,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Master Data Management Analyst,-1,"Master Data Management Analyst

The successful candidate will have the opportunity to work with our client, a multinational IT company specialized in consumer products (hardware & software) and services.

Location: Cupertino, CA

Duration: 10 months contract with possibility of extension.

Candidate must be eligible for direct W2 contract without employment sponsorship.

Job Descriptions:

The Master Data Management Analyst will be responsible of:

Data management, auditing, cleansing, and migration in PLM and SPA ECC environment.
Analyze issues including large data sets to determine root causes and recommend solutions
BOM setup, breakdown and analysis
System implementation and enhancements including scenario development, user acceptance testing, and go-live readiness.

Job Requirements:

Bachelors’ Degree in related fields.
Minimum 3 years of working experience in master data management with experience in analyzing large data set.
Well-versed with SAP ECC, Agile PLM & Excel.
Strong BOM knowledge to setup, breakdown and analyze
Experience in data management, auditing, cleansing, and migration
Strong analytical, debugging and problem-solving skills; must be able to analyze issues including large data sets to determine root causes and recommend solutions
Excellent communication skills, written and verbal, with ability to understand technical problems and clearly explain solutions
Capable of handling multiple deliverables simultaneously with the ability to set priorities
Previous experience with system implementation and enhancements including scenario development, user acceptance testing, and go-live readiness

Why Kelly®?

As a worker today, it’s up to you to take charge of your career and look for opportunities to learn, grow, and achieve your potential. Helping you find what’s next is what we’re all about. We know what’s going on in the evolving world of work—just ask the nearly 500,000 people we employ each year. Connecting with us means getting the support, guidance, and opportunities needed to take your career where you may have never imagined.

About Kelly®

At Kelly, we’re always thinking about what’s next and advising job seekers on new ways of working to reach their full potential. In fact, we’re a leading advocate for temporary/nontraditional workstyles, because we believe they allow flexibility and tremendous growth opportunities that enable a better way to work and live. Connecting great people with great companies is what we do best, and our employment opportunities span a wide variety of workstyles, skill levels, and industries around the world.

Kelly is an equal opportunity employer committed to employing a diverse workforce, including, but not limited to, minorities, females, individuals with disabilities, protected veterans, sexual orientation, gender identity. Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law.
#KellyGTS

]]",3.4,"Kelly
3.4","Cupertino, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1946,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
1,Senior Data Analyst,$83k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to innovate customer experiences and make business decisions smarter through data? Are you ready to join a collaborative and motivated team diving into cutting edge big data technology? As an Senior Data Analyst on the Single View of the Customer (SVOC) team, you’ll thrive in a fast-paced innovative culture that turns data into information, and uses that information to drive action. You will have the opportunity to interact with all our SVOC scrum teams, ensuring that we are incorporating new technologies seamlessly, all while providing value to our customers. This opportunity also allows you to dive in to complex technologies, and work with a very forward-thinking group of peers!

Familiar, but never leveraged big data technologies? No worries! When you first join our SVOC team, you will have the opportunity to come up to speed on the cutting-edge technologies we use to develop SVOC!

Basic Qualifications:

o Significant experience in facilitating the discovery process with functional stakeholders to identify requirements and expected outcomes.
o Experience in developing test plans and scenarios to ensure the highest quality deliverables
o Strong SQL, data mapping, and data profiling skills
o Working knowledge of Big Data and the Hadoop Ecosystem
o Outstanding time management skills and attention to detail
o Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
o Strong presentation skills. Should be comfortable with presenting to all levels of management
o A Bachelor's degree in Information Technology, related field (business, finance, mathematics, computer science), or equivalent professional experience is required

Preferred Qualifications:

o Understanding and experience with Web Services and APIs
o Experience in querying NoSQL databases
o Knowledge and experience working in an Agile environment
o Exposure to QLIK or other data visualization tools
o Experience with providing Production Support

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications

About GEICO:

For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

As a full-time Senior Data Analyst, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

• Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
• Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
• 401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
• Tuition Reimbursement
• Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
2,Principal Business Analyst - Enterprise Data,$70k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our Fortune 500 company is driving a digital transformation and looking for forward-thinking innovators to disrupt how our industry thinks about and uses technology. As one of the world's leading employee benefits providers, we help millions of people gain affordable access to benefits that help them protect their families, their finances and their futures.

Are you an asker of questions, a solver of problems, and a challenger of the status quo? Our mission is to provide a differentiated customer experience and exceed the expectations people have of technology at any company — not just insurers.

We are seeking individuals to join our team of talented IT professionals who share never-ending passion and an unwavering focus on our customer experience. Team members comfortable working in an agile, fast-paced, and delivery-focused environment thrive in our environment where we value an entrepreneurial spirit and those who challenge the status-quo.

Unum is changing, and we’re excited about what’s next. Join us.

General Summary:
Unum's Enterprise Data & Insights team are seeking a Principal Business Analyst to join the leadership team. The successful applicant will be responsible for collaborating with Architects, Product Owners, strategy consultants, and business partners in the development of capability roadmaps for Enterprise Data & Insights. They will take the lead in ensuring that initiatives are prioritized and executed in alignment with the long-term business strategy. They are accountable for the tactical delivery of the strategic components through development of business cases and collaboration and oversight of deliverables with agile teams. They will also contribute ideas and suggestions to the strategic roadmap for the company based on the needs and direction of Enterprise Data.

Job Specifications
Bachelor’s degree required, relevant professional qualification or acceptable industry experience.
8+ years of demonstrated Business Analysis experience
Demonstrable experience working in Agile SDLC environment
Strong insurance or relevant industry experience
Proven track record of success with business delivery (software solutions)
Demonstrates a metrics and financial mindset to ensure ROI for business
Excellent communication skills, both written and oral; ability to translate business strategy into business capability roadmaps.
Demonstrates strong leadership skills
Strong team player; able to lead and work effectively within a team and more broadly with people from a variety of backgrounds and areas across the organization
Proven collaborative and negotiation skills with Technology and Business
Able to deal with significant ambiguity and translate into more tangible outcomes
Certifications strongly encouraged

Principal Duties and Responsibilities
Responsible for the creation and maintenance of an annual or bi-annual capability roadmap for that domain consisting of the highest priority business deliverables
Responsible for the realization of capabilities as features on product backlogs
Collaborates with the business leaders, IT Leadership, Chief Product Owner(s) and Product Owner(s) to ensure the capabilities deliver the expected return on investment and are prioritized accordingly
Collaborates with architects to create digital business capabilities that are innovative and highly capable. May be involved in the definition of external partnership engagement/agreements.
Co-ordinates or participates in tool, technology and service selection, risk assessments and sunsetting in conjunction with technical and business stakeholders ensuring consistency with existing business needs and architectural sustainability.
Leads discussions with Business Analysts, Product Owners, Leaders of Agile Teams and the corresponding management and teams to ensure alignment of priorities. Helps team translate strategic themes and roadmaps to tangible deliverables which can become backlog items
Promotes the development of a strong customer experience
Provides coaching and mentoring for Senior Business Analysts and Business Analysts and ensures consistency of business analyst artifacts and quality of business analysis. Develops and presents business cases for high level initiatives for approval, funding and prioritization
Takes responsibility for Business strategy for that domain through analysis and ensures that feature definitions will deliver the capabilities identified on the short to midterm roadmap
Collaborates with Test Engineers to define and articulate capability acceptance criteria
May serve in a Scrum Master role for an agile team
Effective facilitation of cross team priorities and alignment of short term priorities
Completes business architecture deliverables as part of broad capability team to ensure clarity of direction
Optimizes the user experience across multiple business applications including cloud/third party solutions

#LI-SM!

#LI-MULTI

~IN1

Our company is built on helping individuals and families, and this starts with our employees. We want employees to maintain a positive balance, which is why we provide access to the benefits and resources they need to invest in themselves. From our onsite fitness facilities and generous paid time off to employee professional development programs, we are committed to helping employees live and work their best – both inside and outside the office.

Unum is an equal opportunity employer, considering all qualified applicants and employees for hiring, placement, and advancement, without regard to a person's race, color, religion, national origin, age, genetic information, military status, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or protected veteran status.

Company:

Unum",3.7,"Unum
3.7","Chattanooga, TN",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1848,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
3,Sr Data Analyst - Digital,$80k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

The Data Analyst - Digital role provides a fantastic opportunity to work with a fast-paced and highly functioning Digital Marketing team. This role is responsible for modeling complex Industry problems, discovering Industry insights and identifying opportunities through the use of statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques. This role is also proficient at integrating and preparing large, varied datasets, architecting specialized database and computing environments, that will integrate with the Adobe Experience Cloud (e.g. Adobe Campaign, Adobe Analytics, Audience Manager etc.) focusing in areas of customer segmentation and analytics. Data Analyst work closely with SMEs, data stewards, project/scrum teams, and other IT teams to turn data into critical information.

They will need to validate their findings using an experimental and iterative approach. Also, the Data Analyst will need to be able to present their findings by exposing their assumptions and validation work in a way that can be easily understood using strong written and communication skills. These professionals will need a combination of business focus, strong analytical and problem-solving skills, and programming knowledge to be able to quickly cycle hypothesis validation.

Responsibilities:

JOB DUTIES

Leads discovery processes with GMF stakeholders to identify the business requirements and the expected outcome
Models and frames business scenarios that are meaningful and which impact on critical business processes and/or decisions
Works with and alongside business SMEs by suggesting other products of interest
Collaborates with Institute subject matter experts to select the relevant sources of information
Identifies what data is available and relevant, including internal and external data sources, leveraging new data collection processes
Makes strategic recommendations on data collection, integration and retention requirements incorporating business requirements and knowledge of best practices
Develops innovative and effective approaches to solve client's analytics problems and communicates results and methodologies
Works in iterative processes with the client and validates findings
Develops experimental design approaches to validate finding or test hypotheses
Validates analysis using scenario modeling
Identifies/creates the appropriate algorithm to discover patterns
Assesses, with the business, opportunities to enhance the qualification and assurance of the information to strengthen the use case
Defines the validity of the information, how long the information is meaningful, and what other information it is related to
Partners with the data SMEs in continuous improvement processes impacting data quality in the context of the specific use case
Recommends ongoing improvements to methods and algorithms that lead to findings, including new information
Educates the organization both from IT and the business perspectives on new approaches, such as testing hypotheses and validation of results
Helps the organization understand the principles and the math behind the process to drive organizational buy-in
Contributes business metrics to show performance contribution over iterations
Contributes to on-going reporting metrics and data usage patterns to provide feedback to Marketing Management
Leads the design and deployment of enhancements and fixes to systems as needed
Interface with customers to provide issue resolution for products and processes
Maintain technical and functional awareness and competence of supported business applications, and organizational and industry technology standards
May participate in an on-call rotation that requires after-hours and weekend support for production outages and issues
Perform other duties as assigned
Conform with all company policies and procedures
Qualifications:

Knowledge

Data Strategies including customer segmentation, market segmentation
Marketing Campaign architecture
Marketing Analytics
Data Modeling/Engineering best practices
Delivery Methodologies including Agile, Waterfall, etc.
Thorough working knowledge of information systems and operations
Functional knowledge of the business area or areas assigned to them
Full technical knowledge of systems analysis techniques
Preferred Marketing/CRM platform(s) knowledge such as Adobe Experience Cloud and Google Marketing Suite

Skill

Analysis and reporting using knowledge in one or more of the following frameworks: SQL Server, SAS, or Power-BI
Excellent analytical, organizational, problem solving and follow-up skills with the ability to meet time sensitive deadlines
Must be a self-starter and able to manage the investigations function with minimal supervision
Proficiency with Microsoft Office products
Ability to interact with staff at all levels
Ability to make sound decisions and exercise good judgment
Promote a cooperative and productive team environment
Strong communication and interpersonal skills

Education

Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics or computer science or related field

Experience

5-7 years of relevant quantitative and qualitative research, analytics experience and SQL experience preferred
Knowledge in statistical analysis, quantitative analytics, forecasting/predictive analytics, multivariate testing, and optimization algorithms

Working Conditions

Normal office environment subject to stressful situations

Work is conducted in a professional office environment subject to stressful situations arising from meeting deadlines and managing multiple priorities

Evening and weekend work as required

Some travel to company and vendor sites may be required, including outside the United States

A passport is recommended

#DICE

#LI-KD2",3.2,"GM Financial
3.2","Irving, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
4,Senior Health Data Analyst I,$74k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Senior Health Data Analyst contributes to the overall success of the organization by developing analytic solutions that support activities related to health services utilization management, care coordination, quality improvement and population health. Through analyzing patient claims, member enrollment, and other data, the Senior Health Data Analyst participates in identifying progress, performance and opportunities for improvement on programs, quality of care, patient experience, and other metrics. The Senior Health Data Analyst requires a thorough understanding of healthcare data and workflows, combined with an extensive experience creating large data sets, conducting statistical data analysis (SAS), and using BI tools (Tableau).

Works closely with other members of the Health Analytics team, as well as the Financial Analytics and Data Warehouse teams to gather key data from various internal and external systems.
Creates data sets, extracts and synthesizes data; conducts and interprets quantitative analyses.
Prepares a variety of reports, including statistical analyses and dashboards that allow key stakeholders to make informed business decisions based on data.
Assists in design and development of data collection strategies, aggregation, analysis, and reporting to ensure data integrity and enhance information value.
Generates a quality work product, presentable for content and audience, in a timely manner while maintaining strong attention to detail.
Manages and prioritizes workload while meeting deliverables and expectations.
Works autonomously and collaboratively with report requestors, providing guidance to define report requirements and validate results.
Works collaboratively across departments to understand and meet analytic needs.
Researches and recommends areas for improvement of data quality and reporting.
Maintains in-depth knowledge of health plan operations, including claims processing, utilization management, quality improvement activities and pay for performance programs
Documents report processes/logic and actively engages in department’s documentation efforts to improve knowledge base of team.
SECONDARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Performs other assigned or needed activities required to assure success of the organization.
Participates in special projects as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned.

Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree with concentration in health informatics, health administration, public health, computing, epidemiology, statistics or related field, Master’s degree preferred. Minimum four (4) years of experience in data analysis and reporting.
Special Skills, Licenses and Certifications
Knowledge of major health plan operations: healthcare claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Excellent knowledge of data collection, analysis, statistics and data presentation with experience in data mining techniques and procedures. Experience using statistical packages for analyzing large data sets. Experience working with administrative data, ideally health care data. Understanding of health data formats including claims, lab and pharmacy. Knowledge of clinical coding systems (e.g., ICD9, ICD10, CPT). Proficiency in inferential and predictive statistical analysis. Proficiency in business software applications such as Microsoft Office Suite, SQL, SAS, and Tableau.
Performance Based Competencies
Must demonstrate strong verbal and written communication skills. Ability to clearly communicate complex information to diverse audiences. Ability to communicate data needs to various customers (internal and external) in order to compile and produce necessary reports. Excellent analytical, problem solving, investigative and research ability. Ability to work in a team environment, take and give direction, follow through with tasks and projects, compromise, negotiate and achieve consensus decisions, support consensus decisions, be flexible and adaptable to changes in assignments and the work environment, work independently, manage time efficiently and multi-task effectively. Ability to make decisions that require significant analysis and investigation with solutions requiring critical thinking. Ability to quickly acquire in-depth knowledge of various systems related to claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits at PHC. Ability to present complex information in an understandable and compelling manner. Ability to interpret and understand technical requirements. Must be highly organized and proficient at multi-tasking. Must be willing and able to provide gracious assistance to users, providers, and other constituents of PHC.
Work Environment And Physical Demands
More than 50% of work time is spent at a video display terminal. May be required to bend, stoop, kneel, crawl, or work in other non-standing and non-sitting positions to install cabling, systems hardware, and other related equipment.
All HealthPlan employees are expected to:
Provide the highest possible level of service to clients;
Promote teamwork and cooperative effort among employees;
Maintain safe practices; and
Abide by the HealthPlan’s policies and procedures, as they may from time to time be updated.
IMPORTANT DISCLAIMER NOTICE
The job duties, elements, responsibilities, skills, functions, experience, educational factors and the requirements and conditions listed in this job description are representative only and not exhaustive or definitive of the tasks that an employee may be required to perform. The employer reserves the right to revise this job description at any time and to require employees to perform other tasks as circumstances or conditions of its business, competitive considerations, or work environment change.",3.5,"Partnership HealthPlan of California
3.5","Fairfield, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
5,Digital Transformation and Data Analyst (Claims),$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are You Driven?® We Are.

We are a company of driven, enthusiastic and determined people. We celebrate achievement and success. We foster innovation, determination and recognition. Because of that, our employees feel recognized and rewarded for the contributions they make on a daily basis. At GAINSCO, It is our people that set us apart.

If you are looking for a place where you can make a difference, perceive how your work impacts the company, and be recognized for your efforts and passion, then GAINSCO is the company for you.

Why Join GAINSCO?

By joining GAINSCO, you become part of a dynamic and growing organization that has been recognized as a Top Workplace in both our Dallas and Miami offices.

GAINSCO’s work environment rewards engaged individuals who have a desire to contribute and succeed. That’s because our culture encourages individuals to grow their skills as they build their careers. Come join us and become a champion with GAINSCO.

What does a DIGITAL TRANSFORMATION& DATA ANALYST (CLAIMS) do?
Uncover and communicate performance trends and actionable insights to the business.
Leverage data insights and incorporate these findings to accelerate the digital transformation efforts of the Claims Department.
Complete ad-hoc analysis and offer recommendations based on your findings.
Proactively collaborate with all levels of the Claims organization and offer data-focused support to any relevant business challenges.
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop, implement and maintain business monitoring reports
Perform data validation and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and data quality/accuracy
Work with IT to maintain accessibility to databases/data systems
Additional projects as requested
What is required?

Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Risk Management, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics or Actuarial.
Experience:
1-2 years of working experience as a data analyst preferred
Ability to identify potentially hidden trends and communicate actionable insights based on your findings.
Experience working within an Auto Insurance Claims department is preferred.
Advanced skills in performing mathematical calculations
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Advanced computer skills, specifically in databases and spreadsheets (Excel, SAS, MSSQL preferred, Python, R)
Experience with Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence is preferred.
Excellent written and verbal communication
Excellent organization skills
Other skills and abilities:
A strong desire to be a part of the conversations that result in improving business processes and results.
Ability to communicate and simplify the complex with a wide variety of stakeholders.
Ability to manage own time while prioritizing multiple tasks
Required behaviors for all positions:
Communicate with co-workers, management, customers, vendors, and others in a courteous and professional manner
Conform with and abide by all Company codes, regulations, policies, values, work procedures and instructions
Regular attendance
What else do you need to know?
Competitive Salary based on experience.
Excellent benefits package: medical& dental (Basic plan FREE), vision insurance, life insurance, short term and long term disability insurance.
Parental Leave Policy.
401K + Company Match.
Paid Vacation + Sick days + Floating Holidays + Company determined Holidays.
All offers are contingent upon a background investigation (including employment, education, criminal and DMV verification- when applicable) and a pre-employment drug test with results satisfactory to GAINSCO.",3.8,"GAINSCO
3.8","Dallas, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
6,Programmer and Data Analyst,$38k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Carillon Assisted Living is actively seeking a Programmer and Data Analyst for our corporate office in Raleigh, NC. The Programmer and Data Analyst manages the Programming and Analysis department including developing project plans from internal requests and implementing those plans from initial concept to full production. The department runs primarily on ad-hoc requests with a wide variety of skills necessary to implement the associated projects. The Programmer and Data Analyst must be versatile and excellent at time management. A typical week involves:

Meeting with the CEO and VPO to discuss priorities, statuses of current projects and any requests for new projects
Meeting with outside software vendors to discuss any necessary implementation, customization or integrations
Aiding in the implementation, customization and integrations for third-party software
Designing and proposing plans for projects or analysis necessary to fulfill new requests
Completing or delegating to the team tasks related to any current projects. Tasks generally include:
Developing SQL databases to store data for either program development or data warehousing
Pulling data through outside vendor APIs to move into on-prem data warehouse or to use in in-house programming or reporting
Supporting business decision making processes through analytical analysis of available options
Full-stack programming of any requested web applications
Determining necessary data and analyzing that data to answer questions posed by the VPO and CEO
Developing data visualizations and reports for ad-hoc or continual business analysis
Developing mathematical models for predictive analysis and forecasting
Scheduling and managing team meetings and deadlines for timely project completion
Ensuring all auto-generated reports send on the proper schedule

Qualifications

Required

Bachelors degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or other analytical field
5 or more years of experience in programming and analysis
2 or more years in a management role
1-2 years of experience in business decision making processes, including analyzing and determining a cohesive software suite and developing technical policies and procedures
Excellent communication skills for conveying technical material to non-technical audiences
Experience with full lifecycle project management, including both application development and other large scale projects directed from initial request to full production
Ability to manage multiple project requests with varying priorities and deadlines
Experience maintaining company software suite including implementing customizations and integrations
Experience in full-stack web application development, preferably with C# and Angular 5+
Experience with report development and data visualization, preferably with SSRS
Experience in database development and management including on-prem data warehousing
Experience writing advanced SQL queries and procedures
Working knowledge of REST API's
Experience analyzing data to answer business questions, both on an ad-hoc and routine basis
Experience with Microsoft Excel including writing custom VBA add-ins

Preferable

Masters degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or other analytical field
7 or more years of experience in programming and analysis
3 or more years in a management role
3 or more years in business decision making processes
Experience with BPM tools
Advanced skill set in Microsoft Office Suite including Excel, Word and Visio
Mathematical modeling abilities including stochastic models and linear optimization",2.0,"Carillon Assisted Living
2.0","Raleigh, NC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
7,Data Quality Analyst,$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

The Data Steward at Southern Management Corporation is responsible for helping drive that improvement in the accessibility and quality of our data assets and tools and allow us to deliver data solutions faster than we do today. This role will be intertwined will all aspects of the business and their vendors to accomplish a robust and comprehensive understanding of the data and how it is intertwined. Our goal is to ensure ability to grow is unconstrained by any limitations of our data.

Responsibilities:
Create and evolve Enterprise Data Standards for SMC including:
Business Terms
Business Definitions
Critical Data Elements
Business Rules
Define and execute processes to monitor data integrity and privacy, establish consistent data definitions, and monitor overall data quality for assigned data entities
Partner with Data Architect Team and business to maintain a business data model and ensure data is aligned across the business
Keep management informed on day-to-day activities and potential risks found
Keep customer engaged by providing feedback on data quality trends and making sure that they are part of the resolution process
Other tasks as assigned
Qualifications:

Education & Experience

Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience
1-3 years of experience in Data Quality, Data Stewardship, Business Analytics, ETL, Business Intelligence

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:

SQL experience preferred
Passionate about Data Quality
Ability to triage and prioritize tasks based on the business needs
Knowledge of data quality, data management, and master data management concepts
High level of accuracy and attention to detail
Ability to deal with ambiguous situations
Understanding of Data Warehousing concepts
Ability to interface with the business leaders
Proactive and able to work in an autonomous work environment
Proven data gathering and analytical skills
Expertise with Microsoft Office",3.3,"Southern Management Corporation
3.3","Greenville, SC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
8,People Data Analyst,-1,"About the team


The Analytics team at Miro has a clear mission - use data to make better decisions. We are a highly leveraged team of folks who pride ourselves on finding ways to answer even the most challenging business questions.

About the role


You understand people and the HR team, and enjoy using data and analytics to bring order to ambiguous problems. From building visualizations to help our People team understand talent trends, to helping model out our plan to meet our hiring goals, you will bring the analytical power to help us win the talent marketplace.

What you'll do


You will be working closely with the Head of People and Head of Business Recruiting. The work will be split among the following 3 buckets:
Design source of truth tables for level 0/1 metrics. Enable access to key metrics and data for non-analysts. Promote use of 'self service' analytics tools by associated teams.
Help structure People Analytics at Miro - work with the stakeholder to identify the right metrics to track and guardrails to monitor to measure success. For example, help us understand our diversity and retention or model capacity based on historical data.
Measure the progress of the People team at Miro - build the core dashboards to help us understand the performance and throughput of our recruiting funnels.
Know where to find the right data to answer a question. Be persistent in ensuring data quality and resourceful in getting data that is not immediately available
Support everyday decision making process for People team
Build next generation reporting for team level 0/1 metrics
Participate in team meetings, understand key metrics of team performance, suggest key metrics and visualizations that need to be regularly reviewed
Provide the team with weekly metrics updates. Proactively analyze large week-over-week or Plan vs Actuals deviations. Recommend operational changes that can drive increased performance. Generate business hypotheses of what drove those deviations.
Find the stories buried in data and build insightful dashboards that enable everyone at Miro to be an analyst
Ensure the team leadership is focused on the most critical questions to optimize Miro's business opportunity
For example, produce recruiting competency factor analysis to improve our hiring process
Bring clarity to overall recruiting funnel and areas that strategically require the most attention
Be a vocal and proactive partner to stakeholders. Guide their line of questioning rather than just fulfilling requests. Provide insights and conclusions rather than data outputs
What you'll need
4+ years of Analytics experience
Some experience in People Analytics/People Ops is required
Experience working in a fast growing startup is a plus
You deliver results quickly with iteration, instead of waiting for perfection
You love telling stories with data - numbers are key, but a business is built with people.
Cross-functional relationships and effective communication are critical to make an impact
Humble, no ego
What's in it for you
Excellent Medical, Dental + Vision health benefits
Scrappy startup environment with hyper growth potential where you'll learn best in class skills
Competitive salaries + Flexible time off
401k matching + Stock options
Free lunches + Office snacks
Be a part of a culture of learning that will take your professional growth to another level with collaborative + thoughtful team members
Distributed team across offices globally in San Francisco, Los Angeles, Austin, Amsterdam, + Perm
About Miro


Miro is an online collaborative whiteboard platform that enables distributed teams to work effectively together, from running brainstorming sessions and workshops to planning projects, from designing new products and services to facilitating agile ceremonies. With over 8 million users, Miro is trusted by Dell, Cisco, Salesforce, PWC, EY, Deloitte and many more global companies of all sizes.

At Miro, we are a team of dreamers. We look for individuals who dream big, work hard and above all stay humble. Collaboration is at the heart of what we do and through our work together we hope to create a supportive, welcoming, and innovative environment. We strive to play as a team to win the world and create a better version of ourselves everyday. If this sounds like something that excites you, we want to hear from you!

Check out our career page for all our open roles or hop onto this Miro board to learn more about us!",4.7,"Miro
4.7","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
9,Data Reporting Analyst for Non-Profit Service Program,-1,"The Data Management & Reporting Manager provides overall Data Analysis and reporting support for the Mission Services Department of Goodwill. This is an exciting career opportunity to gain relevant work experience in Data Analysis.

40%- Oversees the management of the Front Desk Operations of the Center, including supervising one full-time Reception Clerk. Develops methods to further automate intake processes as well as automate support and administrative processes and Information. Maintains department Sharepoint to ensure ease of use and completeness of materials shared.

60%- Oversees the client tracking database structure. Ensure quality data within the database. Prioritizes inbound data analytics and reporting work requests. Works with program staff and leadership to consult, advise, and perform various ad-hoc and project-based data analysis and reports. This includes both routine operational data analysis and reporting, as well as customized, ad-hoc and business intelligence oriented work.

Required:

1) Knowledge of SharePoint tools like ULS Logs, workflows to automate business processes, and SharePoint forms for tasks as well as document storage.

2) Advanced Excel.

3) Database structure knowledge

4) Some SQL preferred

5) Loads of customer services

No certifications are required. Preference will be given to candidates with a related degree from an accredited college or university.
Please complete the two Indeed Assessments required to be considered for this position: 1) Data Analysis and 2) Phone Screening.*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $14.00 - $16.00 per hour

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Daily temperature checks, masks and sanitizing supplies required.

Experience:
Office Management/Supervising front desk: 1 year (Required)
Sharepoint (Office 365): 1 year (Preferred)
Data Analysis: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Tallahassee, FL (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
goodwillbigbend.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/GoodwillBigBend
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Goodwill Industries, Big Bend","Tallahassee, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
10,Data Analyst - Brand Strategy & Communications,$37k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Ayco is an industry pioneer and preeminent leader of company-sponsored financial counseling services.

We believe companies best serve their stakeholders and the greater economy when their employees’ financial lives are clear, understood and in their own control. For nearly 50 years, we’ve aspired to deliver a more productive and engaged workforce to our clients by providing their employees a path to financial well-being through holistic and personalized services tailored for each stage of the career cycle—from entry-level to C-suite.

Training: Ayco has a best-in-class new hire training program, covering the technical and practical elements of the job. Initial new hire training includes a combination of classroom learning, practical exercises, and shadowing of existing associates. Through Ayco and Goldman Sachs University, new hires have access to classes that focus on building foundational professional and technical skills, to culture and learning focused training. We take a personal approach to talent development and foster an environment that values different perspectives, challenges thinking and maximizes the potential of our people. Our annual and ongoing feedback ensures our people and their managers have the information they need to excel in their careers.

Diversity & Inclusion: Ayco values the different perspectives and experiences our associates bring. The firm supports the Ayco Diversity Network, an employee-led initiative open to all associates that provides education and awareness on topics of interest to diverse communities. In addition, our firm wide diversity and inclusion efforts expand professional and career development opportunities through programs such as the Women’s Advisor Initiative to support our commitment to having the best talent at all levels.

Benefits & Wellness: From benefits to wellness, we aim to support your commitment to your job as well as your priorities and interests outside of work.

Career Advancement: Ayco offers coaching, mentoring and on-the-job learning that supports your growth and development.

Visit Ayco.com/careers for more information about the firm

Responsibilities


We have an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst to join the Brand Strategy and Communications group in Cohoes, NY. This role sits at the intersection of marketing, product, sales, and customer engagement teams, providing measurement and reporting support for cross-channel campaigns.

• Measure and analyze marketing performance of owned channels and cross-channel campaigns (e.g., Web, SEO, Paid Ads, Affiliates, Email, Social Media, etc.) and prepare regular performance reports for the Brand Strategy team and senior management• Work with the website product owner on design of site experiments, implementing and testing personalization opportunities and A/B testing• Continually assess and audit web analytics effectiveness, funnel optimizations and ensure data is accurate • Work with team leads across marketing, engagement and sales on key growth metrics and reporting framework and lead the build of cross-channel dashboards through use of data visualization tools • Be an analytics lead to identify improvements to reporting procedures or advise on technology gaps• Support the implementation of additional analytics toolsets (e.g., Qlikview, Content Square, Tableau, etc.)• Collaborate across functions – Sales Strategy, Sales, Product, and Technology- to discover new sources of data and evangelize data-driven decision making• Mine data from existing databases and extract clear and actionable insights • Work with the Brand Strategy team to develop strong content around extracted data insights that support Ayco’s business goals • Work with the Brand Strategy team to develop, analyze and report on bespoke research studies with internal and external audiences• Work with the Lead management team to develop processes to automate the ingestion, cleaning and categorization of leads• Create reports and dashboards that track leads across the Marketing and Sales funnel, clearly tracking lead stages, lead velocity, lead conversions, revenues • Deliver on ad-hoc data requests, queries, reports and analysis as required

Preferred technology experience: • R / Python / SQL / Alteryx• Tableau / Qlikview• Adobe Analytics / Google Analytics• Adobe Campaign (reports) / Marketo / Pardot• Adobe Dynamic Tag Manager / Google Tag Manager• Adobe Target or other site personalization/recommendation tool• Salesforce / other CRM platforms

Qualifications


• Minimum 2 years of professional experience in an analytics role working full-time with Marketing or Data Analytics teams• Minimum Bachelor’s degree required; Major in data science, mathematics, statistics, engineering, computer science, business analytics or related field • Hands on analytical and measurement experience of digital channels such as Web, SEO, E-mail, Affiliates, Paid Ads, Social Media • Basic understanding of the Adobe Marketing Cloud products• Knowledge of web development technologies - JavaScript, HTML, SQL is preferred• Experience with web personalization, A/B Testing, funnel conversion optimization is preferred• Creative mindset to ideate and test concepts to optimize online and offline audience experiences and maximize user engagement for each digital channel• Experience in modeling and creating compelling insights from data• Highly organized with excellent attention to detail",3.3,"Ayco, a Goldman Sachs Company
3.3","Cohoes, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1971,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
11,Workforce Data Analyst,$33k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Career Steps Inc.*

*Position Description*

*Title*: Workforce Analyst

*Reports To*: President/CEO

*Exempt*: Yes No

*Supervisory Responsibilities*: No

*Position Summary*

The Workforce Analyst will be part of the CSI Management team to track and report on internal performance, . The position will additionally work with Center staff to ensure that the local operating procedures provide appropriate guidance for front line staff and to evaluate system efficiencies. *This is not an IT position.*

*Essential Skills*

* Strong analytical skills
* Strong data analysis skills
* Solid communication skills
* Detail-oriented/critical thinking skills
* Creativity - thinking outside the box
* Excellent problem-solving skills

*Essential Responsibilities*

* Oversees, collects, compiles, analyzes, and interprets workforce data and information data for the workforce system, management and staff
* Provides detailed analysis of the data in support of the workforce system goals and provides staff with the tools to monitor and achieve performance targets
* Evaluate center staff caseloads and performance then share information with management
* Prepares and provide presentations for staff to individual or in a group setting.
* Track Internal performance using Power Bi and Excel
* Review State performance reports
* Provide guidance on Local Operating Procedures
* Identify CSI and Career and Training Services front line staff in need of training
* Report identified training issues to the and CSI management
* Report weekly trends to CSI management staff
* Other duties as assigned

*Qualification Requirements*

Bachelor’s degree or higher preferred.

PBA (Professional in Business Analyst) preferred

Proficient in Microsoft Office Products including Power BI and expert level Excel skills

Exceptional Customer Service

Excellent oral and written communication skills

Knowledge of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act preferred.

*Working Conditions*

This is an administrative office occupation comprised of work that generally involves sitting at a desk or standing in office situations. Travel may be required between all 3 CSFV centers.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $24.00 - $30.00 per hour

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) matching
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* 8 hour shift

Benefit Conditions:
* Only full-time employees eligible

Work Remotely:
* No",3.0,"Career Steps, Inc
3.0","Daytona Beach, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
12,Intern - Data Analyst,-1,"Join Episerver in an exciting Internship as a Data Analyst with our Product Team.

As a Data Analyst Intern, you will:
Analyzing historical win/loss data as well as identifying trends in the business
Analyzing product usage by region and customer
Developing reports for C suite
Requirements:
Interested in business
Must be pursuing a Bachelors degree with a major finance or business
Needs to know Excel with experience building pivot tables
This internship will be for 6 months long, 20-25 hours/week, remote-based USA. You will be compensated at $18.00/hour. There are no benefits offered.",4.3,"Episerver
4.3",United States,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
13,Senior Data Analyst - CRM,$44k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Zeta Global CRM division provides email, database and interactive marketing services worldwide to clients, the company’s services include strategic campaign planning and optimization, test design, creative development (including rich media), campaign execution, web application development, research, and advanced analytics.

The Analytics team is currently seeking a Senior Analyst. As a Senior Analyst, you will use a variety of data sources and software tools such as SQL, Excel and internal tools to develop reports and insights based on specification provided by clients or client analytical leads.

Primary Job Responsibilities:
Work with digital marketing and CRM partners to understand clients’ requests, design proper metrics reports and dashboard.
Handle data gathering and analysis construction with a variety of data sources and tools.
Develop reports and customized analysis, data organizing and cleansing, and analysis and presentation
Create easy-to-understand data visualization, presentations and provide logical insights and actionable recommendations to clients.
Work with BI and technical team to prioritize and identify the opportunity to automate reports.
Streamline the reporting process; develop repeatable and scalable process and coding across multiple systems and platforms
Work with various businesses and technical teams to make sure the data presented are accurate and flawless.
Well document the standard reporting or analysis procedures and other necessary documents.
Job Requirements:
Minimum Bachelor’s degree in Computer Programming, Statistics, Marketing Analytics or related technical/quantitative field; Master degree a plus
Minimum 3 years of professional experience in an analytical role (prior experience in Agency/consulting or Email industry a plus), digital marketing, database marketing and web analytics a plus
Experience working in rational database, SQL coding, SAS or R or Python programming and extensive Excel skills
Experience working in BI tools, such as Tableau, Microstrategy, Jasper, etc.
Experience in development, presentation and/or deployment of predictive model and segmentation is strongly preferred; knowledge of Machine Learning approaches a plus
Experience working with 3rd party data providers such as Acxiom, IRI a plus
Able to take broad specifications or requests from client and ask the right “questions” to help fine tune the request to help deliver reporting needs. Be able to conduct data investigation when issue arises both independently and/or working with cross functional technical resources, if required, to solve problem
Good verbal and written communication skills; Attention to details, be able to identify data gaps/abnormality in output
Able to plan, organize, & work on multiple projects at once
#LI-MC1

About Zeta Global
Zeta Global is a data-powered marketing technology company with a heritage of innovation and industry leadership. Founded in 2007 by entrepreneur David A. Steinberg and John Sculley, former CEO of Apple Inc and Pepsi-Cola, the Company combines the industry’s 3rd largest proprietary data set (2.4B+ identities) with Artificial Intelligence to unlock consumer intent, personalize experiences and help our clients drive business growth.

Our technology runs on the Zeta Marketing Platform, which powers ‘end to end’ marketing programs for some of the world’s leading brands. With expertise encompassing all digital marketing channels – Email, Display, Social, Search and Mobile – Zeta orchestrates acquisition and engagement programs that deliver results that are scalable, repeatable and sustainable.

Zeta Global is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, ancestry, color, religion, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, medical condition, disability, veterans status, or any other basis protected by law.

Zeta Global Recognized in Enterprise Marketing Software and Cross-Channel Campaign Management Reports by Independent Research Firm

https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zeta-global-opens-ai--data-labs-in-san-francisco-and-nyc-300945353.html

https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zeta-global-recognized-in-enterprise-marketing-software-and-cross-channel-campaign-management-reports-by-independent-research-firm-300938241.html",3.3,"Zeta Global
3.3","East Lansing, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
14,Data Analyst,$41k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst *
National healthcare organization offering a work atmosphere committed to statistical and analytical quality while exploring and leveraging leading edge methodologies for product customization and development. We are looking for an individual who enjoys designing and building report deliverables and using data to answer challenging patient care and business questions, all within a dynamic team environment. We are interested in individuals with the ability to learn quickly, solve problems creatively, and that bring strong communication skills and work ethic while delivering innovative, high quality reporting and analyses to our clients.

This role plays a critical part in designing and building standardized health outcomes reports for our clients. Applicants should have SQL expertise in a SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) environment that includes, at minimum, experience using subqueries to pull database results. Technical report building skills, combined with data management and statistical skills, will be used to drive improvements in patient care. Advanced knowledge and experience with “real world” data and an interest in behavioral health/clinical outcomes are required. A successful member of our data science team will have a natural curiosity for research, an aptitude for analytics, a desire for data-driven decision making, and interest in improving mental health treatment and outcomes.
Summary of Major Functions *
Provide support to Senior Data Scientist and other Data Scientists in standardized report design and building, data management, data cleaning, and analysis. Drafting both standardized and ad hoc analytics reports for non-technical audiences including visual displays of results. Write new SPSS syntax code and/or modify existing code to conduct analyses. Verify accuracy of reports produced by other Data Scientists.

_The ideal candidate has experience building automated reports in an SSRS environment, or at minimum a desire to learn this skill. _
Minimum Qualifications *
_*Ability to: *_
• Conduct complex SQL queries, including the use of subqueries within a main query
• Perform analytics to drive clinical decision making.
• Use statistical modeling software (i.e., SAS/R/Python Pandas/Stata/SPSS experience) to perform analytics, including writing syntax or code.
• Communicate complex statistical results to non-technical audiences orally, in text, and with visualizations.
• Conduct statistical tests, including but not limited to t-tests, Pearson’s correlation, cross-tabulation with chi-square, and one-way ANOVA.
• Meet deadlines and work diligently as both part of a team and individually.

_*Has: *_
• Organizational and problem solving skills, attention to detail, and strong communication skills, oral and written.
• Critical thinking and logical, analytical skills.
• Proficiency in Microsoft Suite products such as Word, PowerPoint, and Excel.
• Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Mathematics or another quantitative field, such as Psychology, Economics, or Sociology and 2+ years of experience.
Preferred Qualifications *
_Also Has: _
• Experienced in using BIDS (Business Intelligence Development Studio) or SSRS to build reports containing data tables and visual displays of data
• Experience using Python within SPSS
• Exposure to health care data, specifically mental health and surveys.
• Research/publication background
• Proficiency in more advanced multivariate statistical models, such as MANCOVA, multiple regression, or logistic regression.
• Exposure to nonparametric statistical tests like Spearman’s correlation, Mann Whitney U, or Kruskal Wallis.
• Master’s degree in Statistics, Mathematics or another quantitative field, such as Psychology, Economics, or Sociology and 5+ years of experience.
To submit your resume please click ""Apply Now"". *
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
SPSS, SAS, Stata, Python Pandas, or R statistical software: 2 years (Required)
SQL queries: 1 year (Required)
t-tests, Pearson's correlation, chi-square, one way ANOVA: 2 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
WILL YOU NOW OR IN THE FUTURE REQUIRE SPONSORSHIP FOR EMPLOYMENT VISA STATUS? (E.G. H-1B VISA STATUS)",3.2,"Horizon Health
3.2","Lewisville, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
15,Intern - Data Analyst - Summer,$57k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the Strategic Planning and Transformation organization will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Data Analyst interns will have the potential to assist in data governance initiatives through data modeling and centralization. The internship will take place in Broomfield, CO from 6/1/2021 - 8/13/2021.

In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engaging with our employee resource groups and developing their professional skills and business acumen through exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Launch your career with Lumen and be a part of something amazing!

Job Description
Implement software to master key data sets and attributes
Set up a common repository for data for cross- functional use across the organization
Consolidate data sets
Qualifications

Minimum Requirements:
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
In pursuit of bachelor’s or master’s in information systems or related degree program
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
US work authorization is required
Experience with data analysis, statistics, and database management
Experience using PowerPoint, Vizio, Sway, or similar tools
Preferred Qualifications:
Cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher
Oral presentation skills
Problem solving abilities, techniques
Data visualization tools
Knowledge of data modeling concepts
Basic programming and user experience design knowledge
SQL (structured query language)
Scripting languages (shell scripts, python, Perl, others)
Web design and build – HTML5, JavaScript, CSS
Programming language – any one of Java, JavaScript, C#, R, Python, others
Organizational skills
Ability to work well in team settings, collaborative environment
Negotiation, convincing, consensus building skills
Requisition #: 234855

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Broomfield, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
16,Data Analyst,$38k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Aculabs, a biomedical laboratory located In East Brunswick New Jersey, is a leader in providing laboratory services to the geriatric population in the mid-atlantic region. Aculabs is accredited and certified by both the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA) and the College of American Pathologists (CAP), the most prestigious organizational accreditation awards within the United States.

We are currently seeking an enthusiastic data analyst who is experienced or interested in the healthcare field to gather, combine, and interpret data from numerous platforms in order to assist in enhancing the quality of care to our facilities and improving efficiencies.

Our ideal candidate will have the following qualifications:

· Attention to detail

· Extremely organized

· Excellent verbal, written, and communication skills

· Extensive computer skills including SQL, Access, Excel

· Ability to develop analytical strategies to resolve issues with a mindset for growth

· Ability to interpret statistical data in order to create meaningful solutions that will aid in increasing company efficiency

· Collaborate with company President, Director of Operations, and departmental heads in order to create necessary reports

· Prior experience in the healthcare/laboratory space preferred

· Bachelor’s Degree in related field preferred
Willing to work out of East Brunswick, NJ office. This position does not offer remote days.",2.3,"Aculabs Inc.
2.3","East Brunswick, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
17,"Analyst, Enterprise Data Office",$38k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description Summary

The HarbourVest Enterprise Data Office acts as a facilitator and coordinator of data governance, data acquisition, and data strategy across the organization. The Analyst will be responsible for measuring data quality, performing root cause analysis, building data remediation plans, implementing data controls, reviewing and maintaining data quality standards, as well as other activities oriented towards improving data management across the organization.

Job Skills & Abilities
Experience doing data analysis is required
Strong analytical capabilities
Comfortable working with large datasets and multiple data sources
Good communication and persuasion skills
Demonstrated understanding of data quality principles and measurement
Project team experience is a plus
Highly proactive and self-motivated with the ability to meet objectives under minimal supervision
Strong presentation abilities
Experience working in an enterprise or cross-functional role is a plus
Private Equity industry knowledge is a plus
Excellent organization skills
Good time management capabilities
Strong affinity for data and attention to detail
Experience using data management tools is a plus
Responsibilities

Data Quality Monitoring and Reporting: 75%
Monitor and report on data quality across the organization, particularly for designated Critical Data Elements
Create and update data quality dashboards for respective data domains on a regular (monthly) basis
Design and develop data quality monitoring, including the development of data quality rules, thresholds and metrics for key investment management data concepts
Prepare materials for regular routines with business and IT stakeholders
Participate in data quality issue root cause analysis and assist in designing action plans for remediation
Partner with domain data stewards to deep dive into data quality issues
Stay current with industry trends on data quality evaluation strategies, automation techniques and data visualization tools
Data Strategy and Standards: 25%
Maintain Enterprise Data Office SharePoint site, including the business glossary
Assist in creating data policies and procedures and ensure teams adhere to these standards
Define and measure cross-domain performance against data quality standards
Education

BS/BA or equivalent

Work Experience

2-5 years of relevant experience",4.0,"Harbourvest
4.0","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
18,SAP Data Analyst,$75k-$100k (Employer Est.),"POSITION PURPOSE:

The Data Analyst will be part of the OWI Analytic team, working closely with our business partners, proactively developing and delivering analytic solutions. The primary deliverables include creating data visualization such as Dashboards, Charts, Histograms and Projective Analysis. This will be accomplished by utilizing OWI data architecture, data workflows from local data sources.

OWI is a fast-paced and dynamic organization. Individuals will be handling multiple activities in a team as well as individual contributor environment.

DUTIES, TASKS AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Experience and expertise creating visualizations that provide business insights for our global customers. Examples: Pie Charts, Dashboards, Cash-flow projections with Histograms– Projections analysis– Financial Analysis – KPI’s Service level Agreements
Expertise in SQL, independently mine data to translate Business data needs into creative visualizations.
Performance tuning specific to Tableau data sets– requires in depth understanding of data.
Assist the Enterprise Data Warehouse team create, design data models that will be published to our Tableau environment.
Assess data quality, design data quality management procedures, clean and correct data quality defects, establish data governance.
Experienced utilizing HANA studio including calculations and analytical views, data base schemas, creating attribute user/role creation.
Assist setting up security, Analytic privileges, user integration services, SQL script, SLT, SDA, SDI and HANA Live solution models.
Demonstrate critical thinking, analytical skills, and employ judgment to offer thoughtful, concise input toward resolutions of problems.
Assist team building the BW4HANA modeler including standard and custom development and deployment of EWD design building BW objects e.g. Composite Providers, Advanced DSO’s, ODS Views, Data Sources, Data Loading using SLT.
Requires the skill set to work with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams and data analysts/scientists to develop data visualizations that provide business insights
Finance/Operations/Sales/Marketing/IT functional leads PTP/PTM/RTR etc.
Projects management capabilities - include requirements gathering, design, deployment, and change request, future enhancements management
Capabilities to build/design prototypes to demo to stakeholders - peer groups, Business partners, and senior leaders.
Training and support peers and stakeholders e.g. Subject Matter Expert (SME) throughout the report creations and support - troubleshooting, analysis of results.
Leadership skills needed to successfully promote ideas, coordinate work activities, and plan deliverables within a project team.


SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE AND ABILITIES:


Advanced expert database handling languages (SQL and variants)
Experience with data analytics, diagrams, data dictionary, data mapping, normalize de-normalize, agile data modeling
Practical skill sets in BI and Data visualization tools
Working knowledge of ETL
Working knowledge of SAP
Basic Project Management and Business Process modeling
Minimum Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering Technology, Computer Science, or closely related field.
A minimum of 3 years’ experience in Tableau, SAP Data Governance, SAP Data Services (Data Extract, Data Profiling, de-duplication)
Advanced competency in Tableau and Alteryx
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with a strong focus on the ability to clearly articulate and discuss technical issues with both technical and business personnel.
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, Math or a related IT field or equivalent work experience in an IT field required
Strong analytical skills, able to effectively solve problems in a timely manner",3.1,"Old World Industries
3.1","Northbrook, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
19,Business Data Analyst - Medical Economics,$60k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a member of the Medical Economics team, you will manage the data and analytic reporting and analysis to support CareCentrix strategic and tactical needs, and to fulfill contractual requirements for external health plan clients. You will analyze extensive financial and healthcare utilization data to develop insights that support business decision and cost savings for CareCentrix.

In this Job, you will:
Under the direction of senior team members, perform analysis of complex and varied healthcare data.
Extract, collect, analyze and interpret data of various types from various sources/
Create Ad-Hoc reports using SQL.
Develop and maintain dashboards of key performance metrics.
Make assessments about health care costs and trends, quality and outcomes.
Present reports and analytic results.
Document issues and problems regarding data sets.
Provide design support for the development of business intelligence solutions.
You will enjoy this role if:
You love data mining and data manipulation, the larger the data set the better!
You love to learn and are curious to understand the nuances of a situation.
You like to move fast.
You enjoy working through ambiguity and a changing market environment.

This job is for you if:
You have a Bachelor's Degree in Machine Learning, Information Technology, Finance, Economics, Statistics or similar.
You have 1-3 years background in data management and healthcare industry (preferred).
You think in quantitative terms. You know Excel, SQL, Tableau and a little about Teradata or Vertica.
You have knowledge of big data concepts.
You have strong focus on process, continuous process improvement and quality
You have some answers but not all of them. You approach problems with questions not answers.
You are fun to work with! We take our commitment to patients seriously, but we don’t take ourselves seriously. We are looking for team members who bring joy to the work they do.

CareCentrix maintains a drug-free workplace.
We are an equal opportunity employer. Employment selection and related decisions are made without regard to age, race, color, national origin, religion, sex, disability, sexual orientation, gender identification, or being a qualified disabled veteran or qualified veteran of the Vietnam era or any other category protected by Federal or State law.",3.9,"CareCentrix
3.9","Tampa, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
20,Configuration and Data Management Analyst III,$37k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

The successful Configuration Management and Data Analyst will support a new program at Perspecta, focused on baseline establishment and management of a new Space Domain architecture. This CM Analyst will be responsible t establish the technical baseline including all cross-space and ground segment interfaces and to lower levels for interfaces considered to be key to inter- or intra-segment interoperability; Support baseline development for the Segments; Identify disconnects between segments and external agencies, and work the issues to closure; Develop system and segment level requirements that allow the Mission Users to effectively and efficiently interoperate and submit the requirements to the change process.

Baseline Management tasks include establish a formal process for capturing the baseline and managing changes and distribution; Employ this process to identify, control, maintain, make recommendations to evolve, and execute changes to technical baselines; Use change management software to mitigate the risk of unauthorized and unplanned changes to the technical baseline, including document content and the associated links; Provide user access to all databases used to manage the technical baseline; Perform requirements analysis in response to requested changes, addressing flow‐down, and changes to systems engineering products such as ICDs and verification plans; Maintain interface control for all ICDs/ISs that involve interaction between segments, contractors, or external agencies.

The CM Analyst will organize, facilitate and provide agendas, briefings and minutes for all System and Segment level CM‐related boards, forums and working groups.

Qualifications

Requires 5 to 8 years with BS/BA or 3 to 5 years with MS/MA or 0 to 2 years with PhD, or at least 5 years as a CM/DM Analyst.
Experience required supporting similar DoD or Space Domain Configuration Management Efforts
Experience with agile COTS Configuration Management Tools
Minimum TS Clearance required

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
21,Senior Marketing Data Analyst,$58k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Avant is revolutionizing the world of lending by lowering the costs and barriers of borrowing for everyday people. At our core, we are a technology company that builds advanced platforms and uses custom analytics. Today, we help underserved consumers, the majority of whom get fast funding on our online platform without having to talk to anyone. Tomorrow we plan to use our world class technology and underwriting capabilities to launch new products and bank partnerships that improve people’s financial lives.

We are looking for a highly energetic Marketing Analytics Associate to join our Marketing Team as we grow Avant’s digital banking business, loan, credit card, and more. The right candidate possesses a passion for driving Marketing initiatives using analytical techniques and thrive in the complex environment of experimentation design, marketing optimization, and ROI. This position will report to the Head of Marketing Analytics and work with cross-functional teams consisting of Product, Risk, Operations, and Compliance. Do you want to help a rapidly ascending FinTech company drive its next phase of growth? If so, Avant is looking for you.
What you do at Avant:
Own and drive strategic analytical projects and insights to influence and support Avant’s Marketing initiatives
Perform in-depth Marketing funnel analysis to drive insights on attribution, causation, and incremental lift
Choose accurate metrics for tracking, measuring, optimizing, and improving marketing campaigns across traditional and digital channels.
Drive standardization for data collection procedures to generate information that is relevant for building analytic systems
Develop reports and provide insights behind the data to help marketers be effective.
Collaborate with stakeholders to define and operationalize KPIs for short- and long-term measurements that align with company financial goals and marketing strategy.
Implement and analyze A/B or Multivariate Tests to provide measurable insights to the marketing team on the test data.
Present findings to senior management to drive business and marketing decisions.

Why you are a fit for Avant:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in a field that requires quantitative analysis
Advanced SQL, Python or R
Proficiency with Excel or a similar analytical tool (exposure to Looker, Tableau, PowerBi or similar tools is a plus)
Work experience in Marketing Analytics function
Demonstrative management or leadership experience
Experience with Marketing “tech stack” including (not limited to) Google Analytics, Tealium, Heap, Responsys are a huge plus
Understanding of data architecture and how to structure customer and campaign data
Ability to think strategically to understand key stakeholder requests and advocate for data-driven solutions.
An inquisitive, logical mindset with an attention to details- they matter!
Ability to break down complex issues into manageable pieces
Strong written and oral communication skills with both technical and non-technical audiences
Thrives in a fast paced and dynamic environment
Why Avant is a fit for you:

At Avant, we believe our values make a difference:
-We value, support, and help each other grow
-We are committed to active inclusion and diversity
-We are transparent and believe the best idea wins
-We succeed when our customers succeed
-We get sh!t done… responsibly
-And we keep it fun!

We believe that ideas are more important than titles, everything is more fun together, everyone drives change, and everyone is an owner. While we believe the perks and benefits that we offer are terrific, nothing excites us more than having the ability to collaborate with intelligent, highly-motivated and talented people on challenging problems as we work to change the face of online lending.",3.2,"Avant
3.2","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
22,"Data Analyst, Payments",$68k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Build out rigorous observability and optimizations across the Stripe Payments Stack

About our Team:


Payments are the core of Stripe's business, and the groups and teams within Payments Infrastructure are broadly responsible for processing and moving these funds at a huge scale.

From the outside, a customer's credit card is charged and the merchant receives a payout to their bank account. On the inside, we have a network of teams that build infrastructure for charging the credit cards (or other payment methods, like bank transfers or Alipay), integrations with our banking partners to send transfers to our users across the globe, systems that collect Stripe's revenue, and more. Collectively, this group powers all payments products at Stripe, and we're looking for talented analysts to come help us organize and understand the data surrounding these complex processes.

You will:
Work closely with product and engineering teams to identify important questions around how to define key metrics
Conduct analyses and opportunity sizing to define addressable markets and operational opportunities for improvement
Develop compelling dashboards and automated reporting related to key performance metrics
Communicate results and influence key decision makers, including engineering, and business leaders
You'd ideally have:


3+ years experience in product analytics
Extensive experience and passion for metrics and dashboards visualizations
Highly skilled at writing SQL to query relational databases; knowledge of R or Python is a plus
Strong communication and presentation skills
Degree in a quantitative field (e.g., Statistics, Economics, Math, Sciences, Engineering)
You should include these in your application:
A resume and LinkedIn profile
A dashboard sample
What's it like to work at Stripe?


Stripe is helping the internet fulfill its potential as a platform for economic progress by building software tools that accelerate global economic access and technological development. Stripe makes it easy to start, run and scale an internet business from anywhere in the world.

We look at Stripe as a constant work in progress and the same is true of our people; for all of us, we believe the best is yet to come. We're here to support each other in our curiosity and creativity – which we pursue through thoughtful discussion and knowledge-sharing among a diverse set of peers and colleagues.

We want to work in a company of warm, inclusive people who treat their colleagues exceptionally well. The kind of people who are committed to going out of their way to help other Stripes in the short-term and pushing them to improve over the long-term (by helping them to get better at what they do).

We're a highly cross-functional organization and view that as part of the fun: we design our space to encourage as much collaboration as possible. We have long tables in the kitchen for a reason (to enable everyone to meet new people and learn from them). We also have a culture of transparency that we carry through to email communication, ensuring that Stripes all around the world have the information they need to make good local decisions.

In both our products and our people, we aim to reflect, represent and advocate for all of our users, globally. Our users transcend geography, culture and language; what we share, collectively, is a drive to create a fairer, more economically interconnected world.",4.1,"Stripe
4.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
23,"Senior Product Data Analyst, Consumer",$58k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Car shopping is complicated. At CarGurus, we use data and technology to make it simple, giving people the tools they need to confidently find, buy, finance, or sell a car. The best part? Our work makes a real impact. We're the most-visited car-shopping site in the US, and we're expanding globally. Ready to come along for the ride?

About the Role

At CarGurus we use data, not hunches, to inform decisions. Product Analysts play a key role in crafting the data narrative for these decisions. We love to collaborate, we're excited by a challenge, and we believe that ownership enables us to grow.

This Product Analyst role will support the Consumer Products team, where you will have opportunities for outsized positive impact. Your data insights will play a big part in helping millions of site visitors have a more transparent and enjoyable car shopping experience. We are looking for thoughtful, daringly curious candidates who can dive into complex data and draw insightful conclusions. You'll work cross-functionally with many departments and partners, and gain exposure to multiple dimensions of the business.

Our team values diversity in experience and backgrounds—we do our best work when we create a space for different voices and perspectives. Whatever unique experiences or skill sets you bring to the table, we look forward to learning from each other

What You'll Do:
Conduct exploratory data analysis across disparate data sources (e.g. website usage, dealer behavior patterns and customer insights) to understand the performance of existing products and see opportunities for new product offerings
Partner with the product, engineering, marketing, sales, and finance departments to grow our business, including recommending and advocating for performance improvement ideas
Define metrics to evaluate business performance, products and experiments; build reports and dashboards to monitor and understand them
Communicate and present data analysis, visualizations, and insights to key partners
Be a voice and advocate for using data to improve the quality of our decision making
Mentor data analysts on technical and professional development
Who You Are:
4+ years of experience in data analysis (experience in consumer internet, digital marketing or SaaS product data a plus)
Proficiency in SQL and Python/R, or other scripting language
Strong grasp of statistical concepts (confidence intervals, hypothesis testing, regression models)
Knowledge of BI and reporting tools, or demonstrated ability in learning new tool
Ability to influence multiple stakeholders to adopt new data-driven approaches and achieve shared business goals
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
CarGurus Culture:

At CarGurus, we invest in our people's professional growth with everything from learning and development programs to tuition reimbursement. Want to work on projects that expand your skill set without sacrificing your work/life balance? You got it. We also strive to provide perks and benefits that employees actually care about like free lunch, commuter subsidies, and more. That includes equity in the company—our way of showing that we want you here for the long haul.

We work hard every day to build the world's most trusted and transparent automotive marketplace, but trust and transparency don't just apply to our consumers. They extend to our talent, too. We aim to create a workplace where everyone feels they can bring the ultimate expression of themselves and their potential—where you don't just fit, you thrive. We don't discriminate based on race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

In addition to the US, CarGurus operates sites in Canada, the UK. We have offices in Cambridge, MA; Detroit, MI; Dublin, Ireland; San Francisco, CA and London, UK. Check out our careers page to learn more.",3.9,"CarGurus
3.9","Cambridge, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
24,PMC: Senior Data Analyst,-1,"PMC: Senior Data Analyst

COVID-19 HIRING UPDATE: We have transitioned to a remote work model and are continuing to hire during this time. This role is expected to begin as a remote position. We appreciate this is unprecedented times and will work closely with you, taking into account your individual circumstances.

PMC is seeking a Senior Data Analyst who will turn data into information, information into insight, and insight into business decisions. This role will support the subscription strategy team and work heavily with paywall and engagement tactics to drive revenue growth. This position can be based in our West LA headquarters or can be remote in the following states: Arizona, California, Colorado, Delaware, Idaho, Illinois, Maine, Massachusetts, Nevada, Oregon, New York, Texas.

Responsibilities
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing visualization and reporting;
Develop and implement data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality;
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems;
Process confidential data and information according to guidelines;
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets;
Filter and clean data to ensure accurate analysis;
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs;
Training end users on new reports and dashboards;
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.
Requirements
Work experience as a senior data analyst or in a related field;
Technical expertise regarding data models, data mining and segmentation techniques;
Experience in handling large data sets and relational databases;
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages, SQL databases, programming (python, XML, JavaScript);
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, R or SPSS);
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy;
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings;
Visualization expertise (Looker/Tableau/PowerBI/etc);
Ability to translate business requirements into non-technical, lay terms. High-level written and verbal communication skills. Comfortable presenting analysis.
BS/MS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics a plus.
About PMC:


Penske Media Corporation (PMC) is a leading digital media and information services company whose award-winning content attracts a monthly audience of more than 180 million and empowers more than 1 million global CEOs and business thought-leaders in markets that impact the world. Our dynamic events, data services, and rich content entertain and educate todays fashion, retail, beauty, entertainment and lifestyle sectors. Headquartered in New York and Los Angeles with additional offices in 11 countries worldwide, Penske Media is the way global influencers are informed, connected, and inspired. To learn more about PMC and its iconic brands, visit www.pmc.com.",4.4,"Penske Media Corporation
4.4",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
25,Jr. Business Data Analyst,$37k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"WebFX is looking for qualified candidates to fill the position of Jr. Business Data Analyst. Employees in this role will gather and analyze campaign data and consult with clients about their business goals and propose solutions and strategies that meet their needs, among other responsibilities.

What You'll Do
Gather and analyze campaign data
Consult with clients about their business goals and propose solutions and strategies that meet their needs
Analyze competitors’ websites and online marketing initiatives
Perform industry analysis and forecasting of trends
Interpret web analytics, demographic data, market research, and buyer behaviors
Optimizing client websites for search engines (on-page SEO)
Create and manage all aspects of SEO, PPC, and paid search ad campaigns for clients
Manage email marketing, website analysis and online advertising programs
Prepare monthly digital marketing campaign reports
Correct technical issues on the backend of website
Perform A/B, website usability, and website conversion rate testing
Responsible for driving client success on the web
5% analyzing clients’ competitors
10% writing ad copy, emails, etc.
10% working in the backend of websites/fixing technical issues
10% creating revenue, ROI and traffic reports for client campaigns
10% managing client projects and ad campaigns
15% performing industry, demographic and market research, and trend forecasting
20% client strategy and analytics
20% client interaction- phone calls, emails, in-person meetings

Note: The Jr. Business Data Analyst is a client-facing position

Training

Our “Bootcamp” web marketing training program will be provided for new WebFX “family members”.
On-site, state of the art training amenities to facilitate departmental trainings, trend watch reports, and monthly Lunch-and-Learns

What You'll Get

WebFX grew 250%+ over the past 3 years, and merit-based promotional opportunities are abundant for new family members who meet or exceed position performance metrics.

Potential Promotional Path for Jr. Business Data Analyst:

Digital Marketing Research Consultant
Director of Digital Marketing
Sr. Digital Marketing Research Consultant

Compensation

$35.5k to $38,500k (potentially higher based on work experience)

GPA 3.8+ : add up to $3k to high range
Elite college or university & graduation with high honors: Add $3.5k-$5k to high range

Candidates interested in the Jr. Business Data Analyst position may also have interest in:
digital marketing, online marketing, paid advertising, search marketing, inbound marketing, web marketing, social media, content marketing, PPC, SEO, SEM, blogging, Facebook, customer service, writing, editing, research, communications, etc.",4.6,"WebFX, Inc.
4.6","Harrisburg, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
26,Data Analyst,$38k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

Classification:

Exempt

Reports to:

Manager of Data Analytics & Reporting

JOB DESCRIPTION

General Summary: Fusion Medical Staffing works to provide top healthcare professional talent to our clients nationwide. Our thriving culture, both internally and externally, allows us to focus on our core values and improve the lives of those we touch. Fusion Medical Staffing is an equal opportunity employer.

Essential Functions:

Understanding of the ETL process, data warehousing and associated activities to implement the best programs to use in managing the data
Mine data, analyze data, and assist in the build out of internal analytical tools to improve decision making and support for the analytics team and reporting to cross functional teams.
Assist in the Design, development, and automation of metrics-based internal reporting, including visuals and Ad-Hoc reporting packages
Gather requirements and define scope for reporting needs, meeting to ensure specific data needed on a project basis.
Ability to manage multiple data sources and systems with logic to ensure proper data file creation.
Ensure a high level of communication and liaison duties with IT/Technology and Operational departments.
Work closely with the Finance Team and financial data on performance and variance analytics.
Ensure a high degree of data quality and accuracy in all results and reporting
Special projects, as requested

Competencies:

Strong written and verbal skills
Exceptional attention to detail
Excellent critical thinking skills
Team Player
Humble
Positive
Driven

Work Environment:

This job operates in an office environment and routinely uses standard office equipment.

Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.

Employee is regularly required to talk or hear
Is frequently required to sit; stand; walk; use hands to fingers, handle or feel;

Position Type/Expected hours worked:

This is a full-time, permanent position. Hours of work and days are Monday through Friday, in between the hours of 8:00am and 5:00pm (there may be some flexibility with start/end times). Regular, consistent and punctual attendance is required.

Required Education and Experience:

3+ Years Relevant Experience in the following focus areas:

BA/BS Business Science or Business Administration, MIS, analytics, statistics, Economics or related field
Experience with Business Intelligence (BI) tools such as Tableau
Strong experience with Tableau
Advanced proficiency in Excel, as well as MS office suites and including MS SQL
Experience in data extraction, data manipulation, synthesis and creating presentations
Experience with analytical initiatives with demonstrated ability to problem solve and think critically; ability to recognize key trends and evaluate results of analysis.
Proficient knowledge of financial and accounting practices and techniques.

Preferred Education and Experience:

Proficiency with SQL and VBA coding
Experience in recognizing, analyzing and communicating descriptive and predictive data for reporting and statistical methodologies.

Other Duties:

This job description is not a comprehensive list of all activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job and is subject to change at any time with or without notice.",4.6,"Fusion Medical Staffing
4.6","Omaha, NE",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
27,Data Analyst,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose of Position
The Data Analyst is responsible for the financial planning for managed clients to include creating and managing client operating budgets and client financial workbooks. In addition, the Data Analyst provides business review presentations, client operational analysis, client savings data, and non-standard or customized analysis and reporting.
Tasks and Responsibilities
Creates and presents annual operating budgets for managed clients. Generates business review presentations to support quarterly or annual client meetings. In addition, work on continuous improvement of the budgeting process and templates.
Develops new client workbooks and provides monthly or quarterly client workbook updates. These updates include budget updates and variance analysis in addition to summary updates, operational updates, and additional analysis or reporting as requested or customized for each client.
Creates ad-hoc or customized reports, as requested by clients or OS teams, including savings data or pro forma budgets.
Supports the Owner Services and Managed Sales team with other duties as assigned.
Education
Bachelor's in Finance or Accounting
Years of Experience
0-2 years of experience
Core Competencies
Attitude
Communication & Listening Skills
Initiative
Interest in Company & Position
Knowledge of Specific Job Skills
Related Education or Training
Related Job Experience
Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Other (KSAOs)
Work experience, preferably in financial/operation analysis and/or planning environment
Strong analytical and organizational skills
Strong communication skills; capable of presenting complex financial information in an easy-to-understand format
Familiar with concepts, practices, and procedures of financial planning & analysis
Advanced proficiency with excel, access and other Microsoft Office applications
Advanced proficiency with Tableau Software
Strong multi-tasking skills
Aviation experience also preferred

Benefits Package:
Full complement of attractive benefits to our team members, including Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance
401(k) Savings Plan. The company provides a 57% matching contribution of your pretax contributions, up to the first 20% of your contributions per pay
Company provided Short Term Disability
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Prescription Drug Benefit Plan
Two-week paid vacation
Executive Jet Management is an equal opportunity employer.
To ensure a safe environment, we conduct pre-employment drug screening and background checks.",4.3,"NetJets
4.3","Cincinnati, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1964,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Charter Air Travel,Travel & Tourism,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
28,Data Analyst 2,-1,"Data Analyst 2
Flux Location


Oregon, Portland

Employment Type

ONFT

Apply Now


Data Analyst 2

Flux is currently seeking a Data Analyst 2 to join our project team onsite with our client in Portland, OR. This full-time contract position is located in the Data Integration and Reporting organization within the IT department. This position will draft Extract, Transformation and Loading procedures for implementing data integration and data migration tasks in support of Data Warehousing and other data integration projects. This position will also support operations and maintenance, as well as provide 24x7 production support on a rotational basis.

Position Responsibilities include:
Draft Extract, Transformation and Loading (ETL) procedures for implementing data integration and data migration tasks in support of Data Warehousing and other data integration projects.
Draft ETL procedures, batch processes, and scheduling; troubleshoot problems and make suggestions for performance tuning and system integrity.
Develop mappings and workflows in Informatica to automate data integration.
Develop data models and database design techniques, including relational and dimensional modeling.
Effectively map source to target data to meet business/system requirements.
Implement management approved SQL stored procedures and advanced SQL queries.
Assist with the development of functional and technical requirements documents for diverse audience (technical and non-technical), including migration, implementation and test plans.
Draft working documents for interfaces with non-Standard systems.
Debug, analyze and troubleshoot data quality issues.

Position Requirements:

Education/Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Information/Computer Technology or a closely-related field is preferred.
With an applicable Bachelor’s Degree, 5 years of experience in Computer Technology or closely-related field is required.
Without a degree, 9 years of experience in Computer Technology or a closely-related field is required.
Technical Requirements:
5 years of experience in Data Integration Techniques.
Demonstrated experience using an ETL tool such as Informatica Suite (including Power Center and Power Exchange) or an equivalent tool.
Experience with Oracle 11g, 12g, 18c or 19c.
Experience writing DDL and creating database objects.
Experience partitioning database tables.
Experience creating Oracle procedures, functions and views.

Flux Resources, LLC is proud to be an AA/EEO employer and we are committed to engaging with diverse populations. It is our priority to be a leader in creating a workforce that represents the citizens we serve. While providing EEO self-identification information is voluntary, we encourage you to do so as it is pertinent to our commitment of creating a diverse workforce.

All candidates will receive consideration without regard to characteristics protected by applicable local, state or federal law such as race, color, sex, age, religion, national origin, physical or mental disability, pregnancy, marital status, veteran or military status, genetic information, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

FLUX Resources, LLC. wants to ensure applicants who apply for jobs electronically are informed of their equal employment opportunity (EEO) protections as part of the application process through the EEO is the Law and Supplement to EEO is the Law posters. In addition, you can review the prescribed pay transparency nondiscrimination provision.

If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran you have the right to request an accommodation, which can be done by e-mailing us at accommodations@workwithflux.com and providing us with your name and contact information",4.7,"Flux Resources
4.7","Portland, OR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
29,Data Analyst,-1,"Company*
Juniper is a fast-growing luxury Architectural lighting brand with locations in New York and Connecticut. We serve the high-end Architectural lighting industry; providing innovative, custom solutions to luxury office and hospitality spaces globally.
Job Description: *
The Data Analyst will work under the general direction of the ERP & Inventory Control Manager, responsible for collecting, analyzing, and reporting data to monitor business performance and quality plans to identify improvements; and to ensure the quality and accuracy of that data is used in ways to assist the business make better decisions.
Essential Duties & Responsibilities: *
Collect, interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques.
Provide reports and ongoing results back to the relevant members of the business.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain ERP.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Providing technical support across the company.
Identify areas of improvement in business processes and apply support changes to the organization.
Effectively communicate with outside vendors.
Manage and assist with special projects.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree in Information Management, Computer Science, Business or a related field.
At least two years experience as a Jr. Data Analyst or in a similar role.
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy.
Able to analyze existing tools and databases and provide software solution recommendations.
Strong verbal and written communications skills.
Excellent computer skills.
Able to work independently with minimal supervision.
Able to work in a support team environment.
Benefits: *
Full Health, Dental, and Vision
Paid time off
401K matching plan
Generous bonus plan
Excellent advancement opportunities

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Information Management: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,"Juniper
3.8","Southington, CT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
30,Senior Analyst/Data Scientist,$141k-$225k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Edmunds were driven to make car buying easier. Ever since we began publishing printed car guides in the 60s, the company has been in the business of trust, innovating ways to empower and support car shoppers. When Edmunds launched the car industrys first Internet site in 1994, we established a leadership position online and have never looked back. Now, as one of the most trusted review sites on the Internet, millions of visitors use our research, shopping and buying tools every month to make an easy and informed decision on their next car. For consumers, we bring peace of mind. For dealers, we make tools to help them solve their problems and sell more cars. How do we do it, you ask? The key ingredients are our enthusiastic employees, progressive company culture and cutting-edge technology. Want to join the team? Read on to find out how!

What Youre Applying For:

Edmunds is seeking a skilled, creative and enthusiastic Senior Analyst/Data Scientist experienced in generating actionable insights from large sets of data, measuring business performance, and identifying areas of growth and optimization using advanced analytical (modeling, machine learning) and experimental approaches.

The ideal candidate is also a natural problem-solver that enjoys working with large data sets and is proactive in exploring database tables and using data to make clear and convincing business cases.

The analyst will play a crucial role in supporting our Tier 1 team by developing, improving, and maintaining digital advertising revenue forecasts & models, monitoring major KPIs, and understanding impact to other areas of the business. This person will be expected to understand the details and complexity of the companys digital advertising revenue to ensure that the executive team has a clear and accurate pulse of the business, and recommend action plans to optimize against the companys revenue goals, and identifying areas of optimization and growth by extracting insights through modeling, testing and experimentation.

In addition, this person will be expected to take ownership of projects to continually improve reporting quality through automation. This person will also be expected to promote the use of self-service analytic tools across internal clients, and provide training for these tools.

This individual will be tasked to work cross-functionally with Product, Sales, Ad Operations, and Paid Media teams to optimize digital advertising products and revenue through A/B testing and experimentation, measuring and uncovering results based on changes to website traffic & consumer site behaviors, and recommending areas of paid marketing spend.

The right candidate will have experience working across business and functional boundaries, partnering with internal clients to provide decision-making support through analytic insights.

This is a great opportunity for an individual with significant business acumen that is interested in playing with the wealth of structured and unstructured data that is available within the car buying ecosystem. Curiosity and business intellect a must.

What Youll Do:
Develop, evaluate, refine, and automate analytic models using data to address business needs, and identify areas of optimization and growth
Prepare visualizations of data in order to explain and persuade
Design, conduct and lead complex analyses that mine, extract, track, report and analyze performance metrics
Provide recommendations to key stakeholders and support the business need
Create and produce forecasts, reports, ad hoc requests, dashboards, etc. utilizing our data warehouse and other data source systems and summarize your findings
Interact with multiple teams in different departments and define requirements for reporting
Challenges:
Edmunds is a fast growing and innovative company. Qualified candidate should possess strong project management skills, and an ability to multitask and balance competing priorities
What You Need:
Strong analytical and data mining skills
Excellent data extraction and manipulation skills - SQL experience required
Strong data modeling / statistical analysis / predictive modeling experience required (R and/or Python)
Excellent presentation and communication skills
Exposure to BI tools such as Tableau is a plus
Bachelors degree in a quantitative field, such as mathematics, statistics, physics, computer science, business analytics, etc. with at least 5 years of relevant and progressively complex work experience
Working @ Edmunds.com:

Employees think its a pretty great place to work and some pretty impressive publications think it is too: we have been recognized as one of the best places to work by the Fortune Magazine and Great Places to Work, LA Business Journal (for the last 6 years!), Computerworld, and Built in LA. We've also been identified as one of the best workplaces specifically in Technology and also for Diversity and Asian Americans. In fact, our CEO, Avi Steinlauf, was rated as one of Glassdoor's Highest Rated CEOs! If youre interested in learning more and joining our mission, wed love to hear from you!

Edmunds will consider for employment qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of all applicable laws.

*LI-POST",3.6,"Edmunds.com
3.6","Santa Monica, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1966,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
31,Clinical Data Analyst - Indpls Infectious Disease Care,$37k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"We Are Hiring

Clinical Data Analyst - Indpls Infectious Disease Care - Full-Time, Day - Infectious Disease of Indiana - Carmel, IN

Schedule may vary. May work weekends.

Why Join Ascension?
In Indiana, St. Vincent operates 24 hospitals in addition to a comprehensive network of affiliated joint ventures, medical practices, and clinics. St. Vincent's more than 15,000 associates and 3,000 providers offer expertise in a wide range of services including acute/long-term acute care, bariatrics, cancer care, cardiovascular services, emergency/trauma services, neuroscience, orthopedics, pediatric services, primary care, urgent/immediate care, women's health and more. St. Vincent has been serving central and southern Indiana for 145 years.

Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with St. Vincent Health-IN, you will have the opportunity to collects and analyzes clinical data from multiple sources for the development of reports and statistical information.

Responsibilities:
Compiles analytical and statistical reports.
Formulates, defines and recommends scope and format of reports.
Oversees provision of ad hoc management reports.
Reviews information for accuracy and reconciles data on a regular basis.
What You Will Need

Licenses/Certifications/Registration:
Preferred Credential(s):
Minimum Qualification: None Required
Education:
Diploma
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required
Work Experience:
None required.
Equal Employment Opportunity
St.Vincent is an EEO/AA Employer M/F/Disability/Vet. Please click the link below for more information.
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/ofccp_eeo_supplement_final_jrf_qa_508c.pdf
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

This employer participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify links below for more information.

eVerify

Right to Work",3.4,"Ascension
3.4","Carmel, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
32,DATA SCIENCE & TAGGING ANALYST,$55k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"DATA SCIENCE & TAGGING ANALYST BETHESDA, MARYLAND DESCRIPTION Mission Essential is currently seeking Data Science & Tagging Analysts. REQUIREMENTS · Applicable degree(s): Computer Information Systems, Computer Science, Database Administration, Data Science, Engineering, IT Management, Mathematics, or Statistics (or another quantitative field). · Minimum five (5) years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models, and familiarity with: · Coding knowledge and experience with several languages (C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.); · Statistical and data mining techniques (Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc.); · Querying databases and using statistical computer languages (R, Python, etc.); · Using web services (Redshift, Spark, DigitalOcean, etc.); and · Creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics (regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc) · These five (5) years may be concurrent with requisite years of experience. · Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on product development. · Proven ability to drive business results with data-based insights. · Demonstrated expertise with developing and implementing data management strategies, processes, and technical solutions. · Demonstrated expertise with one of the key data management knowledge areas: data management, data quality, metadata management, data governance, data modeling and design, data storage and operations, data integration and operability, document and content management, reference and master data. · Outstanding oral and written communication skills with the ability to conduct independent research, filter and synthesize data, and produce clear, logical, and concise recommendations to policy and decision-making data management and governance professionals. · Outstanding interpersonal skills, including the ability to work independently and in a team or collaborative environment, to work with all levels of employees from support staff to senior leadership, and to be proactive and responsive in communicating with all stakeholders. · Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications. · Expert Level Must have Masters + 10 yrs experience, OR BA + 12 yrs experience, OR, AA +14 yrs experience, OR No degree +20 yrs · Senior Level Must Have Masters + 8 yrs experience, OR BA +10 yrs, OR AA +12 yrs, OR No degree +18 yrs · Mid-Level Must Have Masters + 2yrs, OR BA +4 yrs, OR AA +6 yrs · TS/SCI Clearance with CI Polygraph Required · Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers (Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, Facebook Insights, etc.) · Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using (Periscope, Business Objects, etc.). · Demonstrated expertise managing competing priorities while maintaining a high level of attention to detail; demonstrated ability to work effectively with senior leaders in a high profile and demanding office. · Outstanding analytical and critical thinking skills, including the demonstrated ability to think strategically, identify needs and requirements, and develop recommendations and solutions. · Outstanding leadership and managerial capabilities, including the ability to effectively direct tasking, and assess and manage performance. · Knowledge of the IC, ODNI, DoD, and the overall national security apparatus. · Assist the Government to mine and analyze data from various databases to drive optimization and improvement of strategy and policy development. · Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets. Recommend, develop and support implementation of best practices for standardizing data across its lifecycle through engineering, development and governance. · Advise on a range of Enterprise and IC data management matters through their application of substantive, analytical, operational, program management, and/or IC expertise. Mission Essential considers all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status. Mission Essential is an EEO/AA employer and a VEVRAA Federal Contractor. Job Type: Full-time Pay: $1,200.00 - $4,200.00 per month Experience: * data science: 1 year (Preferred) * analytics: 1 year (Preferred) * data scientist: 1 year (Preferred) * hadoop: 1 year (Preferred) * full agile sdlc methodology: 1 year (Preferred) Benefits: * Other Schedule: * Other",3.9,"Mission Essential
3.9","Bethesda, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
33,Data Analyst - Case Specialist,$40k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join a fast-growing company with a vibrant, entrepreneurial culture, dedicated to being the top provider in the class action recovery space! Financial Recovery Technologies has become a trusted partner to hedge funds, mutual funds, custodians, sovereign wealth funds, and other institutional investment firms. Our best-in-class people and technology have made FRT a market leader.

As a Data Analyst – Case Specialist, you will work with case and client data to ensure we deliver accurate, high-quality damages and eligibility information to our clients, providing the information they need in order to make decisions about whether and how to pursue recovery opportunities after portfolio losses.

The Role: As a Data Analyst – Case Specialist, you will:
Own and master case (lawsuit) information, as well as client data as it relates to specific cases
Dig deeply into clients’ transactions and holdings data to perform reconciliation, identify data gaps, and find potential solutions
Ensure the accuracy and quality of data relating to clients' eligibility to recover funds in connection with the settlement of lawsuits and enforcement actions
Bridge the gap between the technical and the nontechnical
Translate between our legal and technical teams, ensuring an accurate interpretation of legal and financial language in legal documents and an appropriate application of that language to the data at hand
Understand corporate actions and their impact on clients' trading history
Communicate results of client data analysis to non-technical client service professionals to facilitate client decision-making
Ask questions and test assumptions made in the handoff of information between our legal, case, and data operations teams
Build strong relationships with peers across corporate functions, including:
Client service professionals, who you’ll work with to provide clients with complex eligibility analyses
Operations professionals, who will rely on your analysis skills in filing claims, remediating deficiencies, and remitting payments
Product and technology teams, who will count on you to serve as a resource as they develop technology to support operational requirements
Our ideal candidate has:
Deep analytical experience, including hands-on work processing information and testing assumptions - a minimum of 3 years' overall professional experience is necessary
Solid experience in financial services (experience in trading or with derivatives would be a plus!), as well as strong SQL skills
Top candidates will be able to recognize and understand the relevant features of various financial instruments in client-provided data and incorporate that understanding into high-quality loss analytics
Experience evaluating existing processes and developing effective process improvements;
An ability to multitask, prioritize, and balance varied tasks on a daily basis;
Strong verbal communication skills
Self-confidence sufficient to execute on tasks independently, trust his/her judgment, and yet know when to ask questions
An intellectually curious personality and a demonstrated commitment to continuous improvement
WHAT FRT OFFERS:
Competitive salary and bonus
Health, dental, vision
401k (with company match)
Income protection plans (life, accidental death and dismemberment, short- and long-term disability) and access to a suite of voluntary benefits
Fun, smart, diverse colleagues
Currently we are remote but under normal circumstances we also offer:
Close to public transit (walking distance to Wellington T on Orange Line)
Free drinks and snacks
Free parking onsite
Free access to onsite gym
THIS POSITION IS BASED IN OUR MEDFORD, MA HEADQUARTERS. LOCAL CANDIDATES ONLY, PLEASE.

AGENCIES: WE ARE NOT WORKING WITH AGENCIES ON THIS REQUISITION.",4.5,"Financial Recovery Technologies
4.5","Medford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
34,Tableau Developer & Data Analyst,-1,"We're hiring!

Leaf Group is looking for an experienced Tableau Developer & Data Analyst for Saatchi Art to join our Business Intelligence (BI) team in Santa Monica, CA.

Saatchi Art is the world's leading online art gallery, established with the goal of helping people all over the world connect with art and artists they love. We offer an unparalleled selection of paintings, drawings, sculpture, and photography in a wide range of prices, and provide artists worldwide with an expertly curated environment in which to exhibit and sell their work. Based in Los Angeles, Saatchi Art is redefining the experience of buying and selling art, making it welcoming and accessible for artists and collectors alike.

Leaf Group is a house of digital brands, creating and cultivating digital-first companies in growing lifestyle categories, including Fitness & Wellness, Art & Design and Publishing. Our media and marketplace brands are authentic and authoritative, reaching a large and growing passionate, creative audience.

We work in a fun, collaborative environment that is diverse, adventurous, and open-minded. We look for proactive, accountable people focused on continuous learning and growth to push themselves and our businesses forward. Check us out here: https://www.leafgroup.com/brands/

A big vision calls for a big job. As we grow, our need for a Tableau Developer & Data Analyst grows with us.

You'll Report To: Sr. Director, Business Intelligence

A typical day as a Tableau Developer & Data Analyst might include:
Create complex SQL queries and perform ad-hoc and exploratory data analysis.
Provide data-driven insights to enable decision-making.
Create data visualizations using Tableau
Work with the business units to establish KPIs and methodology, and then create the appropriate reports and analysis.
Develop, own, and present dashboards to Senior Management that provide actionable insights.
Investigate data anomalies and perform Root Cause Analysis (RCA).
Audit peer reports and provide constructive feedback.
You'll be successful if you are a motivated Data Analyst with strong SQL/Tableau skills and are looking to join an energetic, fast-paced, project-driven BI team.

What You Have:
BA in a quantitative field such as Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics or Mathematics or equivalent experience.
3+ years practical experience in SQL query scripting, debugging, and execution.
2+ years of experience building Tableau dashboards.
1+ years of experience working in a data-intensive organization with large-scale datasets.
Excel proficiency is required.
Previous eCommerce experience is a plus.
Proficiency in Python or other scripting language is a plus.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Not afraid to wear multiple hats - no job being too small or too large.
We're casual and informal but we work hard and work responsibly. Personal accountability goes a long way. We believe we are the change.
What We Have:
eHow is the 2019 & 2020 People's Choice and official Webby Winner for Social Video/How To-DIY
Well+Good is the 2019 People's Choice winner of the Webby's Award for Best Lifestyle Brand
Leaf Group is among TalentDesk's 2019 Best Companies To Work For
Leaf Group is among the 2019 Built In LA Best Companies To Work For
Leaf Group is among Comparably's 2018 Best Companies in Los Angeles
Well+Good is the 2018 winner of Fast Company's Most Innovative Company Award
MyPlate is the 2018 winner of the Webby Award for Best Design
Winner of the 2017 Best Company for Diversity award Comparably
Competitive compensation and benefits packages (i.e., Medical, Dental, Vision, FSA, 401K)
Discounted gym memberships
Paid-to-play vacation rewards
Discretionary unlimited vacation time
Employee discounts for Saatchi Art, Society6, and Deny Designs
Leaf Group, Ltd. is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants for all job openings are welcome and will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, or any other basis protected by state, federal, or local law. It is the intent of the Company to comply with all applicable federal, state, and local legislation concerning equal opportunity in employment.

Agency Disclosure:

If the Leaf Group Talent Acquisition department, or any current company employee, receives an unsolicited resume from a third party recruiting agency and Leaf Group does not have a signed Agency Agreement active, Leaf Group will not be deemed liable to pay a placement fee. The unsolicited resume will be considered a gift and can be considered for our recruitment efforts.",4.1,"Leaf Group
4.1",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
35,Senior Data Systems Business Analyst,$61k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"ROLE SUMMARY

The primary function of the High throughput Clinical Immunoassays and Diagnostics (HCID) team is to generate high-quality assay data in a regulated cGLP laboratory setting to support Pfizer’s vaccine programs. The purpose of this position is join the High throughput Business Analytics team to contribute to a harmonized process across HCID functional areas in the development of written end-user requirements for data systems used in various laboratory processes, and testing of systems prior to validation and deployment in the Production environment.

ROLE RESPONSIBILITIES
Assist in the Development of Laboratory Data Systems
Contribute to a consistent, harmonized process across HCID functional areas for the development of end-user requirements for various internal data systems used in the regulated cGLP laboratory space.
Develop end-user requirements for data system builds requested by HCID functional area managers as well as for functional enhancements to existing builds.
Assist and perform end-user testing of various data system builds against end-user requirements to ensure that these systems function as intended by the end user.
Collaborate with Pfizer IT organizations on data system projects according to VRD priorities.
Attend regular meetings with HCID functional area leaders to review and monitor various data system projects.
Documentation Support
Write and review end-user requirements documents for various data system builds used in HCID per the current good documentation practices.
Review and approve various standard operating procedures (SOPs), as assigned.
Maintain compliance with SOP periodic review process.
Monitor the SOP review and approval workflows for authored SOPs.
Author, review and approve technical reports, as assigned.
Training and Safety
Maintain strict compliance with departmental and site safety regulations.
Take ownership of and successfully complete all assigned training.
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS
MS/MA in a science-related discipline such as computer science / mathematics or biological science with 0+ years of hands-on industry experience with the development and testing of electronic data systems. Or BS/BA with at least 2 years of industry experience.
Must have strong verbal and written communication skills.
Must be detail oriented
Must have a be able to effectively describe complex laboratory and data-handling processes verbally and in writing in a way that is logical and can be understood by both data system specialists and laboratory personnel.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Working knowledge of laboratory information management systems and a basic understanding / familiarity with SQL and computer programming.
Direct hands-on experience with LabWare LIMS is desired.
1+ years’ experience as a Business Analyst in a corporate environment
Must be able to describe laboratory processes in the form of flow charts and testable, line-item requirements.
Proficient in Microsoft Office 365 applications and MS Visio
Strong attention to detail and commitment to operational excellence.
Basic working knowledge of laboratory assays that measure antibodies and other macromolecules in various biological fluids.
Ability to collaborate and work in a team environment
Direct hands-on experience working in a regulated (cGLP) environment.
The ability to understand, develop and effectively describe complex laboratory and data-handling processes both verbally and in writing is required.
Must be attentive to details and have a passion for data quality.
Occasional evening and weekend work and some business travel is required.

#LI-PFE

Other Job Details:

· Location: Pearl River, NY

· Eligible for Employee Referral Bonus

Relocation support available
Sunshine Act

Pfizer reports payments and other transfers of value to health care providers as required by federal and state transparency laws and implementing regulations. These laws and regulations require Pfizer to provide government agencies with information such as a health care provider’s name, address and the type of payments or other value received, generally for public disclosure. Subject to further legal review and statutory or regulatory clarification, which Pfizer intends to pursue, reimbursement of recruiting expenses for licensed physicians may constitute a reportable transfer of value under the federal transparency law commonly known as the Sunshine Act. Therefore, if you are a licensed physician who incurs recruiting expenses as a result of interviewing with Pfizer that we pay or reimburse, your name, address and the amount of payments made currently will be reported to the government. If you have questions regarding this matter, please do not hesitate to contact your Talent Acquisition representative.
EEO & Employment Eligibility

Pfizer is committed to equal opportunity in the terms and conditions of employment for all employees and job applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, gender identity or gender expression, national origin, disability or veteran status. Pfizer also complies with all applicable national, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment as well as work authorization and employment eligibility verification requirements of the Immigration and Nationality Act and IRCA. Pfizer is an E-Verify employer.
Information & Business Tech",4.1,"Pfizer
4.1","Pearl River, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1849,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
36,Associate Research Analyst- Data Science Division,$55k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Wednesday, September 30, 2020

The Data Science Division works on projects to help the Department of the Navy and other government agencies to develop advanced analytics and algorithms for systems, sensors, networks, and platforms to ensure America's defense in the 21st century. DSD researchers have relevant experience (either in course work, previous job experience, or military experience) in programming, machine learning, model building, and data visualization.

CNA fosters an inclusive culture that values diverse backgrounds and perspectives. Our flexible and engaging work environment encourages iterative and creative collaboration at every stage of the problem solving process. Our employees are committed to helping clients develop effective solutions to better manage their programs through scientific, data-driven approaches.

We are looking for creative and innovative individuals to help carry out our mission.

PRIMARY PURPOSE

Staff at this level will provide research, analytical, and technical support on a range of projects.

JOB DESCRIPTION AND/OR DUTIES

1. Under close supervision, conducts research and analysis that meets CNA’s quality standards* on focused, structured questions. Can effectively apply standard, routine, and well-established analytic methodologies. With minimal direction and supervision, routinely produces analysis that is logical and traceable as well as objective and unbiased. Shows some analytic creativity

2. Develops rudimentary institutional knowledge of primary clients/sponsors; their culture, organization, and issues.

3. Contributes productively and harmoniously to the work of others; treats everyone respectfully, professionally and fairly. Keeps others informed. Actively engages with colleagues and works with manager to identify opportunities for collaborations with

4. Supports business development efforts and/or marketing activities by conducting background research and helping prepare materials under the direction of more experienced staff.

5. Limited interaction with sponsors/clients and their study POCs under the supervision of an experienced colleague.

6. Impact largely confined to individual project work.

7. Demonstrates basic, effective communication skills, both written and oral. Can effectively present work to colleagues and CNA managers.

8. Works under close supervision on focused, well-structured pieces of projects.

9. Exhibits a positive attitude in interactions with colleagues and clients/sponsors. Serves as an effective member of project or research team by supporting leadership as needed.

10. Performs other duties as assigned.

JOB REQUIREMENTS

1. Education: Minimum Master’s degree in a relevant field (data science related field) or equivalent experience.

2. Experience: Typical minimum requirements Master’s & 0+ years of experience in research and analysis.

3. Skills: Facility with Microsoft Office applications (Excel, Word, Access, Powerpoint); Ability to manage databases; Ability to gather and organize information on policies, systems, problems, or procedures; Strong critical thinking and organizational skills; Basic knowledge of research techniques; Ability to plan and organize tasks effectively, both as an individual contributor and as a team member; Basic, effective communication skills. Skilled in programming (R or Python), statistics, machine learning, data visualization and other data science fundamentals.

4. Other: Ability to obtain and maintain an Active Secret Security Clearance.

CNA is committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service and protected veterans, or other non-merit based factors. In addition to federal legal requirements, CNA complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. These protections extend to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting and hiring practices, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training and career development programs. For more information about EEO protections, please view the EEO is the law posters below: ""EEO is the Law"" Poster; ""EEO is the Law"" Poster Supplement. The pay transparency policy is available here: Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Poster

To be considered for hire, all individuals applying for positions with CNA are subject to a background investigation. For positions requiring access to classified information, U.S. citizenship is required. Individuals will also be subject to an additional government background investigation, and continued employment eligibility is contingent upon the ability to obtain and maintain an active security clearance.

Other details
Job Family
Research
Job Function
Career Path II - Expert & Research Specialist
Pay Type
Salary",3.3,"CNA Corporation
3.3","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
37,Data Analyst II,$44k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"You’re not likely to find another company like Vermeer. Our people are from all walks of life in locations around the world, rolling up our sleeves and getting tough work done every day. Together. We’re a family-owned and operated company with an unmatched culture, one that is built on the belief that every Vermeer team member has real, personal impact – on our people, our customers and our world. Whoever you are and where you are in your career, Vermeer helps you be Equipped to Do More®.

Job Summary

Work Shift

1 - First ShiftThe Data Analyst II is responsible for performing complex data analysis to make sense of, and draw conclusions from, information buried in raw data. This position works closely with project team members and business units to identify data-related issues and solve them. This role must be an expert at querying information in relational databases like Oracle, Microsoft SQL, and PostgreSQL and able to document findings in tools such as Word, Excel, or Power BI.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned.

1. Exhibit the Vermeer characteristics of caring culture, demonstrating agility, customer focused and stewardship while modeling the associated behaviors.

2. Analyze data sets using various statistical methods to identify patterns within data, to gain insight into process performance, and identify opportunities to enhance decision making. Leverage current information sources including databases, process models, business requirements and other artifacts to research and resolve issues. Interpret, draw conclusions, make recommendations, and present findings to customers to support business questions and promote data literacy. Assist the business to take advantage of opportunities to improve data usage, analytical processes, and business process improvements.

3. Contribute to a data strategy and approach including inventory of data sources, metadata, quality, issues, reconciliations and remediations. Participate in planning and execution activities to identify, extract, reconcile, transform, load, and validate and/or converted data. Create mapping specifications, review data models, update business data definitions, and maintain process and project documentation as needed.

4. Define data quality operations and support the development and use of automated tools to deliver comprehensive data cleansing, matching, and quality monitoring capabilities for master and transactional data. Ensure high quality data is collected and discover the source data that causes issues for downstream applications, processes, and reports. Troubleshoot and resolve discrepancies to maintain data integrity and quality of information assets.

5. Prepare data documentation for specific projects or domains. Participate in unit testing and/or user acceptance testing for deliverables. Provide post implementation support for data reconciliation and quality issues.

6. Participate in product evaluations, requirements gathering, and business decisions to ensure new solutions are aligned with the company’s strategic goals and are scalable into the data warehouse platform.

Education and/or Experience

- Bachelor’s Degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, Business or related field.

- Minimum of 4 years previous experience with data and application standards, development, and integration; and/or equivalent combination of education and experience required.

Other Skills and Abilities

- Ability to shorten development cycles by implementing new and reusable technologies at Vermeer. Ability to examine business and development processes and apply continuous improvement methods to identify opportunities.

- Ability to define, create and complete a technical task without guidance.

- Excellent analytical skills.

- Ability to maintain positive interpersonal relationships which encourage openness with customers and peers; ability to develop interpersonal relationships with co-workers, staff, clients and the community to meet or exceed expectations.

- Demonstration of excellent written and verbal communication skills. This position requires presenting design recommendations to both technical and non-technical audiences. Clarity of ideas and overall understanding is crucial.

- Ability to create accurate, professional and error-free documents.

- Ability to manage multiple projects while applying project management and organizational skills for task breakdown, planning, and prioritization.

Travel

Up to 5% domestic and/or international travel by car or plane may be required.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability or veteran status. Applicants requiring a reasonable accommodation due to a disability at any stage of the employment application process should contact Team Member Solutions in human resources at (641) 621-8767 or at hr@vermeer.com.",4.0,"Vermeer
4.0","Pella, IA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1948,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
38,R1939878 -Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst/Data and ETL Architect - Vice President,$141k-$229k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.

Responsibilities:

Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.

Minimum education required: Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Engineering, Computer Science or Technology related or Business Administration
Minimum experience required: 10+ years of experience in Data Integration, Data Architecture, ETL Architecture, Design and Development

Skills required:

Must have 10+ years’ experience in Architecture, Design and Development of Big data platforms, Hadoop, Apache Spark, Hive, Hue, Query IT, Avro, Parquet, Cloudera , Data-mere, Arcadia.

Must have 10+ years of Ab Initio ETL and Data Management solutions including ability to understand the internal working of variety of Ab Initio components.

Must have experience in delivering Metadata management strategy and reusable Bigdata and Rules based Ab Initio solutions using Ab Initio’s technical and business metadata components.

Must have experience creating highly efficient reusable frameworks and design patterns in Ab Initio. Must have experience with performance tuning techniques in Ab Initio.

Must have demonstrated knowledge across full suite of Ab Initio toolsets e.g. GDE, EME, BRE, Express>It, Data Profiler and Conduct>It.

Must have practical experience with number of techniques involved in ETL and Data integration space including ability to Design highly efficient end-to-end large scale ETL solutions.

Must have experience in data management functions including data governance, data design, master data management, metadata management, and data quality management.

Must have experience with Oracle database

Must have experience leading teams to deliver efficient data driven solutions key stakeholder management.

Job Family Group:

Technology

Job Family:

Applications Development

Time Type:

Full time
Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.

Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi.

View the ""EEO is the Law"" poster. View the EEO is the Law Supplement.

View the EEO Policy Statement.

View the Pay Transparency Posting",3.8,"Citi
3.8","Tampa, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1812,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
39,Senior Data Visualization Analyst,$52k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Guild is hiring for a Senior Data Visualization Analyst who will sit at the intersection of data, infrastructure, and analytics, to help shape and deliver business-critical reporting and value-added data insights for Guild. You will be responsible for organizing, standardizing, and analyzing our data to tell deeper stories about our business – where we are, where we've been, and where we need to go. This role will have a critical impact on the business and our students by providing visibility into and opportunities for improvements across all aspects of our operations.

As a Senior Data Visualization Analyst, you will:
Develop a deep understanding of business and operational needs by building strong cross departmental relationships.
Support Guild's Analytics teams by creating, maintaining, and improving insightful reporting which enables our business partners to access actionable, insightful data to drive decision making.
Partner with Data Services teams to deliver clear, accurate analytical datasets which drive high-quality reporting, including creation of production-quality code base.
Perform in-depth data QA by diving in to various data sources to identify and resolve issues
Maintain and manage an intake of requests from stakeholders, understanding the priority and impact of various reporting requests, and managing expectations for delivery.
Translate business questions into analytical requirements as part of a well-defined development cycle.
Monitor performance, accuracy, and usage of existing data and reports.
Act as subject matter expert for Looker within the Analytics team, supporting team members in troubleshooting issues that arise.
In addition to working on the Decision and Data Science team, in this role you will collaborate with other Guild leaders including: Jack Chang (Senior Manager - BI Infrastructure), and Noah Yetter (Data Engineer).

You are a strong fit for this role if you have:
Proven business experience with SQL, Excel/Google Sheets, and BI Tools
Demonstrated attention to detail and commitment to reporting accuracy
Analytical, intellectually curious, creative problem-solver who is comfortable going beyond data access to analytics and strategic insights
Keen design and data visualization skills – you know how to transform data to generate useful insights and be easily digestible
Strong written and oral communication skills – you can build analytical and decision support models, synthesize recommendations, and create effective presentations for all audiences
Team player mindset, with strong interpersonal and influencing skills
Passion for our mission – Guild is pioneering a new path for education as a benefit in a complicated and regulated space – success means quickly and effectively adapting your expertise
Preferred Competencies:
Analytics and reporting experience in a B2B sales environment
Demonstrated experience building insightful reporting in Looker
Something else? Wonderful, we're curious to learn more about you!
About Guild

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.5,"Guild Education
3.5","Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
40,Sr. Business Data Analyst,-1,"Responsibilities*:
Performing data cleaning, data modeling, data crunching and in-depth data analysis on KPI’s and optimization of subroutine analytics of communications and data mining methodologies
Develop visual, interactive reports using Tableau, Power BI for effective prediction and understanding of data analysis trends and creating automated data analysis workflows using Alteryx designer.
Supporting the Director of Business Planning Analytics through both ad-hoc and project work by analyzing sales data for new opportunities, providing customize reporting and recommendations in support to on-going business decisions and, conducting quantitative analysis including but not limited to ROI, trending, identification and assessment of opportunities and risk, forecasting, regressions, correlation, cannibalization and probability modeling.
Utilizing Excel advance techniques like Pivot Table, V-Lookup H-Lookup for mining data and performing analysis on various sources and summarizing data.
Implementing statistical algorithms such as Linear, Logistic Regression, and Clustering for segmentation's, Time series model (ARIMA), Factor analysis for building correlation, prediction and visualization of the model.
Performing A/B testing and target vs control analysis and profiling, market basket analysis to identify trends and analyze customer purchase behavior.
Working on Waterfall as well as Agile environment including the Scrum process.
Familiarity with statistical programming languages and packages (SAS, SPSS, R, Python)
Utilizing the knowledge of quantitative analytics, data mining, statistics and data visualization to present insights to the senior management to facilitate in strategic decision making.
Working on various reporting objects like Dimensions, Measures, Filters, Calculated Fields, transformations, parameters, conditional formatting, DAX queries, Interactions etc. in Power BI.
Performing Dimensional Data Modeling, Process Modeling for Data Warehouse /Data Mart design, identifying Facts and Dimensions, the creation of cubes, Star Schema, and Snowflake Schema.
Performing exploratory data analysis and data investigation using Alteryx, SQL and Python.
Data management and analyses to enable customer support teams using Excel, Google Sheets, Tableau, Power BI and SQL
Performing descriptive, diagnostic, inferential, prescriptive, and predictive analysis of data.
Extensively working on the creation of customer segmentation, profiling and defining customer purchase patterns using existing customer demographic/transactional data.
Creating engagement tracking dashboards and funnel reports for the mobile app to assist the
Product development team through Mix-panel and New Relic.
Performing A/B testing
Communicating insights from data analysis and influencing change and generating insights and recommendations and presenting these to the senior management.
Performing descriptive, diagnostic, inferential, prescriptive, and predictive analysis of data.
Extensively working on the creation of customer segmentation, profiling, and defining customer purchase patterns using existing customer demographical/transactional data.
Verification of various offers/promotions set by the business teams with pre/post transactional data.
Extracting data from various sources (Oracle, Databricks, MongoDB) using DB queries, Designing and implementing dashboards based on transformed data.
Required *
At least 5-7 years of experience in Analytics
Experience in business requirements gathering
Ability to problem solve and break down complex problem into solvable pieces
Ability to deliver quick and accurate results for each analysis/task
Good communication skills
Experienced in data management, data analysis, data extractio
Skills Matrix -: *
Strong in SAS, SQL
Strong Analytics Background with good exposure to model development, reporting tools (Tableau, PowerBI)
Strong in Advance-Excel, preferably VBA
Strong in basic Accounting and Finance
Patterned and Trend Analysis
Experience in Alteryx, Python/R, SQL, Spark SQL, Oracle, Microsoft Azure Databricks
Excel (pivots, VLOOKUP’s, basic formulae), Power Point (charts, graphs)
Analytics concepts: Test and Control methodology (Sales data analysis, Loyalty Program Analytics, Customer segmentation, Descriptive analysis, Cohort Analysis, Offers/Promotions data trend analysis (coupons, bonus offers, rewards, member offers)
Statistical Techniques (Probability distributions, Confidence Intervals, Statistical Inference, Average, Median, Time Series, Pre and Post data analysis)

Job Type: Contract

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Contract Length:
1 year
Varies
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",4.2,"mroads
4.2","Irving, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Private Practice / Firm,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
41,Marketing Data Analyst,-1,"WHO WE ARE*
Wilshire Law Firm is one of Southern California’s largest plaintiff personal injury, employment, aviation and class action law firms, and recognized as a 2020 Best Law Firm by U.S. News & World Report. To date, our team of nearly 200 legal professionals has recovered more than $750,000,000 for the Wilshire Law Firm client family, providing exceptional service every step of the way.

Utilizing diverse talents and a deep-seated drive to succeed, Wilshire Law Firm consistently delivers on our greatest commitment—achieving the absolute best results for our clients. We constantly ask ourselves, “What can we do better?” We dream big, going beyond what we have done before to redefine our future. Bring your knowledge, your creativity, your passion, and your confidence, and help us empower the world to do more.
Job Description *
Wilshire Law Firm is seeking a full-time Marketing Data Analyst to work as part of our stellar, legal marketing team, in our LA office. You must have outstanding analytical skills, a positive attitude, a creative mind, and the ability to handle multiple projects at once. Essentially, you will hit the ground running with the help and support from everyone at our firm.
Your duties and responsibilities include writing content for: *
· Thrives off of data and analytics

· Perform in-depth attribution and data analysis, including web analytics

· Partner with relevant departments, including IT to develop strategic reporting and dashboards

Perform web analytics tracking initiatives using Google Analytics

· SQL knowledge required

· Knowledgeable in marketing business analytics

· Preferable experience with marketing technologies, including Salesforce CRM, Invoca, Tableau, Domo, Python, digital ads, PPC

· Able to handle large data sets, including advanced Excel experience including pivot tables

· Oversees database development and modification efforts.

· Designs and implements secure, efficient, and accurate databases.

· Maintains current and accurate knowledge of data storage and management best practices.

· Ensures that databases are designed to meet specifications and requirements at the lowest possible costs.

· Ensures that database projects are completed on time and within estimated costs.

· Develops and maintains documentation and standards.

· Gathers, organizes, and interprets statistical data from the database to provide reports to, and answer questions from, upper management.

· Performs other related duties as assigned.
To be considered for this position you must: *
• Work extremely well under pressure, adhere to deadlines.

• Be organized and detail-oriented.

• Possess excellent English written and oral communication skills.

• Have an understanding and sensibility of the legal market and consumers.

• Have strong research and analytical skills.

• Be able to perform with little supervision.

• Positive attitude, work ethic, and ability to multitask across a multitude of projects and tasks.

• Agency experience, plus.
Desired qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree or relevant work experience.

Analytical/Marketing background.
BENEFITS PACKAGE*
Wilshire Law Firm offers competitive pay, great opportunities for growth and advancement and a competitive benefits package, including PTO policy, paid holidays, company-paid medical coverage option, option (plus HMO, PPO and PPO with Health Savings Account options), dental, vision and life insurance. We also provide company-paid life/AD&D coverage, EOP assistance and parking in the office building. We also sponsor professional development trainings and educational conferences.

We strive to maintain a familial atmosphere and team work environment by working collaboratively and hosting various firmwide social events throughout the year.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday",4.5,"Wilshire Law Firm
4.5","Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Private Practice / Firm,Legal,Accounting & Legal,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
42,Laboratory Analyst I (Data Review),-1,"URGENTLY HIRING!!! *
Job Description*
Overview: * ACS Laboratory is the largest Cannabis testing laboratory in the Southeastern USA and we want YOU to join our dynamic team! We are currently seeking a Laboratory Analyst I for Data Review (Full Time).
At ACS Laboratory, we provide a cutting-edge training program with excellent opportunities for growth!

We also offer a total benefits package that includes: 401k, PTO and Flex time off, medical, dental, vision and life insurance. If you are highly motivated, reliable and want to experience working in one of the top laboratories in the nation, please send resume and cover letter.

The Laboratory Analyst I, will play an integral role in the overall support of the laboratory. The Laboratory Analyst I may coordinate and perform tasks and activities in several areas of the laboratory. Each day the Laboratory Analyst I may be assigned specific areas of responsibility within the scope of the job as outlined herein. Depending upon the area of responsibility the Laboratory Analyst I will monitor and prioritize tasks involved, in addition to routine laboratory support duties.
YOU MUST HAVE LABORATORY WORKI**NG EXPERIENCE* (Chemistry degree or Florida licensed technician preferred).
Duties and responsibilities

Reviews and prepares accurate sample results

Assists with training of new employees

Performs and maintains documentation to comply with laboratory requirements

Reviews, maintains, and assists in updating internal SOP. Collects & records QC data or other similar data. Participates in QA processes, accordingly

Practices and actively participates in laboratory safety

Meets annual training requirements

Review instrument qualification documents in compliance with internal guidelines.

Perform data review for analytical test results generated by QC department for compliance with internal SOPs, and Specifications.

Review, support and escalate Out of Specifications (OOS) events. Ensures that investigations assigned to data or documentation are appropriately resolved prior to data verification and final sign.

Discusses data interpretation with individual analysts and elevate, if necessary, to determine data disposition.

Facilitates laboratory data or documentation corrections with analysts to ensure accuracy.

Support in maintaining and updating relevant SOPs for data review and reporting as needed.

Support Laboratory Inspection Readiness at site in coordination with Site QA.

Ensures data integrity through the use of data review controls and electronic data audit trails.

Review stability protocols and reports for commercial and R&D products in compliance with internal SOPs and Regulatory guidelines.

CMTL Analysts must be trained by the CMTL on the minimum requirements for sampling and the Standard Operating Procedures for sampling and security.

Qualifications:

Ability to read and comprehend methods and other instructional documents

Attention to detail and the ability to perform and document work in an accurate and repeatable fashion.

Hands on experience with HPLC and GC including computerized software required for the operation of the equipment or analysis of results, preferred.

Proficiency in computer skills (Microsoft Office: Outlook, Excel, Word etc.…)
Knowledge in sample preprocess, complex preparation, data review, reporting, and instrument maintenance.
Stress and time management skills
Excellent written and verbal communication
Adheres to safety and compliance policies and procedures
Must be available to train and work on weekends
Must be a minimum of 21 years of age
Must be able to pass a comprehensive background check and drug/alcohol test
CMTL Employees must not work for an MMTC, regardless of whether compensation is received; nor shall CMTL Employees receive any form of compensation or benefits of any kind from an MMTC while employed by a CMTL.
CMTL Analysts must have, at a minimum, a bachelor's degree in a natural science, to include, but not be limited to, biology, chemistry, physics, engineering, or environmental sciences; or hold a current license as a Clinical Laboratory Personnel, as defined in s. 483.803, F.S, from the Florida Board of Clinical Laboratory Personnel.
YOU MUST HAVE LABORATORY WORKING EXPERIENCE*
Must demonstrate the following attributes:
Honest and trustworthy
Respectful
Possess cultural awareness and sensitivity
Exceptional attendance & punctuality
Chemistry degree or Florida licensed technician preferred

Hours: Rotating schedules and weekends are required.

Available Shift(s): 6:00 am- 2:30 pm, 8:00 am- 4:30 pm, and 11:30 am- 8:00 pm (this position requires working a full shift every Saturday, taking off one day during the week).

Please note: this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive list of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

$15-$17/hr

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $15.00 - $17.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Night shift
Overtime
Weekends
Experience:
Laboratory: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Sun City Center, FL 33573 (Required)
Shifts:
Evening (Required)
Mid-Day (Required)
Morning (Required)
Working Days:
Saturday (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
acslabcannabis.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"ACS Laboratory
4.0","Sun City Center, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
43,Product Data Analyst - Identity Verification,$55k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Remitly, we help immigrant communities around the world send $6 billion a year to their loved ones. Sending money is faster, easier, and costs less with our all-digital money transfer platform. We want to transform the lives of immigrants and their families by providing the most trusted financial service products on the planet. At Remitly, your work has a direct and positive impact on people around the globe. Your work matters, every day.

The Role:

The Identity Verification Program is a component of Remitly's AML Compliance Program. Anything less than an exceptional product experience for Identity Verification can be a barrier for our customers. As a Product Analyst on this team, you will work with product managers, engineers, and UX designers to help us develop instant verification experiences that strengthen our relationships with our customers so they can send what they need safely, securely and quickly. The quantitative insights you bring will have an out-sized impact on our customers. You will report directly to our Director of Product Analytics.

What You'll Do:
You will develop an understanding of the customer experience and bring it to life in a visual way.
You will uncover customers insights in our compliance experience, with the goal of increasing customer trust through recommendations on the product roadmap.
You ask, ""Why?"" and question the status quo. You view unexpected data results as a puzzle to be solved, a challenge that you accept.
You can explain the methods behind your analyses and validate your results. Once you have data to support your ideas, you're willing to advocate for and move your recommendations forward.
Who You Are:
Bachelor's degree in a technical, business, or quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, or related field).
Minimum three years of relevant experience in a product or customer analytics role.
Experience designing and analyzing A/B experiments and are comfortable with basic statistical techniques
Experience working at startups or large consumer internet/technology companies
Experience with technical skills (e.g. SQL, R, Python) and data visualization tools (e.g. Tableau)
Who we are:

Remitly is a group of passionate people working to make international payments easier and more transparent on both the web and mobile devices. We are seeking team members to join us that want to make a difference and change an industry. We pride ourselves on aiming high and delivering results, data being at the heart of everything we do, and encouraging our team to own business decisions and outcomes. Sound like the place for you? Join us.

Our Benefits:
Unlimited paid time off
Health, dental, and vision benefits + 401k plan with company matching
Company contributions to your HSA or FSA plan, if you choose one
Continuing education and corridor travel benefits
Scholars program
Remitly is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Equal employment opportunity has been, and will continue to be, a fundamental principle at Remitly. We are committed to nondiscrimination across our global organization and in all of our business operations. Employment is determined based upon personal capabilities and qualifications without discrimination on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex, gender identification and expression, marital status, military status or status as an honorably discharge/veteran, pregnancy (including a woman's potential to get pregnant, pregnancy-related conditions, and childbearing), sexual orientation, age (40 and over), national origin, ancestry, citizenship or immigration status, physical, mental, or sensory disability (including the use of a trained dog guide or service animal), HIV/AIDS or hepatitis C status, genetic information, status as an actual or perceived victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or any other protected class as established by law.

Remitly is an E-Verify Employer",4.4,"Remitly
4.4","Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
44,Business Data Analyst,-1,"Business Data Analyst

Are you a passionate leader looking for autonomy and exciting career possibilities? Do you take an energetic and resourceful approach to problem-solving while bringing innovative ideas and analytics to life on behalf of your team and your customers? Do you enjoy effectively translating requirements into an efficient process and/or system solution? If so, DHL Supply Chain has the opportunity for you.

Job Description

To apply knowledge and analytics to develop and communicate timely, accurate, and actionable insight to the business through the use of modeling, visualization, and optimization. Responsible for the reporting, analyzing, and predicting of operational processes, performance, and Key Performance Indicators. Communication with site leadership, operations, and finance on efficiency, customer requirements, account specific issues, and insight into to the business, operations, and customer.

• Applies hindsight, insight, and foresight techniques to communicate complex findings and recommendations to influence others to take action

• Uses knowledge of business and data structure to discover and/or anticipate problems where data can be used to solve the problem

• Uses spreadsheets, databases, and relevant software to provide ongoing analysis of operational activities

• Applies data visualization for discovery and timely insights to decrease Cycle Time to Action (CTA)

• Assists site operations in identifying areas for improving service levels, reducing operational costs, and providing other operational enhancements

• Supports account start-up analysis and/or report implementation as needed

• Develop standardized and ad hoc site and/or customer reporting

• Streamlines and/or automates internal and external reporting

• May investigate and recommend new technologies and information systems

• May conduct feasibility analyses on various processes and equipment to increase efficiency of operations

• Partners with Finance to develop financial models to analyze productivity and payroll; calculates cost benefits and business impact and proposes solutions

• Develops predictive models to help drive decision making

• Designs, develops, and implements data gathering and reporting methods and procedures for Operations

• Responsible for tracking, planning, analysis, and forecasting of storage capacities, inventory levels, equipment and/or labor requirements

• Coordinates with Operations Systems group to ensure technical issues and problems are being identified, addressed, and resolved in a timely manner

• May coordinate with ILD group on issues related to modeling customer solutions, including providing data and relevant insight for customer pursuits

• Responsible for assisting finance and senior leadership in modeling yearly labor budget based on operational and profile changes

Required Education and Experience

• Undergraduate degree in business, logistics, mathematics, statistics, or related field, required

• 1-3 years of analytics experience, required

Our Organization has a business casual environment and focuses on teamwork, associate development, training, and continuous improvement. We offer competitive wages, excellent affordable insurance benefits (including health, dental, vision and life), 401K plan, paid vacation and holidays.

Our Organization is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"DHL
4.0","Livermore, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
45,Healthcare Data Analyst,$42k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview: *
Recovery Centers of America is looking for an experienced Healthcare Data Analyst to join the Operations Team. Goal of position will be to gather and analyze healthcare data from multiple sources and deliver actionable insights that will guide organization to make well informed decisions. This position will also support Operations and EHR team in development of business requirements and UAT testing for system enhancements and product improvements.
Specific Responsibilities**: *
Designs, develops, maintains, and validates business intelligence and analytics capabilities/tools in support of company’s goals of improving quality/access and reducing costs.
Performs ad hoc analysis from initial ask to delivery, including preliminary conversations with end users, data extractions from various data sources, data visualization, and narrative analysis.
Collaborate with team members to collect and analyze data
Establish KPI’s to measure the effectiveness of business decisions
Structure large data sets to find usable information
Create presentations and reports based on recommendations and findings
Ability to gather and analyze data to solve complex problems and evaluate scenarios to make predictions on future outcomes and support decision making
Leverages thorough understanding of business process and system processes to make recommendations and propose technical/non-technical solutions to meet business requirements
Translate story boards and metrics into technical requirements from which to develop insightful solutions
Work independently as well as in a team to deliver end-to-end analytic solutions within tight deadlines
Ensure quality of deliverables using development testing methods, code reviews and user acceptance testing
Able to adapt quickly to new technologies to create the most insightful analytics for the business need
Strong and effective inter-personal and communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group of clients and staff, including management and senior level executives
Analytical mind with problem-solving aptitude
Offer suggestions on ways to improve healthcare delivery, quality, and cost effectiveness for client health plan populations
Responsible for tracking on-going outcomes reports and manage priorities for upcoming reports
· Work closely with the EHR team to understand the workflows and data points that exist in the EHR system, myAvatar.

· Responsible for UAT testing in the EHR to ensure enhancements/product improvements being delivered meet business requirements and delivers on business needs.
Required Education and Experience: *
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Operations Research, Economics, Management Science, Mathematics, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, or similar field preferred
Experience in data analysis
Technical writing skills
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Experience working in healthcare setting required
Experience in interpreting data and making the outcomes actionable
Experience developing and deploying BI Solutions with at least one of the following applications: QlikView, Qlik Sense, Microsoft Power BI, Tableau preferred
Proficiency in SQL database design and SQL programming, including stored procedure and table joins preferred
Excellent oral, written, and presentation communication skills
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",3.3,"Recovery Centers of America
3.3","King of Prussia, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
46,Data Analyst,$49k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"A Data Analyst job in St. Louis, MO is currently available through Belcan. In this role, you will be responsible for creating reports and dashboards. To be considered for this role, you will have a four to six years of experience and experience with SAS, Spotfire, J-Review, R, SAS, JavaScript, Python, and/or Perl. This is a very visible, contract opportunity with a growing company and has excellent upward mobility. Data Analyst Job duties: * Create reports and dashboards * Work with data manager or steward to resolve data quality issues * Work with data scientists to understand their workflows and requirements * Manage model degradation * Ensure models remain predictive Qualifications: * SAS, Spotfire, J-Review, R, SAS, JavaScript, Python, or Perl * Understanding of data standards * Filter, tag, join, parse, and normalize data sets for use in analytical models * Four to six years of experience If you are interested in this Data Analyst job in St. Louis, MO, please apply via the 'apply now' link provided. Belcan is a global supplier of engineering, technical recruiting, and IT services to customers in the aerospace, industrial, and government sectors. Belcan engineers better outcomes through adaptive and integrated services-from jet engines, airframe, and avionics to heavy vehicles, chemical processing, and cybersecurity. Belcan takes a partnering approach to provide customer-driven solutions that are flexible, scalable, and cost-effective. Our unique capabilities have led to continuous growth and success for nearly 60 years. We are a team-driven Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity.",3.3,"Belcan
3.3","Saint Louis, MO",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
47,Data Analyst,-1,"We are currently recruiting for an Data Analyst Audit in the White Plains, NY area (remote to start - White Plains office when office reopens). The Audit Data Analyst will support the global audit function and optimize reporting capabilities. This is a unique role in a growing Audit department. The Data Analyst will assist in the deployment and ongoing maintenance of the audit management tool, TeamMate+. This role, provides a unique opportunity for the right candidate to learn both the internal audit function as well as the business. This is an exciting time as the Internal Audit department is undergoing rapid transformation globally. Key to the success of this new global function is the development of innovative data analytics and visualization tools. These tools will range from supporting the auditors in execution of their audits and other assurance work, to providing audit management with insightful dashboards and metrics to both supervise their staff and report the Board Audit Committee. Compensation: 85K – 95K Base +15-20% Bonus + Benefits package
Responsibilities: *
Partner with the global Internal Audit department to create, execute and manage a portfolio of analytic projects for use in Audit execution testing, continuous monitoring and continuous auditing
Develop data analytics and visualization tools, utilizing various data sources from throughout organization
Develop dashboards and metrics reports highlighting key performance indicators
Develop automated quality assurance tools
Assist in Senior Management and Board Reporting data visualization
Contribute to the TeamMate+ global deployment and provide on-going support
Perform iterative analytic scripting of ad-hoc requests supporting audit projects
Work with audit teams to continuously assess results and refine the analytics
Experience & Requirements: *
Bachelor's degree (Master's a plus) in Data Science, Computer Science, Information Technology, Information Systems, Statistics, Applied Math, or any other related field
Demonstrated skills in data analytics and/or visualization is required
Experience in Power BI and Alteryx
Prior role within big-4 consulting or internal audit function covering data analytics/automation/visualization
Experience with TeamMate+ would be an advantage
Excellent analytical, verbal and written communication skills
Strong MS Office skills required
Additional language(s) desirable
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $85,000.00 - $95,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Power BI: 2 years (Preferred)
Data Analysis: 3 years (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Bellwether Staffing Solutions,"White Plains, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
48,Data Reporting Analyst for Non-Profit Service Program,-1,"The Data Management & Reporting Manager provides overall Data Analysis and reporting support for the Mission Services Department of Goodwill. This is an exciting career opportunity to gain relevant work experience in Data Analysis.

40%- Oversees the management of the Front Desk Operations of the Center, including supervising one full-time Reception Clerk. Develops methods to further automate intake processes as well as automate support and administrative processes and Information. Maintains department Sharepoint to ensure ease of use and completeness of materials shared.

60%- Oversees the client tracking database structure. Ensure quality data within the database. Prioritizes inbound data analytics and reporting work requests. Works with program staff and leadership to consult, advise, and perform various ad-hoc and project-based data analysis and reports. This includes both routine operational data analysis and reporting, as well as customized, ad-hoc and business intelligence oriented work.

Required:

1) Knowledge of SharePoint tools like ULS Logs, workflows to automate business processes, and SharePoint forms for tasks as well as document storage.

2) Advanced Excel.

3) Database structure knowledge

4) Some SQL preferred

5) Loads of customer services

No certifications are required. Preference will be given to candidates with a related degree from an accredited college or university.
Please complete the two Indeed Assessments required to be considered for this position: 1) Data Analysis and 2) Phone Screening.*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $14.00 - $16.00 per hour

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Daily temperature checks, masks and sanitizing supplies required.

Experience:
Office Management/Supervising front desk: 1 year (Required)
Sharepoint (Office 365): 1 year (Preferred)
Data Analysis: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Tallahassee, FL (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
goodwillbigbend.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/GoodwillBigBend
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Goodwill Industries, Big Bend","Tallahassee, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
49,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description:

Job Title: Data Analyst

Client: State of Arkansas, Department of Health

Location: Onsite – Little Rock, Arkansas

This is a contract position in Data Analysis. You will be responsible for data cleanup and analysis of covid related data.

Must have:

Excel experience
Data Analysis experience (trends, thresholds, queries, etc)
Data Cleanup experience
Data entry experience
Be able to work Full time, Monday through Friday, 8am-4:30pm with possible weekend work

What you will need to be successful in this role:

Strong Excel and data analysis experience
Strong attention to detail
Ability to handle confidential information with discretion and professionalism
Some understanding of medical terms and terminology is preferred but not required

Sounds Great, Right? Here’s What’s Next

Apply online and our team will contact you ASAP to discuss further!

A Little About Us

Learn about TalenTrust – helping clients find, keep and grow the best people

Read This New Book: Solve the People Puzzle

TalenTrust and our partners are Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employers and welcome all qualified applicants. Applicants will receive fair and impartial consideration without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or religion or other legally protected status.",3.4,"TalenTrust LLC
3.4","Little Rock, AR",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
50,Data Integration Analyst,-1,"About Us


Riskified is the AI platform powering the eCommerce revolution. We use cutting-edge technology, machine-learning algorithms, and behavioral analytics to identify legitimate customers and keep them moving toward checkout. Merchants use Riskified to increase revenue, prevent fraud, and eliminate customer friction. Riskified has reviewed hundreds of millions of transactions and approved billions of dollars of revenue for merchants across virtually all industries, including a number of Fortune 500 companies.

About the Role


As a Data Integration Analyst at Riskified, you will be using technical skills, analytical insights and business perspective to ensure we have the most accurate and complete data set from each client. You will be responsible for helping new and existing customers to ensure they are receiving the best performance possible and leading the change on processing the data of the largest eCommerce merchants in the world. Riskified's clients come in many different sizes and industries, use different technical platforms, and each one has their own unique data concerns and order flows that have to be uniquely assessed. Our team is the one to fully capture these aspects and recommend the best implementation as well as point out any possible issues.

What You'll Be Doing


Supporting the onboarding of new customers by completing the following:
Working with some of the largest companies in the world to perform comprehensive analysis of their data
Perform due diligence of business models and flows
Data modeling as part of the integration architecture
Combining the technical, business and analytical objectives to come up with tailored solutions for onboarding merchants
Data wrangling & sanitization
Prioritize, track, and communicate data issues internally and externally
Become the subject matter expert of riskified product and technology
Work closely with analysts, research and data science teams to accommodate changes in industry data
Monitoring and resolving data irregularities of existing customers by completing the following:
Monitor key health indicators and automated alerts
Identify, research, and offer system-wide solutions for common issues
Work closely with Account Management to engage customers
Qualifications


Candidates must be eligible to work in the U.S. for other than practical training, without any Visa sponsorship (including OPT Visas)
3+ years of experience in a data-centric industry role (ETL, DBA, etc.)
2+ years with SQL or NoSQL databases
2+ years experience with data wrangling (R, Python for data processing)
2+ years with optimizing technical processes
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Eagerness to learn new technical concepts
Strong analytical skills and attention to detail
Life at Riskified


We are a fast-growing and dynamic startup with 500+ team members between our offices in Tel Aviv and New York City. We value collaboration and innovative thinking. We're looking for bright, driven, and passionate people to grow with us.

Some NYC Benefits & Perks:
Fully-covered medical, dental, and vision insurance from your first day
Stock options for all employees, 401(k) + matching, commuter benefits
Catered lunch, team events, healthy snacks, yoga, pilates, soccer league, and more
In The News


Fortune Magazine: 25 Best Workplaces in New York

Announcing Riskified's $165M Funding Round

Inc Magazine: Best Workplaces

Built In NYC: 100 Best Workplaces

Crain's: Best Places to Work in New York City

TechCrunch: Riskified Prevents Fraud on Your Favorite eCommerce Site

Calcalist: Riskified is the Most Promising Startup in 2019

Riskified is deeply committed to the principle of equal opportunity for all individuals. We do not discriminate based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or any other status protected by law.",4.5,"Riskified
4.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
51,Big Data Analyst,$43k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Infosys is seeking a Big Data/Python Developer with experience in platform administration preferred. The position will primarily be responsible interface with key stakeholders and apply your technical proficiency across different stages of the Software Development Life Cycle including Requirements Elicitation, Application Architecture definition and Design. You will play an important role in creating the high-level design artifacts. You will also deliver high quality code deliverables for a module, lead validation for all types of testing and support activities related to implementation, transition and warranty. You will be part of a learning culture, where teamwork and collaboration are encouraged, excellence is rewarded, and diversity is respected and valued.

Required Qualifications:
Candidate must be located within commuting distance of Dallas, TX or be willing to relocate to the area. This position may require travel in the US and Canada.
Bachelor’s Degree or foreign equivalent, will consider work experience in lieu of a degree
2+ years of experience with Information Technology
2+ years of experience in Hadoop ecosystem, i.e. Hadoop, HBase, Hive, Scala, SPARK, Sqoop, Flume, Kafka, Python
1+ years of experience in Python programming - strong understanding and hands-on programming/scripting experience skills – Python, UNIX shell, Perl, and JavaScript.
Strong knowledge in object oriented concepts, data structures and algorithms
Good experience in end-to-end implementation of DW BI projects, especially in data warehouse and mart developments
Knowledge and experience with full SDLC lifecycle
Experience with Lean / Agile development methodologies
U.S. Citizenship or Permanent Residency required, we are not able to sponsor at this time

Preferred Qualifications:
2+ years of experience in software development life cycle
2+ years of experience in Project life cycle activities on development and maintenance projects
2+ years of experience in Hadoop ecosystem, i.e. Hadoop, HBase, Hive, Scala, SPARK, Sqoop, Flume, Kafka, Python
Experience in developing data science/analytics pipeline, i.e. starting from installation of various packages, data engineering, data analytics is preferred.
Working experience with Machine learning libraries, H2O, NLP is preferred
At least 1 year of experience in Relational Modeling, Dimensional Modeling and Modeling of Unstructured Data
Good experience in end-to-end implementation of DW BI projects, especially in data warehouse and mart developments
Good understanding of Data integration, Data Quality and data architecture
Good expertise in impact analysis due to changes or issues
Experience in preparing test scripts and test cases to validate data and maintaining data quality
Strong understanding and hands-on programming/scripting experience skills – UNIX shell, Perl, and JavaScript
Experience with design and implementation of ETL/ELT framework for complex warehouses/marts. Knowledge of large data sets and experience with performance tuning and troubleshooting
Hands-on development, with a willingness to troubleshoot and solve complex problems
CI / CD exposure
Strong written and oral communication skills
Ability to work in team in diverse/ multiple stakeholder environment
Ability to communicate complex technology solutions to diverse teams namely, technical, business and management teams
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience and desire to work in a Global delivery environment

The job may entail extensive travel. The job may also entail sitting as well as working at a computer for extended periods of time. Candidates should be able to effectively communicate by telephone, email, and face to face.

About Us
Infosys is a global leader in next-generation digital services and consulting. We enable clients in 46 countries to navigate their digital transformation.
With over three decades of experience in managing the systems and workings of global enterprises, we expertly steer our clients through their digital journey. We do it by enabling the enterprise with an AI-powered core that helps prioritize the execution of change. We also empower the business with agile digital at scale to deliver unprecedented levels of performance and customer delight. Our always-on learning agenda drives their continuous improvement through building and transferring digital skills, expertise, and ideas from our innovation ecosystem.
To learn more about Infosys and see our ideas in action please visit us at www.Infosys.com

EOE/Minority/Female/Veteran/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin",3.3,"Infosys Limited
3.3","Dallas, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1981,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
52,(Sr.) Data Analyst -,-1,"Wednesday, August 5, 2020

Merrick Bank is a top-25 credit card issuer and merchant acquirer in the VISA/MasterCard networks, and a major recreational vehicle lender.
The Bank is a Utah Financial Institution and a member of the FDIC.

At
Merrick Bank, we specialize in credit programs that assist people looking to
build or rebuild their credit. We are FDIC insured and recognized as a top-20
issuer of Visa® cards. In total, we proudly serve over 2.4 million cardholders
and have extended over $5.3 billion in credit.

Our
Mission is to make a positive difference in the lives of our customers, our
employees, and our community. We work hard to create a work environment that
empowers our associates to grow, learn, and reach their potential.

This
position is responsible for running multiple monthly processes, extracting
data, maintaining/updating analytical files and data sources, producing ad-hoc
reports and working with the new accounts analytical team. The candidate will improve current processes
through automation, streamlining, and general improvement of the process. Further this candidate will be responsible
for time-sensitive processes requiring audits that involve other departments
and will require being able to explain month to month changes in the audit
reports. This candidate will work
closely with other analysts in the group to assist them in their role through
education of data sources and providing data when needed. Previous experience with large datasets using
R, SQL, or SAS is desired, particularly updating and maintaining
databases. Previous experience with
quality assurance or business intelligence reporting is also useful –
particularly using Shiny or R.

QUALIFICATIONS:

·
Bachelor's degree in a field related to the following skill
set is required. A Master’s degree is
preferred.

·
Expertise with SQL and some familiarity with programming
(SAS being ideal) is required.

·
Knowledge of R, Python, Java script, Shiny, Html, or CSS are
desired.

·
A firm understanding of data manipulation and extraction is
necessary.

BONUS POINTS:

·
Experience with Docker, and Git would is desirable.

·
Experience working with databases is desirable. We are currently using PostgreSQL.

·
Any experience with BI tools such as Shiny (R) or Dash
(python), or writing automated reports with LaTeX is desirable.

·
Experience finding issues with data is desirable.

·
Experience in the banking industry, specifically in credit
cards is desirable.

PRIMARY DUTIES:

·
Monthly process.

·
Prospect selection process and audit.

·
Quality assurance of data processes.

·
Improving the current data environment and making it faster,
and easier to access.

·
Documenting all data and processes the department develops
and utilizes.

·
Effective written and verbal communication skills.

·
Work effectively both individually and in a collaborative
manner with a team.

·
Compliance with Laws & Regulations:

·
Responsible for complying with all of the Bank’s internal
control policies and procedures.

·
Responsible for understanding and complying with all laws
and regulations to which the Bank is subject.

·
Responsible for communicating problems in operations,
noncompliance with the code of conduct, noncompliance with laws and regulations,
policy violations, or illegal acts.

What’s in it for you:

Competitive salary (DOE)

Benefits package
Medical, Dental and Vision (plus much more)

401(k) Plan with Company
Match

Short & Long Term Disability

Group Life and AD&D
Insurance

Paid Vacation, Holidays,
and Personal Days

Employee Events,
including Employee Appreciation Day, Holiday Party, etc.

Tuition Reimbursement
Program

Candidates must have unrestricted authority to work in the
United States without sponsorship.

Merrick Bank is an equal opportunity employer. We
evaluate qualified applicants
without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability,
veteran status, and other legally protected characteristic. The EEO is
the
Law poster is available here: http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm

Please go to our website www.merrickbank.com to apply and learn more about our company

We are an equal opportunity employer. Merrick Bank will do a thorough background check for all hires. This includes a review of your personal credit history, drug testing, background check, and employment/personal references. A good credit history is important.

Other details
Job Family
Account Acquisition & Data Science
Pay Type
Salary",3.5,"Merrick Bank
3.5",Utah,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
53,Data / BI Analyst,$69k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"RedCloud is seeking multiple Data and BI Analysts ranging from Mid to Senior level, to support our growing consulting team! If you are a Data or BI Analyst with an eye for capturing what others miss, a strong analytical focus, and the ability to research, model, visualize, and provide insights as well as identify trends, we want to talk with you!

RedCloud Consulting is a business and IT consulting company with local Puget Sound Enterprise and Mid-sized clients. We have been recognized by Seattle Business Magazine and ranked #1 on their “Best Companies to Work for in Washington” for Mid-Sized Businesses list, awarded #1 Fastest Growing Company in Washington by Puget Sound Business Journal, and named on the Inc. 500/5000 list.

**We are currently only considering local candidates, residing in the Greater Seattle area, for this role**

Responsibilities may include but are not limited to (will vary by experience level):
Work closely with client stakeholders and coordinate delivery of projects in scope and on time
Define business requirements and functional specifications for a BI solution – including data requirements, reporting / presentation layer requirements.
Drive data architecture and modeling recommendations
Perform data ETL processing from multiple sources
Conduct data analysis and interpret data to answer key business questions
Develop report deliverables and data visualizations producing valuable insights to stakeholders
Required Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (will vary by experience level):
An understanding of BI solutions best practices and common pitfalls from architectural design, data source, ingestion, storage, analysis and visualization
Ability to articulate BI and reporting concepts in a way that is easy to understand
Demonstrated ability to coordinate and conduct test efforts for a BI solution
Excellent stakeholder management skills and meeting presence
Proven ability to manage your workload, organizing and prioritizing tasks and clearly communicating status
Ability to multi-task and manage multiple projects and priorities
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Education and Experience:
Minimum BA/BS degree from a four-year accredited university
Demonstrated experience from the “Required Skills, Knowledge and Abilities” section above will vary by level from Mid (3-7 years) and Senior (8+ years).
Desirable systems and tools experience, which will vary by role, may include: SQL skills (connecting to databases, joining tables, queries), SSIS/SSAS/SSRS, data analytics (Advanced Excel, Python, R), reporting visualization and presentation (PowerBI, Tableau, SharePoint)
About Us:

RedCloud is a boutique Management Consulting firm founded in 1995, based in Bellevue, WA with a primary goal of empowering businesses to realize their potential and reach peak performance. We do this with a complete and unwavering focus on accountability, dependability and results. We achieve this by providing a broad array of both Business and IT consulting services in addition to staffing solutions to our clients. Our professional services include Strategic Planning, Process Improvement, Project Management, IT Management, Sales and Marketing, Business Intelligence and Cyber Security Services.

Learn more about us at redcloudconsulting.com.",4.6,"RedCloud Consulting
4.6","Bellevue, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
54,Data and Policy Analyst - Writer/Coordinator,-1,"Job Description

At Acumen, LLC / The SPHERE Institute, Data and Policy Analysts provide analytical support for research and consulting projects for government and private clients, primarily in the area of health policy. This position is responsible for managing and analyzing data, researching and interpreting policy, and communicating findings to multiple audiences.

Data and Policy Analysts perform a wide array of functions as part of the research process. Those applicants interested in focusing on writing/coordinating will help create and report descriptive statistics, conduct literature searches, independent research and summarize findings, coordinate project activities and communications among diverse groups of internal and external clients and team members, interpret study specifications, research findings and quantitative analyses for relevant audiences, prepare project reports, memos, presentations and proposals, deliver technical assistance and presenting findings to clients, and perform other duties as assigned.

Required Skills

As we review your materials, we are looking for candidates who best exemplify the following qualifications:

Qualifications Required
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative, public policy, or related field or equivalent relevant experience
Good quantitative analytical skills
Good oral and written communication skills
Good organizational skills and strong attention to detail
Familiar with one or more of the following technical competencies: statistics programming, policy writing, research methods documentation, or project management
Able to demonstrate initiative, critical thinking, and problem-solving
Able to work in a team-oriented environment
Able to prioritize tasks and meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment
Demonstrated aptitude and enthusiasm for learning
Qualifications Desired
Demonstrated interest in health and social policy
Any application without a cover letter will not be considered. Transcripts and writing samples are not required, however highly preferred and may be requested. We ask that you submit an application for only one office location. We are excited to review your application and look forward to seeing how you may best contribute to our work.

Job Location

Washington, District of Columbia, United States

Position Type

Full-Time/Regular",3.5,"Acumen
3.5","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
55,"Analyst, CX Data Science",$112k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"TriNet is a leading provider of comprehensive human resources solutions for small to midsize businesses (SMBs). We enhance business productivity by enabling our clients to outsource their HR function to one strategic partner and allowing them to focus on operating and growing their core businesses. Our full-service HR solutions include features such as payroll processing, human capital consulting, employment law compliance and employee benefits, including health insurance, retirement plans and workers’ compensation insurance.

TriNet has a nationwide presence and an experienced executive team. Our stock is publicly traded on the NYSE under the ticker symbol TNET. If you’re passionate about innovation and making an impact on the large SMB market, come join us as we power our clients’ business success with extraordinary HR.

JOB SUMMARY/OVERVIEW
The Analyst, CX Analytics will be responsible for conducting Voice of the Customer (VOC) analyses, leveraging a wide range of analytical and data visualization tools to uncover and communicate opportunities to improve the customer’s experience.

The CX Analytics team supports business leaders at TriNet in the Customer Experience organization by providing the customer’s perspective throughout all phases of their tenure and ensuring the customer is at the center of the organization’s most critical business decisions.

Leveraging analytical tools such as Qualtrics, Tableau, and SAS, the Voice of the Customer team analyzes customer behavioral data and open-ended customer feedback TriNet receives through various sources, including: Net Promoter surveys, CSAT surveys, website and app intercept feedback, product feedback, customer engagement data, and customer demographic data.

The Analyst, CX Analytics will collaborate with internal business stakeholders to:
• Deliver real-time, actionable customer insights, leveraging all tools and resources available.
• Integrate qualitative and quantitative customer feedback responses with customer behavioral data to address targeted business questions.
• Supporting the Net Promoter System program, including measurement of NPS, analysis of the drivers of NPS, and management of the Closed Loop process.
• Continuously improve the effectiveness and efficiency of the team’s research and analysis methodologies, processes, and deliverables.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES
• Leverages survey, behavioral, demographic, and transactional data to inform stakeholders and strategic decisions.
• Conducts Voice of the Customer research, including text analytics, synthesis of multiple data sources, and ad hoc analyses.
• Ties customer feedback data to customer behavioral data to drive impactful insights and recommendations.
• Effectively translates data into insights by proactively and effectively communicating the “so what” from the data, as well as issues and opportunities exposed by the data.
• Collaborates with key internal partners to identify and understand customers’ underlying needs and implement solutions that address root causes of customer pain points.
• Continuously drives reporting and dashboard improvement by simplifying and automating, where possible.
• Participates in communicating research results to executives and other stakeholders.
• Collaborates cross-functionally with other teams and departments on complex projects.

JOB REQUIREMENTS AND QUALIFICATIONS
Education:
• Bachelor's degree (B. A.) from four-year college or university, with a focus in analytics, data science, business or psychology; or equivalent combination of education and experience.
• Professional management certification is a plus.

Experience:
• Minimum 5 years’ related experience in large, multi-national environment, high tech or PEO experience is helpful.
• Regular exposure to complex, cross functional projects in either a project or program management capacity.
• Experience in presenting data visually to tell a clear story.
• Experience in presentation and translation of complex findings into layman’s terms.
• Experience with unstructured data analysis, including text analytics.
• Experience with and understanding of data and analysis tools, including Tableau and SAS.
• Experience with and understanding of various statistical methods.

Other Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
• Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite, particularly Excel and PowerPoint.
• Excellent analytical skills, including strong business acumen.
• Ability to communicate, build trust, and influence employees at all levels of the organization.
• Ability to adapt to a fast paced, continually changing business and work environment while managing multiple priorities.
• A demonstrated commitment to high professional ethical standards and a diverse workplace.

WORK ENVIRONMENT/OTHER INFORMATION (Travel required, physical requirements, on-call schedules, etc.)
• Minimal travel required.
• Work in clean, pleasant, and comfortable office setting.
• The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions

Please Note: TriNet reserves the right to change or modify job duties and assignments at any time. The above job description is not all encompassing. Position functions and qualifications may vary depending on business necessity.

TriNet is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate against applicants based on race, religion, color, disability, medical condition, legally protected genetic information, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions), age, veteran status or other legally protected characteristics. Any applicant with a mental or physical disability who requires an accommodation during the application process should contact recruiting@trinet.com to request such an accommodation.

#LI-AF1",3.4,"TriNet
3.4","Dublin, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
56,Product Data Analyst (MUST have SQL exp.),$48k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Grubhub is dedicated to connecting hungry diners with our wide network of restaurants across the country. Our innovative technology, easy-to-use platforms and streamlined delivery capabilities make us an industry leader today, and in the future of online food ordering.
We strive to create a workplace that reflects the diversity of our customers and the communities we serve. When you join our team, you become part of a community that works together to innovate, solve problems, take risks, grow, work hard and have a ton of fun in the process!
Why Work For Us
We have a fast-paced environment and that is what our teams thrive on. Grubhub believes in empowering people and offering opportunities for development, as well as professional growth. We value strong, positive relationships in all areas: with each other, our customers and our greater community. Want to be a part of a team of diverse collaborators in an authentically fun culture? If so, we want to talk to you - and hear what’s your favorite restaurant for food delivery!
About You: You are a smart, world-class, passionate about ecommerce and analytical person who wants to help define and build innovative experiences on both mobile and web platforms. You help develop a strategy and vision and build and execute feature roadmaps from start to finish. You embrace this cross-functional role that requires you to work closely and successfully with senior leaders across the company, engineering/IT, QA, design, customer care, and the rest of the product team.

Participate in defining roadmap projects
Support PMs with data analysis to help inform business decisions (impact analysis, root cause analysis, cost/benefit analysis), expediting product discovery and prioritization efforts
Create SQL queries and dashboards to monitor experiments
Provide insights into product usage to inform innovation or areas of weakness
Work closely with other product team members to help understand how you can provide data to power decision making
Gathering and unearthing unmet customer needs through research, data analysis, user experience analysis and testing, competitive research and any other relevant tools
Be able to prioritize and handle multiple requests for information at any one time
Understand how user interactions translate to data that you can provide insights

2+ years of relevant Product Management experience with 1+ years of that experience in e-commerce preferred
Technically proficient in pulling disparate data sets together to address questions and provide insights
MUST have 2+ years using SQL to build queries, reports and dashboards
Experience building KPI, KEI reporting to monitor performance and quickly respond to changes in performance
A born communicator with strong written and verbal skills
History of teamwork and proven ability to get the job done
Ability to “dive deep” and use data to prioritize a roadmap as well as validate completed projects
Have a natural curiosity that overcomes obstacles to get answers
Well organized, detail-oriented and self-motivated
Comfortable in a fast paced constantly changing environment
A self-starter with a strong bias for action
A team player and fun to work with too

Flexible PTO. Grubhub employees are provided a generous amount of time to recharge their batteries.
Health and Wellness. We provide programs that support your overall well-being such as generous medical benefits, employee network groups, company-wide fitness challenges, and a comfortable and casual workplace! We also support our parents by offering 8 weeks of paid parent bonding time, a 4-week returnship program, and 6-8 weeks paid medical leave.
Learning and Career Growth. Your personal and professional development is a priority at Grubhub. From day one, we empower you to lead and be an active participant in your career growth. We provide continuous learning opportunities, training, and coaching and mentorship programs.
MealPerks. Who’s ready for some lunch? We provide our employees with a weekly Grubhub credit to enjoy and support local restaurants. We also offer company-wide meals several times a year to bring our Grubhub family together.
Fun. Every Grubhub office has an employee-led Culture Crew that connects people through fun, meaningful events and initiatives. Some of our popular past events include: Wing-eating contests, Grubtoberfest, 5k Runs, Bring Your Child to Work Day, regular happy hours, and more!
Social Impact. We believe in the importance of serving the communities that support our business. In addition, employees are given paid time off each year to support the causes that are important to them.


Grubhub is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here: DOL Poster. If you are applying for a job in the U.S. and need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to TalentAcquisition@grubhub.com and let us know the nature of your request and contact information. Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.
CA Privacy Notice: If you are a resident of the State of California and would like a copy of our CA privacy notice, please email privacy@grubhub.com.",4.0,"Grubhub
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
57,Data Analyst,-1,"This is an opportunity to join the leadership team at our US Corporate Office. Our client is a $2+billion global company focused on delivering the products and services to healthcare, pharmaceutical, and medical device Customers. They have a long history of success and are excited about what the future holds. We are seeking an enthusiastic data analyst professional with a background in accounting, information systems, or comparable business experience who is ready to create and innovate in support of their goals.

What you will do:

The data analyst will be responsible for planning, organizing, and executing analytics related to internal audits and business processes throughout the Company (including IT, financial, operational, compliance, quality and fraud). The role will develop repeatable data analytics processes to provide timely audit assurance, improve audit efficiency, and automate business processes. This position will drive analytics and strategy for Internal Audit and will collaborate with Internal Audit management and business functions within the organization to improve internal controls, create efficiencies, and add value to the business.

Provide an understanding of business and data requirements, and design visualizations for initial concepts and prototypes that can be presented to Internal Audit and business partners.

Perform detailed data analysis (determine data structures, content, and quality of the data through examination of source systems).

Design and create data visualizations (reports and dashboards) using Tableau as required.

Maintain a controlled repository of data visualization templates and views in Tableau.

Contribute to the planning, sampling, and testing of Sarbanes-Oxley controls.

Explore innovative ideas to continuously improve the audit methodology and audit procedures including the strategic deployment of technology to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of audit procedures and increase value to business partners.

Partner with Internal Audit team members to develop and deliver a data analytics strategy in all phases of the audit process including risk assessment, planning and scoping, fieldwork, testing, and reporting.

Develop training and usage of data analytics capabilities within the Internal Audit team.

Work with Internal Audit colleagues to continuously improve the department and achieve department goals.

What you need to be successful:

You must have advanced skills related to Tableau, SQL, and other analytics software such as Alteryx.

You have a Bachelors degree in accounting, information systems, or other related degree.

You are comfortable working in a complex global organization where youve had successful interactions and built relationships across functions, regions and business units. Your excellent verbal and written communication skills helped you influence, consult, and create compelling business cases at all levels of the organization.

You are able to inspire and instill a common vision and framework with individual and team projects.

Candidates with the audit experience and certifications such as CPA, CIA, CISA, CFE, Tableau certification, or other big data type certifications preferred.

This position may be elevated to a Senior Data Analyst role for candidates that possess an appropriate level of relevant experience as determined by STERIS.

Offering You In Return:

The opportunity to join a company that will invest in you for the long-term. Our client offers competitive salaries, healthcare benefits, tuition assistance, paid-time off, holidays, matching 401(k), annual merit, and incentive plans. Join and help write our next chapter.

Must have Sarbanes experience

Finance experience a plus

Audit experience very desirable",4.7,"Job Juncture
4.7","Mentor, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
58,Data Analyst,-1,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Kforce has a client in search of a Data Analyst in Philadelphia, PA.

Key Tasks:
Serve as client point of contact for data/statistical analysis workstreams and inputs
Provide statistical, epidemiological, and/or econometric expertise to the development of project methodologies, analysis plans or study protocols
Perform descriptive and advances statistical analysis using large patient and/or claims databases to support project goals
Synthesize findings and package insights on client spending, utilization, quality, and specific clinical areas for use by client services team or client directly
Collaborate with client services team, product team, researchers, and external stakeholders to navigate challenges
Facilitate/attend regular project meetings between the company and client
Work with the company product team to translate analytics processes to repeatable, scalable solutions
Support overall company methodology/strategy development
REQUIREMENTS:
Masters level Statistics, Computer Science, or equivalent degree strongly preferred
2-3 years of experience in health care client services, management consulting or healthcare product delivery
Experience with statistical packages including R, SAS, and familiarity with Python
Extensive experience with analytical work including advanced modeling tools such as R, SAS, Tableau, etc.
Past exposure to payer/provider landscape, value-based care, and specific risk-based payment and delivery reforms encouraged
Demonstrated ability to lead development of core deliverables from cradle to grave (data analysis, strategy development, operations/process improvement, etc.)
Experience owning complex tasks/workstreams and leading others
Excellent verbal/written communications and executive presentation skills required
Passion for improving health care a must - you will get to work alongside some of the country's leading health care experts
Strong work ethic and entrepreneurial spirit - we are building a company from the ground up, so every team member is given a significant amount of responsibility and growth opportunity
Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,"Kforce
4.1","Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
59,Data Analyst,$41k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sony Electronics, Inc. look for the risk-takers, the collaborators, the inspired and the inspirational. We want the people who are brave enough to work at the cutting edge and create solutions that will enrich and improve the lives of people across the globe. So, if you want to make the world say wow, let's talk.

Job Description

Sony Electronics Inc. has an opportunity available for a Data Analyst within the B2B team for Imaging Products & Solutions of Americas – Professional Division. Based in the group’s Paramus, NJ headquarters, the Data Analyst reports into the Business Management (marketing) group, but will support cross-business functions including sales, marketing, and planning and control. The Data Analyst will be the primary point of analyzing various monthly and quarterly reports received such as industry market research reports, channel partner point of sale (POS) reports, channel program utilization reports and financial reporting reports. This highly visible position will be tasked with developing and maintaining databases and automated reporting analytics as well as processes to ensure consistency and accuracy of information that will be used for business decisions by the B2B management team.

Responsibilities

The Data Analyst will have as a key responsibility the gathering, consolidation, reporting and analysis of POS data from multiple sources (internal and external) for the B2B segment on a monthly and ad-hoc basis. Focus will include assessing sales performance versus budget/forecast on a consolidated, territory and individual basis (identifying areas of success and gaps/opportunities) and reporting those results to management. This assessment will go beyond numbers presentation; and will involve identify trends and providing initial insight regarding contributing factors.

The Data Analyst will also prepare monthly & quarterly consolidated revenue attainment results by salesperson for compensation purposes, and actively contribute to and support management during the sales quota-setting process. Working with B2B sales team, will help identify gaps in revenue/quota attainment. In addition, this position will be involved in research and analysis of year-over-year sales results, and marketplace conditions/areas of business growth potential.

With management input, the Sales Analyst will build upon existing corporate analytics to establish the tools, processes and reporting methodology to support these analyses as they relate to the B2B business and modify accordingly based on future business direction and needs.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree.
Must have 2-4 years of related experience.
Advanced Excel proficiency including pivot tables, formulas and macros.
Solid oral and written communication skills, and professional presentation skills.
Must have high level skills in Microsoft Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook.
Preferred Requirements
Bachelors’ Degree concentration in finance, mathematics, statistics is preferred.
Working knowledge of database creation, coding, manipulation preferred.
Experience with Oracle databases and Power BI is highly desired.
Salesforce.com experience is a plus.
Sony Electronics is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values employees with a broad cross-cultural perspective. We strive to create an inclusive environment, empower employees and embrace diversity. We encourage everyone to respond. All applicants will receive fair and impartial treatment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, age, legally protected physical or mental disability, protected veteran status, status in the U.S. uniformed services, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information or on any other basis which is protected under applicable federal, state or local law.

Disability Accommodation for Applicants to Sony Electronics, Inc.

Sony Electronics, Inc. provides reasonable accommodation for qualified individuals with disabilities and disabled veterans in job application procedures. For reasonable accommodation requests, please contact us by email at talenthelp@am.sony.com, or you can mail your resume to: Sony Electronics, Human Resources Department, 16535 Via Esprillo, San Diego CA 92127. Please indicate the position you are applying for.
EEO is the Law

EEO is the Law Supplement

Right to Work (English/Spanish)

E-Verify Participation (English/Spanish)",4.2,"Sony Electronics
4.2","Paramus, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1946,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
60,"Intelligence Data Analyst, Senior",$77k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Intelligence Data Analyst, Sr

Job Description: Provides support to the Department of the Army

Intelligence Information Services (DAIIS). Responsible for delivering world

class organizational messaging for the Army intelligence enterprise through

the Multimedia Messenger Manager (M3). Provides data management functions

in the form of data governance, data architecture, data warehousing, data

quality management, metadata management, data security management, data

development management, data operations management, data refinement,

integrated data services, data transformation services, data discovery

services, data tradecraft services, advanced data analytics, and technology

pursuit. Serves as an enterprise access manager/validator for Army

intelligence users to access intelligence community PKI-enabled databases or

communities of interest (COI) on JWICS such as NCTC Online and JEMS.

o Required Skills: Power Business Intelligence (BI), ability to

manipulate data, experience with training

o Desirable Skills: Python coding experience is a plus",4.4,"The Buffalo Group
4.4","Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
61,Data Integration Analyst 1,$26k-$46k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Integration Analyst I

General Description:

Monitor and manage daily functions and operations of a portfolio of mortgage loans transfer of servicing as related to data mapping to ensure smooth and timely conversion.

Essential Functions and Duties: ·
Complete data mapping for all master fields, special loan and escrow fields for all servicing transfer conversions.
Ensure completion of all tasks in accordance with the Project Plan, updating Plan with tasks, completion dates, etc.
Produce required tables for mapping client codes to applicable fields.
Actively participate in meetings to provide status reports and identify and resolve potential issues.
Maintain accurate and timely communication with sub-servicing clients, prior service's, and internal department personnel to ensure minimal impact to clients and their customers.
Complete detail balancing of mid-size and large transfers including fund reconciliation.
Understand impact of data conversions as they pertain to servicing operations.
Handle related transfer of servicing issues, including research, trial, and final audit and comparison of data.
Manipulate data from various servicing platforms and convert to usable format in MSP (Black Knight).
Required Qualifications:
Advanced PC skills: Microsoft applications, Excel spreadsheets, macros, merge documents, database conversions, record layout, etc.
Working knowledge of accounting functions as they relate to reconciliation and balancing
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills and attention to detail and accuracy
Ability to handle complex, multiple tasks simultaneously in a fast-paced environment
Exceptional organizational and time management skills
Preferred/Other Qualifications:
Experience in mortgage servicing environment
Knowledge of Monarch, Access, Jira
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
https://workforcenow.adp.com/mascsr/default/mdf/recruitment/recruitment.html?cid=fcd47a55-549b-413b-a4e7-c18e32d48625&ccId=19000101_000001&jobId=169880&source=CC3&lang=en_US
Work Remotely:
No",2.2,"Dovenmuehle
2.2","Elgin, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1844,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
62,Data Analyst,$44k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"Collaborate with business stakeholders to understand their needs, then create and manage the on-going use of new data products to support them
Review data from internal and external customers with a view to identify trends that might lead to business insights for our sales team
Generation and maintenance of several daily, weekly, and monthly reports to be used by internal customers
Management of Leadership Team’s Key Performance Indicator Dashboard
Design and build and maintain dashboards to measure, compare, and monitor select productivity data from our warehouse activities
Work with 3rd party datasets to understand and provide descriptive models of our portion of the automotive aftermarket
Look for ways to increase efficiency of data mining, analysis, visualization, and dissemination
Work with category management and sales personnel to create the tables, charts and data insights that will populate customer presentations
Continually improve and help automate the delivery of data driven products to internal and external customers
Work to take ownership of our analysis and reporting structure and seek to take this portion of the business to the next level
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $40,000.00 - $46,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
COVID-19 considerations:
Daily, temperature screening
Daily, spraying and surface cleaning
Bi-weekly, testing on site

Experience:
Data Analysis Skills: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Application Question:
• Are you comfortable with statistical analysis (mean, mode, quartiles, regression, etc.)
• Are you detail oriented
• Are you able to effectively communicate technical topics to non-technical end users
• Do you love data
• Do you love to learn
• Are you comfortable working with multiple teams

Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.8,"PGI
2.8","Memphis, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
63,Data Analyst,$60k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Datadog:

We're on a mission to build the best platform in the world for engineers to understand and scale their systems, applications, and teams. We operate at high scale—trillions of data points per day—providing always-on alerting, metrics visualization, logs, and application tracing for tens of thousands of companies. Our engineering culture values pragmatism, honesty, and simplicity to solve hard problems the right way.

The team:

We are building a first-class Internal Analytics team composed of Data Engineers and Data Analysts. We use cutting-edge data collection, transformation, and analysis tools in order to provide other teams with data that will help them better understand both our customers and our own operations so they can make strategic data-driven decisions.

The opportunity:

As a Data Analyst within the Internal Analytics team, you will help ensure all teams at Datadog have the data they need to drive their projects. You will have a chance to interact with all other departments including other Engineering teams, Product Managers, Designers, Marketing, and Customer Success.

You will:
Contribute to building the data model layer that is used by the whole company to query internal data and analytics
Build actionable data reports and visualizations that will help other teams make strategic decisions
Help product managers, designers, and engineers to understand our products usage and user behaviors, and facilitate data-driven decision making
Help marketing teams optimize their initiatives
Run deep data analyses and investigations
Work to discover how different technologies are being adopted over time by different segments of users
Present findings to team leads and executives
Train other employees to use data to answer questions without assistance
Requirements:
You are a clear, concise communicator that works well with others
You can explain complex datasets to non-technical people in understandable ways
You are able to clean a dataset and conduct a data analysis in Python or similar language
You are fluent with SQL and are able to write complex and performant queries with no assistance
You’ve mastered data analysis and visualization in Looker, Excel, Google Sheets, Tableau and/or similar tools
You have a natural curiosity and investigative mindset - driven to know “why”
You want to work in a fast, high-growth startup environment and thrive on both autonomy and collaboration
2+ years of professional experience
Bonus points:
You are familiar with Spark and/or Hadoop
You have some experience with data stores similar to AWS Redshift or S3
You are familiar with data storage optimization (keys, schemas, …)",4.2,"Datadog
4.2","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
64,Sr Analyst - Data Analytics,$71k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Team

The Auto Proceeds Optimization and Data Science Team at Ally is responsible for optimization proceeds across the Ally Off Lease and Repossessed portfolio and manage risk of leasing portfolio as well as support residual setting This includes collaborating with internal (matrix partners) and external vendors to optimize channel, geographic, reconditioning and pricing strategies. Our primary purpose is to provide data & analytic driven solutions to optimize residual setting and used vehicles' proceeds, efficiency, and profitability across Auto line of business.

Job Description

The Remarketing Proceeds Optimization and Data Science team is in the process of innovating their proceeds' and processes' optimization methodologies by embracing the most recent data science & AI technology to boost auto business revenue. As a member of Remarketing Strategy and Decision Science team, the analyst will be responsible for gathering data from multiple resources, improving data quality, developing modern web/BI based data driven products and supporting decision making. The role communicates with data scientists to understand pricing optimization strategies across multiple channels, meanwhile communicates with front end business partners to understand business requirement. The role also will perform data engineering with SQL, SAS, Pyhton or R and develop front applications and choose the right visualization tools that can best convey insight drawn from data. The role will be required to have a strong understanding of business objectives and how analytic outputs drive critical decisions

Additionally, the role will work with IT to ensure solutions are successfully moved to production, and thereafter oversee future application upgrade or adjustment.

Job Responsibilities

Lead all data governance initiatives and action plans to success.
Deep understanding of data management principles and practices.
Gathering data with diverse resources, performing data cleansing, normalization and transformation and integration, etc.
Design application architecture with some well used design patterns like MVC
Develop, test, maintain and improve data driven front end applications
Use visualization tools like Power BI or Packages from Python
Leverage understanding of data and the business to make recommendations to meet business needs
Create logical and physical data models to ensure high data quality
Resolve issues for customers in a timely, efficient manner
Work with 3rd party vendors and IT to install software tools
Use SVN, GIT or similar for source control tools
Research of new technologies and data, such as telematics data usage, and new tools for data exploration and visualization.

Qualifications

3+ Years of Data and Business Analysis Preferred
Bachelor's degree in quantitative or technical field required (Mathematics, Information System Management, Economics, Computer/Data Science, etc). Master's degree strongly preferred
Python charting experience required: using packages including matploylib, Seanborn, Numpy, PYSpark
Some SAS experience preferred
Knowledgeable about unix or linux; shell scripting preferred
Proficient working with databases: Oracle, SQL server, etc
Familiarity with Hadoop, Cloudera, AWS, EC2 or RDS is a plus
Knowledgeable about logical modeling/ data management and mart creation
Able to work effectively in a highly matrixed organization
Automation mindset a must
Facility working with object-oriented programming methods using multiple languages and tools
Experience with JSON or REST API
Comfortable dealing complex problems
Ability to translate analytic insights into actionable applications via visualization tools such as Power BI and Tableau
Ability to work independently with strong attention to detail
Ability to work across cultures and functions Experience Working with - Growing High Potential Talent Strong Written and Oral Communication skills, as well as ability to Manage Large Meetings Strong Microsoft Access, Excel, and Power Point skills Strong organizational, analytical and interpersonal skills Proficiency in Oracle SQL, Cognos, Tableau, and other reporting - analysis tools Technical expertise in data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets
Represents Ally in a professional and positive manner in all situations

Ally Overview

Ally Financial Inc. is a leading automotive financial services company powered by a top direct banking franchise with the opportunity, experience and people to redefine the industry.

Ally's automotive services business offers a full suite of financing products and services, including new and used vehicle inventory and consumer financing, leasing, inventory insurance, commercial loans and vehicle remarketing services. Ally Bank, the company's direct banking subsidiary and member FDIC, offers an array of deposit products, including certificates of deposit, savings accounts, money market accounts, IRA deposit products and interest checking. Ally's Corporate Finance unit provides financing to middle-market companies across a broad range of industries.

Total Rewards

Ally's compensation program offers market-competitive base pay and pay-for-performance incentives (bonuses) based on achieving personal and company goals. But Ally's total compensation - or total rewards - extends beyond your paycheck and is designed to support and enrich your personal and professional life, including:

Time Away: competitive holiday and flexible paid-time-off, including time off for volunteering and voting.
Planning for the Future: benefits to help you plan for the near and long term including an industry-leading 401K retirement savings plan with matching and company contributions, student loan and 529 educational assistance programs, tuition reimbursement and other financial well-being programs.
Supporting your Health & Well-being: flexible health and insurance options including dental and vision, pre-tax Health Savings Account with employer contributions and a total well-being program that helps you and family stay on track physically, socially, emotionally and financially.
Building a Family: adoption, surrogacy and fertility support as well as benefits that help you take care of your family - parental and caregiver leave, back-up child and adult/elder day care program and child care discounts.
Work-Life Integration: other benefits including Life Matters® Employee Assistance Program, subsidized and discounted Weight Watchers® program and other employee discount programs.

Ally is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We extend equal employment opportunities to qualified applicants and employees on an equal basis regardless of an individual's age, race, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, pregnancy status, marital status, military or veteran status, genetic disposition or any other reason protected by law.",3.9,"Ally Financial Inc.
3.9","Fort Washington, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1919,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
65,Marketing Data Analyst,$36k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary: *
The Database Analyst will work closely with the marketing team in unveiling the business’ story and strategy through the examination of data. The role is crucial to the success of the team to meet increasing analytic requirements and to improve efficiency and accuracy, including performance/KPI reporting, as well as pre and post forma for ongoing campaigns in support of Player Development and CRM.
Tasks: *
· Interfaces with IT development, data warehouse and external vendor teams to fulfill critical data needs, particularly supporting promotions, player performance and development.

· Works with marketing team to create offer matrices and coupon libraries.

· Develops customized SQL queries that lay the strategic groundwork for ad hoc marketing campaigns, Player Offers and the exploration for incremental opportunity.

· Analyzes and reports (“visualizes”) on Player Free Play redemptions (coupons), membership enrollments, tracked play and across all marketing channels (including promotions).

· Works with Player Development to identify key opportunities with Guest offers.

· Regularly reviews key indicators and trends with marketing team to reconcile monthly, quarterly and annual performance goals.

· Performs data quality audits, identifying data collection issues and gaps and recommends fixes.
Experience, Qualifications and Education: *
· Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Data Science, Data Analytics, Computer Science or related field

· 2+ years of experience in database management/programming and data analysis

· 2+ years of experience in at least 1 major database platform (e.g. Oracle, Teradata, or SQL Server) and 1 data extraction software (e.g. sequel server management studio)

· Experience with analysis software and related programming languages a plus (e.g. SAS, Azure, Salesforce, Python, R, etc.)

· Experience with data visualization tools preferred (e.g. Tableau, Crystal Reports) & large data tables

· Exceptional interpersonal, communication and teaming skills; ability to synthesize complex data analyses to simplified summary

· Must be able to obtain and maintain a gaming license
Working Conditions: *
· Long periods of sitting, standing and/or walking in a smoke environment.
Physical Requirements: * Employees are required to meet the following physical demands as essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made for individuals with disabilities.
Occasionally Required: *Exerting 20-50 pounds of force to lift, carry, push and pull to move objects. Climbing to move objects may be required at times.Exerting over 50 pounds of force to lift, carry, push and pull to move objects.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",3.6,"Chicken Ranch Casino
3.6","Jamestown, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
66,Data Analyst - Appraiser,-1,"Valucentric, an employee-based appraisal firm currently operating in 24 states, has an opening for an experienced Certified Residential Appraiser in our Boston office.

This is a full time position in support of our local TEAM of residential appraisers.

The ideal candidate is a currently a Certified Residential level Appraiser with experience in mortgage related residential appraisals. The ideal candidates enjoy having attained an expert level in UAD compliance, are very familiar with the UCDP data-set grading system, and are adaptable and flexible in the needs of the clients and the TEAM. The Valucentric TEAM works collaboratively in all aspects of the business, a truly futuristic approach in our industry.

If qualified and interested, please submit your resume. Qualified candidates will be contacted quickly as this position needs to be filled as soon as possible.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Professional Development Assistance
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Appraisal: 3 years (Required)
License:
Residential or Higher (Required)
Working Days:
Monday (Required)
Tuesday (Required)
Wednesday (Required)
Thursday (Required)
Friday (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
High stress tolerance -- thrives in a high-pressure environment
Company's website:
www.valucentric.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/valucentric/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Valucentric, LLC","Wakefield, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
67,HR Data Analyst,$35k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
Oklahoma City Office - Oklahoma City, OK
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
Bachelor's Degree
Travel Percentage
None
Job Category
General Business
Description

This position works with HR and the business to develop reports and provides analysis to inform and support decision-making. This role will utilize data analysis methodologies, reporting and data visualization tools, and requires an understanding of data mining/mashing, analytical mindset, data visualization, and the ability to frequently interface with executive and senior leaders.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Conducts analysis of HR and/or business data to identify actionable insights. Merges data from multiple sources/systems and provides ad-hoc reporting when needed
Leverages internal HR and/or business data using internal tools, systems, and data sources
Collaborates with cross-functional teams (HR, IT, Product Management and Development) to develop progressive analytics use cases for Product Management.
Proactively partners with key stakeholders to address business gaps or opportunities identified through analytics.
Develops reports, dashboards, and models to explore data and explain opportunities
Merges structured, semi-structured and unstructured data from several systems to highlight company trends related to recruiting and other business areas
Performs moderately complex data analysis and generates insights to support the HR workforce analytics needs of the business to drive informed business decisions
Delivers high quality analysis, reports, presentations using simple and effective visualizations that can be scaled for consumption by a larger audience
Creates and maintains monthly and quarterly workforce metrics and analysis
Builds strong relationships and collaborates with teammates, business leaders, and other internal clients
Automates data and analytics solutions, builds and prototypes dashboards to provide insights
Continuously monitors data quality and integrity
Manipulates and analyzes large data sets to gain insights and provide recommendations
Documents and maintains procedures for reports and records of information management and storage protocols
Develops and delivers weekly, monthly and quarterly client group metrics
Leverages advanced technical knowledge of excel and other data visualization tools
Qualifications

MINIMUM BASIC QUALIFICATIONS

Education/Certification:

Bachelor's degree in Business, Human Resources

Experience:

2-4 years of experience in Data Analytics
Experience with data visualization and advanced analytics tools
Human Resources experience

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS

Education/Certification:

Bachelor's degree in Business, Human Resources or Quantitative Analytics preferred

Experience:

4 years of experience in HR Data Analytics
Human Resources/Workforce Analytics experience strongly preferred
Experience with Power BI, Tableau

Skills/Abilities:

Critical, analytical thinker with strong communication skills
Strong analytical skills and the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
Self-starter who thrives in a fast paced environment
Strong understanding of HR processes and procedures
Collaborative partner, builds and maintains professional relationships

Paycom is an equal opportunity employer and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any kind. Paycom makes employment decisions on the basis of business needs, job requirements, individual qualifications and merit. Paycom wants to have the best available people in every job. Therefore, Paycom does not permit its employees to harass, discriminate or retaliate against other employees or applicants because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy, national origin, military and veteran status, age, physical or mental disability, genetic characteristic, reproductive health decisions, family or parental status or any other consideration made unlawful by applicable laws. Equal employment opportunity will be extended to all persons in all aspects of the employer-employee relationship. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including, but not limited to, hiring, training, promotion, discipline, compensation benefits, and separation of employment. The Human Resources Department has overall responsibility for this policy and maintains reporting and monitoring procedures. Any questions or concerns should be referred to the Human Resources Department.",4.4,"Paycom
4.4","Oklahoma City, OK",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
68,Feshers- Data Analyst@Redmond,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Pactera, leading industry in localization and globalization services, is looking for in-house transcribers to work with us in our Redmond, WA office.

These transcribers will work on a project for our well-known worldwide IT client.

Working hours: *29 hours/ week*

Location: *Redmond, in-office*

Job Type: *Part-time*

Salary*: $14.00 /hour*
Role Responsibilities*
· Download existing transcription file and audio file (provided by Pactera)

· Listen to the recording.

· Verify that the transcription represents the recording

· Identify Speaker Name

· Edit Transcription segments

· Insert tags when necessary (background noise or additional voices)

· Submit the task
REQUIREMENTS*
· Native US English Speaker (a must)

· Ability to transcribe English text from audio

· Ability to closely follow guidelines

· Ability to learn new software quickly

· Must type at least 55 words per minute.

· Must be able to proof own work and be at least 98% accurate.

· Impeccable attention to detail

· Must be able to work on-site in Redmond office

Preferred Skills*:

· Past transcription experience preferred.

· Past working experience as content writer, journal editor or other writing experience.

· Good technical and data management skills.

· Good problem-solving and analytical skills.

· Experience in data entry and computer query procedures using a variety of software applications such as Microsoft Office Suite (Excel, Word and Outlook).
Training and guidelines will be provided.*
To be selected you have to pass a screening test.

We are looking forward to meeting you!

Job Type: Part-time

Pay: $14.00 per hour

Job Type: Part-time

Pay: $14.00 per hour",4.5,"Pactera Technologies
4.5","Seattle, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
69,Energy Analyst/Data Analyst,-1,"Open until filled

Position Summary:

This position is responsible for assisting the Markets Department in the analysis of electric energy supply strategies, power purchase contracts, project development, load trends and rates and pricing strategies in support of the Cooperative's strategic initiatives.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Perform quantitative analysis of historic market pricing data, load data and other factors that drive the strategic decisions for the cooperatives power supply
Create models and tools to automate, increase accuracy and expedite analysis
Assist the Markets Department with database queries, cleaning and formatting of large amounts of data
Identify sources of appropriate economic demographic and load data, design studies to collect and analyze pertinent information in support of load and revenue forecasting activities
Develop and maintain cash flow simulation models for purchased power, load costs and rate recovery
Develop portfolio and market impact analysis based on Nodal Protocols Revision Requests
Develop analytical techniques used in the economic analysis of various supply options and contracts
Develop, analyze and interpret load data to understand customer usage patterns for use in forecasting models, rate design and energy services offerings
Update existing and create new revenue and expense forecasting models using proven methodologies
Compare forecast performance with actual results, explain variances and recommend changes for future forecasting cycles
Perform financial evaluation and analysis of different retail rate structures
Research economic trends, emerging industry issues, impact of technologies, i.e., renewables, energy storage, end-use efficiencies, etc. and develop recommendations regarding their effects on usage patterns and the future demand
Monitor electric market data and factors, regulatory changes and competitor’s rate offerings
Develop and maintain critical information, history and databases
Provide routine and ad-hoc reports and analysis
Develop presentations and reports
Maintain the security of confidential information
Stay abreast of changes in technology

Supervisory and/or Leadership Responsibilities:

May provide technical direction, training and project lead responsibilities

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

Knowledge of using computer systems, which may include setting up and using hardware and software programs, entering data, configuration, or processing information
Knowledge of principles and processes for providing customer service
Knowledge of ERCOT market operations
Knowledge of ERCOT’s Nodal Protocols and financial settlement concepts
Skilled in time management
Skilled in prioritizing and managing changing priorities
Skilled in prioritizing, time management and managing changing priorities
Skilled in project management
Ability to function in a complex, rapid changing environment
Ability to query data, manipulate databases, and create reports and dashboards from databases
Ability to compute and interpret complex financial and statistical data
Ability to stay organized amid many evolving projects; detail-oriented and methodical with large amounts of data
Ability to manipulate and analyze data
Ability to work in a team oriented environment providing ideas and open feedback
Ability to maintain confidentiality
Ability to communicate effectively verbally and in writing
Ability to listen and understand information verbally and in writing
Ability to anticipate, identify, analyze and resolve conflict and problems

Minimum Qualifications – (Education, Experience, Certification, & Licensure):

Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Economics, Accounting, Finance or related discipline
Five years relevant experience
Directly related experience may substitute for education
Valid Driver’s License

Preferred Qualifications:

Advanced degree
Forecasting, statistical analysis and financial evaluation experience
Five years querying and managing large data sets
Advanced user of Microsoft Excel
Advanced user of database querying tools
Proficiency with SQL, VBA, and other programming languages
Experience with scrubbing and managing large data sets

Pedernales Electric Cooperative is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, sexual orientation and gender identity.",3.0,"Pedernales Electric Cooperative
3.0","Johnson City, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1938,Nonprofit Organization,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
70,Data Analyst,$42k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

At Pactiv, the health and safety of our employees is a top priority. In response to the COVID-19 pandemic and in accordance with guidance from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), we have implemented a number of safety precautions at all of our locations to protect our employees. These precautions include, but are not limited to, mandatory face coverings, daily COVID-19 screenings, including temperature screenings, social distancing requirements and proper hygiene protocols. In addition, we provide all of our employees with regular COVID-19 updates and education.

This position is for Pactiv, a company of Reynolds Group Holding Inc.

Job Description:

Develop digital solutions that address unmet needs, provide new insights or identify opportunities for growth.
Utilize digital solutions to enable more effective strategic, tactical and operational insights to support business functions.
Extract big data and transform it into actionable information for users by using the data visualization software Tableau.
Determine best methods to extract, model, manipulate, and present data that meets the requirements of the business.
Assist in the identification of opportunities across functional areas where the application of improved data would create value for the user.
Assist the Project Management Office with the development of digital reporting and tracking solutions for major company initiatives.
Work cross-functionally with groups such as IT, Finance and Logistics.
Assist in the creation and documentation of Robotic Process Automation (RPA) projects aimed at process improvement.
Assist in the development and coding of RPA solutions using the platform Automation Anywhere.

Qualifications:

BA/BS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Finance, Statistics or related field.
Experience transforming large amounts of data.
Experience with data visualization software like Tableau a plus.
Comfortable taking initiative and working both autonomously and in a team environment.
Strong analytical skills and exceptional attention to detail
Python experience required
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.

Pactiv LLC is the leading manufacturer of food and beverage packaging solutions in North America and beyond. Since its founding in 1965, Pactiv has grown to support its customers, providing the broadest selection of products made from over a dozen materials. Today, the company is headquartered in Lake Forest, Illinois, and operates over 60 facilities with more than 14,000 employees across the globe. For more information, visit www.pactiv.com.

Pactiv LLC is an equal opportunity employer. We consider applicants for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, ancestry, citizenship, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, protected veteran status, or any other legally protected status. ""IND1P"" #LI-TM1 #CB1",2.4,"Pactiv
2.4","Lake Forest, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1965,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
71,Senior Data Analyst,$60k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Known

Known is a modern marketing company engineered for the unprecedented challenges and opportunities facing marketers today. Known pairs PhD data scientists with award-winning creatives, expert research teams and strategists. Known is anchored by two decades of groundbreaking market research and data science capabilities, which uniquely empower our marketing strategy and acclaimed creative groups, who produce some of the most innovative, cutting-edge creative work in culture. The result? Marketing that is predisposed to succeed and be persistently optimized, directly impacting clients' bottom lines. Our clients span the leading brands in finance, technology, media, CPG, real estate and many other categories. Known has over 200 employees in 6 US cities including Seattle, San Francisco, Los Angeles, Austin, Boston and New York. Our teams have won multiple Emmys, Clios, Effies, Cannes Lions Awards and ProMax Agency of the Year three times.

Known's Media Science team uses advanced analytics, machine learning, statistics, and algorithms to plan and optimize advertising dollars. We partner with our clients to translate their business goals into meaningful metrics, and buy media across all channels to drive those target outcomes. We are looking for a Senior Data Analyst to join the team and work alongside other data analysts, data scientists, and software engineers.

The ideal candidate will have:
A BS/BA degree from a well-regarded college or university. STEM degrees are preferred.
2-5 years experience in analytics, advertising, ad tech, or media. Experience utilizing Python (or similar language) and SQL regularly
Proficiency in Microsoft Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint)
A desire to work on advertising challenges that require flexibility in approach -- everything from on-the-fly analytics to statistics, big data, machine learning, and mathematical algorithms (but not alone!)
A willingness to learn foundational knowledge and skills rapidly
Superb communication and presentation skills
Ability to think strategically, analytically, and proactively about diverse business problems
Passion for managing the quality & accuracy of analytics, including checking your and others' work
Experience multi-tasking in a fast-paced environment is a plus
Experience working directly with clients is a plus
Experience with media buying is a plus
Experience with predictive analytics / data science is a plus
Your responsibilities would include:
Driving performance for our media campaigns and amazing our clients
Day-to-day monitoring, management, optimization, and development of assigned campaigns
Creating and validating data analyses
Building stories and slides for client reports
Developing new approaches (algorithms, models, and automation) to optimize KPIs and improve Known IP
Operating existing software infrastructure to traffic, evaluate performance, and analyze media
Interfacing directly with clients to communicate results",3.5,"Known
3.5","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
72,Data Analyst,$37k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary*
Advanced Radiology Services is one of the largest physician-owned radiology practices in the country. Our growing practice includes 168 radiologists, 30 advanced practice providers, and more than 100 employees providing administrative support in our wholly owned subsidiary STARS. We value diversity on our team and promote a culture of inclusion. We provide services to more than 60 different sites across the state of Michigan.
Responsibilities and Duties*
The Data Analyst is responsible for using data analytics and financial analysis to assist the billing departments in solving complex business problems and in the development of ongoing monitoring tools.
Responsibilities: *
Serve as the company expert and main source of data support as it relates to Physician billing and billing operations
Identify, analyze, and escalate critical billing risks and issues
Work with internal and external customers to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of billing and billing operations
Coordinate fee schedule updates, analyze potential impact and audit for compliance
Fulfill various data requests using Decision Support tools and databases
Develop and maintain dashboards and reports that assist in monitoring the billing process
Additional duties and projects as assigned
Requirements: *
Bachelor’s Degree in Business Administration, Analytics, Computer Science or Mathematics
Minimum of 2 years of analytic experience is required, medical billing preferred
Experience with medical billing software, Healthpac preferred
Database (SQL) experience is preferred
Proficiency in Microsoft Office products including Outlook, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint
Benefits*
ARS offers career growth opportunity, work-life balance and outstanding compensation and benefits.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"Advanced Radiology Services
4.0","Grand Rapids, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
73,Sr. Data Analyst,-1,"You could say Brightree by ResMed is a technology company. And that’s true. But Brightree is, at its heart, about people. We develop innovative, end-to-end technology solutions and services for people facing everyday challenges in the post-acute care industry. Brightree helps streamline processes, improve efficiency, and increase profitability. For over fifteen years, organizations big and small have put their trust in us—for our wide-ranging solutions, our leadership, and our unmatched customer service. Going to work each day and creating new ways to positively impact our customers’ businesses and the lives of patients is just what we do. Because Brightree is, after all, about people.

To learn more about Brightree technology and solutions watch this short video by our CEO: https://vimeo.com/293016800

The Sr. Data Analyst will be responsible for the conversion, the management and the reporting of data within the Professional Services organization for new and existing customers. The right candidate will have an expert level knowledge of SQL Server with particular emphasis on Stored Procedures and SSIS packages. In addition, the candidate will have the ability to collect, organize, analyze and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy. Most importantly, the ideal candidate will be a creative thinker with a willingness to go the extra mile in order to satisfy the customer’s needs and assist them in whatever way possible.

Let's talk about you and Responsibilities:
Partner with stakeholders to understand new data requirements to ensure results meet the business needs
Work directly with Brightree customers to interpret their requirements to design and implement solutions
Have an expert level understanding of SQL and stored procedures. Make modification to existing Stored Procedures. Will also be required to define new store procedures and SSIS packages
Create solutions that allow capture of existing data into useable Brightree data formats
Mentor Data Analysts on the Data Services team
Communicate and consult with key accounts and customers in non-technical language
Be cognizant of the customer’s expectations on timelines and work diligently towards achieving that goal
Let's talk about skills and experience:
Must have a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, MIS or related field required; plus six years of experience performing analysis and design to solve customer technical and business problems
Strong past experience in Microsoft SQL Server software development including 2 years of query tuning and performance troubleshooting and strong experience writing select, update, delete, and insert statements with multiple table joins
Past experience executing on pre-built SSIS/DTS packages to check data and migrate data to and from data staging tables in SQL
Also should exhibit experience with ETL process and concepts
Prior experience communicating ideas and opportunities to stakeholders in non-technical language
Experience in project management and identification of project critical path.
Comfortable working in a continually changing, customer-focused, matrixed environment
Comfortable balancing multiple high-priority deliverables correctly applying the appropriate judgment of what can shift
#LI-RD1

Joining us is more than saying “yes” to making the world a healthier place. It’s discovering a career that’s challenging, supportive and inspiring. Where a culture driven by excellence helps you not only meet your goals, but also create new ones. We focus on creating a diverse and inclusive culture, encouraging individual expression in the workplace and thrive on the innovative ideas this generates. If this sounds like the workplace for you, apply now!",3.5,"Brightree
3.5","Peachtree Corners, GA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
74,Data Analyst - Insights,-1,"Doximity is transforming the healthcare industry. Our mission is to help clinicians save time so they can provide better care for patients.

We value diversity — in backgrounds and in experiences. Healthcare is a universal concern, and we need people from all backgrounds to help build a better future for all.

How you'll make an impact:
Play a key role in creating client-facing analytics by working closely with our Client Service Managers and Sales teams.
Showcase your engineering skills by creating data products from scratch and automating code so they can be re-used by other teammates.
Work with your team to build your technical and non-technical skill sets.
Leverage Doximity's extensive datasets to identify and classify behavioral patterns of medical professionals on our platform.
Grow into a presentation/communication-focused role or dive deeper into more-involved technical challenges—the choice is yours.
We're trying something different. In the past we'd throw out a laundry list of requirements but we realized there were 4 key traits we need - everything else can be flexible.

A successful candidate must have at least a three-year track record of these traits:
Collaborative—The best candidates and teammates are not only strong in their own aptitudes but care deeply about supporting each other's growth.
Passion for Data—You're going to help our clients and team members with data-driven decision making. We need someone that can manipulate millions of rows of data and also ask the right questions to find the important insights.
Attention to Detail—Clients expect the right answers and the successful candidate will have a history of error handling and creating quality checks to make sure we provide accurate data.
Time Management—Our team operates in a fast-paced environment. We have a lot of clients with a lot of questions and are looking for the best person to manage competing priorities from various stakeholders.
After 90 days on the job, we expect that you will be:
Able to create and evaluate complex SQL statements involving numerous tables and complex relationships.
Conducting Exploratory Data Analysis using Python using some of the most common modules (numpy, pandas, statsmodels, matplotlib).
Comfortable with UNIX command line interface and standard programming tools (vim/emacs, git, etc.).
Fun facts about the Insights team:
We have access to one of the richest healthcare datasets in the world, with deep information on hundreds of thousands of clinicians and their connections.
The members of our team bring a diverse set of technical and cultural backgrounds.
Business decisions at Doximity are driven by our data, analyses, and insights.
We like to have fun - company outings, team lunches, and other social events.
More info on Doximity

We're thrilled to be named the Fastest Growing Company in the Bay Area, and one of Fast Company's Most Innovative Companies. Joining Doximity means being part of an incredibly talented and humble team. We work on amazing products that over 70% of US doctors (and over one million healthcare professionals) use to make their busy lives a little easier. We're driven by the goal of improving inefficiencies in our $3.5 trillion U.S. healthcare system and love creating technology that has a real, meaningful impact on people's lives. To learn more about our team, culture, and users, check out our careers page, company blog, and engineering blog. We're growing steadily, and there's plenty of opportunity for you to make an impact.

Doximity is proud to be an equal opportunity employer, and committed to providing employment opportunities regardless of race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy, childbirth and breastfeeding, age, sexual orientation, military or veteran status, or any other protected classification. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.

This role is a remote position.",4.7,"Doximity
4.7",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
75,DLP Analyst III (Data Loss Prevention),-1,"Position/Title: DLP Analyst III (Data Loss Prevention)

** NOTE: Must have demonstrated experience with McAfee ePO/HBSS. **

Location: Charlotte, NC (Must be within a few hours of our corporate office in Winston-Salem, NC)

Primary Purpose:

The Data Loss Prevention compliance analyst will be the primary Point of Contact of a critical system and process that will ensure key data is monitored and protected following regulatory and legal compliance standards such as PCI, HIPAA, ISO27001 and NIST Cybersecurity Frameworks. The Compliance Analyst will work with the other members of the team to enhance business practices, internal controls and performs other review related activities to support the execution of the department's annual assessment plan.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Following is a summary of the essential functions for this job. Other duties may be performed, both major and minor, which are not mentioned below. Specific activities may change from time to time.
Monitor the data movement and ensure the security protocols are well designed and in function as per requirement.
Work with Security Architects, Security Analysts, Security Administrators and other IT and business departments to design effective and efficient procedures and controls to meet IT compliance requirements
Monitor the use of the tools and ensure a consistent process of improvement is in place.
Understand Healthcare sector requirements and rules for implementing a DLP solution. Adhere to local policies and laws to ensure data movement is appropriate.
Reviewing BAU processes to ensure they are fit for purpose
Recommend remediation activity for compliance activities found deficient and monitors remediation progress
Provide technical auditing duties as liaison between the IT department and internal and external auditing teams
Review audit trails and access control violations, reporting such violations to Security Analysts and management when necessary
Monitor changes in the IT regulatory and security landscape and reports on the impact of those changes to IT security and operational processes and procedures
Collect and document business requirements for process identification/improvement/automation efforts
Contribute to the development of process improvements
Apply knowledge of key regulations to influence assessment scope
Formulate appropriate conclusions regarding the adequacy of internal controls and procedures based on the assessment work performed and knowledge of company operation, drafts well written, clear and concise finding reports and participates in presenting the findings to the Enterprise Risk & Compliance management
Minimum Skills and Competencies:

The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
8+ years substantive experience with End Point protection tools within a licensed financial institution or a regulatory compliance examiner with a federal or state financial services regulator
Bachelors degree in Computer Science or Computer Information Systems or related or equivalent experience
Demonstrated knowledge of HIPAA, PCI, SOX, ISO27000 and NIST Cybersecurity Frameworks
Excellent communication and writing skills
Demonstrated detailed oriented self-starter and the ability to work independently with limited supervision and limited direction, and in collaborative team environments
A strong ability to multi-task and manage varying priorities and projects
Excellent interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills with the ability to communicate security risk and compliance related concepts to a broad range of technical and non-technical staff
The ability to provide support after normal business hours as needed
Proficient in Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)
Desired Skills:
CIA, CISSP, CISA, CISM, CCRISC, or CGEIT certifications
GRC Tool, Tripwire Enterprise, Tripwire IP360, Nessus, BeyondTrust Retina, Qradar, Trustwave TrustKeeper, Proofpoint, McAfee ePO/HBSS
#LI-PJ1

National General Holdings Corp. is an Equal Opportunity (EO) employer Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of any characteristic protected by law. Candidates must possess authorization to work in the United States, as it is not our practice to sponsor individuals for work visas.

In the event you need assistance or accommodation in completing your online application, please contact NGIC main office by phone at (336) 435-2000.",3.2,"National General Insurance
3.2","Charlotte, NC",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1939,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
76,Data Analyst,$41k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst
U.S. citizenship is required for this position due to Department of Defense restrictions.


Role Summary:

Work to collect, organize and interpret data for WPS that delivers enhanced business value and operational agility. This position will be responsible for inspecting, cleansing, transforming and modeling data to support complex advanced analytical solutions. This position will demonstrate emerging analytical capabilities that align with the business to assist in business decisions and help solve complex business problems.

In this role you will:
Work with internal and external stakeholders in framing business problems, identifying data sources and delivering solutions in an exploratory and production environment.
Apply design and data analysis techniques to organize the presentation of data in effective ways to make it easier to understand, insightful, and actionable.
Collaborate with Reporting& Analytics team members to identify and deliver advanced analytical capabilities to WPS business units.
Drive advanced analytical innovation by removing technical and cultural barriers to innovation process.
Provide guidance into the overall strategy and visualization methodologies used to solve complex business problems.
Maintain team repository of reusable data formulas, visualization templates, and views.
Generate advanced methods of data visualization to allow clearer communication, viewer engagement and improved decision-making.
Evangelize and mainstream advanced analytical solutions to internal customers.
Stay current on new and emerging data management and analytical technologies.
Responsible for data acquisition, translation and validation from multiple sources.
Comfortable in manipulating and analyzing complex, high volume, high dimensionality data from multiple sources.
Proactively identify sources of information either internal or external to enhance the research efforts and develop and test new complex data structures.
Automate data gathering to improve the efficiency and accuracy of data collection.
Design and implement data acquisition strategies for diverse sets of data from internal and external sources.
Provide support for legacy reporting environments, including migration of data delivery assets to current technology platforms.
Optimize the performance of new or existing reporting assets, including analysis of execution plans and implementation of techniques to reduce contention.
Review manually produced and automated delivery of data and reporting assets to ensure timely and error-free delivery
This role could be a good fit if you:
Enjoy solving data and reporting-related problems.
Want to work on a team that is diverse in both location and backgrounds.
Possess a strong background working withSQL Server and T-SQL.
Have strong attention to detail and enjoy analyzing data.
Are creative, innovative, and get excited about using data differently.
You’ll benefit from this experience by:
Expanding your SQL Server skillset working with large datasets.
Working with a forward thinking and highly collaborative team.
Working in an environment that serves our Nation’s military, veterans, Guard and Reserves along with their families.
You need to have:
U.S. citizenship is required for this position due to Department of Defense restrictions.
Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent post high school and/or related work experience.
Highly preferred:
2 or more years of progressive technology experience within the data management and analytics domains
2 or more years of database querying& reporting experience with diverse data sets OR a combination of relevant experience.
Experience querying relational and/or multi-dimensional databases (Microsoft SQL Server, Oracle, and MySQL)
Experience with querying NoSQL or other data lake architectures.
Experience with visualization tools such as PowerBI, Tableau or QlikView
Strong communications skills, an affinity for numbers and problem solving.
Your team:

This team is led by 1 manager and has 8 Data Analysts, 2 Process Analysts, and 1 Data Scientist. They are geographically diverse and work together well in their remote setting.

Compensation and Benefits
Eligible for annual Performance Bonus Program
401(k) withdollar-per-dollar match up to 6% of salary
Competitive paid time off
Health and dental insurance startDAY 1
Vision insurance
Flexible spending, dependent care, and health savings accounts
Short- and long-term disability, group life insurance
Dress for your day
Innovative professional and cognitive development programs
Who We Are

WPS Health Solutions is an innovator in health insurance and a worldwide leader in claims administration, serving millions of beneficiaries in the United States and abroad.

Founded in 1946, WPS offers health insurance plans for individuals, families, and seniors, and group plans for small and large businesses. We are a world-class claims processor and program administrator for the government’s Medicare program. And we manage benefits for millions of active-duty and retired military personnel and their families.

WPS has been named one of theWorld's Most Ethical Companies® by the Ethisphere® Institute for 10 years in a row.

Learn more about WPS.

Our Purpose and Values

Our purpose is to make healthcare easier for those we serve.Click Here

Our values– Customer Focused, Individual Responsibility, Mutual Respect, and Driven& Passionate– are the core of who we are and how we conduct business every day.

Health Insurance

WPS Health Insurance offers high-quality health insurance plans for individuals and families, Medicare supplement plans for seniors, and group health plans for businesses of every size.

http://wpshealthsolutions.com/business-units/wpshi.shtml

Military and Veterans Health

WPS Military and Veterans Health administers claims and provides customer service and related activities for the U.S. Department of Defense and the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs and their beneficiaries.

http://wpshealthsolutions.com/business-units/wpsmvh.shtml

Government Health Administrators

WPS Government Health Administrators manages Medicare Part A and Part B benefits for more than 7 million beneficiaries. As one of the largest contractors for the Centers for Medicare& Medicare Services, we’ve served Medicare beneficiaries and their health care providers since 1966.

http://wpshealthsolutions.com/business-units/wpsgha.shtml

Arise

Arise Health Plan provides innovative and high-value health plans to groups and individuals in eastern and northeastern Wisconsin. With our quality Wisconsin-based customer service, Arise offers health care expertise with a personal touch.

http://wpshealthsolutions.com/business-units/arise.shtml

EPIC Specialty Benefits

EPIC Specialty Benefits provides businesses group insurance products that cover:
Life
Disability
Dental
Vision
Voluntary benefits
http://wpshealthsolutions.com/business-units/epicsb.shtml

Stay connected: Sign-up for Job Alerts

FOLLOW US!

Facebook

Twitter

LinkedIn",3.3,"WPS Health Solutions
3.3","Dallas, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1946,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
77,CRM Business Data Analyst,$30k-$56k (Glassdoor Est.),"CRM Business Data Analyst

Position Overview

The CRM Business Data Analyst is responsible for analyzing Customer Relationship Management (CRM) system data in response to channel marketing initiatives. Review online and offline retail sales data and determine effective reporting to drive strategic decisions on future initiatives. Includes analyzing customer information, touchpoints, customer flow and order data by channel.

The Analyst will notice trends, discrepancies, and find effective insights or solutions by taking a holistic perspective. Uses data to predict and address problems or opportunities and finds answers that support strategic goals. Can identify “noise” to ensure focus on key goals and the task at hand.

They will help identify processes, techniques and opportunities for improvement of existing data technology. This person will work closely with the marketing team, corporate IT team and outside agencies. They should be able to work collaboratively and effectively across the team while focusing on action and learning.

Key Responsibilities

Customer Relationship + Engagement

Collaborate with Marketing + Retail teams to build customer life-cycle programs, focusing on engagement, lead generation, and nurturing initiatives.

Re-engage existing customers through the promotion of new products, services, and established relationships.

Educates cross-functional team on customer experience concepts, value, and supporting process impact.

Provides regular competitive benchmarking and customer awareness best practices.

Serves as customer advocate with senior management; ensures that customer findings are understood, tracked, and acted upon.

Insight Mining

Compiles high-quality reports on key performance indicators.

Explains the components of a marketing dashboard and its importance in guiding future marketing initiatives.

Testing + Innovation

Carries out A/B Testing and/or various digital touchpoints campaigns to establish the most effective strategy.

Analyzes basic customer touchpoints and interactions to identify the connection between customers and the brand.

Describes the needs, values, perceptions, emotions, cognitions, and behaviors of target customer profiles.

Leads customer insights gained through analytics to inform design decisions.

Monitors industry best practices and analyzes campaign performance to optimize plans going forward.

Digital Marketing

Identifies opportunities for audience development and growth through analysis of digital customer behavior.

Supports the development of digital marketing multi-channel campaigns aimed at increasing loyalty.

Monitors paid acquisition budget and performance across multiple platforms and develops recommendations on adjustments.

Analyzes creative performance and determines trends based on creative and channel.

Support segmentation initiative to drive enhanced marketing automation capabilities.

Additional Skills

Strong intellectual curiosity, attention to detail, self-motivated, and excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Communicates effectively; ensures that information is passed on to others who should be kept informed, expresses oneself clearly in conversations and interactions; provides background when working through an issue, and proactively provides the necessary level of detail. Interpret information and break down complex topics to digestible, actionable pieces.

Data modeling and familiarity with various Business Intelligent tools, including DOMO.

Experience with Salesforce Service and Marketing Cloud a plus.

Must be able to handle multiple projects simultaneously.

Required Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in business, marketing, analytics, computer science or related field.

Experience working with CRM system data and online marketing retail with 4-7 years of relevant work experience in an analytical role. Heavy focus on analysis and visual representation of the data, and understanding of ecommerce and business best practices, systems and technology.

Advanced technical experience with Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint.

This position has a partial work from home opportunity with required days at the corporate headquarters in Bassett, VA.

Bassett Furniture Industries is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer and does not discriminate against any applicant for employment because of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, age, veteran status or other protected category. Bassett is dedicated to ensuring that qualified applicants are employed and that employees are treated consistently during employment, without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, age, veteran status or other protected category.

EEO/AA-M/F/V/D

Back Share
Apply Now",3.3,"Bassett Furniture
3.3","Bassett, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1902,Company - Public,Home Furniture & Housewares Stores,Retail,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
78,Data Analyst,-1,"POSITION SUMMARY *
The Data Analyst oversees and conducts the conversion of data into insights that will lead to informed business decisions. The position works directly with stakeholders and the business’s top management and executives within the assigned departments. The Data Analyst will handle multiple simultaneous tasks, prioritize work, and remain functional under pressure, and aggressive timelines.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS*
Conduct detailed data analysis on data used across business units to evaluate business processes and improve on/create new feature and provide innovative analytical insights
Perform various data analytics in SQL and MS Excel using statistical models or industry accepted tools
Provide relational database expertise to construct and execute SQL queries to be used in data analysis activities
Manage and redesign the reporting environment, including data sources, security and metadata
Support initiatives for data integrity and normalization
Support the data warehouse in identifying and revising reporting requirements
Provide expertise and translate the business needs to design; and develop tools, techniques, and metrics, and dashboards for insights and data visualization
Responsible for developing and executing tools to monitor and report on data quality
Responsible for providing high level advanced triage support to stakeholders, business partners, and product teams in managing specific issue resolution activities
Analyze data from large disparate data sets, queries, and reports from applications for operations or management staff of assigned business unit(s)
Contribute to applying knowledge of best practices to influence transformations in business, data, and technology architecture
Participate in other interdepartmental cross training
Maintain strict confidentiality and discretion
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS*
TECHNICAL SKILLS: *
Proficient with T-SQL including stored procedures, views, functions, query optimization
Proficient with SQL Server Management Studio (SSMS)
Data reporting and visualization tools like SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) and Power BI
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Office tools including Outlook, Word, Excel including, pivot charts, pivot tables, macros, and complex formulas
Ability to work with structured and non-structured data sources
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience in ETL technologies and frameworks such as SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS).
DATA ANALYTICAL SKILLS: *
Be able to differentiate and express applications of qualitative and quantitative data
Detailed knowledge of two and multi-dimensional data modeling and shaping
Demonstrated ability to multi-task and prioritize
Master problem solving and creative thinking skills
3-5 years of industry experience as a Business/Data Analyst with 3-5 experience in data analysis using tools such as SQL and Excel
Strong organizational and analytical skills
EDUCATION*
Bachelor’s degree (preferred Master’s degree) in Analytics, Computer Science, or Data Science; Mathematics or in a related field and 3-5 years of industry experience in data analysis using SQL
PREFERRED CERTIFICATIONS
CIPM, CFA, and/or CAIA certification(s) with proven track record of relevant technical experience; SQL and relational database knowledge are required for the data analyst position in the financial sector
COMMUNICATION SKILLS*
The role of a data analyst involves working with people and managing junior team of analysts. It is crucial to have exceptional writing and verbal communication skills to perform job duties and manage others
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
business analyst: 3 years (Required)
SQL Server Reporting Services: 2 years (Required)
T-SQL: 2 years (Required)
SQL Server Management Studio: 2 years (Preferred)
Location:
Santa Ana, CA (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Confidential,"Santa Ana, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
79,Data Analyst,$32k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Position: *
TruHearing’s provider network consists of 6,000+ hearing care professionals. As a Network Adherence Analyst, you will be playing a vital role in ensuring that our provider network maintains the highest quality standards by monitoring, tracking, and reporting satisfaction data for adherence.
Essential Functions & Responsibilities: *
• Convert patient satisfaction data found in various databases into information that supports the decision-making process of quality adherence

• Utilize data to assess overall provider quality by:
systematically track providers past performance of delivering customer satisfaction
develop audit capabilities to ensure adherence to patient care and physical location standards
identify trends that can be used to drive improvements
• Collaborate with Network Management team to improve provider quality outcomes by
providing timely and actionable provider scorecards/ dashboards
make recommendations for provider education opportunities and corrective actions where necessary o
identify and report key, top performing providers
• Support quality improvement initiatives and assist with developing new initiatives

• Interpret and comply with quality adherence standards • All other duties as assigned by your supervisor
Qualifications: *
A minimum of 2 years of experience in a similar analytics role
Proficiency with Microsoft programs including Access, Word, Excel & Outlook (Certifications preferred
Expertise on datasets and reports relevant to provider quality, including trends, and customer facing reports
Highly self-motivated
Problem-solving and decision-making skills
Customer service competence
Ability to work well with a group of people to achieve a shared goal or outcome
Excellent communication skills, verbal and written
Coachable and willing to improve • Ability to be creative and flexible when exploring new ideas
Exude the “TruHearing DNA” which includes being energetic, passionate, empathetic, and mission-driven
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $34.00 - $42.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.truhearing.com/careers/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"TruHearing
4.4","Draper, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
80,Junior Data Analyst,$40k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"(Req# 4174)

ICI Services is looking for a motivated individual who wants to join our team in support of a major US Navy program office at Naval Sea Systems Command (NAVSEA) at the historic Washington Navy Yard in Washington, DC. We are a mid-sized defense contractor providing Engineering & Integration, Systems Acquisition, Information Warfare, and In-Service Sustainment to government clients in 14 states and the District of Columbia. We need a Junior Data Analyst ready to join a fast-paced and exciting work environment.

Security Clearance:
Applicant must hold an active Department of Defense (DoD) SECRET personnel security clearance
Responsibilities:
Conduct research across various sources to support the Director’s oversight and assessment of various activities related to PEO USC subordinate commands, laboratories and warfare centers
Perform in-depth analysis of existing data and provide recommendations for data not currently tracked or recorded
Generate performance metrics for multiple programs
Provide recommendations for the visualization of information
Interpret data; analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports and feedback
Create visual representations, graphs, charts, and tables for a wide range of data
Organize and deliver data in decision-quality form for use in executive briefings, reports to Congress, and other messaging
Support the development of responses to Departmental, Federal, and Congressional data calls and requests for information
Maintain data in appropriate databases, verify accuracy in data sets, and assist in the resolution of data anomalies
Experience Requirements:
3-5 years’ recent and relevant experience in data management and analysis with demonstrated progressive responsibility in support of the DoD enterprise is preferred
Work experience in positions requiring exceptional oral and written communication skills and above-average skills in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel applications as well as data analytic and visualization tools
Demonstrated ability to perform at a high-level under short deadlines
Strong organizational skills with the ability to multi-task and prioritize work assignments is required
Education Requirements:
Bachelor degree OR minimum of five (5) years’ active duty military OR minimum of ten (10) years’ industry experience required
EOE/M/F/ Disability/Vet
VEVRAA Federal Contractor

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
DoD logistics data management and analytical: 3 years (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.icisrvcs.com/careers
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.0,"ICI Services Corporation
3.0","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
81,Machine Learning Data Scientist/Analyst,$98k-$156k (Glassdoor Est.),"Machine Learning Data Scientist/Analyst Job

Location(s): CO - Alamosa; CO - Arapahoe; CO - Arvada; CO - Aurora; CO - Bayfield; CO - Boulder; CO - Brighton; CO - Brush; CO - Centennial; CO - Cheyenne Wells; CO - Del Norte; CO - Denver; CO - Durango; CO - Englewood; CO - Evergreen; CO - Fort Collins; CO - Georgetown; CO - Glenwood Spg; CO - Golden; CO - Granby; CO - Grand Junction; CO - Greeley; CO - Hayden; CO - Henderson; CO - Hugo; CO - Ignacio; CO - Keenesburg; CO - Lakewood; CO - Leadville; CO - Loveland; CO - Matheson; CO - Meeker; CO - Minturn; CO - Ophir; CO - Platteville; CO - Pueblo; CO - Rifle; CO - Salida; CO - Silverthorne; CO - Sterling; CO - Wiggins; DC - Washington; GA - Atlanta; MI - Ironwood; MN - Albany; MN - Bayport; MN - Becker; MN - Brainerd; MN - Burnsville; MN - Cannon Falls; MN - Dexter; MN - Dodge Center; MN - Edina; MN - Faribault; MN - Gaylord; MN - Glenville; MN - Glenwood; MN - Grand Meadow; MN - Hendricks; MN - Holland; MN - Hugo; MN - Inver Grove Heights; MN - Jeffers; MN - Jordan; MN - La Crescent; MN - Mankato; MN - Maple Grove; MN - Mapleton; MN - Minneapolis; MN - Montevideo; MN - Monticello; MN - Montrose; MN - New Richland; MN - Newport; MN - Northfield; MN - Paynesville; MN - Pipestone; MN - Reading; MN - Red Wing; MN - Roseville; MN - Shakopee; MN - Shorewood; MN - Slayton; MN - St Cloud; MN - St Paul; MN - Wabahsa; MN - Waconia; MN - Waseca; MN - Waterville; MN - Welch; MN - White Bear Lake; MN - Winona; MN - Wyoming; MN - Zumbrota; ND - Courtenay; ND - Fargo; ND - Grand Forks; ND - Kulm; ND - Minot; ND - Rolla; NM - Artesia; NM - Carlsbad; NM - Clovis; NM - Hobbs; NM - Portales; NM - Rogers; NM - Roswell; NM - Santa Fe; NM - Santa Fe; NM - Tucumcari; SD - Canton; SD - Dell Rapids; SD - Lennox; SD - Marion; SD - Salem; SD - Sioux Falls; SD - South Shore; SD - Watertown; TX - Amarillo; TX - Austin; TX - Borger; TX - Canadian; TX - Canyon; TX - Claude; TX - Dalhart; TX - Denver City; TX - Dimmitt; TX - Dumas; TX - Earth; TX - Floydada; TX - Friona; TX - Hereford; TX - Levelland; TX - Littlefield; TX - Lubbock; TX - Muleshoe; TX - Pampa; TX - Perryton; TX - Petersburg; TX - Plainview; TX - Post; TX - Seminole; TX - Slaton; TX - Spearman; TX - Vega; TX - Wheeler; WI - Abbotsford; WI - Almena; WI - Amery; WI - Ashland; WI - Baldwin; WI - Blair; WI - Chippewa Falls; WI - Cornell; WI - Durand; WI - Eau Claire; WI - Ellsworth; WI - Glen Flora; WI - Hayward; WI - Holcombe; WI - Hudson; WI - Jim Falls; WI - La Crosse; WI - Ladysmith; WI - Madison; WI - Manitowish Water; WI - Menomonie; WI - Neillsville; WI - Phillips; WI - Rice Lake; WI - Sparta; WI - St Croix Falls; WI - Trego; WI - Viroqua; WI - Winter

Are you looking for an exciting job where you can put your skills, talents and education to work at a company you can feel proud to be a part of? Do you want a workplace that will challenge you and offer you opportunities to learn and grow? A professional position at Xcel Energy could be just what you’re looking for.

Position Summary

This position will focus on our Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence business area.

Responsible for providing cyber security guidance, identification, evaluation, design, development, implementation and integration of cyber security solutions, products and services. Provide expertise and execution in the day-to-day operations of all cyber security solutions, technology and procedures including vulnerability management, penetration testing, perimeter management and testing including rogue wireless detection, cyber forensic investigations, and overall security technology and solutions management. Ensure all regulatory, contractual and internal security requirements are met in relation to the day-to-day operations and use of cyber security solutions, technology and procedures. Execute assigned tasks as part of an on-call rotation.

Essential Responsibilities

Manage and operate all security solutions and technology used in cyber security to provide protection and regulatory compliance.
Perform Cyber Security Audits and Penetration Tests as well as mitigation of Cyber Security Vulnerabilities.
Provide cyber security support to business and technical teams in the design of standardized products and customized solutions. Must be flexible to continuously changing demands and technologies and have the ability to maintain a library of security tools used as part of this function.
Develop and maintain a working relationship with 3rd Party service providers responsible for providing technology consulting. Work with business unit executives and service providers to introduce required Cyber Security functionalities into the environment.
Perform Cyber Investigations and maintain forensic evidence as needed.
Provide guidance and training to internal staff including project managers, other Xcel Energy technical areas as well as customers and trade allies on cyber security issues and requirements.
Provide all assigned responsibilities as part of an on-call rotation.

Minimum Requirements

Bachelor’s degree with a concentration in computer science, technology, accounting or business or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Minimum of 5 years experience in I/T including 3 years direct experience in cyber security.
Demonstrated verbal/written communication and presentation skills.
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate information and recommendations to management.
Demonstrated leadership skills.
Proven problem solving and business risk analysis skills.
Ability to excel in a team environment.
Strong investigative, conflict resolution and negotiation skills.
Must possess a broad knowledge relating to I/T infrastructures and have in-depth and up-to-date experience with multiple operating systems and desk side integration.

Preferred

Experience with machine learning/artificial intelligence, specifically the development of algorithms used for the analysis of security data.

As a leading combination electricity and natural gas energy company, Xcel Energy offers a comprehensive portfolio of energy-related products and services to 3.4 million electricity and 1.9 million natural gas customers across eight Western and Midwestern states. At Xcel Energy, we strive to be the preferred and trusted provider of the energy our customers need. If you’re ready to be a part of something big, we invite you to join our team.

Posting Notes: CO - Denver || CO - Alamosa; CO - Arapahoe; CO - Arvada; CO - Aurora; CO - Bayfield; CO - Boulder; CO - Brighton; CO - Brush; CO - Centennial; CO - Cheyenne Wells; CO - Del Norte; CO - Denver; CO - Durango; CO - Englewood; CO - Evergreen; CO - Fort Collins; CO - Georgetown; CO - Glenwood Spg; CO - Golden; CO - Granby; CO - Grand Junction; CO - Greeley; CO - Hayden; CO - Henderson; CO - Hugo; CO - Ignacio; CO - Keenesburg; CO - Lakewood; CO - Leadville; CO - Loveland; CO - Matheson; CO - Meeker; CO - Minturn; CO - Ophir; CO - Platteville; CO - Pueblo; CO - Rifle; CO - Salida; CO - Silverthorne; CO - Sterling; CO - Wiggins; DC - Washington; GA - Atlanta; MI - Ironwood; MN - Albany; MN - Bayport; MN - Becker; MN - Brainerd; MN - Burnsville; MN - Cannon Falls; MN - Dexter; MN - Dodge Center; MN - Edina; MN - Faribault; MN - Gaylord; MN - Glenville; MN - Glenwood; MN - Grand Meadow; MN - Hendricks; MN - Holland; MN - Hugo; MN - Inver Grove Heights; MN - Jeffers; MN - Jordan; MN - La Crescent; MN - Mankato; MN - Maple Grove; MN - Mapleton; MN - Minneapolis; MN - Montevideo; MN - Monticello; MN - Montrose; MN - New Richland; MN - Newport; MN - Northfield; MN - Paynesville; MN - Pipestone; MN - Reading; MN - Red Wing; MN - Roseville; MN - Shakopee; MN - Shorewood; MN - Slayton; MN - St Cloud; MN - St Paul; MN - Wabahsa; MN - Waconia; MN - Waseca; MN - Waterville; MN - Welch; MN - White Bear Lake; MN - Winona; MN - Wyoming; MN - Zumbrota; ND - Courtenay; ND - Fargo; ND - Grand Forks; ND - Kulm; ND - Minot; ND - Rolla; NM - Artesia; NM - Carlsbad; NM - Clovis; NM - Hobbs; NM - Portales; NM - Rogers; NM - Roswell; NM - Santa Fe; NM - Santa Fe; NM - Tucumcari; SD - Canton; SD - Dell Rapids; SD - Lennox; SD - Marion; SD - Salem; SD - Sioux Falls; SD - South Shore; SD - Watertown; TX - Amarillo; TX - Austin; TX - Borger; TX - Canadian; TX - Canyon; TX - Claude; TX - Dalhart; TX - Denver City; TX - Dimmitt; TX - Dumas; TX - Earth; TX - Floydada; TX - Friona; TX - Hereford; TX - Levelland; TX - Littlefield; TX - Lubbock; TX - Muleshoe; TX - Pampa; TX - Perryton; TX - Petersburg; TX - Plainview; TX - Post; TX - Seminole; TX - Slaton; TX - Spearman; TX - Vega; TX - Wheeler; WI - Abbotsford; WI - Almena; WI - Amery; WI - Ashland; WI - Baldwin; WI - Blair; WI - Chippewa Falls; WI - Cornell; WI - Durand; WI - Eau Claire; WI - Ellsworth; WI - Glen Flora; WI - Hayward; WI - Holcombe; WI - Hudson; WI - Jim Falls; WI - La Crosse; WI - Ladysmith; WI - Madison; WI - Manitowish Water; WI - Menomonie; WI - Neillsville; WI - Phillips; WI - Rice Lake; WI - Sparta; WI - St Croix Falls; WI - Trego; WI - Viroqua; WI - Winter || United States (US) || Customer And Innovation || 56130:Cyber Security || Full-Time || Non-Bargaining ||

Requisition Number: 24749

Equal Opportunity Employer: Minority/Female/Disability/Veteran

Individuals with a disability who need an accommodation to apply please contact us at recruiting@xcelenergy.com

EEO is the Law | EEO is the Law Supplement | Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination | Equal Opportunity Policy (PDF) | Employee Rights (PDF)

ACCESSIBILITY STATEMENT
Xcel Energy endeavors to make https://www.xcelenergy.com/ accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact Xcel Energy Talent Acquisition at recruiting@xcelenergy.com. This contact information is for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire about the status of applications.

Our Values: One Team Powered by Many

Committed
Connected
Safe
Trustworthy",3.6,"Xcel Energy
3.6","Denver, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1909,Company - Public,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),-1
82,Data Analyst,$48k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Symetra is seeking to hire an amazing Data Analyst to join our team!

About the role
Our Data Analyst will be responsible for designing, developing and maintaining reporting and database components. You will be responsible for understanding and documenting business and technical data requirements by partnering with business customers and business analysts. The Data Analyst will also draw out requirements by analyzing existing reports, queries, and data.

What you’ll do
• Collect, compile and analyze data, from various structured and unstructured sources.
• Provide technical consulting in the definition, design, and creation of Microsoft SQL database environment.
• Transform client requests into data deliverables to include data models, data mappings and data transformation rules.
• Debug and optimize existing queries, views, and tables to improve performance.
• Create custom reports to support multiple functional users.
• Design and develop packages to transfer data from source to destinations using ETL process

What we offer you
We don’t take a “one-size-fits-all” approach when it comes to our employees. Our programs are designed to make your life better both at work and at home.
• Flexible work program and telecommute arrangements
• Wellness program offering employees a variety of resources crafted to assist you in reaching and maintaining your optimum health
• Plan for your future with our 401(k) plan and take advantage of immediate vesting and company matching up to 6%
• Paid time away including vacation and sick time, flex days and ten paid holidays
• Give back to your community and double your impact through our company matching

Want more details? Check out our Symetra Benefits Overview
Who you are
• Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent experience.
• Business and data analysis experience.
• Minimum of 3 years of Data Analysis and/or report development with modern visualization tools (preferably MS Power BI).
• Minimum of 5 years of recent IT experience.
• Minimum of 3 years of experience developing complex SQL queries for analytics purposes.
• Strong communication skills; ability to interface with office teams and business stakeholders
• Professional with technical reporting skills and willingness to seek understanding of business goals and the role of data in achieving them. Ability to resolve complex issues in creative and effective ways.

We empower inclusion
At Symetra, we’re building a place where every employee feels valued, respected, and has opportunities to contribute. Inclusion is about recognizing our assumptions, considering multiple perspectives and removing barriers.
We embrace and celebrate diverse experiences, identities and perspectives, because lifting each other up fuels thought and creates a stronger, more innovative company. We invite you to learn more about our efforts here.

In a complex industry, we strive for clarity.
Symetra is a dynamic and growing financial services company with 60 years of experience and customers nationwide. In our daily work delivering retirement, employee benefits, and life insurance products, we're guided by the principles of VALUE, TRANSPARENCY AND SUSTAINABILITY. That means we provide products and services people need at a competitive price, we communicate clearly and honestly so people understand what they're getting, and we build products that stand the test of time. We work hard and do what's right for our customers, communities and employees. Join our team at Symetra to meaningfully contribute to a world where more people have access to financial freedom.

To learn more about Symetra and our careers visit http://www.symetra.com/careers

#LI-KM1",3.5,"Symetra
3.5","Bellevue, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1957,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
83,Marketing Intelligence and Data Analyst,-1,"The Kestra team has over 400 years of experience in the external and internal cardiac medical device markets. The company was founded in 2014 by industry leaders inspired by the opportunity to unite modern wearable technologies with proven device therapies. Kestra’s solutions combine high quality and technical performance with a wearable design that provides the greatest regard for patient comfort and dignity. Innovating versatile new ways to deliver care, Kestra is helping patients and their care teams harmoniously monitor, manage and protect life.

The Marketing Intelligence and Data Analyst generates data-driven analyses and develops insights to guide marketing and sales strategy and initiatives related to market entry and product launches. This person plays a key internal consultative role assessing specific market characteristics and developing tailored strategies for Kestra marketing, sales, and operations efforts in the wearable medical technologies space.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES: *
· Derive insights from deep analysis of quantitative and qualitative data from a variety of sources to provide thoughtful and relevant marketing, sales, and operations recommendations.

· Perform and report complex analyses of key health care industry environments including cardiology, durable medical equipment, healthcare systems and payors.

· Act as a project leader owning the research and problem solving with business leaders and team peers to address unique questions regarding market visibility, market opportunity, market segmentation, and market sales performance.

· Validate and integrate the best sources of data and supervise or conduct data mining and alignment across multiple platforms. Where data is scarce or unobtainable, develop logical models and inferences to test and deploy as pathways to understanding.

· Effectively communicate cross-functionally, in all forms of media: making use of visualization, analysis and presentations tools

· Define technical and strategic approaches to researching, profiling, scoring and tailoring marketing efforts to a diverse base of customer types.
COMPETENCIES*
· Ability to be a self-starter, seek new and better methods, and work with minimum supervision

· Demonstrates inherent curiosity, continual learning, and deep expertise in industry best practices

· Ability to collaborate within a Team environment and across functions

· Capability to discern relevant facts and in turn, effectively resolve issues by making good decisions (compliance, quality, integrity, ethics, and critical thinking ability)

· Ability to be flexible in a fast-paced goal-oriented environment

· Demonstrates the understanding of deadlines and time limits, ability to accomplish goals, and the desire to win

· Fluency with data tools and environments including SalesForce, SQL, Excel, Access, PowerBI, Tableau, PowerPoint and others.
QUALIFICATIONS*
Education/Experience Required: *
· Education/Experience Required:

· Bachelor’s degree

· 2+ years of business analytical experience which includes a deep understanding of complex product markets.

· Exceptional written and verbal communication skills (top tier, with prior experience presenting to C-level audiences)

· Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with a solid understanding of statistical techniques

· Demonstrated ability to think and act strategically

· Excellent cross-functional collaboration skills

· Ability to perform as a self-starter and work autonomously
PREFERRED: *
· Master’s Degree in Business

· Knowledge of healthcare, economics, data science, marketing and/or marketing research.

· Familiarity with cardiology solutions, clinical informatics, patient-focused medical technology products, or similar
WORKING CONDITIONS: *
· Fast paced office environment

· Noise level typical of an open office environment
PHYSICAL DEMANDS: *
· Frequent keyboard and mouse usage

· Frequent sitting for extended periods of time

· Occasional bending and stooping

· Occasional lifting up to 20 pounds
TRAVEL: *
· Occasional travel, less than 10%
OTHER DUTIES: *
This job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the Team Member. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change or new ones may be assigned at any time with or without notice.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1.00 - $2.00 per month

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.kestramedical.com
Company's Facebook page:
Kestra Medical Technologies, Inc.
Work Remotely:
No",4.1,"Kestra Medical Technologies, Inc.
4.1","Kirkland, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
84,Data Analyst I,$35k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst I

Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
Ontario - Washington, DC, DC
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
4 Year Degree
Travel Percentage
None
Job Shift
Day
Job Category
Health Care
Description
Mary's Center is committed to promoting diversity, equity and inclusion (DEI) within our organization and the communities we serve. We embrace diversity of experiences, ideas, and individuals, and seek to bring diverse candidates to the table.

The Data Analyst I with work with other Data Management and Health Analytics (DMHA) team members to run and prepare reports for all Mary’s Center Initiatives to include other departmental requests, grant applications and standard reporting and ad hoc reporting. The Data Analyst I is responsible for running routine quality and outcomes reports, responding to requests for data as well as grant reporting. This position requires proficient command of SQL coding and advanced Microsoft Excel skills, including creating and using complex formulas and manipulating large datasets.

Reportability

This position will report directly to the Director of Quality & Outcomes.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
Build complex queries in SQL Server
Build Tableau Dashboards
Analyze large datasets and be able to strategize methods of data collection
Assist other team members with their duties
Run routine quality and outcomes reports by scheduled due dates, validates and analyzes data, sends data to staff responsible for programs.
Prepare patient panels for chronic disease management and group care
Manage health maintenance reminder messages
Qualifications
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skills, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Education and/or Experience – Undergraduate degree in social science research and evaluation field and/or two to three years’ experience working in a research/evaluation setting. Extensive experience with Microsoft Excel, including creating and using complex formulas and large datasets. Knowledge of Word, and PowerPoint is essential, knowledge of SQL, SPSS, preferred, as well as a thorough understanding and working knowledge of patient/client confidentiality issues and HIPAA compliance/regulations. Knowledge of SQL and integration of SQL queries in Tableau. Understanding of data flow. Individual must be detail-oriented and able to coordinate multiple tasks at once.

Physical Demands – Regularly required to sit; frequently required to reach with hands and arms, walk, stoop, kneel, crouch, talk or hear; must be able to lift objects up to twenty-five (25) pounds.

Work Environment – Mostly in a typical office and/or home setting with a quiet to moderate noise level. May be exposed to extreme cold, heat, and humidity due to outside weather conditions.",3.3,"Marys Center For Maternal and Child Care
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1988,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
85,Business Data Analyst,-1,"Our Customer is an American business and financial software company that develops and sells financial, accounting, and tax preparation software and related services for small businesses, accountants, and individuals. They are laser-focused on their customers, live and breathe innovation, and champion those who dare to dream. Their Mission is powering prosperity around the world. They do it by attracting the world’s top talent, bringing vital partners into their global platform, and leaving the world a better place through exceptional corporate citizenship.

We are seeking a Business Data Analyst on a contract basis to support our Customer’s business needs.

What you’ll do:

• Partner with marketing and Product Management by providing actionable insights from data.

• Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with the product

• Develop a deep understanding of the Small Business Group ecosystem and be able to identify and analyze the impact of marketing and product changes on customer behavior, acquisition and retention.

• Use Hypothesis-driven approach to drive setup and analysis of A/B tests and provide recommendations based on the test performance

• Create dashboards to understand early user engagement and proactively come up with ideas to improve customer experience

• Communicate analytical findings and recommendations in a clear and concise way to non-technical audiences, both in oral and written presentations

Must Haves:

• 5+ years relevant experience with a proven track record of leveraging analytics to drive significant business impact.

• Advanced SQL skills and proficiency in visualization tools such as Tableau Experience with R, Python and Hive Exceptional analytical skills and strong business acumen

• Outstanding communication skills with the ability to influence decision-makers and build consensus with teams

Education: BS or MS degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, CS, Econometrics or related field

Hours & Location:

Standard M-F, 40 hours/week. This role will be remote while COVID restrictions are in place. The expectation is to be onsite at Mountain View, CA location once it is deemed safe to do so

Now for the Perks!

Health Benefits: Medical, Dental, Vision, Life (including spouse & child), 401k, STD/LTD, AD&D, and Commuter Benefits program.",4.9,"The Mom Project
4.9","Mountain View, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
86,Data Analyst,-1,"Paysign is looking for a Data Analyst to join our growing team. The Data Analyst will take responsibility for managing and manipulating various data sources within the organization into useable and impactful reports and dashboards to support business decisions. The role will perform tasks such as data mapping and translation, report and dashboard generation using Tableau, and assisting in translating results.
Essential Functions*
Managing and designing the reporting environment, including data sources, security, and metadata.
Supporting the data warehouse in identifying and revising reporting requirements.
Assist in managing master data, including creation, updates, and deletion.
Assist in administering Tableau, including managing users and user roles.
Helping develop reports and analysis using Tableau
Provide quality assurance of imported data.
Commissioning and decommissioning of data sets.
Processing confidential data according to regulatory guidelines such as PCI and HIPPA.
Supporting initiatives for data integrity and normalization.
Assessing tests and implementing new or upgraded software
Generating reports from single or multiple systems.
Assist in troubleshooting the reporting database environment and reports.
Assist in evaluating changes and updates to source production systems.
Training end users on new reports and dashboards.
Providing technical expertise on data storage structures, data mining, and data cleansing.
Required Skills/Abilities: *
Hands-on experience working with Tableau to create reports and dashboards
Hands-on experience with intermediate-level SQL queries
Ability to translate business requirements into non-technical, lay terms.
Demonstrated experience in handling large data sets and relational databases.
High-level written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to work with stakeholders to assess potential risks.
Ability to analyze existing tools and databases and provide software solution recommendations.
High-level experience in methodologies and processes for managing large scale databases.
Ability to handle changing priorities, deal with ambiguity, and use good judgment in stressful situations
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Education and Experience: *
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university or college in computer science.
Three years of experience as a data analyst or in related field.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $52,000.00 - $67,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
SQL: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.paysign.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"Paysign, Inc.
5.0","Henderson, NV",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
87,SalesForce Data Analyst,$44k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: SalesForce Data Analyst

Overview

Varonis is a world-class organization with a straightforward mission: protecting vulnerable data.

Did you know that on average, 20% of an organization's data is accessible to every employee? Seventy percent of attacks take months or years to discover. But not for our customers.

At Varonis, we see the world of cybersecurity differently.

Our customers always know where their most valuable data is on premises or in the cloud. Only the right people have access to only the right data. With real-time awareness of how employees use data, our clients flag and stop malicious behavior in its tracks.

Were fighting a different battle than conventional cybersecurity companies, relentlessly focused on securing data. Data assets are the most valuable and vulnerable components of the global economy. Along with employees, data is at the heart of almost every organization, yet conventional cybersecurity solutions, by themselves, have failed to protect it.

Why Join Varonis as a SalesForce Data Analyst?

This is an exciting opportunity to join us as we expand our team!

In this role, you will perform administrative management of data including detection and correction of data-quality issues, process incoming data, and data standardization. You will collaborate with the Salesforce Team and Sales to engage in the ongoing and detailed evaluation of data quality and lead assignments.

You will be responsible for:
Validating and processing data import inquiries
Assisting with lead assignment updates which include: Updating and management of lead assignment rules, reassignment of leads, and validation of lead distribution with stakeholders
Ensuring sufficient data quality is maintained so that the data can effectively support the business process and reporting accuracy
Identifying, investigating, and managing the resolution and escalation of data quality issues
Coordinating ongoing data quality audits
Coordinating various data cleanup tasks which include: ensuring that Leads are assigned to the appropriate owner, standardizing data, and ensuring that necessary data fields are populated
Key skills, experience and personal attributes
BA/BS degree or equivalent practical experience
1-year minimum experience in a data management role
Ability to manage multiple priorities
Logical thinker with superb interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure
Organized and detail-oriented
Comfortable with ambiguity
Customer service oriented
Great teammate
Salesforce experience preferred
We invite you to check out our Instagram Page to gain further insight into the Varonis culture!

@VaronisLife

Varonis is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics.",3.9,"Varonis
3.9","Morrisville, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2005,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
88,Business Intelligence Analyst - Data & Analytics,$37k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Business Intelligence Analyst will be an active member of the Data and Analytics team to design enterprise-wide reporting and analytics solutions to support the information needs of the organization. As a member of the data acquisition team within Data and Analytics, the BI Analyst II will assist in transforming disparate data sources processes into a cohesive reporting tools to help meet the customer?s needs and requirements and enable them to implement their performance improvement projects, vision, and strategy.The successful Business Intelligence Analyst II will be a team player who can understand design concepts and work with business analysts and technologists to assist in determining and implementing the best solutions for complex data needs. The Business Intelligence Analyst II will assist in determining the best method to re-tool data by focusing on data efficacy, data quality, and data reporting in an overall effort to help build confidence in data housed in the data repositories at Tanner. The Business Intelligence Analyst II will also assist members of the Analytics team working closely with customers to provide advice and training on the most efficient and effective BI tools adopted by the organization to help customers manage, analyze, and gain insight from their data.

Education
Bachelor's Degree

Experience
Two years of related experience. Requires working knowledge of specialized practices, equipment, and procedures.

Licenses & Certifications
*NONE REQUIRED

Qualifications
*Ability to apply core mathematical concepts and competencies to develop reports, forecasts, dashboards, and solutions to business problems.
*Demonstrated experience working and collaborating in a team environment with supervision, and following predetermined guidelines.
*Demonstrated knowledge of hospital operations, patient management, the interrelationship of systems and how technology enables business processes is preferred.
*Evidence of problem-solving skills and ability to comprehend database methodology.
*Experience analyzing business processes from a business intelligence perspective and knowledge of how to use validated and timely data to construct update key metrics.
*Experience with Data Warehousing and data repositories is preferred.
*Knowledge of Business Intelligence Tools (e.g. MS Power BI, Tableau,... ) highly preferred.
*Minimum of 2 years experience in supporting a business intelligence reporting solution.
*Minimum of 2 years experience supporting reporting requests utilizing SQL query language is required.
*SQL skills required .",3.8,"Tanner Health System
3.8","Carrollton, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1949,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
89,Reconciliation Data Operations Analyst,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Global Payment Operations organization is hiring a Recon Ops Data Analyst in Austin TX, who will be responsible for day-to-day reconciliation, data analysis and reporting of payment transactions processed through our system and the related general ledger accounts. You will partner closely with our Controlling, Accounting, Payments product and Payments operations Team etc. The ideal candidate will be self-motivated, process-oriented, works effectively with cross functional teams, in addition to strong written and verbal communication skills.

Job Responsibilities:

Reconciles variances by identifying patterns in complex data sets
Works with accounting and product on key performance metrics, reports and analytics related to reconciliation
Manages daily, weekly and monthly reporting for review with Accounting team
Develops standardized reporting packages, and delivers ad-hoc reporting/analysis required to support reconciliation procedures
Works with large volumes of data for extraction and transformation leveraging eBay’s massive and rich databases
Analyze current manual process surrounding Operations for optimization opportunities.
Designs optimal data architecture for data management and high performance.
Designs and execute reports to measure success and performance of business initiatives.
Automates data driven system controls for Operational procedures
Performs data modeling, documents and presents analysis

Job Requirements

Advanced SQL knowledge
General Ledger and Payments Industry Experience
Experienced in data mining and analysis
Expertise in deriving and building Metrics to help quantify Business Processes.
Ability to work with various stakeholders to understand and build project requirements.
Understands SOX compliant processes and builds accordingly.
Experienced in Agile environment.
Problem solving approach with great verbal and presentation skills
SAS, Python, Hadoop experience is a plus
Master+ 3 Years or Bachelors+ 5 Years

This website uses cookies to enhance your experience. By continuing to browse the site, you agree to our use of cookies

View our privacy policy

View our accessibility info
eBay Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at talent@ebay.com . We will make every effort to respond to your request for disability assistance as soon as possible.

For more information see:
EEO is the Law Poster
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement",3.8,"eBay Inc.
3.8","Dripping Springs, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
90,Data Analyst,-1,"ProVantageX Data Analyst*
Who We Are*
ProVantageX (PVX) is the most complete, two-way connected platform for the buying and selling of local Television media in the US. PVX combines the power of automation and data to bring value and operational efficiency in the first two-way connected platform for local television buyers and sellers. We allow media professionals to focus more time on strategic creativity, while helping them improve value by seamlessly blending and optimizing qualitative and quantitative data to precise campaign designs
Job Description*
Partner with colleagues facilitating the design, build and automation of reports / dashboards that provide insight into behaviors and trends.
Perform data manipulation, cleansing and standardization to provide a framework for advanced reporting capabilities and descriptive analytics.
Review and document the content and structure of existing tables to enhance their utility.
Partner with colleagues facilitating the design, build and automation of reports / dashboards that provide insight into behaviors and trends.
Build intuitive interfaces, infographics, and visualizations to tell stories with data analysis and insights for both technical and non-technical audiences.
Participate and contribute in the analysis, design, development, and implementation of various Business Intelligence initiatives.
Validate source data with data mappings and ensure data integrity.
Write technical procedures for applications including operations, user guide, etc.
Support data integration resolve both design and analytical problems, as well as data processing enhancements.
Work across functional teams to identify and resolve data issues.
Required Skills / Qualifications: *
Implementing and supporting self-service BI tools such as Microsoft PowerBI Desktop/Excel (PowerPivot, PowerQuery)
Analyze reports for trends and communicate those trends in various formats.
Excellent problem-solving skills, particularly with regard to anticipating and solving issues, or concerns before they occur or become critical.
Self-starter with strong quantitative and analytical skills.
Build user-friendly UIs to improve utilization of data.
Must be detail oriented and highly organized.
Team player with strong collaboration skills.
Experience: *
1 to 2 years of analytical experience, using self-service BI tools such as PowerBI Desktop, advanced Excel (PowerPivot, PowerQuery)
Strategic thinker with ability to formulate solutions to complex problems.
Track record of identifying and implementing data focused solutions.
Ability and willingness to roll up the sleeves and get things done.
Demonstrate persistence and resilience at accomplishing difficult tasks, plus proven ability to learn from failures.
Experience with data analysis methods, techniques and understand statistics concepts (e.g., hypothesis testing, regression analysis) a plus.
BA/BS in a quantitative discipline (statistics, mathematics, quantitative finance, economics, marketing, etc.)
Compensation: *
Compensation based on experience.
Full benefits package including medical, dental, QTB, FSA and 401K.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $45,000.00 - $55,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.provantagex.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/ProvantageX/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,ProVantageX,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
91,Data Analyst,$45k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

i3 is seeking a Data Analyst to support Mission Integration Management, Engineering, and Analysis activities. This position is located in Arlington, VA.

This position will support programs in the Office of the Under Secretary of Defense for Research & Engineering (OUSD(R&E)). USD(R&E) requires mission engineering, analysis, and integration expertise to produce objective insights and analytic justification to inform future technology and capability investment decisions within the Planning, Programming, and Budgeting Execution (PPBE) process and aid in the prioritization, alignment and validation of requirements within Joint Capabilities Integration and Development System (JCIDS) to deliver modernized capabilities that enable an all domain joint force aligned with future Joint Warfighting Concepts.

Responsibilities:
Synthesize vast amounts of complex technical data into management level information
Conduct data analysis in support of technical, managerial or operational fields
Support development, maintenance, and curation of government reference architectures used to communicate and guide analysis efforts, document and communicate results, and set the basis for subsequent engineering and prototyping activities
Conduct project management related tasks, meeting management and administrative duties as requested including stakeholder integration working level meetings related to Joint Capabilities Integration and Development System (JCIDS), Joint Force Integration Cell (JFIC), Joint All-Domain Command and Control (JADC2), War gaming/Table Top Exercises (TTX), Service/COCOM Engagement, Industry Engagement, and USD(R&E) Modernization Assistant Directors
Qualifications:
Minimum of a bachelor’s degree in science, technical, engineering or mathematics (STEM) discipline
Minimum of five (5) years of experience
TS/SCI security clearance highly preferred
Experience in supporting technical, managerial or operational fields and mature judgement required to interface with external stakeholders and senior government personnel
Strong organizational and oral and written communication skills are required. Experience synthesizing vast amounts of complex technical data into management level information.
Experience preparing presentations and other visualization forms to communicate results and artifacts to varied audiences
Experience maintaining configuration management on large and complex projects and developing and administering integrated data environments including cloud based storage approaches",4.0,"Integration Innovation, Inc.
4.0","Arlington, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
92,Senior Data Analyst (Remote/ Virtual),-1,"We Are Hiring

This is your opportunity to join the growing Ascension Data Science Institute!

Remote opportunity!

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

Serves as key resource/SME in collection and analysis of data from multiple sources for the development of reports and statistical information.

Responsibilities:
Compiles analytical and statistical reports as needed.
Formulates, defines and recommends scope and format of reports.
Oversees provision of ad hoc management reports.
May provide leadership, orientation, training, coaching, and mentoring to staff on how to access reports and interpret the data.
Identifies data trends and makes recommendations for quality improvement.
Parses, validates and scrubs data of widely differing formats.
Analyzes structured and unstructured data for business insight.
What You Will Need

Education:

High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required
Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Analytics, Data Science, Engineering, Operations Research, Decision Sciences, Computer or Information Science, Physics, Behavioral and Social Sciences or other related technical or quantitative fields strongly preferred.
Bachelor's level or higher is strongly preferred.
Work Experience:
3 years of experience preferred.
Preferred Skills:
1-3 years experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, QlikView, or Microstrategy
Web and social media analytics
Scripting language experience in Python, R and SQL preferred
Knowledge of and some experience with Google Cloud Platform preferred
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.4,"Ascension
3.4",Missouri,-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
93,Data Analyst,$41k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"EquipmentShare is Hiring a Financial Data Analyst


EquipmentShare is searching for a Data Analyst for the corporate office in Columbia, Missouri to help us drive profitability through data-driven analysis.

About EquipmentShare


EquipmentShare is dedicated to creating a connected jobsite for the modern contractor. We deliver user-friendly technology solutions that help contractors maximize their equipment uptime, reduce risk exposure and increase productivity. EquipmentShare's product offerings include an improved equipment rental experience, fleet tracking and asset management software, hardware security solutions and predictive service and maintenance applications.

EquipmentShare is the fastest-growing, independently owned construction equipment rental company in the country. We serve dozens of markets across the U.S. and are on track to create a national footprint in every major market in the country by the end of 2023. Our branch locations are equipped with a broad range of construction equipment, ranging from 150-foot telescopic booms to 120,000-lb. track excavators.

EquipmentShare's rapid growth goes beyond meeting a demand for equipment rentals in booming new markets. Instead, our mission begins with our rental product, and it's a testimony to our ability to improve industry standards and better serve the customer. Our expansion and customer retention is a validation of strong contractor demand for the smart jobsite technology we've built into our rental fleet. And it's just the beginning of our journey to establishing a global presence.

Your Opportunity to Grow With Us


The EquipmentShare team is a close-knit group of professionals who all share an interest in providing a service and product that improve our customer's experience. Above all, we care about building something people want, and the only way to do that is by assembling a skilled, passionate and talented team. Our mission is to improve productivity and efficiency throughout the entire construction industry, and our people are how we make achieving that goal possible.

We're seeking a Financial Data Analyst who loves a challenge and wants the opportunity to grow with a fast-paced company. Industry competitors often have layers of tenured management that create barriers to career advancement. The opportunity for career growth is unparalleled at EquipmentShare, where you'll find no shortage of challenging yet fulfilling work, chances to build new skills and supportive teammates who will push you to achieve your best.

Primary Responsibilities
Analyze a wide range of data, and turn that data into action, whether that looks like process improvements, best business practices or other data-backed solutions
Use your strong development and analytical skills to solve business problems across the company
Produce reports and models for senior leaders and other key team members
Identify trends, correlations and patterns in data, and present findings to stakeholder
About You


Our mission to change an entire industry is not easily achieved, so we only hire people who are inspired by the goal and up for the challenge. In turn, our employees have every opportunity to grow with us, achieve personal and professional success and enjoy making a tangible difference in an industry that's long been resistant to change.

Skills & Qualifications
Must be qualified to work in the United States - we are not sponsoring any candidates at this time.
2 years of experience in an analysis-focused role
Forecasting, reporting, and analysis experience
You have a proven ability to approach complex problems with curiosity and an analytical mindset.
You roll with the punches and can adapt quickly, manage competing projects and challenge the status quo.
A keen understanding of data interpretation and the ability to swiftly extract key insights
Expert-level Excel skills
SQL experience required
Preferably knowledge of an analytical language like Python, R, SAS, SPSS, etc.
Why We're a Better Place to Work
Competitive salary
Health insurance and medical coverage benefits
401(k)
Generous paid time off
Stocked breakroom and full kitchen
Free weekly team workout at a local gym
Volunteering and local charity initiatives that help you nurture and grow the communities you call home through EquipmentCare
Opportunities for career and professional development with conferences, events, seminars, continued education
Since our founding in 2015, we've had explosive growth—and we're not stopping anytime soon. Ready to invest in our mission, invest in yourself and discover a better place to work? Then we'd love to meet you. Apply today.

EquipmentShare is an EOE M/F/D/V",4.2,"EquipmentShare
4.2","Columbia, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Commercial Equipment Repair & Maintenance,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
94,"Lead Data Analyst, Consumer Experience",$66k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the role

As a Lead Analyst, you will be responsible for the success of multiple work streams across our consumer product, focusing on the Move Money product experience. You will act as a mentor and manager to your fellow teammates and lead the standardization of our analytical processes and project delivery methods. You'll use data to develop insights, run experiments, and guide decision making to build consumer experiences and features to delight and solve our members' issues.

In this role, you can expect to
Define key metrics used to measure the success of our consumer banking experiences and products and develop dashboards to surface insights to drive decision making
Build a deeper understanding of our members needs and use predictive analytics to develop strategic product and business opportunities for Chime
Closely partner with product, engineering, and operations to translate your data insights into product features or recommendations; you will partner with product to drive roadmap development.
Oversee and help to define the work of other members of the team to ensure consistent delivery of high-quality outputs
Lead experimentation by providing guidance on the experiments that should be run, how they should be run, and evaluating the impact on our key metrics
Foster a data-driven, test-and-learn culture with your passion for telling stories with data
To thrive in this role, you have
A quantitative degree in a field like Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Operations Research, or Engineering. Advanced degrees preferred
7+ years in analytics. B2C product analytics and FinTech experience preferred
2+ years direct or indirect management experience overseeing the work of 2-4 team members
Advanced SQL skills - familiarity with window functions and query optimization
A high level of comfort delivering reporting and insights within a data visualization platform (eg Looker, Tableau)
Exposure to a scripting language like Python or R and relevant data science packages
Proven experience with data science, experimentation, and statistical analysis used to guide decision making.
Excellent communication skills, a record of working cross-functionally to achieve results.
A little about us

We created Chime because we believe everyone deserves financial peace of mind. By eliminating unnecessary fees and helping people grow their savings automatically, we've empowered millions of Americans to take control of their finances.

Chime is the largest and fastest-growing U.S. player in the challenger-banking space. Through our banking partners, we offer access to bank accounts with fee-free overdraft, provide members the chance to receive early access to their paychecks, help them improve their credit, and more!

We've built one of the most experienced leadership teams in Fintech and were recently valued at over $14.5B. We've raised over $1B in funding from leading investors including DST, Coatue, Tiger Global, General Atlantic, Iconiq, Dragoneer, Menlo, Whale Rock, Access, Forerunner, Crosslink, Cathay, aCrew, and others.

What we offer
Competitive salary based on experience
401k match plus the usual medical, dental, vision, life, and disability benefits
Quarterly stipend to spruce up your home office
Generous vacation policy and company-wide Take Care of Yourself Days
Virtual events to connect with your fellow Chimers- think cooking classes, music festivals, mixology classes, paint nights, etc., and delicious snack boxes, too!
A challenging and fulfilling opportunity to join one of the most experienced teams in FinTech and help create a completely new kind of banking service
We know that great work comes from great and inclusive teams. At Chime, we specifically look for individuals of varying strengths, skills, backgrounds, and ideas. We believe this gives us a competitive advantage to better serve our members and helps us all grow as Chimers and individuals.

We hire candidates of any race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital or family status, disability, Veteran status, and any other status. Chime is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know. To learn more about how Chime collects and uses your personal information during the application process, please see the Chime Applicant Privacy Notice.",4.8,"Chime
4.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
95,Data Analyst,$50k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"Terrific Contract Opportunity!

Position: Data Analyst
Location: Phoenix, AZ 85007
Term: 8 Months Contract

Day-to-Day Responsibilities:

Lead in data submissions and analysis for two major projects
Working knowledge of SAS and complex data systems is critical.
Data submission, and the design and construction of an integrated database will begin in December and January
Will pursue a detailed medical marijuana data analysis using Behavioral Risk Factor Surveillance Survey (BRFSS) 2019 data

If this sounds like the perfect fit, Apply Today!",4.2,"Matrix Resources
4.2","Phoenix, AZ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
96,Contract Data Analyst,$54k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Amyx is seeking to hire a Contract Data Analyst located in Rosslyn, VA. The successful candidate must have A 4-year course of study leading to a bachelor's degree with a major in any field, that includes or is supplemented by at least 24 semester hours in any combination of the following fields: accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization. Also, a minimum of 2 years of experience serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst

Responsibilities:

Responsibilities and Skills:

Knowledge of WAWF eBusiness processes.
Knowledge of the federal acquisition process.
Knowledge of contracting principles, laws regulation and procedures.
Knowledge of methods and techniques of fact-finding, analysis, and resolution of complex problems, and the ability to develop concrete action plans to solve problems.
Knowledge and Experience of the WAWF eBusienss Suite, to include: iRAPT, EDA, IUID, CDR, MyInvoice, and Contract Closeout.
Good verbal, analytical and written communication skills.
Good organizational skills in tracking data and actions.
Knowledge and Experience writing professional documents.
Knowledge and Experience in Customer Service.
Skilled in Business Intelligence Reporting.
Proficient in the use of the Microsoft suite of applications including Word, SharePoint, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, and Project as well as with Adobe Acrobat.

Supported Technologies:
Integrative Acquisition Environment
DOD acquisition system

Qualifications:

Required Skills and Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree and preferred majors are accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization.
2 years of experience required in serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst.

Desired Skills and Qualifications:
Knowledge of Federal and DOD acquisition procedures

Amyx is an Equal Opportunity employer. Amyx is committed to providing equal employment opportunity to all job seekers. Every qualified applicant receives focused consideration for employment and no one is discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status. In addition to federal law requirements, Amyx complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training. Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. Amyx is an E-Verify employer.
Amyx proudly and proactively takes affirmative action to advance employment of individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities.
Physical Demands
Employee needs to be able to sit at a workstation for extended periods; use hand(s) to handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. Most positions require ability to work on desktop or laptop computer for extended periods of time reading, reviewing/analyzing information, and providing recommendations, summaries and/or reports in written format. Must be able to effectively communicate with others verbally and in writing. Employee may be required to occasionally lift and/or move moderate amounts of weight, typically less than 20 pounds. Regular and predictable attendance is essential.",4.1,"Amyx, Inc.
4.1","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
97,Sr. Programmer/Analyst - Data Analytics,$44k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Technology is the tool, data the medium, and insights the art.

Sound a little pretentious? Maybe, but as a data analytics professional you know that providing data-driven insights can make an impact. That’s why you got into this field! Now, you’d like to do it not just for one company, but for many. Read on to find out how!

Resource Data has been in the business of providing custom software and data-driven business applications for over 30 years. We’ve built a reputation of being trustworthy, competent, and dependable. Clients rely on us to help them effectively use technology to improve their business. We don’t just give them buzzwords and jargon; we provide practical advice based on our technical expertise and inside knowledge of their business. Data analysis tools and insight are a growing part of our services.

Intrigued? Let’s look at what a successful career at Resource Data might look like.

After three months here…

You jumped right in. After a period of acclimation with your new teammates, you started work on an existing data analytics project, helping the team complete key objectives on time.
You’ve had a role in several other projects building ETL processes and expanding data warehouse capabilities. This has allowed you to build connections across the Resource Data offices.
You’ve started working with the business users to understand what they’re after and how you can help.
You’ve identified datasets that look intriguing. You’re comfortable working directly with the client and have started discussing how they might use them for better insights.
Three months in and you’re a bona fide member of the Resource Data team. The client sees Resource Data as their data analytics experts.

At six months you’re developing opportunities.

You’ve started working with the client on a new initiative. You’re leading the research and developing a proof-of-concept to validate the idea and turn it into a full project.
You have identified work that could be handed off to someone more junior. We’ve started hiring for a new position.
You’ve continued to build your network at Resource Data and leverage expertise from across the company. You appreciate the depth of technical knowledge and the diversity of skills available to assist on specific problems.
You’ve led an internal discussion about common tools used in data analytics and the problem sets they are applied to. This has led to requests from other branches to support developing data analytics practice areas.

After one year, you’re building Resource Data and have a vision of a data analytics team.

You’ve identified several other clients in the local area in need of data analytics services. You have worked with the proposal team to develop technical estimates and present proposals. New clients are coming on board.
You’re able to market the breadth of services Resource Data can offer and are expanding our presence with clients outside of data analytics.
You’re working with the hiring team to identify colleges and programs that provide the right mix of technical and analytical education so you can help hire the best candidates for a growing practice.

This is just year one. Imagine what you can accomplish after that!

We expect you’ve got a few years’ experience in a business setting applying your statistical and machine learning background using tools like R and Python. In addition to data manipulation and modeling, you should have some exposure to software development and technical projects. Ultimately, we’re more interested in what you’ve done than years of experience, so please feel free to highlight your accomplishments.

We often say Resource Data is consulting done right. We work hard to provide stability and flexibility so that our employees can grow and experience long-term successful careers here. We take our commitment to clients seriously and strive to do our best work for them while also having a rewarding personal life.

If this sounds like the right place for you to continue you’re career journey, send us an application. We’d love to talk more about this opportunity and what Resource Data can offer.

Starting in Alaska over 30 years ago, Resource Data has grown to over 180 professionals across 5 offices. We’re ready and eager to demonstrate high value results to local clients through our commitment to people, technology, and results.

Resource Data is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Unfortunately, we are not able to provide any visa sponsorship or transfers for this position.",4.2,"Resource Data
4.2","Boise, ID",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
98,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Responsibilities: *
Provides data driven input, with insight and forward-thinking recommendations to business leaders.
Interpret, evaluate and interrelate company and research data and develop integrated business analyses and projections for incorporation into strategic decision making
Consistently provide proactive and prescriptive analytics
Monitor daily/weekly/monthly metrics and alert business leaders to issues and trends
Conduct insightful, ad hoc analyses to investigate ongoing or one-time operational issues
Analyze business activities and present results and recommendations to enhance operational strategies both for awareness, effectiveness and overall financial benefit.
Review business processes via analysis and involvement to develop optimization strategies the focus on value-add work.
Develop predictive models of customer value, behavior, and responsiveness based on various business activities related to Fraud, Fed Gov, Account Management, Account Recovery, Sales, HR, and Underwriting
Recognizes and communicates financial implications of business decisions and strategy.
Provides support related to data needs stored within databases, including Domo reports.
Maintains relationship with IT and Finance teams to assure data accuracy and integrity.
Conduct and coordinate financial, product, market, operational and related research to support strategic and business planning within the departments you support
Creates process procedures, standards, and flows for current and future state initiatives/analysis.
Completes special projects as assigned for various departments such as Fed Gov, Account Management, Account Recovery, Sales, HR, and Underwriting
Ensure all deliverables adhere to department quality and delivery standards.
Maintaining and staying up to date on the latest analytical tools and trends.
Lead meetings and develop presentations to easily explain analysis and drive actionable results.
Actively participate and partner in operational department financial related meetings.
Incorporate proven modeling that provides future predictions on business operations and financial status.
Requirements & Preferred Skills: *
Bachelor's in Economics, Decision Sciences, Mathematics, Finance or related field
Minimum of 3 years of business analysis experience
Four or more years of extensive experience with SAS and other statistical software packages
Minimum of two years of experience with VBA, SQL, Microsoft Access, BI/data visualization
Advanced Analytic Techniques: Knowledge of advanced quantitative analytic techniques and protocols used to build necessary business models
Advanced knowledge with data analytics and data mining
Experience working with cross-functional teams to build consensus and project plans
Contract length: 8 months

Job Type: Contract

Work Remotely:
No",-1,Microagility,"New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
99,Client Experience Data Analyst,$40k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"Client Experience Data Analyst
Location: Atlanta, GA
Department: Client Support
Type: Full Time
Min. Experience: 4+ years

Our Data Analyst will have a passion for using data to solve complex problems through root cause analysis, trend analysis and other analysis techniques. Their talent will be evident for finding compelling stories in customer, operational and financial data that inform the business with easy to follow conclusions and actionable recommendations. The story told will be objective to inform the business, no matter where the data takes them. This person enjoys the act of strategically thinking through the problem and then executing the analysis hands-on by manipulating large datasets using computer languages and analytics tools.

Our Data Analyst role will support the ongoing success of the OxBlue Client Experience team and support other reporting needs for the OxBlue Operations Team. This individual will provide insight and analysis to promote execution, productivity and the growth of OxBlue. In addition, you will be an advisor to OxBlue leadership through your analytics and reporting, to enhance the client experience and employee experience, with the objective of driving executional excellence throughout OxBlue.

As the Client Experience Data Analyst you would:
Provide reporting and commentary to the Vice President of Client Experience and other OxBlue senior leaders to drive business objectives such as improving client experience, employee engagement and profitable revenue growth
Identify, develop and maintain reporting around key success metrics
Develop self-service data tools
Analyze large amounts of information from multiple sources to discover trends and patterns and uncover solutions to business problems
Create models to forecast results of various enhancements to product, technology or procedural changes
Oversee data transmission and automation development, validation and maintenance from internal and external sources
Other analytical and process improvement projects as needed
You Have:
4+ years of related business, financial or data analytics experience
Strong organizational skills and high attention to detail to meet deadlines
Ability to work independently and with little supervision in a project management-like environment
Strong communication skills
1-3 year experience with a data visual program like PowerBI, Alteryx, Tableau or Qlik
Experience with survey tools
Enjoys researching and generating insights to solve problems
SQL coding proficiency
Bachelors degree (Finance, Math, Statistics, Business Administration, Analytics, IT or related field) preferred or equivalent experience
Bonus Points For:
Experience with the following survey tools: Satmetrix, Qualtrics, Medallia or Survey Monkey
Experience with using both customer experience and operations experience data to make recommendations for continuous improvement projects preferred
Our Perks:
Health insurance paid 100% for employee and 50% for family
Dental insurance paid 100% for employee
401k with company match
A fun work environment: casual dress, free snacks, complimentary massages and great parties
Investment in your professional development with internal promotions, continuing education, and tuition reimbursement
Paid sabbatical program: 4 weeks every 5 years
An award-winning culture recognized for its high level of employee satisfaction
Long-term disability paid 100% for employee
Life/AD&D
Paid Parental leave
The above summary of benefits is subject to change, is for informational purposes only and does not create any contract rights to benefits.

If you have what it takes and are looking for a company committed to the success of its clients and its people, we want to hear from you.

Diversity and Inclusion are important to OxBlue. We value the diversity of thought that comes from working with people from varied backgrounds. Our continuous improvement and ability to serve our customers depend on creating a workplace that brings out the best in everyone. Thats why we are committed to continuing to create an atmosphere of positivity, happiness and inclusion.",4.5,"OxBlue Corporation
4.5","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
100,Data Analyst,$37k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Spalding Consulting, Inc.is seeking a Data Analyst, Mid in Lexington Park, MD. Spalding Consulting, Inc. is a professional services firm specializing in Information Technology (IT), Program Management, and Financial Management for the Department of Defense, federal agencies, and commercial clients. We offer excellent salaries, benefits, and outstanding growth potential.

Position Type: Full-Time

Summary/Scope: Ability to acquire & integrate diverse data sets/systems; and apply custom business rules to data. Must possess functional, technical, and analytical expertise to execute workforce management, strategies, and programs using integrated data set, predictive analytics, visualizations and Business Intelligence (BI) solutions.

Essential Functions:

• Gathers and analyzes data from databases, systems, reports, presentations, and spreadsheets.
• Creates and updates mapping spreadsheets and generates reports
• Translates functional requirements into technical specifications
• Prepares reports and presentation material
• Provides functional testing of data mappings
• Other duties as assigned

Qualifications and Experience:

Required:

• 3 years of experience conducting data analysis in an IT environment
• Advanced MS Excel experience required (pivot tables, macros, VBA)
• Proficiency with SQL

Desired:

• Experience providing support to the NAVAIR IT organization/environment
• Experience with Business Objects, Informatica, and TOAD or similar BI tools
• Experience in/knowledge of any of the following systems: Defense Civilian Payroll Data System (DCPDS), Total Force Manpower Management System (TFMMS), Military Personnel System (NTMPS), Workload Requirements and Planning System (WRAPS), Contractor Work Plan (CWP), Exit Interview, Civilian Workload Automation Tool (CWAT), Standard Procurement System (SPS), Contractor Automation Module (CAM), Federal Procurement Data System – Next Generation (FPDS-NG), HEATSM, Standard Work Package (SWP), Procurement Management Tool (PMT) and Common Spend Plan Tool (CSPT)

Security Clearance:
Must be eligible to obtain a Secret clearance. Requirements to obtain a clearance include US Citizenship, security investigation, etc.

Education:
High School diploma or GED
*COVID-19 Procedures: On-boarding/training will be virtual and telework maximized/permitted to the greatest extent possible, however on-boarding/training/tasking may require on-site work a few hours per week during the current COVID-19 situation. Future on-site/telework requirements/schedules may change as additional client direction is received. On-site guidance regarding social distancing, PPE (wearing masks at all times), and proper hand-washing/sanitization procedures are followed.
Spalding Consulting, Inc. is committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all applicants and employees. We will not discriminate against any employee or applicant on the basis of race, color, ethnic origin, national origin, creed, religion, political belief, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, age, veteran status, or physical or mental disability. Spalding Consulting, Inc. is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and encourages minorities, women, disabled, and veterans to apply for job openings within our company.",3.9,"Spalding Consulting, Inc.
3.9","Patuxent River, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
101,Principal Data Analyst,$92k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

The primary role of the Principal Analyst is to provide business requirements with associated data analytics to support the ALM, Capital Management, Funding and Liquidity and FTP modeling teams within Treasury and the associated business, management and regulatory processes.

These models describe the projected balance and income for one or more product portfolios (e.g. retail deposits, mortgage backed securities, commercial loans etc.) on Citizens balance sheet over a wide range of potential interest rate and economic scenarios. The results of the portfolio modeling are critical components of the interest rate risk, liquidity risk management, capital and product funding processes for the entire bank.

This role will also have the opportunity to support and interact on a regular basis with Corporate Planning, Treasury Operations, Treasury and Capital Management and other various business units.

Primary responsibilities will include:
Partnering with Treasury’s business team members to incorporate balance sheet and model updates for forecasting the Bank’s balance sheet through a sophisticated model application (QRM).
Documenting and maintaining proper procedures to serve as reference of processes completed in building the balance sheet model and ensuring proper controls, data quality, data integrity and financial validation reports follow best practices.
Validating data information, system and business requirements, testing, and implementation of technology and modeling projects to ensure complete data availability and models function as expected.
Collaborating in the development and testing of tools to automate and streamline processes while improving detail, accuracy, and timeliness of analytics
Creating detailed documentation and model support processes for ALM, F&L, FTP, and Capital Management teams.

Qualifications

Required Skills/Experience:
5 years of financial analysis and/or budgeting / forecasting experience
Demonstrated knowledge of bank products and services.
Strong quantitative, financial, economic, data analytics and statistical skills and the tools in which to leverage them.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Well versed in project management basics (emphasis on teamwork and collaboration).
Flexible and resourceful with the ability to work on many project deadlines at the same time
Proficiency on Microsoft’s Excel, Word, Access, SQL and PowerPoint – required
QRM’s ALM model experience – preferred
Essbase database knowledge - preferred
Education, Certifications and/or Other Professional Credentials:
Bachelor's Degree in Business, finance, computer science, math, statistics or other related topic
Hours & Work Schedule
Hours per Week: 40
Work Schedule: Monday through Friday 8:30AM – 5:00PM
#LI-Sourcer #8

Why Work for Us

At Citizens, you'll find a customer-centric culture built around helping our customers and giving back to our local communities. When you join our team, you are part of a supportive and collaborative workforce, with access to training and tools to accelerate your potential and maximize your career growth.

Equal Employment Opportunity

It is the policy of Citizens to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all colleagues and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, ethnicity, religion, gender, pregnancy/childbirth, colleague or a dependent’s reproductive health decision making, age, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability or perceived disability, genetic information, genetic characteristic, citizenship, veteran or military status, marital or domestic partner status, family status/parenthood, victim of domestic violence, or any other category protected by federal, state and/or local laws.

Equal Employment and Opportunity Employer/Disabled/Veteran",3.4,"Citizens
3.4","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1988,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
102,Data Analyst,$59k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Foundation Finance:

Foundation Finance Company (FFC) is one of the fastest-growing consumer finance companies in the U.S. We work with home improvement contractors nationwide to help them close more sales through the use of flexible financing plans. FFC's full-spectrum lending approach has driven billions in originations and helped many customers make needed improvements to their homes. We're making big investments in both infrastructure and employee talent to keep up with our growth, so the time is right to join our team! It's a fast-paced environment with room to advance. We offer a competitive salary, medical/dental/vision benefits, 401(k) with company match, a casual dress work environment and much, much, more.

To learn more, check us out on Facebook at ""Foundation Finance Company Careers."" If you think you have what it takes to help our team succeed then apply today!

Data Analyst Description & Duties:

We are looking for a strong analyst to help drive profitable growth by leveraging data and analytics. This is a hands-on role requiring technical skills to query and manipulate data to develop data-driven reports and recommendations. The analyst will have a wide range of exposure to loan originations and servicing areas in consumer lending. The analyst will on a regular basis present reports, findings and recommendations to senior management to improve business strategies and practices

Duties may include, but are not limited to:
Dive into data and quickly become an expert on internal and non-traditional data sets. Maintain data and file integrity. Improve existing data query scripts and develop new ones as needed.
Create user-friendly reports and Tableau visualizations for staff and management. Enhance existing and build new Tableau dashboards as needed.
Track, review, manage and audit software development projects, particularly from database access and usage perspectives.
Work with staff, managers and executives on analytic projects and develop data-driven solutions and recommendations.
The Ideal Candidate:

Applicants must be reliable, dynamic, sociable and enthusiastic team players; while possessing a positive ""can-do"" attitude, excellent judgement and communication skills. Applicants must also have great attention to detail and ability to multi-task under the stress of deadlines with a strong desire to help the organization succeed.

Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Finance, Business, Economics or related field.
Hands-on familiarity with SQL data querying, coding experience and understanding of basic coding syntax.
Advanced Excel skills to create/edit pivot tables, understand/create/manipulate database formulas, create/modify macros (VBA knowledge preferred), adjust formatting to create professional reports.
Advanced data visualization skills, preferably with Tableau.
Must have the ability to research, think through and solve technical and analytic problems.
Strong communication skills, attention to detail, analytical curiosity is required.
Working Conditions:

Office environment with significant time spent sitting, typing and talking on the telephone.

Foundation Finance Company provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",4.8,"Foundation Finance
4.8","Weston, WI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
103,Data Analyst,$59k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"For 25 years, Getty Images has embraced disruption and change; riding the digital wave to evolve from a fragmented, analog stock photo business into a multi-billion-dollar, global e-commerce industry leader and trusted brand. The breadth and quality of our content has always allowed our customers and partners to tell their stories with greater creativity and accuracy, eliciting more emotion and enabling more action. Getty Images moves the world, whether the goal is commercial or philanthropic, revenue-generating or society-changing, market-disrupting or headline-driving. Help us move the world with images! Getty Images is the most trusted and esteemed source of visual content in the world, with over 405 million assets available through its industry-leading sites www.gettyimages.com and www.istock.com. The Getty Images website serves creative, business and media customers in almost 200 countries and is the first-place people turn to discover, purchase and share powerful content from the world's best photographers and videographers. Getty Images works with over 330,000 contributors and image partners to provide comprehensive coverage of more than 160,000 news, sport and entertainment events, impactful creative imagery to communicate any commercial concept and the world's deepest digital archive of historic photography. Getty Images is a world leader in visual content. With over 405 million assets, of which over 285million are digitized, encompassing the latest global news, sports, celebrity, music and fashion coverage; exclusive conceptual creative images; and the world’s largest commercial archive. New content is added daily, with 8-10 million new assets added each quarter. We are inclusive of different voices, perspectives and experience. We believe diversity is critical to our mission to objectively reflect the world we live in and allow our customers to illustrate that world. This means including a diverse range of voices in our content, actively pursuing diversity in our team and sources of content and listening to our customers to make sure we are as open and responsive as possible. Women, gender-nonbinary, people of color, LGBTQIA+ people and people with disabilities are encouraged to apply. We are looking for a Contract Data Analyst to join our AI/ML Team to own the analysis and reporting of our A/B testing and experiments. Sample project topics: Trends in search behavior Preferences in customer search and download behavior Customer segmentation Customer behavior insights based on their site interactions What you’ll need: Strong data analytics and insights Can access data that is messy and from different sources Brings a critical eye to data; cares about data quality Someone who brings a customer focus, can work with user research team to combine qualitative findings with their quantitative insights Research mindset, proactively formulating hypotheses and questions to answer with the data Learns quickly Strong communication for sharing findings SQL, hive, python Education Requirements: A B.A. or B.S. in Statistics, Data Analytics, Data Science, Mathematics, Engineer, Computer Science, Economics, Sociology, Natural Sciences or any other equivalent quantitative field is preferred. If you are self-taught and believe you are a good fit for this role, or have significant work experience, we would love to hear from you as well. Due to the current conditions and impact of Covid-19, this position is a remote work from home 6 month contract with the potential to convert to a Full-time position in the future. As we do not have a timeline to when conditions improve, we are prepared to offer flexibility with the timeline to relocate including relocation assistance. The contract Data Analyst position is not eligible for an H1B Visa transfer or sponsorship. Getty Images is committed to providing Reasonable Accommodations and will work with you to meet your needs. If you are a person with a disability and require assistance to search for a job opening or to submit an online application, please email RecruitingAccommodations@gettyimages.com. We celebrate our inclusive work environment and welcome members of all backgrounds and perspectives. Getty Images is committed to providing Reasonable Accommodations and will work with you to meet your needs. If you are a person with a disability and require assistance to search for a job opening or to submit an online application, please email RecruitingAccommodations@gettyimages.com. Visit Getty Images at www.gettyimages.com to learn more about how the company is advancing the unique role of still and moving imagery in communication and business, and enabling creative ideas to come to life. For company news and announcements, visit our Press Room, and for the stories and inspiration behind our content, visit Stories & Trends. Find Getty Images on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, LinkedIn, Pinterest and Tumblr, or download the Getty Images app where you can explore, save and share the world's best imagery. Getty Images is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. Getty Images believes that diversity is critical to our success in moving the world with images and is committed to creating an inclusive, mutually respectful environment which celebrates diversity. We seek to hire on the basis of merit, competence, performance, and business needs.",2.8,"Getty Images
2.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Photography,"Arts, Entertainment & Recreation",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
104,Data Analyst,-1,"This is an opportunity to join the leadership team at our US Corporate Office. Our client is a $2+billion global company focused on delivering the products and services to healthcare, pharmaceutical, and medical device Customers. They have a long history of success and are excited about what the future holds. We are seeking an enthusiastic data analyst professional with a background in accounting, information systems, or comparable business experience who is ready to create and innovate in support of their goals.

What you will do:

The data analyst will be responsible for planning, organizing, and executing analytics related to internal audits and business processes throughout the Company (including IT, financial, operational, compliance, quality and fraud). The role will develop repeatable data analytics processes to provide timely audit assurance, improve audit efficiency, and automate business processes. This position will drive analytics and strategy for Internal Audit and will collaborate with Internal Audit management and business functions within the organization to improve internal controls, create efficiencies, and add value to the business.

Provide an understanding of business and data requirements, and design visualizations for initial concepts and prototypes that can be presented to Internal Audit and business partners.

Perform detailed data analysis (determine data structures, content, and quality of the data through examination of source systems).

Design and create data visualizations (reports and dashboards) using Tableau as required.

Maintain a controlled repository of data visualization templates and views in Tableau.

Contribute to the planning, sampling, and testing of Sarbanes-Oxley controls.

Explore innovative ideas to continuously improve the audit methodology and audit procedures including the strategic deployment of technology to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of audit procedures and increase value to business partners.

Partner with Internal Audit team members to develop and deliver a data analytics strategy in all phases of the audit process including risk assessment, planning and scoping, fieldwork, testing, and reporting.

Develop training and usage of data analytics capabilities within the Internal Audit team.

Work with Internal Audit colleagues to continuously improve the department and achieve department goals.

What you need to be successful:

You must have advanced skills related to Tableau, SQL, and other analytics software such as Alteryx.

You have a Bachelor’s degree in accounting, information systems, or other related degree.

You are comfortable working in a complex global organization where you’ve had successful interactions and built relationships across functions, regions and business units. Your excellent verbal and written communication skills helped you influence, consult, and create compelling business cases at all levels of the organization.

You are able to inspire and instill a common vision and framework with individual and team projects.

Candidates with the audit experience and certifications such as CPA, CIA, CISA, CFE, Tableau certification, or other big data type certifications preferred.

This position may be elevated to a Senior Data Analyst role for candidates that possess an appropriate level of relevant experience as determined by STERIS.

Offering You In Return:

The opportunity to join a company that will invest in you for the long-term. Our client offers competitive salaries, healthcare benefits, tuition assistance, paid-time off, holidays, matching 401(k), annual merit, and incentive plans. Join and help write our next chapter.

Must have Sarbanes experience

Finance experience a plus

Audit experience very desirable",3.9,"Gables Search Group
3.9","Mentor, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
105,Data Analyst - Sales Performance,$34k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary:

The Data Analyst – Sales Performance is responsible for managing weekly and monthly reporting in conjunction with the Sales Administrator.

Job Duties: -

· Develops data queries and analysis to understand trends across the entire customer lifecycle, lead effectiveness, conversion rates, pipeline analysis, and customer retention

· Creates and maintains weekly informational reports for the Sales and Sales Performance teams, as well as developing data analysis tools

· Analyzes data and key metrics to make recommendations to management on improving sales reporting and sales performance based on the data; Audits and validates data; Ensures consistency in reporting

· Reviews results to determine root cause and leading indicators

· Develops action plans to improve reporting

· Other duties as required and assigned

Requirements:

· Experience working with large data sets and sourcing data from BI tools or CRM tools

· Proficient in Power BI or Tableau

· Proficient with Microsoft Outlook, Word, and Excel

· Ability to read, analyze, and interpret financial or technical reports

· Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals

· Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists

· Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form

· Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced and demanding environment

· Ability to work flexible schedule and weekends as needed

· Ability to travel as required to support regional labor management activities

Environment:

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to use hands to manipulate, handle, or feel. The employee is regularly required to talk, hear and communicate. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. The employee is frequently required to work in both an office setting and a warehouse. The employee may occasionally be exposed to moving mechanical parts. The employee is regularly exposed to ambient lighting and temperate climate conditions.

The following statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified.

Job Duties as documented in this job description are considered “Essential Functions” and have been created by the standards of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission (EEOC). The standards of the Americans with Disabilities Act (1990) require that employees be able to perform “Essential Functions” of the job with or without reasonable accommodation. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the “Essential Functions”.

The following statements are representative of the work environment and physical demands required by an employee to perform the essential functions of this job, with or without reasonable accommodations.",3.2,"GEODIS
3.2","Brentwood, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1904,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
106,Data Analyst,$45k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role: Data Analyst
Location: Tempe, AZ
Duration: 6+ Months

Job Description:

A driven, experienced data analyst to join the Vendor Managed Inventory team who has a passion for solving problems with data, an eye for process improvement, and the skill to execute changes.
You'll be a great fit if you have the grit to persevere through challenging or ambiguous problems, love a chance to step away from your desk to understand and improve processes, and get excited about translating data into action.

Â
Use statistical methods to analyze data and generate useful business reports to solve operational problems.
Be responsible for extracting, cleansing, and visualizing large data sets using the tools and techniques described above.
Plan and lead execution of identified process improvements and cross functional initiatives.
Proactively monitor existing reporting, identify areas of concern, and perform any additional analysis needed to understand underlying causes or nuances.
Deliver insights on urgent business challenges by performing ad hoc analysis and crafting accurate, easy to understand findings.
Forecast future performance based on impact of process improvements and changes to the business.
Work with management team to create a prioritized list of needs for each business segment.
Use data to create models that depict trends related to growth, consumption and forecast.
Work with Project managers to outline the specific data needs for each supplier negotiations.

Qualifications/Experience:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, or similar field from an accredited undergraduate institution required.
2+ years of professional experience in data, reporting, and analytics.
Ability to collaborate effectively and work as part of a team.
Strong attention to detail.
Strong analytical skills with proficiency in Microsoft SQL Server.
Experience with visualization software; Excel, Access, Pivot Tables, V-Look Up, Tableau proficiency a big plus.
Capable of managing competing priorities.
Ability to thrive (and preference to work) in a dynamic, fast-paced environment.
Ability to communicate confidently to senior leadership.",4.3,"Softcom Systems
4.3","Tempe, AZ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
107,Data Analyst- Tiktok Ads,-1,"Data Analyst- Tiktok Ads
Mountain ViewProduct - Data analysisExperienced
Responsibilities
- Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with our ads products
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions
Build/maintain reports, dashboards, and metrics to monitor the performance of our products
Mine massive amounts of data and extract useful product insights
Manage development of data resources, gather requirements, organize sources, and support product launches
Qualifications
- 2-5 years experience doing quantitative analysis
BA/BS in Math, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, or other quantitative field. Advanced degrees preferred but not required
Fluency in SQL or other programming languages. Some development experience in at least one scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Experience with large data sets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop) a plus
Ability to initiate and drive projects to completion with minimal guidance
The ability to communicate the results of analyses in a clear and effective manner
Basic understanding of statistical analysis
Apply
Share to",4.1,"TikTok
4.1","Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
108,Data Analyst,-1,"About Trantor

Trantor, Inc., a leading provider of global software services, specializes in Business Intelligence, Software Security, and Web Services solutions. Trantor, Inc. has a proven and demonstrable track record of successful multi shore project delivery since its inception in 2009. Trantor, Inc. is a leading software development company with expertise in both Cloud-based and traditional applications. Trantor understands all aspects and challenges of software development from product and feature definition, though core product development and QA / deployment / ongoing maintenance. We have also developed our own product suite and integrated it to several market applications.

Here’s what we are looking for CMC Product Lead

Position Name: Data Analyst
Location: Rhode Island, US
Duration: 11 Months
Interview Type: Zoom Video Interview 1 G Manager and 1 Client interview
Remote: Until Covid-19 settles

• Data analyst skill set
• Can Work directly with business to understand the requirements
• Build SQL queries and extract data or build reports/visualization.
• Experience with EPIC data warehouse (Caboodle) or Clarity databases would be very helpful.
o Epic Caboodle (also known as Cogito Data Warehouse) is an enterprise data warehouse (EDW) solution designed for healthcare organizations

Additional Information

We offer you a chance to join a highly motivated unit in a fast-growing and dynamic company, and challenging tasks and opportunities for your future career. Find out more at www.trantorinc.com Follow Trantor on LinkedIn

https://www.linkedin.com/company/trantor/",4.0,"Trantor Software
4.0",Rhode Island,-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
109,Data Quality Analyst Lead,$80k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose of Job We are currently seeking a talented Data Quality Analyst Lead for Phoenix, Tampa, San Antonio Home Office II/III or 100% Remote Work Environment.

Manages and analyzes information using a variety of techniques and tools in alignment with USAA's Enterprise Information Standards. This role may be responsible for one or more information management function noted below:
Metadata includes defining and documenting data ensuring the information is understood. This may include working with project teams or support teams to define, redefine, or continue maintenance of the metadata.
Data Quality includes defining data quality rules ensuring data is measured and trusted. This may include working with project teams to define data quality requirements as well as ensuring ongoing assessments of data quality.
Information Lifecycle Management includes archiving and purging of data to meet the needs of the business while reducing corporate risk.
Data Security and Privacy includes managing the security of data access as well as privacy of data sharing in compliance with external regulations and internal policies. This may include working with other departments to ensure compliance to GBLA, FCRA, PCI DSS, etc.
Master Data and Reference Data includes managing key corporate data to ensure the organization can manage its operations with accurate and consistent information.

Job Requirements

About USAA
USAA knows what it means to serve. We facilitate the financial security of millions of U.S. military members and their families. This singular mission requires a dedication to innovative thinking at every level.

In each of the past five years, we've been a top-40 Fortune 100 Best Companies to Work For®, and we've ranked among Victory Media's Top 10 Military Friendly® Employers 13 years straight. We embrace a robust veteran workforce and encourage veterans and veteran spouses to apply.

USAA Careers - Award Winning Workplace (17 seconds)
USAA Careers – World Class Benefits (31 seconds)

Leverages expert data management knowledge to support in one or many of the information management functions.

Tasks may include any of the items noted below:

General

Identify and implement process improvements Lead discussions with cross-functional teams on complex problems
Oversee alignment of best practices and tools based on business needs.

Metadata and Data Quality Support

Metadata repository maintenance, access requests, and proper metadata association Review, validate, and record metadata and data quality information.
Development of definitions, data quality rules, thresholds, and standard metrics of quality for data elements that support critical business processes.
Development of controls to mitigate data quality risks including data quality plan development, monitoring data quality results, reports and dashboards for high risk issues.
Define and oversee high risk data quality corrective action plans.
Oversee data quality compliance assessment process.

Information Lifecycle Management

Oversee archiving and purging activities of data.
Develop archiving and purging strategies and processes.
Oversee ILM compliance assessment process identifying items that may be a risk to the corporation.

Data Security and Privacy

Manage Data Access security as needed
Support Privacy initiatives through analysis of sensitive data
Ensure sensitive data is accessed and shared in accordance to policies and processes.

Master and Reference Data

Develop Master and Reference Data processes and procedures to align with Enterprise Policies and Standards
Create and maintain reference data in accordance to processes and procedures.
Ensure quality and maintenance of master data.

Requirements
Bachelor's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or 4 years work experience in data management, data quality or business application function or related experience can be substituted in lieu of a degree in addition to the minimum years of work experience required.
OR
A Master's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline
OR
A PhD in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline

8 or more years of experience in one or more information management functions below and any relevant tools:
Metadata
Data Quality including metrics, dashboards, advance knowledge of frequency and duplicate analysis, cross dataset dependencies, orphan 'child data' rows, redundancy analysis, etc.
Information Lifecycle Management including archiving, purging, content and document management
Master and Reference Data
Data Security & Privacy
OR
Master's Degree in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline PLUS 6 or more years of experience in a data management/quality analytic function.
OR
Master's Degree and PhD in a Business or Science discipline or a related discipline PLUS 5 or more years experience in a data management/quality analytic function.
Qualifications may warrant placement in a different job level*
When you apply for this position, you will be required to answer some initial questions. This will take approximately 5 minutes. Once you begin the questions you will not be able to finish them at a later time and you will not able to change your responses.

Preferred
Advanced SQL or SAS programming skills
Experience mentoring/leading junior team members, prioritizing work items, and establishing/executing peer review processes
Strong technical acumen; previous experience working on or in support of a data and analytics team
Excellent attention to detail and ability to create synergies/draw connections across multiple platforms/disparate systems to drive consistency and reuse in metadata
Intermediate understanding of the data development life cycle and information management principles (ETL/ELT process, SDLC, metadata management, data quality, etc.)
Demonstrate familiarity with IT development environments, tools, and maintenance processes and how these pieces impact metadata and quality
Previous experience as a DPO/Scrum Master or experience working in an Agile environment
Prior experience with tools: JIRA, Rally, IBM InfoSphere Suite (Information Governance Catalog, Information Analyzer, DataStage)
Experience working for a large financial institution

The above description reflects the details considered necessary to describe the principal functions of the job and should not be construed as a detailed description of all the work requirements that may be performed in the job.

At USAA our employees enjoy one of the best benefits packages in the business, including a flexible business casual or casual dress environment, comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans, along with wellness and wealth building programs. Additionally, our career path planning and continuing education will assist you with your professional goals.

Relocation assistance is available for this position.

For Internal Candidates:
Must complete 12 months in current position (from date of hire or date of placement) or must have manager’s approval prior to posting.

Last day for internal candidates to apply to the opening is 9/02/20 by 11:59 pm CST time .",3.6,"USAA
3.6","Sun City, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,1922,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
110,Configuration and Data Management Analyst IV,$37k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

The successful Configuration Management Analyst will support a new program at Perspecta, focused on baseline establishment and management of a new Space Domain architecture. This CM Analyst will be responsible t establish the technical baseline including all cross-space and ground segment interfaces and to lower levels for interfaces considered to be key to inter- or intra-segment interoperability; Support baseline development for the Segments; Identify disconnects between segments and external agencies, and work the issues to closure; Develop system and segment level requirements that allow the Mission Users to effectively and efficiently interoperate and submit the requirements to the change process.

Baseline Management tasks include establish a formal process for capturing the baseline and managing changes and distribution; Employ this process to identify, control, maintain, make recommendations to evolve, and execute changes to technical baselines; Use change management software to mitigate the risk of unauthorized and unplanned changes to the technical baseline, including document content and the associated links; Provide user access to all databases used to manage the technical baseline; Perform requirements analysis in response to requested changes, addressing flow‐down, and changes to systems engineering products such as ICDs and verification plans; Maintain interface control for all ICDs/ISs that involve interaction between segments, contractors, or external agencies.

The CM Analyst Lead will organize, facilitate and provide agendas, briefings and minutes for all System and Segment level CM‐related boards, forums and working groups. The Lead is also responsible for mentoring and training more junior CM/DM support.

Qualifications

Requires 8 to 10 years with BS/BA or 6 to 8 years with MS/MA or 3 to 5 years with PhD, or equivalent work experience with at least 5 years experience leading a CM/DM Team.
Experience required supporting similar DoD or Space Domain Configuration Management Efforts
Expereince managing a small team of CM/DM professionals
Experience with agile COTS Configuration Management Tools
Minimum TS Clearance required

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
111,Data Analyst,-1,"RESPONSIBILITIES*
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that are automated, scalable, maintainable, and reliable to optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing reports, and performance indicators to locate and correct problems.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.
Identify and recommend new ways to streamline business operations.
Research issues to determine source of discrepancies and identify solutions for preventing future discrepancies.
Be a source and advocate for data within the department and the organization by teaching and empowering others to use data.
Can generate and present reports for review by leadership team and other stakeholders.
Analyze the data in a way that provides business intelligence that is timely, accurate, and actionable.
Support departmental needs for ad hoc reporting.
REQUIREMENTS: *
Proven 2-3 years working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Strong knowledge of and experience with programming in XML. Preferred if experience with reporting packages (Business Objects etc), databases (SQL etc), programming (Javascript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets in Excel, knowledge of QlikView a plus.
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
SKILLS*
Analytical Skills: Data analysts work with large amounts of data: facts, figures, and number crunching. You will need to see through the data and analyze it to find conclusions.
Communication Skills: Data analysts are often called to present their findings, or translate the data into an understandable document. You will need to write and speak clearly, easily communicating complex ideas.
Critical Thinking: Data analysts must look at the numbers, trends, and data and come to new conclusions based on the findings.
Attention to Detail: Data is precise. Data analysts must make sure they are vigilant in their analysis to come to correct conclusions.
Math Skills: Data analysts need math skills to estimate numerical data.
Thrives in a fast-paced environment.
Ability to learn and adapt to change.
Must speak and write both in English and Spanish fluently.
EDUCATION*
BS in Mathematics, Engineering, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics, or something closely related to those fields.
SALARY AND BENEFITS*
Pay/benefits are competitive based on industry standards.
Salary will be based on experience
Benefits include: healthcare, 401(k)
Job Type: Full-time

Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Language:
English (Preferred)
Spanish (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)",-1,Elite flowers,"Doral, FL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
112,Data Systems Analyst Manufacturing,-1,"Data Systems Analyst - SQL Salesforce SAP

Our client located in Gibbsboro, NJ is seeking a Business Systems Analyst for a full-time, permanent position. This person will be responsible for working with Managers and Executives to gather requirements needed for system modifications, enhancements and implementations as well as extracting data and providing SQL programing support.

Qualifications:

5+ years of IT experience specifically in Business Systems Analysis and/or Data Analysis
At least 2 years experience working in a manufacturing environment
Experience with SQL programing including data extraction and data manipulation
Understanding and experience with HRM, Supply Chain, Financial Reporting and Manufacturing systems a plus.
Must have good communication skills both verbal and written
Must be a US Citizen or Green Card holder

This company offers stability and the ability to work in an exciting environment while growing your career technically and professionally.

To apply, send resumes to kg@libertyjobs.com

Katie George

Senior IT Recruiter

Liberty Personnel Services, Inc.
410 Feheley Drive | King of Prussia, PA 19406

kg@libertyjobs.com www.libertyjobs.com

http://www.linkedin.com/in/kgeorge406

Twitter @kgeorge406

#LI-KG1

#libertyjobs

#IT

#midsenior",4.3,"Liberty Personnel Services
4.3","Gibbsboro, NJ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
113,Data Analyst,-1,"Noah is a modern finance company that helps homeowners tap into their home equity without selling or adding additional debt (and the burden of monthly payments). Noah is focused on making home-ownership more affordable and accessible for millions of Americans, and is partnering with homeowners to help them maximize the value of what is likely their most valuable asset. Founded in 2016, with backing from Union Square Ventures and Tribe Capital, Noah has offices in San Francisco and New York.

The Role

Noah is seeking a data analyst to join our Data Science & Analytics team. Candidates should be comfortable owning a broad range of data science-related responsibilities, including the ideation and development of Noah's business and portfolio analysis tools, as well our risk and pricing models. Candidates will be expected to operate both at an execution and strategic level. This position offers high exposure to Noah's executive team, and will be reporting directly to the CIO.

Day-to-day responsibilities will include:
Translating business priorities and requirements to data science deliverables
Working with data scientists, data engineers, and software engineers to develop and support the internal tools used for pricing, underwriting, marketing, product & operations support.
Design, develop and maintain business dashboards to track KPIs across marketing, operations and product linked activities.
Develop and maintain a suite of portfolio analytics and metrics utilized for reporting to internal and external stakeholders
Developing methods to analyze risk of the US housing market in a systematic and objective manner
Identifying, sourcing and managing the data required to build Noah's risk and pricing models
Contributing to developing the core algorithms and analytical models for Noah's products
Creating frameworks for back-testing Noah's proprietary models
Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics, Economics or other technical field
3 years of data science/analytics experience
Experience with analytic and visualization tools such as Mode Analytics, Looker etc.
Experience with: data collection, filtering, and cleaning techniques, statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, hypothesis testing), and SQL and relational databases like Postgres
Development experience, preferably in Python
Ability to organize and present complex data to technical and non-technical audiences
Team player with high integrity
Nice to have:
Experience working at an early stage startup
Open to feedback with an ongoing desire to improve
Understanding of financial concepts such as risk, volatility, IRR
A high degree of self awareness
Exposure to: A/B testing, statistical models and their interpretability, mortgage and home price models.
Working knowledge of backend software development, including RESTful APIs and databases
A collaborative mindset, and eagerness to partner with engineering, product, and business development teams
Benefits include:
Competitive salary, 401k, and equity in a company that is growing rapidly
Comprehensive health, vision, and dental insurance, FSA
Paid time off
Ongoing training and development",3.6,"Noah
3.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
114,Data Analyst,-1,"This is an opportunity to join the leadership team at our US Corporate Office. Our client is a $2+billion global company focused on delivering the products and services to healthcare, pharmaceutical, and medical device Customers. They have a long history of success and are excited about what the future holds. We are seeking an enthusiastic data analyst professional with a background in accounting, information systems, or comparable business experience who is ready to create and innovate in support of their goals.

What you will do:

The data analyst will be responsible for planning, organizing, and executing analytics related to internal audits and business processes throughout the Company (including IT, financial, operational, compliance, quality and fraud). The role will develop repeatable data analytics processes to provide timely audit assurance, improve audit efficiency, and automate business processes. This position will drive analytics and strategy for Internal Audit and will collaborate with Internal Audit management and business functions within the organization to improve internal controls, create efficiencies, and add value to the business.

Provide an understanding of business and data requirements, and design visualizations for initial concepts and prototypes that can be presented to Internal Audit and business partners.

Perform detailed data analysis (determine data structures, content, and quality of the data through examination of source systems).

Design and create data visualizations (reports and dashboards) using Tableau as required.

Maintain a controlled repository of data visualization templates and views in Tableau.

Contribute to the planning, sampling, and testing of Sarbanes-Oxley controls.

Explore innovative ideas to continuously improve the audit methodology and audit procedures including the strategic deployment of technology to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of audit procedures and increase value to business partners.

Partner with Internal Audit team members to develop and deliver a data analytics strategy in all phases of the audit process including risk assessment, planning and scoping, fieldwork, testing, and reporting.

Develop training and usage of data analytics capabilities within the Internal Audit team.

Work with Internal Audit colleagues to continuously improve the department and achieve department goals.

What you need to be successful:

You must have advanced skills related to Tableau, SQL, and other analytics software such as Alteryx.

You have a Bachelor’s degree in accounting, information systems, or other related degree.

You are comfortable working in a complex global organization where you’ve had successful interactions and built relationships across functions, regions and business units. Your excellent verbal and written communication skills helped you influence, consult, and create compelling business cases at all levels of the organization.

You are able to inspire and instill a common vision and framework with individual and team projects.

Candidates with the audit experience and certifications such as CPA, CIA, CISA, CFE, Tableau certification, or other big data type certifications preferred.

This position may be elevated to a Senior Data Analyst role for candidates that possess an appropriate level of relevant experience as determined by STERIS.

Offering You In Return:

The opportunity to join a company that will invest in you for the long-term. Our client offers competitive salaries, healthcare benefits, tuition assistance, paid-time off, holidays, matching 401(k), annual merit, and incentive plans. Join and help write our next chapter.

Must have Sarbanes experience

Finance experience a plus

Audit experience very desirable",-1,Food Management Search,"Mentor, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
115,Data Analyst,$38k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Main Activities and Responsibilities

Support on customer satisfaction programmes
Support sample and survey data collection across Elsevier's feedback programs, including the global NPS (Net Promoter Score) program.
Monitor automated data-feeds for surveys and other operational data.
Help to automate the sample collection process (using tools such as SQL, KNIME and/or Python)
Programme questionnaires in ConfirmIT [ConfirmIT knowledge advantageous, training will be provided if there is no prior knowledge)
Oversee incentive fulfillment for survey participants.
Manage GDPR requests and customer responses to survey invitations.
Support on customer market research projects
Provide analytical support on large scale international annual studies benchmarking the performance of key Elsevier products as and when requried
Support on customer market research projects
Ensure rigourProvide support on global reporting and existing dashboards which use ConfirmIT (our survey tool). Help maintain our web presence on Elsevier's intranet site.
Ensure rigour
Ensure that there is high standard of rigour on projects.
Responsible for quality checks. Examine data closely for the identification of outliers, anomaly identification, etc, and take remedial action as appropriate.
Clean data files thoroughly and accurately in Excel
Maintain detailed documentation providing step by step guide of processs, including data sources and data definitions.
Collaborate effectively with team members to define project requirements, timelines, and outcomes.
Provide accurate status reporting to supervisors and management
Functionaal and Technical Competencies
Organised with great project management skills, able to balance several projects at once and work to tight deadlines.
Has good knowledge of databases (e.g. SQL). Able to identify interesting patterns in data sets and drive insight from data.
Basic knowledge of HTML, CSS, or JScript/ JavaScript (preferred)
Experience or knowledge of data manipulation techniques (knowldge of tools such as Knime, SPSS advantageous)
Knowledge of viusalisaion applications such as Tableau a plus.
Knowledge of survey software (ConfirmIT particularly advantageous), willingness to learn key.
Excellent knowledge of Microsoft applications especially Excel.
Education, Knowledge and Experience
Educated to degree level or equivalent, preferably in sciences
Hard working, methodical with strong attention to detail. Highly numerical.
Personable and a good communicator.
Ability to think independently and solve problems
A good command of written and oral English.
Comfortable working with large data files
Elsevier is an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. If a qualified individual with a disability or disabled veteran needs a reasonable accommodation to use or access our online system, that individual should please contact 1.877.734.1938 or accommodations@relx.com.

Please read our Candidate Privacy Policy",3.6,"Elsevier
3.6","Oxford, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1880,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Publishing,Media,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
116,Data Analyst/Tableau,$48k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Employee-owners have made Cenlar one of the nation’s largest mortgage subservicers. We have achieved success by empowering people with company ownership, real programs that provide avenues for advancement, and a great atmosphere that makes everyone look forward to the workday. Get your share of our success by considering the opportunity to join our team as a Data Analyst II.
Job Summary: *
Responsible for working with large and complex data sets (both internal and external data) to evaluate, recommend, and support the implementation of business strategies. Identifies and compiles data sets using a variety of tools (e.g. SQL, Access) to help predict, improve, and measure the success of key business to business outcomes. Responsible for documenting data requirements, data collection/processing/cleaning, and exploratory data analysis; which may include utilizing statistical models/algorithms and data visualization techniques. Incumbents in this role may often be referred to as Data Scientists.
Responsibilities: *
Day-to-day actions are focused on administering defined procedures, analysis and report preparation.
Commands knowledge of data elements across the enterprise and industry – definitions, lineage and usage
Executes creation of tabular operational reports and aggregation reports with medium to high complexity.
Commands intermediate to expert level t-SQL coding proficiency
Performs data mapping for systems integration, data provisioning, and data consumption
Responsible for documenting metadata, data lineage, data definitions and business glossary entries.
Handles basic data transformation tasks such as date and decimal formatting, rounding of numeric values, and conversion of numeric values to percentages.
Has intermediate to expert level SSIS ETL build proficiency
Works with Data stewards to enforce adherence to standards for enhancements and new repositories.
Handles more complicated report requests, data visualizations, forecasting, regression modeling, sequencing (e.g. Fibonacci or similar) and trend analysis.
Can deduce portfolio or market trends from reports or chart analysis.
Understands business logic for aggregation and analysis services.
Can perform data transformation and can produce dimensional reports
Can perform basic data profiling activities, understands cardinality
Helps to define guidelines for data management, governance and reporting
May direct day-to-day work of employees, but will not typically have formal management role.
Individual at this level is expected to use some independence of thought but to refer more complex problems to supervisors or other experts.
Individual would be expected to contribute to work flow or process change and redesign and to form a strong basic understanding of the specific product or process.
Qualifications: *
Typically exhibits strong executional capabilities and is beginning to take on more responsibility.
Primary focus is on execution within defined parameters, with some expansion based on developing capabilities and or experiences. In partnership with more experienced staff.
Minimum of 5 years of experience.
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, finance, mathematics, statistics (or similar) or equivalent work experience
Total Rewards: *
Cenlar FSB offers outstanding benefits which may include paid medical/dental/life insurance, 401k, employee ownership, tuition assistance, a supportive work environment, and genuine opportunities for advancement. Cenlar is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer -- M/F/D/V/SO.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Tableau: 5 years (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply",2.5,"Cenlar FSB
2.5","Ewing, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,-1,-1,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
117,Data Analyst,-1,"Total Solutions, Inc. (TSI) is recruiting for a full-time Data Analyst to support FEMA offices in Washington, DC.
Duties:
In this role you’ll work on defining, measuring and process improvements for our internal teams. As a member of the Business Process Improvement team, the Data Analyst creates analysis that drives process improvements and measure effectiveness of improvements.
As a Data Analyst, you will:
Understand your stakeholders’ objectives, the metrics that are the most important to them, and how they measure their performance.
Turn business requirements into technical requirements
Find and understand the correct data sources for a given analysis
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements including automating manual processes and optimizing data delivery
Shape how our team manipulates and visualizes data
Advocate and strategize ways for our Sales and service groups to move faster and more efficiently
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree plus 2 years’ experience
6 years’ work experience may be substituted for a Bachelor’s Degree
Associate’s Degree plus 4 years’ work experience may be substituted for a Bachelor’s Degree",4.1,"Total Solutions, Inc.
4.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
118,Data Analyst,$51k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Number: R0093778

Data Analyst, Mid

Key Role:

Provide business and technical expertise to analyze interacting operational activities of military and governmental policies, plans, and processes to obtain a quantitative, rational basis for decision making and resource allocation. Apply advanced consulting and extensive technical expertise, including modeling, statistical methods, operational mathematical techniques, and other principles and laws of scientific and economic disciplines in determining solutions. Coordinate with Navy enlisted manpower stakeholders from across the enterprise to develop innovative solutions to complex business problems. Work without considerable direction and mentor and supervise team members.

Basic Qualifications:

-5+ years of experience in a professional work environment

-Experience with data analysis

-Experience with data visualization and dashboard development

-Experience with Microsoft Office, including Excel and Access database development

-Active Secret Clearance

-BA or BS degree

Additional Qualifications:

-Experience with Navy or DoD

-Possession of excellent oral and written communications skills

-MA or MS degree

Clearance:

Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information; Secret clearance is required.

We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.

#LI-AH1",3.9,"Booz Allen Hamilton Inc.
3.9","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1914,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
119,Data Analyst,$25k-$47k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Osmose

With 85 years of experience, Osmose proudly serves the electric utility and telecommunications industries across the U.S., helping enable the delivery of safe, reliable and affordable electricity and communications services to millions of customers nationwide. We are the industry leader in wood and steel structure condition assessment, life-extension and rehabilitation services. Our mission is to accurately inspect and mitigate aging infrastructure in a planned, programmatic manner that minimizes owner costs while maximizing benefits.

Headquartered in Peachtree City, Georgia, with satellite offices in Atlanta, Buffalo-Depew, Syracuse, Boston-Westborough and Secaucus, NJ, the Osmose footprint extends throughout the country. Our employees are inspired to perform each and every day by our core values of integrity, customer focus, safety, respect, excellence, flexibility, efficiency and ownership. Our staff and field personnel represent some of the most tenured, well trained, and innovative professionals in the industry.

We are currently seeking a Data Analyst responsible for researching, gathering and presenting data as it pertains to consultative selling engagements and to validate data within the asset analytics platform.

Responsibilities
Execute ETL processes and workflows to capture, store and process utility infrastructure data in specific ways that make it actionable in machine learning/modeling processes.
Collaborate with Solution Consultants and other staff members to provide data needed to supplement the consultative selling engagements.
Analyze data and identify trends in individual customers and the entire electric and telecom utility population as a whole.
Download and apply spatial datasets using GIS Software to perform ad hoc analyses as well as to supplement the Asset Analytics platform of models.
Assist the Data Engineer in gathering company wide data for utilization outside of the Asset Analytics team.
Serve as a contributing member of the project team from project inception to completion.
Use defined application requirements to validate outcomes from the a suite of applications.
Qualifications
A minimum of one (1) year of work experience in a similar role.
Proven history of generating innovative and effective data analyses.
Excellent interpersonal communication skills to explain complex technical topics in an easily digestible manner.
Strong Microsoft Excel, T-SQL skills, basic working knowledge of modern scripting languages (preferably R and Python).
Utilities services background a plus.
Benefits

Come grow with us! Full-time employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package that includes:

Medical Insurance and Health Savings Account with company contribution
Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, STD, LTD, Critical Illness Plan and more!
401(k) with excellent company match
Paid time off (vacation, sick)

Osmose is an Equal Opportunity employer. EOE M/F/Disabled/Vet

REQ ID 535",3.3,"Osmose Utilities Services
3.3","Depew, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1934,Company - Private,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
120,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

WHO WE ARE

Cloud9 Technologies is a voice communication and analytics platform for institutional traders. We leverage cloud services including AWS, a wide array of web services, WebRTC, as well as advanced deep learning techniques to empower firms with the benefit of modern communication tools and enhance trader workflow with actionable voice data & analytics.

Our company was started in 2014 by a team of motivated entrepreneurs and highly successful industry veterans that have started several businesses and taken multiple companies through public offerings. We are well funded, with investors including J.P. Morgan, Barclays, NEX, and Point72 Asset Management. Cloud9 has been profiled in publications such as the Wall Street Journal, Forbes, and Waters Technology. Our award-winning technology was a named the 2017 Best Sell-Side Trading Communication System by Waters Technology for the second year in a row, recognized in the Top 10 innovative solutions of the year by the Futures and Options Industry Association, named to the CB Insights Fintech 250, and the FinTech Global RegTech 100.

By bringing together an experienced group of engineers, product managers, and industry experts, Cloud9 developed a communications platform for the trading floor of the future – offering more functionality and analytic insight than legacy hardware at a fraction of the cost. We’re a group of pioneers who enjoy solving challenges and building disruptive technology – and we’re looking to hire the best and brightest.

Join our team to contribute to the development of the most secure, compliant, and reliable communications platform in the financial services industry.

WHAT YOU WILL DO

The Data Analyst will collect data and develop analysis and reports to help Cloud9 make the right decisions to grow the company. The successful candidate will turn data into information, information into insight, and insight into business decisions. Responsibilities include:

Work with executives and other leaders to identify opportunities for improvement
Create reports for internal teams and external clients
Collect data and analyze processes and requirements
Establish KPIs to measure the effectiveness of business decisions
Create and maintain documentation including requirements, design, and user manuals
Identify opportunities to improve processes and streamline operations

THE RIGHT BACKGROUND

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Finance, or similar
Coding skills in SQL and R (and Python is nice to have)
Experience with a business intelligence tool (ideally Looker)
Experience manipulating large data sets in Excel
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Ability to contribute both independently and as part of a team",3.5,"Cloud9 Technologies
3.5","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
121,Data Analyst,$44k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"MIRACORP Inc., is a veteran, women-owned firm specializing in federal government contract services. One of our competitive advantages is that we provide services to our customers with a standard of excellence that is unmatched. MIRACORP believes our employees are the cornerstone for our success.

MIRACORP is seeking a Data Analyst at our customer location in Washington DC. The Data Analyst provides functional support, including: Human capital, budget execution, budget formulation, oil and gas regulatory processing, federal employee workforce engagement, communications, and COOP.

Task Requirements:

Demonstrates integrity and diligence understanding and abiding by laws, regulations and policies associated with receiving and handling of highly sensitive, including classified, data.
Demonstrate expertise to utilize various software tools/applications in the analysis of large, bulk data sets.
Use analytical skills and in-depth research, critical thinking and judgement to draw conclusions.
Interprets analytical results and uses writing skills, verbal communication skills and creativity to convey results to others.

Your Requirements:

A minimum of three (3) years of experience that is relevant and directly related to federal travel is required.
A BS or BA degree (or an additional six (6) years of relevant experience in lieu of a degree) in a discipline that relates to the job duties.
Other relevant professional development courses and training related to administrative and organization is desirable.

Why consider a career at MIRACORP?

Our Comprehensive Benefit Package includes Medical, Dental, Vision, Health & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts, Basic Term Life and Accident, Short Term Disability, Long Term Disability, and 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan.
At MIRACORP we value and leverage your unique talents and perspectives. We will support you along the way. MIRACORP employees are the foundation of our company and valuable contributors to our continued success. We welcome professionals that want to be part of our growing team.

MIRACORP is an equal opportunity employer. Veterans are encouraged to apply!

Powered by JazzHR

YisgqsUtwV",4.8,"MIRACORP
4.8","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
122,Data Analyst,-1,"This is an opportunity to join the leadership team at our US Corporate Office. Our client is a $2+billion global company focused on delivering the products and services to healthcare, pharmaceutical, and medical device Customers. They have a long history of success and are excited about what the future holds. We are seeking an enthusiastic data analyst professional with a background in accounting, information systems, or comparable business experience who is ready to create and innovate in support of their goals.

What you will do:

The data analyst will be responsible for planning, organizing, and executing analytics related to internal audits and business processes throughout the Company (including IT, financial, operational, compliance, quality and fraud). The role will develop repeatable data analytics processes to provide timely audit assurance, improve audit efficiency, and automate business processes. This position will drive analytics and strategy for Internal Audit and will collaborate with Internal Audit management and business functions within the organization to improve internal controls, create efficiencies, and add value to the business.

Provide an understanding of business and data requirements, and design visualizations for initial concepts and prototypes that can be presented to Internal Audit and business partners.

Perform detailed data analysis (determine data structures, content, and quality of the data through examination of source systems).

Design and create data visualizations (reports and dashboards) using Tableau as required.

Maintain a controlled repository of data visualization templates and views in Tableau.

Contribute to the planning, sampling, and testing of Sarbanes-Oxley controls.

Explore innovative ideas to continuously improve the audit methodology and audit procedures including the strategic deployment of technology to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of audit procedures and increase value to business partners.

Partner with Internal Audit team members to develop and deliver a data analytics strategy in all phases of the audit process including risk assessment, planning and scoping, fieldwork, testing, and reporting.

Develop training and usage of data analytics capabilities within the Internal Audit team.

Work with Internal Audit colleagues to continuously improve the department and achieve department goals.

What you need to be successful:

You must have advanced skills related to Tableau, SQL, and other analytics software such as Alteryx.

You have a Bachelor’s degree in accounting, information systems, or other related degree.

You are comfortable working in a complex global organization where you’ve had successful interactions and built relationships across functions, regions and business units. Your excellent verbal and written communication skills helped you influence, consult, and create compelling business cases at all levels of the organization.

You are able to inspire and instill a common vision and framework with individual and team projects.

Candidates with the audit experience and certifications such as CPA, CIA, CISA, CFE, Tableau certification, or other big data type certifications preferred.

This position may be elevated to a Senior Data Analyst role for candidates that possess an appropriate level of relevant experience as determined by STERIS.

Offering You In Return:

The opportunity to join a company that will invest in you for the long-term. Our client offers competitive salaries, healthcare benefits, tuition assistance, paid-time off, holidays, matching 401(k), annual merit, and incentive plans. Join and help write our next chapter.

Must have Sarbanes experience

Finance experience a plus

Audit experience very desirable",-1,BioSource Recruiters,"Mentor, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
123,Data Analyst,$41k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tombras, a 330+ person, full-service, national advertising agency with a digital mindset, is seeking a Data Analyst to join the Data Analytics department.

You’ll be joining one of the top independent agencies in North America. We blur the lines between a creative agency, a digital agency and a management consultancy. Our digital offering is married to the discipline and rigor of our Effie-winning strategists and Cannes Lion-winning creative directors. We are united by our philosophy: Connecting Data & Creativity for Business Results®. You’ll also be a part of a highly creative agency that has been recognized by Advertising Age, Adweek, Communication Arts, Fast Company, Forbes and Fortune. Tombras was recently named one of Ad Age’s 2019 A-List Agencies to Watch.

The Data Analyst will report directly to the VP, Analytics. You will be responsible for the execution, evaluation and effective communication of data-driven, digital results and insights. This includes the development and implementation of holistic, cross-channel measurement.

What you'll be doing:

Measurement:
Develop and implement holistic, cross-channel measurement
Define, monitor, and analyze key performance indicators for continuous improvement of marketing campaigns
Consult with colleagues and clients on measurement strategies/techniques
Ensure appropriate analytics integration into agency production processes
Assessment and Analysis:
Works independently and with the VP, Analytics in assessing client media programs
Provides reporting & analysis for agency clients
Interpret media marketing data and analyze its effects on KPIs and ROI
Deliver analyses (i.e. insights and actions) via the appropriate means (e.g. dashboards, deep dive analyses, infographics, etc.)
Present results in a simple, story-telling fashion
Collaborate with numerous partners and agency departments to keep analyses integrated and focused.
What you bring:
1+ years of working with analysis of digital media channels in a business environment; prior experience working in an ad agency is a plus
Working knowledge of Tableau
Working knowledge of Marketing and Digital Marketing
Working knowledge of Web Analytics Platforms (Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics, etc.)
Experience with AdWords, Facebook Business Manager, DCM is a plus
SQL knowledge or experience with database administration a plus
An analytical mind, an entrepreneurial spirit, and innovative strategic thinking
Ability to collaborate with cross-functional teams and make recommendations
Bachelor's in Marketing or Analytics and/or equivalent work experience
Master's in Marketing or Business Analytics a plus
Why you’ll want to work at Tombras:
New, Modern building in downtown Knoxville
Dog-friendly office
Casual dress
Highly collaborative and high-energy work environment
Competitive salaries
Benefits including health, dental, vision, life and disability insurance, 401(k) and more
Company culture of promotions from within and an atmosphere allowing for varied and rapid career development.
This position will be remote to start and will be based at our headquarters in Knoxville, Tennessee. If you haven’t heard, it’s one of the coolest cities (just ask HuffPost, Buzzfeed and Forbes). Seriously — if you’re lucky, we might help you relocate here.

Tombras is proud to be an equal opportunity employer dedicated to pursuing and hiring a diverse workforce.

This job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change or new ones may be assigned at any time with or without notice. Job may require traveling overnight, driving long distances as required and sitting for extended periods of time with occasional walking and standing and occasionally lifting or carrying articles weighing less than 10 pounds.

Tombras Offices and Locations: New York City, NY Charlotte, NC Atlanta, GA Washington, DC Knoxville, TN Nashville, TN",3.8,"Tombras
3.8","Knoxville, TN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1946,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
124,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Title:

Data Analyst

Department/Group:
Client Services*
Reporting Relationship:
Senior Director of Client Services and Outcomes Tracking*
Job Category:

Full-Time Exempt

SUMMARY
Data Analyst* will be responsible for ongoing data entry and analysis of health care information, obtained from a variety of sources, including health outcomes, knowledge, financial, and demographic data. It involves development, interpretation and preparation of information across multiple departments. It requires the ability to analyze data from conceptualization through presentation of the data. It also requires proficiency with analytical tools (SQL, Excel, Access), knowledge of data analysis methodology, use of presentation software, strong communication skills and a strong commitment to and affinity for delivering the highest level of customer service.
ESSENTIAL RESPONSIBILITIES
Develops appropriate methodologies for collecting, analyzing, and presenting health care data
Develops and implements data mining techniques and data quality control procedures to protect the integrity of all data collected
Design, develop and implement MS Access databases by using SQL, Micros, and Visual Basic
Performs complex data analysis in support of ad-hoc and established reporting deadlines
Delivers data in report/presentation format or verbally, based on internal or external customer specifications and timelines
Supports development of data entry procedures manual and ensure that data standards and quality controls are maintained
Maintains Comprehensive Nutrition Care (CNC) outcomes database by adding and updating information
Supports business/system re-engineering and architecture development to define future data needs
Trains appropriate staff on data entry procedures
Consults with IT team as they build a customized database to serve the organization’s long term data collection needs
Serves as an organizational consultant on matters relating to databases by providing expertise to assist users in meeting their needs
QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s Degree with 3+ years of data analysis experience
Demonstrated experience in analysis and presentation of data required
Experience working with a variety of information systems and data files, including large and complex files: analyzing file structure, using and creating file layouts, transforming raw data into finished products
Demonstrated experience and expertise with statistical software required
Demonstrated experience using advanced MS Excel and Access features and techniques required
Familiarity with various types and sources of health care information, including financial and patient-level data files
Strong communication skills, both written and spoken
BENEFITS AVAILABLE*
Open Hand is committed to sponsoring a comprehensive benefits program for all eligible employees. In addition to receiving an equitable salary and having an equal opportunity for professional development and advancement, you may be eligible to enjoy the following benefits which will enhance your job satisfaction:
Medical
Dental
Vision
403B
Pet Insurance
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Short Term/Long Term Disability
Legal Shield/Identity Theft Protection
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Company's website:
https://openhandatlanta.org/
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Open Hand Atlanta,"Atlanta, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
125,Data Advancement Analyst,-1,"A dynamic and diverse role requiring analytical and business skills applied across a variety of data types. Responsible for data analysis, reporting, and technology implementations using industry-leading principles, methodologies, and programs. These analytic activities are typically product or solution based designed to serve many clients or a single client who requires custom development to tackle a specific business problem. The Analyst is a thought leader who is innovative, logical, and able to participate and contribute to all facets of the data life cycle either independently or as part of a team. This role can be home-based/remote in the US.
What You Will Do:
Perform data mining to include crosstabs, frequencies, correlations, and data summarizations.
Use predictive modeling and machine learning to improve and optimize client usage, adoption, and benefit of data.
Collaborate with partners to identify and support the development of analytic solutions based on company data products.
Utilize statistical techniques to perform predictions, analyze patterns, and uncover hidden stories told through data.
Prepare analysis datasets by appending data, deduping, loading data to analysis application, and merging with other datasets.
Research and implement new analytic techniques or methodologies as needed for specific projects.
Use a variety of statistical analysis tools (SAS, R, Python) to facilitate analytic discovery.
What You Will Need:
Knowledge of supervised and unsupervised statistical and data mining techniques
Knowledge of advanced predictive analytics (GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting Trees)
Experience with a variety of programming languages (SAS, R, Python)
Experience with automating tools and processes
Ability to effectively communicate results and findings
Intellectual and business curiosity
Required:
Bachelor’s Degree in a quantitative field (Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Economics) or related degree programs and 3+ years of relevant work experience.
Master’s Degree in a quantitative field (Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Economics) or related degree programs and 1+ years of relevant work experience.
Knowledge of various statistical software programming languages (SAS, R, Python).
Experience with data mining and statistical/machine learning techniques.
Ability to interpret business problems and identify optimal solutions.
Preferred:
Knowledge of data visualization tools (Microsoft BI, Tableau)
Experience with automating processes using a variety of tools and platforms
Experience working with global data
Experience working with agencies
Travel: 10-20%

#GD17

Primary Location City/State:

Homebased - Conway, Arkansas

Additional Locations (if applicable):

Acxiom is an affirmative action and equal opportunity employer (AA/EOE/W/M/Vet/Disabled) and does not discriminate in recruiting, hiring, training, promotion or other employment of associates or the awarding of subcontracts because of a person's race, color, sex, age, religion, national origin, protected veteran, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetics or other protected status.",3.8,"Acxiom
3.8",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1969,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
126,Senior Business Data Analyst,$69k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title:
Senior Business Data Analyst

Location:
US, California, San Jose
Role Overview:


McAfee is looking for an experienced Senior Business Analyst to join our digital marketing team. You will analyze our Consumer Growth Marketing acquisition and Retention Business including digital channel performance, channel forecasting, leading root cause analysis, and more. You will provide cross-department marketing insights to influence media systems, strategy, creative and content teams. You will build internal measurement and reporting processes and implement our results dashboards. You will report to the head of customer insights and analytics. This is a high visibility role working with sales, finance, and senior business leaders.



Company Overview


From device to cloud, McAfee provides market-leading cybersecurity solutions for both business and consumers. We help businesses orchestrate cyber environments that are truly integrated, where protection, detection, and correction of security threats happen simultaneously. For consumers, McAfee secures your devices against viruses, malware, and other threats, both at home and away. We want to continue to shape the future of cybersecurity by working together to build best in class products and solutions.
Job Description
About the role:
You will work with global business leads helping them with strategy discussions aiding with important insights on customer journey and on important metrics performance.
You will perform data analysis across all applicable marketing technologies, and communicate insights and recommendations based on findings
You will summarize data from multiple sources, developing assumptions where needed, to communicate insight and opportunity
You will build analysis, data visualizations, and reporting that provides important insights
You will organize our needs, collaborate in the design of diagnostic solutions, developing experimentation backlog based on opportunity ranking and achieve data products and insights
You will translate requirements into technical specifications for data and reporting teams and, conversely, technical approaches into easily digestible insights
You will work with the digital marketers to build time series, seasonality and forecasting models on demand and play a data science role.
You will develop processes and protocols for data monitoring, hygiene (e.g, validation), and other strategies that help uncover gaps and opportunities to improve the business
You will conduct cross-training sessions with team about new tools and techniques for mining customer insights
You will interpret and use data science models, interpret results, draw conclusions about findings and tell a story with data findings.
You will create informative reporting that highlights relevant business trends and opportunities for improvement
About you:
You have experience transforming data trends into useful customer insights to improve data-driven strategy and customer experience
You have professional experience in a digital role working with data, excels, business models as part of a marketing team
You have 5+ years of experience working in Digital, Traditional and B2C Marketing teams
You have a working knowledge of PowerBI, Azure, Adobe Analytics, or Google Analytics
You have experience using advanced Excel features (pivot tables, vlookups)
You have basic skills in SQL and experience with Tableau, PowerBI, or other visualization tools
You have an interest in ever-growing Internet technologies, current online trends, and marketing tactics (Search, Social, SEO, or Email)
Company Benefits and Perks:


We work hard to embrace diversity and inclusion and encourage everyone at McAfee to bring their authentic selves to work every day. We offer a variety of social programs, flexible work hours and family-friendly benefits to all of our employees.
Pension and Retirement Plans
Medical, Dental and Vision Coverage
Paid Time Off
Paid Parental Leave
Support for Community Involvement
We're serious about our commitment to diversity which is why McAfee prohibits discrimination based on race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation or any other legally protected status.

Job Type:


Experienced Hire

Primary Location:
US, California, San Jose

Additional Locations:",3.5,"McAfee
3.5","San Jose, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1987,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
127,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description
DATA ANALYST*
Greater Flint Health Coalition – Flint, MI*
Greater Flint Health Coalition (GFHC) is seeking a Data Analyst to work in its Healthcare Quality & Innovation Focus Area.
Overview: *
The Data Analyst will conduct data analysis, aggregation, trending, quality monitoring, and reporting functions in support of programs in the Greater Flint Health Coalition’s focus area of Healthcare Quality & Innovation. Projects activities will include data analyst functions specific to the GFHC’s Clinical Community Linkage (CCL) Initiative, the GFHC’s Community Data Scorecard Project, and regional Community Health Needs Assessment (CHNA) Project.

The GFHC’s Clinical Community Linkage (CCL) Initiative seeks to improve health outcomes and reduce emergency department utilization of patients in the Genesee Community Health Innovation Region (CHIR). The CCL Initiative recognizes the impact social determinant of health needs (food insecurity, housing, transportation, employment, etc.) have on health outcomes and assists clinical providers in linking their patients to resources available in the community. In this role, you will provide reporting and actionable analysis to support operations and drive constant improvement in the CCL Initiative.

The GFHC’s Community Data Scorecard Project is conducted annually; it is a critical element of the Flint/Genesee County consolidated Community Health Needs Assessment. The Data Analyst will own project deliverables required from actions that include data entry, data aggregation, data trending, trend analysis, baseline research, and data outcomes reporting from a variety of public and private data sources. The position will work with a variety of internal and external stakeholders, with an emphasis on hospital, health plan, and other clinical partners including physician organizations, federally qualified health centers, health departments, and community mental health agencies.

GFHC is seeking a candidate who understands the intricacy of healthcare and public health data sets, enjoys efforts of data aggregation and analysis, and seeks to make data actionable for healthcare and community health improvement strategy implementation. On a daily basis, the Data Analyst will interact with a wide range of health professionals in a fast-paced environment where constant change is the norm. You will identify trends in data, provide clear reporting on program performance, establish metrics, reconcile data, create methods of error checking, review analytics, and measure strategies to improve the linkage of community residents to resources to address their social determinant of health needs. Your work will support effective clinical decision making, ensure effective community linkages, improve efficiency and care delivery, foster information sharing, and make knowledge and data actionable.

Flexibility and a commitment to continuous learning will be required of the successful candidate.
Primary Responsibilities: *
Serves as the primary Data Analyst supporting the GFHC Clinical Community Linkage Initiative and Community Data Scorecard Project.
Data entry, aggregation, trending, analysis, and quality control functions.
Owns the maintenance of ongoing metrics, reports, analyses, dashboards, etc. to drive
key programmatic decisions.
Formulates new internal processes and analytical reports to improve information
resources.
Monitors industry standards and trends to assure continuity of data reporting as available data evolves.
Gathers data from departments; updates periodic reports; analyzes statistical data to
identify and correct errors and to evaluate general content.
Proactively researches requests for baseline measures and related assistance and recommends solutions or process improvements that will meet program needs.
Performs review analyses, including accumulation of data, forecast modeling, reporting
and monitoring of responses.
Designs data acquisition methods and collection efforts.
Develops ad-hoc reports to conduct data analysis and validation.
Analyzes trends to recommend process and/or operational improvements.
Creates procedures to document report generation.
Manages timelines, activities, documentation, and deliverables while maintaining
alignment with program objectives and work-plan requirements.
Participates in quality assurance, continuous improvement efforts, identifying system
and process issues.
Supports the mission, vision, values and key strategies of the Greater Flint Health
Coalition and development of collaborative relationships with the organizations that

interface with the program.
Collaborates with GFHC staff and other stakeholders to promote shared understanding and appropriate use of reported data.
Other duties and responsibilities as assigned.
Qualifications & Experience Required: *
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
2+ years of experience in relevant health care, health education, data management, or business domains, including healthcare information management or analytics, project coordination, or technology.
Bachelor’s degree in Public Health, Health Education, Statistics, Data Analytics, Business, Epidemiology, or related discipline (Master’s Degree a plus).
Knowledge of databases and reporting from databases required; experience with data analytic applications such as SQL, SAS, SPSS, Stata, etc. is a plus.
Understanding of statistical concepts and techniques.
Competent in Microsoft Office computer applications (including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Access), internet usage, and use of office machines.
Prioritization, multi-tasking, and organizational skills, and a strong attention to detail.
Demonstrate a high level of critical thinking and problem-solving skills in order to make sound assessments, implement plans, and re-evaluate program outcomes.
Maintains a high level of confidentiality and acceptance of diverse populations.
Demonstrates ability to work within a team-based environment and works in compliance with organization, state, and federal rules.
Demonstrates interest and ability in continuous quality improvement; receptive to feedback.
Knowledge of HIPAA and prior experience in a health care setting a plus.
Excellent interpersonal, written, and oral communication skills and an ability to present self in a courteous, tactful, and professional manner.
Considerate, attentive, and punctual.
Demonstrated ability to take initiative and to work proactively, both independently and in teams; excels in an open office environment.
Great passion for the mission, vision, and values of the Greater Flint Health Coalition and able to promote both internally and externally.
\*

Reports to*:

Vice President of Programs
Job Status: *
Full Time, Salary; Monday through Friday, 8:30 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. on average with occasional early morning meetings
Compensation: *
Greater Flint Health Coalition’s collaborative work environment emphasizes teamwork, personal commitment, integrity, and success. In addition to the meaningful and groundbreaking work to improve health on a community-wide level, GFHC offers a competitive salary commensurate with experience. Benefits include paid time off, holidays, medical, vision, and dental benefits plus life & disability insurance paid 100% by employer for employee, 403b (5% employer contribution), and more.
About Greater Flint Health Coalition: *
Greater Flint Health Coalition serves as the neutral convener and backbone organization for public health and healthcare collaboration between Flint & Genesee County hospitals, physicians, insurers, businesses, government, public health, schools and colleges, nonprofits, and citizens. We work to improve the health status of area residents, and improve the quality and cost effectiveness of the healthcare system in our community. For more information on the GFHC and our work, please visit our website http://www.gfhc.org.
To apply, please submit the following Application Materials: *
Qualified applicants please submit (a) cover letter (addressing how candidate meets qualifications), (b) resume, (c) salary history, and (d) employment references via email to , c/o Greater Flint Health Coalition, Attn: Human Resources, 519 S. Saginaw Street, Suite 306, Flint, Michigan 48502. In the subject line of your email, please write “Data Analyst”.

This position is open until filled.

Full posting also listed at http://www.gfhc.org.
NO PHONE CALLS PLEASE.*
Job Type: Full-time

Application QuestionsYou have requested that Indeed ask candidates the following questions:
Are you willing to undergo a background check, in accordance with local law/regulations?
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $24.00 - $29.00 per hour

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location",1.0,"Greater Flint Health Coalition
1.0","Flint, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
128,Development Data Analyst,$38k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Link Logistics Real Estate (“Link”) is an industrial real estate operating platform owned by The Blackstone Group Inc. Link currently manages a national portfolio of high-quality, well-located industrial assets totaling over 400 million square feet throughout the U.S.
The Development Team is responsible for overseeing Link Logistics $1.5b development pipeline that includes ground up construction, build to suits and major redevelopments of existing assets. The Development Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting the Development Team with the administrative oversight of all development-related reporting, data management, and project monitoring. This position will be exposed to all facets of commercial real estate.

Establish and monitor project budgets and schedules in Yardi for all developments through the project life cycle
Project future revenue by entering and maintaining market lease assumption for speculative buildings in Forecast Manager
Manage project documentation in Yardi and confirm proper records are maintained for all developments
Work with the Development teams on accurate cashflow projections and update as budget and schedules evolve
Coordinate the “Close Out” process of completed developments and ensure all documentation is received and financial records are finalized
Work with Yardi consultants to improve reporting capabilities and data management
Ensure timely payments of development expenses and accurate coding
Assist in ad-hoc reporting and new development initiatives
Support all phases of the Development from acquisition through lease-up
Assist in preparation of the monthly Development Executive reporting and quarterly Board Book

BA or BS in relevant field of study (Finance, Accounting, Real Estate, Business Management or similar)
Must be a team player
1-2 years’ experience in the development or real estate industry preferred
Strong proficiency with Microsoft Outlook, Excel, Word, PowerPoint; familiarity with Yardi also a plus
Detail-oriented
Ability to multi-task effectively in a fast-paced work environment
Excellent oral and written communication skills
EEO Statement
Our company is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. Our employment decisions are based on individual qualifications, job requirements and business needs without regard to race, color, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, age, religion, disability, citizenship status, national origin, pregnancy, veteran status and or any other legally protected characteristics. We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations, if you need an accommodation to complete the application process, please email employment@liprop.com
#LI=MB1",3.4,"Revantage Corporate Services
3.4","Fort Washington, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
129,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Senior Merchandising Analyst*
New York, NY (Weehawken, NJ)*
4 Month Contract to Hire*
The Sr. Data Analyst, Merchandise Planning - Online you will be responsible for understanding and analyzing the key drivers of performance related to online merchandising and our full assortment. This role works with Merchandise Planning Managers and Product Development to identify business opportunities and execute strategies to achieve business objectives and maximize sales and profitability. The Sr. Business Analyst will be responsible for executing daily, weekly, and monthly reporting efforts, as well as strategic initiatives on pricing, assortment optimization, profitability & supplier engagement.

If you are looking to be an essential part of driving business revenue at a Fortune 20 retailer, keep reading and apply today!
Minimum Qualifications: *
*﻿*Bachelor’s Degree in Statistics, Supply Chain, Math, Marketing, Advertising, or related field
3 years of professional experience analyzing, evaluating, and interpreting complex data; innate intellectual curiosity.
Professional experience creating Excel Macros reports utilizing VLOOKUP, COUNTIF, SUMIF and other formulas
work experience in retail, merchandising, or a consulting/ project management role in a corporate environment.
Tableau dashboarding experience is a plus
Advanced Excel skills and experience training others in Excel, Demandware and NetSuite experience a plus
*Must reside in Greater New York area *
Responsibilities: *
Create new excel reports to track inventory performance and teach team to use these reports
Manipulate and cleanse all data to showcase clear reporting outcomes
Track and measure business performance via execution of key daily, weekly and monthly reporting; seek out opportunities to continuously improve reporting efforts.
Partner with Assortment Planning Manager to analyze pricing, promotions and business drivers; provide insightful assessments and execute strategies to achieve business objectives.
Contribute to projects and new initiatives which further strategic business objectives/
What’s In It For You? *
Excellent opportunity to grow your career in the corporate retail industry
Exposure to upper level leadership
Beautiful office space with views of Manhattan
Free onsite parking, walking distance from NJ Transit Bus, Light Rail, and NY Ferry
Weekly paychecks
Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Pay: $30.00 - $35.00 per hour

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Position will remain remote, eventually going onsite when it is safe to do so.

Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Weehawken, NJ 07086 (Required)
Contract Length:
3 - 4 months
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.7,"Calculated Hire
4.7","Weehawken, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
130,Data Analyst,-1,"Over the coming years, biotech will fundamentally rewrite the way we live. Gene editing and cell therapy are dramatically changing how we treat cancer and other major illnesses. Biofuels and biomaterials are transforming the cars we drive, the clothes we wear, and the makeup of everyday objects. Crop science and synthetic biology are producing sustainable and ethical food. Benchling’s mission is to accelerate the research that propels us towards this reality, and magnify its impact, through modern software. Every day, scientists around the world use Benchling’s applications, platform, & analytics in their efforts to solve humanity's most pressing problems. For these scientists, Benchling is the central technology they use to conduct their research. Our customers include pharmaceutical giants, leading biotechs, and the world's most renowned research institutes. Benchling is building an Internal Data and Analytics team, which will be focused on establishing the necessary data infrastructure and systems to enable all of our business units to answer key questions and make strategic decisions. If you have a passion for investigating what makes a growing business tick, and if you imagine yourself exploring data from systems across an entire company to dig up answers to these questions, we want to meet you. You will establish key metrics for many stakeholders within the company, including Product, Marketing, Sales, and Customer Success, and identify opportunities for data to guide critical strategic product and business decisions. In addition, you will be one of the first people at Benchling building the next generation of our data infrastructure, which will be used not only by the data practitioners on our team, but by the rest of the company as well. As one of Benchling’s first data analysts, you’ll be joining a rapidly growing, world-class engineering and product team and form the foundation of our data organization. You will help to build the next generation of our data infrastructure and enable the company to answer key questions and make better decisions. Benchling is growing really quickly, and you’ll be setting the bar for high quality data and a metrics-driven culture as we scale. RESPONSIBILITIES Work closely with cross-functional teams across all of Benchling to develop a strategy around our data platform and to establish best practices for a metrics-driven culture. Build dashboards / reports and empower the business to answer key questions across Sales, Marketing, Customer Success, Recruiting, Product, and Engineering. Prioritize between multiple planned analytics projects and ad-hoc data requests for our internal stakeholders Define and design data pipelines and data integrations to collect, clean, and store large scale, cross-functional datasets. YOU BS or MS degree in Computer Science or a related quantitative field 5+ years experience, not counting academic experience, on data science or data analytics teams, especially on data teams focused on internal operations Experience with querying and exploring data stored in MPPs (Redshift, Snowflake, Hive/Presto, or similar technologies) Demonstrable fluency with SQL (primarily PostgreSQL) Experience with a scripting language (Python, Ruby, or similar) Experience with data visualization tools such as Tableau, Looker, or similar tools Strong communicator with both words and data - you understand what it takes to go from raw data to something a human understand OUR VALUES Empower through information. We explain the “why” behind every decision, unless there are highly sensitive circumstances. We're honest about how we're doing, especially in difficult times. We believe that sharing information builds trust and enables better decision-making. Rely on tenacity. Hard work is one of the greatest factors to determine success and is fully under our control. We must make the most of every day by bringing the highest level of determination. Dreaming big is not enough. Raise the bar. Pushing ourselves and others to improve will be uncomfortable and at times result in failure. However, it's critical to our success. We're dedicated to creating a place where everyone feels challenged to improve. Build a lever. We choose to build tools and infrastructure that will help others make world-changing innovations. There's less glory in it, but in the words of Archimedes, ""Give me a lever long enough and a fulcrum on which to place it, and I shall move the world."" PERKS AND BENEFITS Work with a talented yet humble team Competitive compensation & equity package 401k Medical, dental, and vision insurance Monthly health & wellness stipend Weekly virtual social events, and annual company retreats *$1,000 work-from-home stipend In following best practices and safety protocols, all Benchling employees are expected to work remotely until we are further advised that it is safe for employees to resume work in their respective office locations. *To support remote work conditions, Benchling provides each employee a one-time stipend of $1,000 upon commencing employment, and additional discounted employee purchase plans for home-office equipment.",5.0,"Benchling
5.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
131,"AVP, Senior AML Data Quality Analyst",$63k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Function Background/Context

The AML Data Governance Office oversees the end-to-end AML data “ecosystem” including data governance, architecture, standards, controls, metrics, Issue Management & Resolution (IMR), reporting and risk management. Objectives include: improving data governance and management; defining and maintaining the AML data architecture and standards; increasing business and functional engagement; improving data comprehensiveness, quality and coverage; reducing the inventory of data issues; and accelerating data access and validation for new projects.

Description

The Anti-Money Laundering (AML) Data Quality Senior Analyst will interact with subject matter experts across Citi's AML function and Citi's lines of business to identify, measure and report AML metrics. The Data Mining & Analytics (DM&A) team functions within the Citi AML Data Governance Office and provides support to AML Monitoring Risk Management efforts to improve data quality, validate t-code usage against current Gold Source mappings, and provide analytical support to guide IMR remediation decisions.

The analyst will use SQL along with SAS, R, Python, or advanced Excel functions to create reports, analyze trends, and identify drivers and risks. The analyst will lead projects and communicate findings and recommendations to stakeholders in a clear, concise fashion. In order to succeed, strong partnerships must be developed and maintained with global stakeholders from business, operations and compliance functions.

Responsibilities

Develop well-designed SQL queries to extract correct output from Citi AML systems (Mantas, Actimize, Oracle, EAP, etc.)
Perform statistical analyses of raw data using tools such as SAS, R, Python, or Excel to identify trends and behaviors that present AML risk
Identify and report data quality issues that may impact AML monitoring efficiency and effectiveness
Analyze and interpret data to draw conclusions and make recommendations to address specific business needs
Source and prepare AML metrics to support Data Governance initiatives
Enhance existing metrics and propose new metrics to measure AML performance and risks
Present proposals and findings of analysis to team members and senior stakeholders in a clear and succinct manner both verbally and in writing
Maintain effective communications with stakeholders to manage expectations throughout each project
Produce high quality deliverables within the allotted time frame
Clearly document projects, processes, and procedures for the intended audience
Provide ad-hoc support to AML Monitoring Risk Management stakeholders

Qualifications

4+ years of experience in Oracle SQL development
2+ years of experience in Mantas and Actimize
Proven analytic and problem-solving skills
Strong knowledge of Excel including advanced functions such as formula based data manipulation, advanced table lookups, pivot tables and VBA
Highly effective written and verbal communication skills
Knowledge of statistical packages such as SAS, R, or Python desired
Knowledge of Anti-Money Laundering (AML)
Ability to learn new concepts quickly and adapt to shifting requirements and priorities
Ability to manage significant workload independently and effectively

Education

BA/BS Degree in MIS, Business or related field

Job Family Group:

Technology

Job Family:

Data Quality

Time Type:

Full time
Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.

Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi.

View the ""EEO is the Law"" poster. View the EEO is the Law Supplement.

View the EEO Policy Statement.

View the Pay Transparency Posting",3.8,"Citi
3.8","Tampa, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1812,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
132,Data Analyst,$32k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),".

Do you dare to reinvent the future of education?


At Cengage, we are harnessing the power of tech to build a future where all learners have the tools and confidence to achieve their goals.

As a Cengage employee, you will blaze a new trail to transform the way people learn. Collaborating with the best of the best, you will feel challenged and inspired to do breakthrough work. With the support of our united team, there is no limit to what you can imagine, create and set in motion.

Are we right for you?


We set the bar higher by bringing our unique talents and point of view to the table every day. We are curious and comfortable with change and are willing to take risks to transform education. Most importantly, with everything we do, we put learning first.

What You'll Do Here:


The Data Analyst, Product Data Analytics will be responsible for delivering data-driven insights across the finance, product, strategy, technology, and legal groups designed to significantly improve Cengage’s Higher Education and Skills product and content development. The Data Analyst will be a critical contributor to the team, focusing on deriving business outcomes from data, driving improvements in data quality, building out new proof of concepts, engaging and communicating analysis to cross-functional teams, and providing analytic and operational support to multiple areas.Cengage Learning is a collaborative environment. This role will bring data-first thinking to projects that are transformational in nature. The right candidate will possess strategic thinking, effective problem structuring, proven analytical skills, and an ability to influence within diverse teams.

This position is full-time, on-site in one of the following locations: Boston, MA/Mason, OH/Clifton Park, NY.

· Form a deep understanding of Cengage Learning’s product data, processes, systems and tools, while shaping workflow best practices and improving data integrity· Assist in structuring and executing operational and strategic initiatives by gathering and synthesizing relevant data, leading analyses, and developing final recommendations and documentation· Drive analysis to recommendations to meaningful operating results, such as higher quality, faster cycle times, less costly, etc.· Capture and communicate findings within broader project structure; maintain healthy project management practices, including work plan development and trackingTo successfully accomplish the above, engage with and on cross-functional teams

Skills You Will Need Here:


· BA/BS with high proven achievement· Minimum 3 years of experience working directly with complex data systems · Demonstrated ability to conceive and execute quantitative analysis and deliver data-driven insights· Outstanding organizational skills and a very strong attention to detail· Demonstrated writing and verbal presentation skills enabling her/him to prepare and present information and recommendations to a diverse and often senior audience· Proven commitment to providing excellent customer service to internal and external stakeholders; demonstrated willingness to take ownership of customer issues and see them through to resolution· Collaborative problem solving and working style to drive change through influence· Able to self-manage progress against milestones and deliverables with a high degree of accountability and personal urgency· Advanced skills with Microsoft Office Suite of systems, particularly MS Excel and MS Access

Preferred Skills/Knowledge/Experience:· Experience with successfully navigating and driving change in complex organizations· Experience with successfully implementing strategic initiatives; collecting, analyzing, and synthesizing large datasets to identify problems and propose solutions · Prior experience in the publishing or technology industries is beneficial",4.0,"Cengage
4.0","Clifton Park, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
133,Data Analyst,$44k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our healthcare client in the Pacific Northwest is seeking a Data Analyst for an 11+ month contract starting ASAP remotely.

Must live in the Renton or Portland, WA area and be able to work as a W2.

Requirements include:

3+ years experience with SQL, Data Extraction, ETL, Power BI and ERP solutions
Develop and execute SQL queries, extract data in support of analyses, and performs reporting tasks from information systems
Demonstrate skill developing qualitative and quantitative measurement, summarizing results of data file and the follow-up tasks on the data structure to solve related problems and inconsistencies such as missing data or incorrect data values
Develop and maintain dashboards with most up to date data extracts
Bachelor's Degree or equivalent

To learn more about this and other positions, contact Jared Fudge at (978) 561-2019 or jared.fudge@healthcareitleaders.com. Healthcare IT Leaders is a national leader in IT workforce solutions, connecting healthcare provider, payer and life sciences organizations with experienced technology talent for consulting and full-time hiring.",4.9,"Healthcare IT Leaders
4.9","Renton, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
134,Data Analyst,-1,"Description:

The Bizzell Group, one of the fastest-growing businesses in America, is seeking a Data Analyst to integrate and interface clinically reliable, safe, and effective clinical technologies across the Department of Defense (DOD). You will be part of a small team implementing medical device integration.

. Requirements:
Establish and maintain an MDI TF database environment (MS SharePoint, MS SQL Server, MS Access and Concept Searching) to ensure full availability and currency of data
Maintain and periodically update the MDI TF Equipment Tracking and Resource Database a web-based repository of equipment, publications, links to publications, program and website directory listings, and other resources on Medical Devices and MHS Genesis deployment, supported by a robust search engine
Maintain relevant and current health, support, and program resource information, allowing for increased continuity of services, and facilitate collaboration among broad stakeholder community in DHA, Army, Navy and Air Force medical communities
Perform other duties as assigned

Required Skills

Ability to address fragmented data and inconsistent compilation and analysis from all stakeholders by creating a single, source of truth repository for devices/systems identified to be integrated into MHS GENESIS.
(The database will be scalable to flex with requirements throughout all three phases of implementation integrating various disparate data points and database into a single comprehensive system to support the queries, the analysis and most importantly, the ability to collaboratively share the data throughout the enterprise)

Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree desired
At least two (2) years of working knowledge with content management in an MS SharePoint and SQL Server web repository environment
At least 2 years of experience in working with ETL & BI tools (SSIS, SSRS)
Hand on experience with database creation, integration, and management using tools such as MySQL, SQLite, and PostgreSQL
Intermediate knowledge of SQL, including the ability to write stored procedures, triggers, analytics/windowing functions, and tuning
Demonstrable proficiency with enterprise Business Intelligence tools (Tableau)
Working knowledge and experience with Web Server technologies such as J2EE, Apache, Nginx,
Experience with content management system development, deployment, and maintenance
Evidence of work with various API Integrations
Ability to design and develop ETL structures to extract, transform and load data from multiple data sources into the database based on requirements would be a plus
Knowledge of relational and dimensional database structures, theories, principles, and practices

Other Duties as Assigned

This position description should not be construed to imply that these requirements are the

exclusive standards of the position nor will it be the sole basis for any subsequent employee

evaluations.",4.7,"Bizzell Group
4.7","Lanham, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
135,Data Analyst,$60k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Ed360 project provides educators with near real-time instructional support using data from the data warehouse.



Qualifications:
Candidate demonstrates experience using Microsoft SQL Server to model data into datasets for consumption of business intelligence software.
Candidate demonstrates expertise of data administration and management functions (collection, analysis, distribution etc.)
Candidate demonstrates expertise conducting statistical analyses of data using standard statistical techniques.
Candidate demonstrates expertise gathering functional specification requirements for the development of dashboards and reports.
Candidate demonstrates expertise with modern data warehouse and information system technologies.
Candidate demonstrates experience with data security and privacy by anonymizing datasets.

Job Responsibilities:
The Data Analysts will work with the Lead Data Analyst to provide data analysis support of agency initiatives revolving around the data warehouse.
These projects may include support of Evidence-based Funding, Illinois Report Card, State assessments, Data Quality Dashboard, IL-EMPOWER IBAM rubric, ESSA summative designations, holistic district plans, and Ed360 instructional support.
The data warehouse team is developing reporting capabilities for the new Evidence-based Funding formula in support of public school districts funding.
The Illinois Report Card is undergoing a major rewrite to report district and school report cards from the data warehouse.
State assessment data including PARCC, SAT, KIDS, ISA, ACCESS, and DLM-AA are high-stakes reporting metrics for a number of reporting initiative for the agency and inform education stakeholders of statewide progress.
The Data Quality Dashboard is a tool developed for districts to review data quality reports in an effort to improve the State's reporting of data.
The IL-EMPOWER IBAM rubric will be used by districts to assess their needs for IL-EMPOWER school improvement services.
The ESSA summative designations are used to place schools into groups of similar strengths and opportunities.
The holistic district plans project is new development to collect and collaborate on strategic planning and coordination of support to prepare students for success.
The Ed360 project provides educators with near real-time instructional support using data from the data warehouse.

Systems Environment:
Currently operates and supports a multitude of applications to conduct its business processes on various platforms using mainframe, client server, and web-based technologies.
Initiatives have incorporated the use of web-based tools utilizing Microsoft®.NET as the primary application development tool and Microsoft® SQL Server as the relational database management system (RDBMS).
Operates a Windows-based environment using the Microsoft® Office Suite for staff in its Springfield and Chicago offices.
Web-based applications at must be browser independent and run on a Windows-based PC or MAC operating systems. In addition, the selected Offered will be required to follow all current application development standards and procedures while ensuring maximal security.
All technical solutions related to this RFSP must use Microsoft Visual Studio 2010/2012/2013/2015, Visual Basic.NET, C#, ASP.NET, AJAX, JQUERY, Microsoft SQL Server, SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS), SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) or Crystal Reports, Microsoft Power BI Business Intelligence, and Microsoft SharePoint 2016.
Team Foundation Server (TFS) will be used for version control.
Secure access to all web applications requires the Offer or to use the current application development framework to integrate into the current Single Sign-On (SSO) or the sign in portal (Web Application Security (IWAS)).
Web-based applications at must run under Internet Information Server (IIS) 7 or higher on one or more servers running Windows Server 2012 R2 Datacenter Edition.
All servers run as virtual machines under VMware ESXi 6.

About our Company:
Connecting people’s aptitude & ambitions with our opportunities to deliver results.
22nd Century Technologies was established in 1997 and is headquartered in McLean VA. We are one of the leading IT services and solutions firm in the country with 12 regional offices and presence in all 50 states. We bring a mix of innovative technology and sector expertise to customers in defense, intelligence, civil, and healthcare markets. As our name implies, we are a forward thinking company with the ultimate goal of helping our customers implement innovative IT solutions that will satisfy their business needs. We combine real-world experience, specialized skills, innovative thinking, and industry knowledge to deliver quality IT solutions. At our core, we are about people - our customers and our employees.
“22nd Century Technologies is an Equal Opportunity Employer"" and “US Citizens & all other parties authorized to work in the US are encouraged to apply.""",3.4,"22nd Century Technologies
3.4","Springfield, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
136,Data Analyst,$56k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

PCG is searching for proven Data Analysts to define data requirements and functional specifications that will drive improved environment and analysis that align to business objectives.
Compensation: $80,000 to $120,000 Annually
Benefits Offered: Medical, Dental, Life, 401K
Employment Type: Full-Time
IDEAL CANDIDATE
3+ years’ experience in, data cleanup, report definition and development and backend database transactions
Skilled with several of the following: Access, Excel, SQL, Dynamics SL, Dynamics, Epicor, and IQMS, Oracle, MatLab, Tablean, and Queries
Solid analytical, quantitative and problem-solving skills, with the ability to use statistical analysis and modeling
PRIMARY RESPONSIBILTIES
Take data in existing access database and clean and update the data
Determine functionality of current system and business processes for both current and future state
Assess current situation of the state of the information in the access database, solidify requirements, provide a resolution, and execute solution
Take multiple opinions and guide teams to a common ground
Code reviews and feedback
Requirements definition/ documentation
Lead requirements gathering sessions using multiple techniques
Implement new technologies
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
BS or AA in computer science or equivalent related work experience
Demonstrated excellence in data manipulation and data visualization skills
Excellent communication, time management, and teamwork skills
Experience with data cleansing, data conversion and ETL initiatives
Proficient with multiple scripting languages, version-control systems
Data validation, testing, and impact analysis experience
Experience with security and related issues, solutions and technologies
Excellent system-level thinking and the ability to move up and down the stack",4.5,"Project Consulting Group
4.5","Minneapolis, MN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
137,Administrative Data Analyst,-1,"_Our mission is to partner with the community to eliminate poverty and create social change through_*
_advocacy and essential services_*
JOB DESCRIPTION *
POSITION:

Administrative/Data Analyst

LOCATION:

CAB’s Luna y Sol Familia Center: 1430 Freedom Blvd. Watsonville, CA 95076

REPORTS TO:

Luna y Sol Operations Manager

HRS/SCHEDULE:
5 hrs. per week, generally Monday to Friday 12-8pm
SALARY:

$19-$20 per hour

BENEFITS:

Medical (some employee share of cost, depending on plan selected), dental (employee pays half of dental), vision plan and life insurance, 24 days annual leave to start and 12 paid holidays,

prorated to time worked, Retirement Plan (401K) after 6 months.

TO APPLY: Submit resume and cover letter ASAP to Ruben Prieto (831) 724-3447 RubenP @cabinc.org or on Indeed.com. *Position open until filled. *

Overview: CAB’s employment program, Alcance, is one of the six component programs of the Community Action Board of Santa Cruz County, Inc. Alcance provides adult and youth alternative to incarceration, re-entry, and workforce development services through the provision of employment readiness, training, mentoring and placement/job matching. In each of these service areas, the program follows a strengths-based, and outcomes approach and integrates evidence-based practices from criminal justice research, advancing employment as one of the most important vehicles for hastening offender reintegration, improving employment placements for the under-resourced, and improving community functioning for participants. Alcance’s Youth Programs are focused on addressing gaps in how the community supports youth and young adults that have been harmed by poverty and violence through providing culturally respectful services designed to increase youth wellbeing and safety, reduce harm, and build assets.

The Luna y Sol Familia Center serves South County Latinx youth, predominately males ages 12-17 at risk of justice system involvement (prevention cohort) or justice-involved (diversion cohort). Additionally, it will provide services to families including parent/guardians and younger siblings such as linkages to basic necessities, wellness programs (restorative justice practices, substance use, and mental health), education/career exploration, economic opportunities, community engagement/leadership, family support/parenting workshops) and establish strong partnerships with probation, law enforcement and community-based organization partners, etc. The center is currently funded by a three-year grant.

GENERAL DUTIES:

The Administrative/Data Analyst position will provide administrative, organizational, and operational services at the Luna y Sol Familia Center, including supporting with collection of youth and families participation data for program evaluation and reporting purposes including pre/post assessments, program intakes, program exits, and ongoing data collection. Data will be tracked in excel documents for the purpose of analyzing information clearly and efficiently. Must be able to prepare informational PowerPoint presentations and provide detailed written and verbal reports quarterly and as needed.

Knowledge and Abilities:

Administrative/Data Analyst needs a working knowledge of common general-office and Microsoft Office computer applications and how to create documents, letters, Excel spreadsheets, and PowerPoint presentations using them.
Maintain accurate data collection for evaluation purposes regarding program activities, youth and families participation in program and follow up tracking.
Responsible for providing administrative assistance including clerical support, data entry, record-keeping, assisting with reports to funders, correspondence, and maintenance of electronic and physical client files; under direction, creating fliers, PowerPoint presentations and social media postings.
Responsible for assisting youth and families with forms, translation, advocacy, outreach, and referrals as needed.
Responsible for assisting in providing outreach and recruitment services to area low-income at-risk youth and families, including in-person, virtual, phone/Zoom, and social media.
Responsible for maintaining accurate data, including local schools and probation department.
Assist with Luna y Sol programming as needed, including Joven Noble, Xinachtli, Financial literacy, job readiness, community engagement activities, intake, and assessment screenings.
Accurate communication with community partners regarding Luna y Sol programming such as services provided to families and youth including number of referrals, client data, and workshop facilitation pre/post surveys.
Assist with data collection and support with pop up activities to outreach to youth and families.
Attend related meetings, take meeting minutes as needed, and assume additional responsibilities as assigned.
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:
AA degree and/or equivalent of 2 years of administrative, data collection/analysis, and/or related experience.
Bilingual/biliterate (Able to speak, read, and write English/Spanish) REQUIRED; bicultural preferred.
Ability to assist in the oversight of program service delivery, contract compliance, and impacts are met.
Supports the Operations Manager with daily operations of the Alcance Luna y Sol Familia Center
Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite/Office 365 (Word, Access, Teams, PPT, etc.); ability to keyboard 40 wpm.
Excellent organizational, customer service and verbal and written communication skills (English and Spanish).
Strong initiative and willingness to pitch in as needed. Outstanding follow-through with tasks.
The ability to work cooperatively, respectfully, and non-judgmentally with diverse cultures, ages, and interests.
Knowledge and familiarity with the Santa Cruz County network of health, social service, and related agencies.
Ability to work evening hours on a weekly basis and occasional weekend hours if needed.
DMV printout stating safe driving record, current CA driver’s license and insured vehicle REQUIRED.
Ability to sit, stand, bend, reach and routinely safely lift to 25 pounds.
Ability to pass background check to work with youth.
Ability to handle sensitive information in a confidential manner.
Assist in monitoring and tracking all program objectives and outcomes to ensure program goals are met and prepare programmatic reports as needed.
Communicate with project partners and other community members/organizations about program activities and objectives.
Assist with overseeing and ensuring proper expenditures related to employment programming, supplies, client assistance and other operating expenses.
Assist in monitoring program/staff compliance with all CAB policies, procedures, and safe work practices.
Assists in oversight of contract youth and family activities, including workshops and activities provided either in the office or in community settings and capacity building for staff, interns, volunteers.
Other duties as assigned.
_The hired candidate will adhere to CAB’s standard of upholding the agency’s mission, values, and code of ethics through a commitment to confidentiality and communication._*
NOTE: The position is currently funded by a three-year grant.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, disability, medical condition (cancer-related), marital status, sex, sexual orientation, age (over 18), veteran status, gender, pregnancy, or any other non-merit factors unrelated to job duties. *AA/EOE 10/2020 *

www.cabinc.org

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $19.00 - $20.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Associate (Preferred)
Experience:
Administrative experience: 2 years (Preferred)
Language:
English/Spanish (Required)
License/Certification:
Commercial Driver's License (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.CABINC.ORG
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/CommunityActionBoardSC/
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Community Action Board of Santa Cruz County, Inc.","Watsonville, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
138,"Data Integrity Analyst- I, II, III, or SR",$58k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Integrity Analyst- I, II, III, or SR

Apply now »

Date: Oct 16, 2020

Location:

New Orleans, Louisiana, United States

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Company:
Entergy
This position may be filled as a Data Integrity Analyst I, II, III or SR. **depending on the qualification level of the applicant**

Job Summary/Purpose

The Data Integrity Analyst (DIA) serves as a “data steward” of a functional area. The DIA works closely with IT and enterprise data governance resources in support of the following data management activities as part of both “build” and “run” functions—data governance/stewardship, master data management, metadata management, data quality management, data modeling, data replication/migration/integration, taxonomy/ontology/search, data security/privacy and data architecture. The DIA is the subject matter expert for a business function’s data. DIAs are responsible for information certification and will execute processes that ensure the accuracy, completeness, and reliability of data—including associated business rules, business formulas, aggregations, etc.—for designated output (like reports, dashboards, etc.)

For example, within the AMI Operations Center (also known as “AMOC”), this role will be used to staff positions responsible for day-to-day monitoring and maintenance of AMI data transfers and transactions—supporting processes dependent on data from advanced meters like meter-to-cash, outage management, etc. These positions will work closely with IT resources to resolve issues related to data transfer among integrated systems. The main performance objective of this role in the AMOC is to minimize the number of unaccounted-for meters, ensure that the data used for customer billing, system analysis and regulatory reporting is secure and of the highest accuracy, and act as the primary utility point of contact to troubleshoot ongoing system issues affecting data integrity.

Job Duties/ Responsibilities

Ensure data governance/stewardship by establishing/following practices for master data management, metadata management, data quality management, data modeling, data replication/migration/integration, taxonomy/ontology/search, data security/privacy and data architecture; these activities will support design, build, test and deploy phases of technology implementation as well as on-going business operations.

Contribute to master data management at Entergy—i.e. identify and define mappings for the most important, critical and valuable data at the company.

Contribute to metadata management at Entergy—i.e. identify and define mappings for the lineage of metadata at Entergy.

Ensure data quality management—including profiling, monitoring and cleansing of data; perform periodic reconciliations (driven by monthly or quarterly data audits); monitor daily system logs for data quality issues and manage resolution work; maintain ongoing tracking of data unaccounted for in key systems using designated enterprise tools.

Supervise data migration and integration activities.

Implement taxonomy, ontology and search capabilities by providing data with descriptions, nomenclature and classifications.

Support data security and privacy practices by working with Entergy’s data security team and adhering to existing practices.

Support data architecture efforts by collaborating with Entergy’s Enterprise Architecture team and application data architects.

Liaise with 3rd party data providers—i.e. AMI meter installation vendor--to ensure that essential information is correctly passed onto Entergy systems via recurring data transfers; if data is unaccounted for, provide oversight and guidance on the investigation process.

Organize the causes of data sync failure into categories for reporting/communicating to business stakeholders.

Master the mechanics of data transfer interfaces and proactively identify ways in which to reduce data sync issues through process or technical improvements; record incident resolution methodology in knowledge repository.

For system issues that remain unresolved after normal troubleshooting procedures, log tickets with IT support staff for troubleshooting in appropriate systems—i.e. MDMS, CCS, HES, OMS, etc.—and follow through with involved parties to ensure issue resolution.

Provide technical support after-hours or on holidays if required.

Where applicable, execute standard IT Service Management (problem, incident, and knowledge management) processes.

Clearly define and implement the boundaries of data management work between the data integrity analyst role and the IT organization—developing processes and procedures as necessary.

While not solely a technical position, must deliver responses to requests for data using various tools and systems including the ability to develop, communicate and/or write program logic.

Perform investigation and in-depth analysis of data to address issues for both technical and business related processes.

Minimum Requirements

Minimum education required of the position

Bachelor’s degree in a technical or business related field required or equivalent work experience; Master's Degree desired; Bachelor’s degree in computer science, computer engineering or management information systems preferred.

Minimum experience required of the position

Data Integrity Analyst I - 0-2 years of professional experience

Data Integrity Analyst II - 2-4 years of professional experience

Data Integrity Analyst III- 4-6 years of professional experience

Data Integrity Analyst Sr.- 6 or more years of professional experience

Professional experience in a control/operations environment is preferred—i.e. telecom, energy or utilities operations, finance/accounting; experience monitoring data flow across integrated enterprise applications preferred; experience working within an established data management organization is highly desirable.

Minimum knowledge, skills and abilities required of the position

Database skills (for example, in SQL) preferred. IT experience in data extract, transform and load (ETL) and/or DBA roles is preferred. Data architecture skills preferred. Ability to trouble-shoot and solve problems by analyzing data from multiple sources and timelines. Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint) proficiency. Ability to handle potentially sensitive customer information and interact with data that impacts customer bills. Experience with industry tools supporting enterprise data management preferred—i.e. Informatica. Experience with enterprise reporting and analytics tools is preferred.

Any certificates, licenses, etc. required for the position

ITIL Certification Preferred

Working Conditions

Ability to work at a desk in an office/operating center environment for normal business hours during the week; ability to serve on-call depending on the needs for the AMI Operations Center; ability to relocate to temporary work-site locations during major storm events or disaster recovery operations; up to 10% travel may be required.

#LI-AH1

Primary Location: Louisiana-New Orleans
Job Function: Professional
FLSA Status: Professional
Relocation Option: Level I
Union description/code: NON BARGAINING UNIT-NBU
Number of Openings: 1
Req ID: 99462
Travel Percentage:Up to 25%

An Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disability/Vets. Please click here to view the full statement

Job Segment:
Database, Telecom, Telecommunications, Engineer, Quality Manager, Technology, Engineering, Quality

Apply now »",3.4,"Entergy Nuclear
3.4","New Orleans, LA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1999,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
139,Data Analyst,$36k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"ICF is seeking an experienced Data Analyst to analyze and define data requirements and specifications to ensure information systems reliability and accessibility to prevent and defend against unauthorized access to systems, networks, and data in support of a large scale DoD Navy contract in Mechanicsburg, PA.



Duties & Responsibilities:

Designing, normalizing, developing, installing, and implementing databases

Maintaining, monitoring, performance tuning, backup, and recovery of databases

Installing, configuring, and maintaining database management systems software

Analyzing and planning for anticipated changes in data capacity requirements

Developing and administering data standards, policies, and procedures

Developing and implementing data mining and data warehousing programs

Evaluating and providing recommendations on new database technologies and architectures

Ensuring the rigorous application of information security/ information assurance policies, principles, and practices in the delivery of data management services

Basic Qualifications:

5+ years relevant IT experience supporting a DOD program
Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience
Security clearance required - DOD preferred
Advanced knowledge of network and systems technologies and security protocols
DOD 8570 Compliance, or the ability to quickly obtain and maintain active security certifications
Strong initiative and a personal interest in Information Technology Security
People skills and the ability to communicate effectively with various clients with the ability to explain and elaborate on technical details

Professional Skills:

Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills

Working at ICF

Working at ICF means applying a passion for meaningful work with intellectual rigor to help solve the leading issues of our day. Smart, compassionate, innovative, committed, ICF employees tackle unprecedented challenges to benefit people, businesses, and governments around the globe. We believe in collaboration, mutual respect, open communication, and opportunity for growth. If you’re seeking to make a difference in the world, visit www.icf.com/careers to find your next career. ICF—together for tomorrow.

ICF is an equal opportunity employer that values diversity at all levels. (EOE – Minorities/Females/ Protected Veterans Status/Disability Status/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity). For more information, please read our EEO & AA policy .

Reasonable Accommodations are available for disabled veterans and applicants with disabilities in all phases of the application and employment process. To request an accommodation please email icfcareercenter@icf.com and we will be happy to assist. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodations. Read more about non-discrimination: EEO is the law and Pay Transparency Statement .

Pennsylvania Client Office (PA88)",3.4,"ICF
3.4","Harrisburg, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
140,Data Analyst (Learning and Development),$48k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tailored Management is seeking a candidate to join the world's largest social media network who enables over a billion users to openly connect with friends and family, share content, and explore the world. You'll have the opportunity to work with great people, tackle big challenges, and make a real impact – while being your unique, authentic, self at work!

Title: *L&D Data Analyst II*
Location: Menlo Park, CA (Remote until further notice)
Pay*: $60-$70/hr.
Department*: Learning & Development
Duration: 6-month project with the opportunity for an extension!
Health Benefits + PTO

Job Duties*:
Deliver standard reports/dashboards on a regular cadence
Document reporting requirements with stakeholders, drive iterations and changes to core dashboards and solutions
Pull, organize, and analyze relevant data from multiple sources
Create visualizations and dashboards that display meaningful and actionable (KPI’s)
Triage requests for people data and ad hoc reports
Maintain code-base (SQL) used to drive self-service tools, and recommend opportunities for improvement
Build and automate easy to use, self-service reports and dashboards
Audit data integrity, investigate concerns, and establish processes to streamline and improve data quality
Support non-technical program managers to design, build, launch, scale and run learning products
Provide direction and coaching to end users on how to use and interpret metrics
Cross-functional partnering with People Insights, People Analytics, Research, Forecasting Analytics, and Engineering
Tools and programming languages such as Tableau, Hive, Excel, Workday, and Visier
Translate data and trends into stories to drive business decisions
Prioritize requests and effectively communicate appropriate delivery expectations
Must be comfortable with navigating ambiguity while working in a fast-paced, rapidly evolving environment and exercising agility to alternate between strategic projects and tactical reporting/analysis requests
Experience initiating and driving projects to completion with minimal guidance
Strong initiative, curiosity, and comfort with uncertainty
Excellent presentation and communication skills, including the ability to explain technical subject matter to a non-technical audience and influence others
Skills*:
6+ years of experience with SQL (or similar language aimed at querying)
6+ years of experience creating custom reports/dashboards and building visualizations in Tableau data.
6+ years of experience with visualization tools (SQL, R, Tableau, SASS, etc.)
BA/BS in a field that emphasizes data analysis and visualization (e.g., computer science, social sciences, physical sciences, math, engineering, or statistics), or equivalent work experience.
Must have advanced Microsoft Excel skills (conditional formulas and formatting, charting, pivot tables, Vlookup, etc.)
Experience with data management, specifically with validating and auditing data and reports from multiple systems
Experience manipulating large data sets through statistical software or other methods
IND2

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60.00 - $70.00 per hour

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
using visualization tools (SQL, R, Tableau, SASS, etc.: 6 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.6,"Tailored Management
4.6","Menlo Park, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1965,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
141,Junior Data Analyst,-1,"The Details:

Data drives strategy. Unique Influence's Data Science & Analytics practice helps internal and client stakeholders take a scientific approach towards optimizing critical business and marketing decisions. Our forward thinking in Data Science & Analytics is a key differentiator that has contributed to our agencies success.

This position is for self-starters who believe that data should drive insights. They can change perceptions through data and will be responsible for measuring and communicating the effectiveness of media to internal and external stakeholders.

What Youll Do:
Design & execute analytical reporting dashboards to improve the effectiveness of digital online and offline marketing programs. Recommend appropriate analytic methodologies and approaches. Be a subject matter expert for analytics and techniques, including A/B testing
Design and enhance media planning optimization reports across channels such as Programmatic, Social, and search
Develop visualizations in Excel and PowerPoint to illustrate campaign performance data
Partner with internal teams to develop monthly and quarterly reports, trends, insights and recommendations
Assist with the development of a measurement and learning plan including establishing campaign performance benchmarks, goals, and projections
Devise Ad Hoc analyses including but not limited to: ROI analysis, Churn Analysis, Reach/Frequency Analysis, Audience Segmentation
Must Haves:
1+ years of experience in an analytical role
Proficiency in data visualization software (e.g. Tableau) and querying languages like SQL
Ability to QA and troubleshoot data
Familiarity with media measurement and the digital marketing ecosystem
Strong analytical skills with solid foundation in statistical techniques
Desire to look at the bigger picture and translate data into strategy
Powered by JazzHR",4.2,"Assembly
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
142,Jr. Data Analyst,$47k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Meet our professionals


CGI: An employer of choice
Position Description


CGI Federal is looking to hire a Jr. Data Analyst to develop, enhance, and maintain data science capabilities for a government customer in Chantilly, VA.

Required qualifications to be successful in this role


•Due to the nature of this government contract, US Citizenship is required.
•Bachelor's degree
•3+ years of related experience
•Experience with general data analysis tasks identifying, analyzing, and interpreting trends; acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases; filtering and ""cleaning"" data by reviewing reports and performance indicators to locate and correct problems; developing and refining ad hoc reports; and identifying and prioritizing business and information needs
•Familiarity with the AI/ML lifecycle, from ideation and solution concept development, to rapid prototyping and validation in operational environments, and importantly, in the sustainment of AI/ML solutions for CI/CD.

Desired Skills:
•Experience with geospatial data sets a plus.

#CGIFederalJob
#CGIPoly2020

What you can expect from us


Build your career with us.

It is an extraordinary time to be in business. As digital transformation continues to accelerate, CGI is at the center of this changesupporting our clients' digital journeys and offering our professionals exciting career opportunities.

At CGI, our success comes from the talent and commitment of our professionals. As one team, we share the challenges and rewards that come from growing our company, which reinforces our culture of ownership. All of our professionals benefit from the value we collectively create.

Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.

Learn more about CGI atwww.cgi.com.

No unsolicited agency referrals please.

CGI is an equal opportunity employer.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.

CGI provides reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with disabilities. If you need an accommodation to apply for a job in the U.S., please email the CGI U.S. Employment Compliance mailbox atUS_Employment_Compliance@cgi.com. You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested. Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.Please note, this email address is only to be used for those individuals who need an accommodation to apply for a job. Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.

We make it easy to translate military experience and skills! Clickhere to be directed to our site that is dedicated to veterans and transitioning service members.

All CGI offers of employment in the U.S. are contingent upon the ability to successfully complete a background investigation. Background investigation components can vary dependent upon specific assignment and/or level of US government security clearance held.

CGI will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with CGI's legal duty to furnish information.",3.6,"CGI
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
143,Data Analyst,-1,"RGP is a global consulting firm helping some of the most recognized companies in the world work differently. Our success comes from a shared belief in rolling up our sleeves and doing the hard work of solving complex challenges, executing plans and implementing technology to help transform organizations.

Working as a consultant you will be connected to work that matters, putting your expertise to its best use while developing skills for the future. The result is a career defined by you, supported by RGP and built on tangible accomplishments.

As we continue to grow and deepen our impact on organizations around the world, we are looking for the right people to join us on our mission. If you are interested in being part of our team, there are a few things you should know:
We are energized by challenges and the effort needed to solve them.
We like working with people who are positive, adaptable and growth-minded.
We care how work gets accomplished and are deeply invested in the success of our clients and our colleagues.
If this sounds like you, we invite you to read on and learn more.
THE RGP CONSULTING EXPERIENCE
RGP has a unique consulting model that provides opportunities for consultants to work in different ways. Most consultants work in a model where they have the flexibility and autonomy to choose projects aligning to their experience, skills and desired lifestyle. Other opportunities exist in team-based, strategy and solutions work. In all models, you will feel the full support of RGP to assist you in your work and guide you on your chosen path.
PURPOSE OF THE ROLE
As a Data Analyst, you will assist business leaders in making improved business decisions through the analysis of large data sets, creation of comprehensive reports and informed recommendations.

ATTRIBUTES OF CONSULTANTS WITH RGP
Respect for people and opinions and confidently offer your point-of-view with clients and among colleagues
A drive for proactively cultivating relationships with clients and colleagues
Optimism when faced with challenges and complex situations, coupled with the drive to solve client issues
Dedication to continuous improvement and development of your skillset and talents
A strong personal identification with RGPs values loyalty, integrity, focus, enthusiasm, accountability and talent
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE ROLE
Analyze, manipulate, profile and extracts large data sets
Assist with documenting requirements
Build, review and modify data reports
Transfer knowledge to client team members to enable them to be self-sufficient in building and maintaining reports to address future needs
DESIRED EXPERIENCE AND REQUIREMENTS
Bachelors Degree in Finance, Accounting, MIS or other related business discipline required
5 to 10 years of data analysis experience
Strong understanding of financial statements and the interrelationship of the income statement, balance sheet and statement of cash flows, including account reconciliation and financial analysis skills
Excellent interpersonal communication skills
Capable of working independently; a self-starter
Experience with SAP or Oracle software required, including the ability to access reports and data as needed
Intermediate to Advanced Excel skills required, including strong data retrieval and downloading abilities, and proficiency with macros, PowerBI, PowerPivot, etc.
Technical capability in one or more of the following: SQL, Tableau, QlikView, Cognos, ERWin, etc. strongly preferred

Equal Opportunity Employer
RGP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, gender, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, genetic information or veteran status, and encourage all applicants to apply.",4.0,"RGP
4.0","Charlotte, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
144,Data Analyst,-1,"Do you have a Bachelor's Degree in GIS or related field? Are you looking for a new career opportunity in the Detroit area? Luttrell Staffing Group is currently recruiting for Data Analyst.

Job duties and details for Data Analyst:

Responsible for the monitoring and analysis of new construction, including but not limited to LiDAR and aerial photography from all types of sensors (could include aerial, terrestrial and/or static platforms).
Responsible for evaluating Commercial Data Feed, Classifying Construction Projects, Identifying New Projects, Identify Closed/Updated Projects and the scheduling of Pre-Drive Validations.
Support other aspects of advanced Change Management, Production and Acquisition Operations.
Ensure the Change Management Tasks are completed free of gross errors or anomalies.
Temp-to-Hire position.
Pay rate, $20-$24/hr.
Bi-Weekly pay, direct deposit available.

Job requirements for Data Analyst:

Bachelor’s Degree in GIS or related field.
Knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite.
Knowledge in CAD software where layers are often used.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills and ability to work in a team.
Attention to detail and focus on quality.
Ability to organize work and manage multiple priorities.
Capable of working under pressure to meet deadlines in a fast paced, dynamic environment.

Please apply by clicking the link below, then call our office (805) 928-6555. Please send resume to santamaria@Lstaff.com.
For more information on this or other opportunities, text Luttrell to 25000*
""We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, pregnancy, age, national origin, disability status, genetic information, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.""",4.2,"Luttrell Staffing Group
4.2","Detroit, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
145,Lead Data Analyst - Remote,-1,"ABOUT US

Life360 brings families closer with smart tools designed to protect and connect the people who matter most.

Known for first-to-market solutions for modern family challenges, Life360 recently reached #1 in Apple's US App Store's list of free social networking apps. Nearly 1 in 10 US families with kids use Life360 an average of 12 times a day, and global membership is growing exponentially, with over 25 million monthly active users in over 140 countries making Life360 the largest mobile service for families in the world.

This reach gives us the opportunity to do unprecedented good for families through our valued core offerings: advanced location sharing, private messaging, driver monitoring, help alerts, 24/7 roadside assistance, and Crash Detection with emergency response. On average we respond to 1,000 roadside assists and dispatch 200+ ambulances each month to those in need.

Offering both free and paid memberships. In addition, the company has raised over $200 million in equity financing, and recently completed an IPO on the ASX exchange giving our employees the liquidity of a public company with the upside of a private growth stage business.

Life360's rapidly growing team of 150+ employees is headquartered in San Francisco, with offices in San Diego, and Las Vegas.

POSITION SUMMARY

Life360 is looking for a savvy Lead Data Analyst to join our growing Data and Analytics and Data Science (DAS) team. As a senior member of the team, you will partner with business leaders to distill a thoughtful analytic strategy and roadmap to fuel business insights, understand performance drivers, find new growth opportunities, and create incremental value for the organization. The candidate will leverage their analytic and technical talents and our unique dataset of geolocation, mobile application, and transaction data to help answer key business driver and product efficacy questions and deliver analytic programs and strategic insights projects.

The ideal candidate has a passion for fueling the business with meaningful data driven insights and distilling results into a compelling narrative. Utilizing a blend of product strategy, technical data skills, and analytics techniques, the candidate should be able to answer a range of business questions and present the insights in a concise and effective manner. The candidate must bring a blend of consulting, collaboration, technical aptitude, leadership, programming skills, as well as business skills to be effective in this role.

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES
Build a holistic understanding of our product, customers, data, product and business goals to create and deliver an analytics and data roadmap.
Analyze and deliver insights and recommendations utilizing complex, large volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources using a variety of tools and data analysis techniques.
Understand business drivers and performance trends as well as answer product and business questions to drive product actions.
Leverage industry best practices in establishing repeatable Business Intelligence capabilities and experiences.
Proactively foster and drive a data driven analytics culture.
Look for new opportunities to leverage data assets in innovative ways
Be an analytics thought leader and evangelist to create and drive the Life360 Data and Analytics brand both internally and externally.
EXPERIENCE/QUALIFICATIONS
7+ years of data analytics experience (Consumer internet, mobile app, or digital product experience preferred)
3+ Years in data and analytics consultative capacity as an engagement and delivery lead role.
Demonstrated experience in program and project delivery evolving translation of strategic business and product questions into a successful data and analytics roadmap.
Strong hands on technical Big Data SQL, Python / R or equivalent data wrangling and reporting experience with multi-billion daily row volume data sets.
Proven experience in delivering enterprise Data and Business Intelligence projects (Quicksight, Tableau, Qlick, Looker, or equivalent)
Ability to articulate vision, requirements & benefits, providing solid recommendations and rationale to business partners
Keen grasp of statistical concepts (confidence intervals, hypothesis testing, regression models)
Proven hands on expertise in leveraging big data and cloud database technologies (AWS, Athena, Redshift, Snowflake, Hive, Teradata)
Team development and leadership experience preferred
Demonstrated project management and organizational skills.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Information Systems or another quantitative field.
PERKS
Fridays are Work From Home days at Life360
Competitive pay and benefits
Free snacks, drinks, and food in the office
Health, dental and vision insurance plans
401k plan
$200/month Quality of Life perk
A great office with plenty of light in the heart of the SOMA district in beautiful San Francisco
Whatever makes you stronger makes us stronger. We buy you the things you need to improve yourself and get your job done.
We are looking for candidates with a diverse background that will compliment the skills and backgrounds of the current team. If you don't fit all the criteria below please apply anyway as this list is more of a preference rather than a rule. Our priority is for a well rounded team that delivers results.

#LI-Remote",3.9,"Life360
3.9",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
146,Material Master Data Analyst,$40k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Material Master Data Analyst will be responsible for maintaining the SAP Material Master Data module in SAP for Sabert's North American Operations. The focus of this role is to effectively manage the SAP materials data originating from Marketing, New Product Development, Manufacturing and Procurement groups that require creation and changes to support the Order to Delivery process.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Responsible for executing the end-to-end Material Master Data process. Responsible for coordinating with all process areas to ensure the end-to-end completeness, accuracy and quality of the Material Master Data, which supports supply chain and plant production processes

• Collaborate with NPD, Marketing, Purchasing, Accounting, Production, Planning, Customer Service and Quality to provide timely release and implementation of new and changed Material Master Data

• Bill of Materials and Routing Maintenance

• Create BOM's and Routings as needed per planning

• Create semi-finished sku's for Work In Process in order to put product into inventory as needed by production department

• Perform monthly data audits of weight, cube, pallet configurations and costing

• Extend SKUs to different sales channels in SAP as needed by Customer Service

• Provide to and/or train sales and marketing teams to obtain product specifications as required

• Manage our UPC database

Packaging Design

• Assist with box size / pallet configuration determination on new and existing products

• Manage box specifications in SAP

• Manage print plate inventory with corrugate vendors; order new print plates and send required information to vendors for artwork creation as needed

• Manage labeling database and label formats and troubleshoot any Easy label software issues

Project Support

• Create ad-hoc reports for the supply chain team

• Handle other projects or assignments as needed

Required Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:

• Understanding of integrated supply chain processes

• Collaborative and interpersonal skills

• Analytical and problem-solving skills

• Able to work independently and within a team environment

• Proficient in Microsoft Office, with expertise in Excel and Access

• Knowledge of SAP, product change control

• B.S. in Industrial Engineering or equivalent/related field

• 0 - 2+ years of experience in a Supply Chain role

Summary

Pay, benefits and more.

Sabert is eager to attract the best, so we offer competitive compensation and a generous benefits package, including full health insurance (medical, dental and vision), 401(k), life insurance, disability and more.

About Sabert:

We are a leading global manufacturer of innovative food packaging products and solutions. Our company was founded in 1983 on a single mission: to enhance and advance the way people enjoy food . Today we design, manufacture and distribute a wide spectrum of packaging solutions for food distributors, restaurants & caterers, grocery stores, national food chains and consumer entertaining.",4.2,"Sabert
4.2","Sayreville, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
147,Data Analyst,-1,"Must speak Mandarin!

Premier Logic is currently seeking a Data Analyst for an exciting role with a top Accounting Advisory company- this position can be done remotely!

Opportunity to work for a great company utilizing business transformation, data analytics & automation.We are looking for someone that has a background in investigations, disputes (litigation, regulatory actions, etc.), or other legal-related consulting. You will be performing on-site data modeling, data migration, writing technical documentation and workflow optimization. Experience in forensics and fraud is a plus.

Must have a strong knowledge and experience in SQL analysis, especially using Microsoft SQL Server.

We prefer candidates who speak Mandarin but would also strongly consider candidates who don't speak Mandarin.

If you are interested in this exciting opportunity- please send me your resume to sarah.groff@premierlogic.com

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.4,"Premier Logic
3.4",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Unknown,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
148,Data Analyst,-1,"Optimove is the Science-First Relationship Marketing Hub. Were obsessed with what drives customer behavior and strive to provide our clients the solution to foster long-lasting customer relationships.
The Data Analyst position is the perfect role for an entry-level engineer whos looking to get their feet wet in the world of data science. You report to the Director of Data Science and interface directly with clients data science teams across business verticals. Your core responsibilities involve playing an active role in collaborating with internal teams to construct Optimoves tailored predictive models for our clients. The ideal candidate is a SQL whiz with a strong work ethic, robust analytical and technical capabilities and highly effective time management skills. We are looking for a master multi-tasker that thrives in challenging, fast-paced environments with agility and ease. The Data Analyst is an integral part of the Analytics team and the position is one that brings with it an excellent opportunity to learn and grow within a rapidly expanding company.
Responsibilities:
Conducting consumer data research and analytics
Working with customer-centric algorithm models and tailoring them to each customer as required
Presenting complexed analysis to clients
Extracting actionable insights from large databases



Requirements:
B.Sc in Engineering, Computer Science, Data Science, or similar major
Experience or undergraduate courses focused on SQL and Excel
Exceptional work ethic with outstanding technical skills
Ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously
Strong communication skills
Please note that we are unable to provide sponsorship for this position
Optimove is an equal opportunity employer. Two thirds of our managers were promoted from within. If youre looking to develop your career, get acknowledged for your efforts, and work with dedicated people who love what they do, youve come to the right place.",3.7,"Optimove
3.7","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
149,Data Analyst,-1,"Accountemps is working with a local pharmaceutical company who is in need of a transportation coordinator with strong microsoft excel skills and logistic/transportation background. the ideal candidate will use a TMS system to analyze data from BOL/Shipping Labels/All carrier documentation/Tracking Tracing. Use the data to format into spreadsheets. This client really needs someone who has import/export experience as well as domestic and international shipping experience. The use of Pivot tables and VLookups are required to be successful in this role.

Import Customer Service, Import Export, Export - Import Documents, Export Shipments, WMS System, International Shipments, Tariffs, Excel Formulas, Excel Formulas, Microsoft Excel, Pivot Table, VLOOKUP, Analytical Reasoning, Analytical Skills

Accountemps, a Robert Half Company, matches highly skilled professionals with accounting finance jobs on a temporary and temporary-to-hire basis. From accounting clerks and bookeepers to accounts payable and staff accountants, we provide you with access to exciting career opportunities. Our personalized approach, innovative matching technology and global network with local market expertise help you find the legal opportunities that match your skills and priorities — fast. By working with us, you have access to challenging opportunities, competitive compensation and benefits, and training to enhance your skill sets.

From philanthropy to environmental stewardship to employee programs, Robert Half is proud to have an active role in the communities in which we live and work. Our company has appeared on FORTUNE’s “Most Admired Companies” list every year since 1998.

Download our mobile app to take your job search on the go!

Contact your local Accountemps office at 888.490.3195 or visit www.roberthalf.com/jobs/accountemps to apply for this job now or find out more about other job opportunities.

All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States. All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.

© 2020 Accountemps. An Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Veterans

By clicking 'Apply Now' you are agreeing to Robert Half Terms of Use .",3.6,"Robert Half
3.6","Memphis, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1948,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
150,Data Analyst,$40k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"Published Job Title:
Data Analyst - Service Operations

Location:
BRKFD-Brookfield

Position:
MAF006-Data Analyst

Job Summary::

Milwaukee Tool's service experience is a customer expectation and a competitive advantage. As Service grows larger and faster and is more data-driven, we are seeking a Data Analyst to support our operations and innovations.

This position will be tightly integrated with all operational and commercial aspects of Service, as well as its support functions like Finance, Supply Chain, and others. In addition to creating and deploying ""single source of truth"" analytics, this role will use its knowledge of the Service business and operations to accurately articulate past and present performance, project future activities and results, identify new business and operational opportunities, and provide early warning of issues or concerns. As such, we want a Data Analyst who is business savvy, detail oriented, entrepreneurial, and who won't allow the status-quo to impede on innovation.

The ideal candidate will be able to demonstrate experience in:
Effectively communicating and interacting with business and technical personnel in evaluating and solving complex business problems.
Reviewing historical results and trends, current performance, and future projections and forecasts to develop clear, accurate, and repeatable business models.
Analyzing and researching opportunities for improvement, and clearly documenting action steps for desired change.
Interacting with multiple locations, business units, and cross-functional teams to drive consistency and standardization across the enterprise.
Leveraging both new and existing technologies to create reports, dashboards, scorecards, and visualizations that clearly measure KPIs. Teaching end-users how to interpret and use to maximum effect.
Working with the end users to understand requirements, formulate use cases, and translate needs into effective solutions.
Education and experience requirements:
Requires a Bachelor's Degree in mathematics, statistics, computer/data science, supply chain, or economics.
Minimum 1 years' experience working with data warehouses, data visualization techniques, & BI development tools.
Experience working in service or manufacturing environments is preferred.
Expert-level knowledge of Microsoft Suite, including Excel, VBA, & PowerPivot.
Advanced-level knowledge of SQL Server and relational data.
Experience with programming and computing languages; Power BI & R preferred.
Functional knowledge of corporate finances.
Oral and written communication skills for presentations to all levels of plant and management teams.
Occasional travel will be required, up to 10%-15%. Travel is generally domestic and short durations. Destinations can include Milwaukee Tool facilities as well as customer and supplier locations
Minimum Requirements::

Shift::
1st Shift

Full/Part Time:
Full-time

Pay Range::",4.6,"Milwaukee Tool
4.6","Brookfield, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1924,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
151,Data Analyst,$46k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"About adMarketplace
With 20 years of search marketing expertise our goal is to add value to every search. On the simplest level we are the largest consumer search technology platform outside of Google and Bing. adMarketplace delivers incremental search traffic across native channels, including mobile apps, consumer sites, and browsers. Our technology enables audiences to skip search results pages and navigate directly to trusted sites in moments of intent. As well as driving incremental reach we are also market leaders in terms of privacy and performance.

The Role
We have a fantastic opportunity for a Data Analyst to join our growing team. The right person will be a champion of big data who can extrapolate big ideas from data analysis. You will support key projects to deliver scalable solutions that tackle our biggest business challenges.

What You'll Do:
Synthesize raw data into actionable insights to drive business results, identify key trends and opportunities for business teams and report the findings in a simple, compelling way
Develop a deep knowledge of data, partner with business leads to provide data sets and ad hoc reporting to solve day-to-day issues or answer key questions from our business teams
Work closely with product analyst team to support data projects of varying degrees of scale
Build reports and dashboards via our new business intelligence platform
Qualifications:
BA/BS degree or equivalent, (Math, Statistics, CS, Engineering background preferred); 1-2 years of relevant experience
Able to organize large data sets to answer critical questions, extrapolate trends, and tell a story
Highly proficient knowledge of Excel (pivot tables, VLOOKUP, formulas, functions)
Experience with SQL and databases
Python and scripting languages is a plus
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Able to understand key business drivers; strong attention to detail combined with an ability to see the big picture
Eagerness to learn and grow professionally
Interest and/or experience in advertising a plus",4.2,"adMarketplace
4.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
152,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description


Job #: 1088965

Apex is looking for a contract to hire Data Analyst in Scottsdale.

Start Date: October 5th

Location: Scottsdale

The candidate doesn’t need lots of experience – would consider recent graduates. It much more important that they have the right attitude. They need to be a “go getter” and a “digger”. “Digger” means when they hit a problem they need to research and dig in and figure out what’s going on (not just give up and go ask for help).

Job Description
Liaison between business & technical team
Liaison between technical & testing teams
Maybe some light SQL work (does not need to have high level SQL)
Great written & verbal communication skills
Ability to create written technical requirements
Ability to triage technical issues and set priorities with Director Enterprise Data
Ability to work across all levels of the organization (from C level to junior Developers)
Scrum a plus
Jira a plus
Confluence a plus
EEO Employer

Apex Systems is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate or allow discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, or related medical conditions), age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, registered domestic partner status, marital status, disability, status as a crime victim, protected veteran status, political affiliation, union membership, or any other characteristic protected by law. Apex will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 844-463-6178.",3.8,"Apex Systems
3.8","Scottsdale, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
153,Data Analyst,-1,"At Propel, our mission is to build modern, respectful, and effective financial tools for low-income Americans. Over 4 million people use our first product, Fresh EBT, to manage government benefits on their EBT card, save money, and earn income. Read more about the impact of Fresh EBT here, here, and here. Now we're expanding further into the financial services space by building new products that help our users manage the other aspects of their financial lives.

As a Data Analyst, you'll play a key role in fulfilling this mission by using data to identify the best opportunities to increase our impact. You'll help us define metrics to evaluate our success, prioritize and drive the analyses to understand how we're tracking against them, and turn the results into compelling recommendations to guide our product and business roadmap.

You'll also play a crucial role in fostering a data and experimentation-driven culture at Propel. You'll make our teams more effective by collaborating cross functionally to ensure the data we need is organized, clean, and reliable, and work closely with our operations team to build queries and dashboards that improve operational efficiency.

Propel is a for-profit software company that holds its social mission at its core. Our investors include Andreessen Horowitz, the Omidyar Network, Kevin Durant, Serena Williams, and Nas.

We are strongly committed to hiring a diverse and multicultural team. We encourage applications from traditionally under-represented backgrounds, including those with direct experience with the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program or other government benefits.

We offer
Immediate opportunity to make an impact
A get-stuff-done and fun and caring culture
Meaningful work and a strong shared sense of mission
Competitive compensation (including equity) and excellent benefits
A dog-friendly office based in Downtown Brooklyn (remote work through at least mid 2021)
What you'll do
Partner with product, engineering, business and other stakeholders to provide compelling insights and recommendations from data
Collaborate with design and research to provide a quantitative lens on our understanding of our users across a variety of topics, ranging from the impact of Covid to their use of financial products
Define metrics that we should be tracking and take ownership over ensuring the right data to power these metrics is clean, available, and well structured by managing database design
Build queries and dashboards to create more visibility into our product and operational health across the company
Lead experimentation by designing A/B tests and other experiments and owning the statistical analysis of their impact
What you have
Strong skills in SQL and Excel
Exposure to Python or R and data science packages
Familiarity with A/B testing, experimentation, and statistical analysis
Excellent communication skills with the ability to synthesize and distill complex information into the right takeaways for different audiences
Strong attention to detail to make sure our data is clean and accurate
Ability to be entirely self-directed when necessary, and generally comfortable with some degree of autonomy",5.0,"Propel
5.0","Brooklyn, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
154,Data Analyst,-1,"Overview

The Data Analyst serves as an analytics specialist in the business, focusing on the management of data from various sources and providing data-driven insights to relevant departments and stakeholders. In this position, the Data Analyst gains exposure to almost all departments of the business, inclusive of data warehousing, client services, marketing, account management, and IT among others. The Data Analyst aids by providing various departments with data analysis, reporting, and dashboard solutions that will enable the achievement of the business’s overall goals.

The role involves the definition and execution of detailed requirements, the analysis of the business’s needs, and the validation of reporting solutions within the business. The role additionally entails working with internal applications in an effort to enable high-quality products/services for the business’s clients leading to customer satisfaction and the ultimate achievement of goals.
Primary Responsibilities

Define and document data and reporting processes.
Identify and validate the appropriate technological solutions for various needs.
Perform analysis for a wide range of requests using data in different formats and from various platforms.
Collaborate with stakeholders and obtain buy-in by providing easy-to-understand explanations of data analysis through reports and visual dashboards that deliver high-value insights.
Execute the production and delivery of reports throughout the organization and to our clients.
Troubleshoot data integrity issues, analyze data for completeness to meet business needs, and propose solutions and recommendations.
Continually analyze the reporting outputs to improve the effectiveness of our deliveries in both accuracy and clarity.
Assist in the definition of enterprise wide data models that drive clarity and ease of use for analysts throughout the organization.
Using Power BI, develop dashboards and reports for both internal and external use.
Articulately and concisely explain the implications of complex data.

Position Requirements

Bachelor’s Degree in related discipline or equivalent experience.
Working knowledge of SQL (Queries, Views, Indexes), SSIS, ETL, data cleansing, and various data visualization tools including Power BI.
Understanding of data modeling, dashboard development, and report design.
Ability to solve intricate business problems using various data analysis techniques.
Attention to detail and with strong data analysis and problem-solving skills.
Ability to function effectively both independently and within a team.
Excellent interpersonal and persuasive oral and written skills.
Physical Requirements

The work is of an intellectual nature. While performing the functions of this job, the employee is required to stand and sit for prolonged periods. Specific vision abilities required include close and medium distance vision and the ability to adjust focus. Must be able to hear normal sounds, distinguish sound as voice and communicate through human speech. This position requires the ability to operate a keyboard, computer mouse, telephone, fax, copier, writing tools, and other standard office equipment. On an occasion, an employee will be asked to lift items weighing up to 35 lbs.

Other Duties

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
We look for the best talent in the business

APPLY NOW
San Diego, CA | Portland, OR | Email us at: jobs@vervent.com",3.2,"Vervent
3.2","Portland, OR",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
155,Data Analyst,$33k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Law360, a LexisNexis company, is an online newswire for business lawyers that covers major litigation, transactions, and regulatory issues. Founded in 2004 and acquired by LexisNexis in 2012, Law360 is a cutting-edge organization and one of the fastest-growing subscription news services in the U.S. Our subscribers include the largest law firms in the U.S. and around the world, in-house counsel at major corporations, and key decision-makers in the government sector.

Law360, a LexisNexis company, is seeking qualified candidates for the position of Data Analyst to join our newsroom.

The Data Analyst will be part of a growing team in our Law360 newsroom, helping to implement surveys and rankings of law firms that support our efforts to report on the legal industry. The Data Analyst will support the accurate, timely, relevant and efficient delivery of that research, and would work collaboratively with editors, reporters and graphic designers to analyze the results of the team’s surveys. The analyst will also work on data management, cleaning and verification. The analyst will employ statistical methods to help improve analyses and data usage. Training will be provided.

Primary Duties/Responsibilities:
Help conduct surveys and interviews.
Help develop the methodologies used in annual reports and rankings from survey data.
Collaborate with editors on research projects, based on surveys and publicly available data.
Help create data visualizations based on surveys and publicly available data.
Participate in drafting and presenting key research findings to reporters and editors.
Combine, clean and verify data from multiple sources.
Help manage our data set. Work with a wide range of stakeholders in Editorial and IT with regard to data management.
Basic Requirements:
1+ years of related experience, including in data management, cleaning, and analysis. Relevant coursework may count toward this experience.
Preferred Requirements:
Previous expertise using quantitative analytical tools.
Advanced Excel skills (e.g., Pivot Tables).
Familiarity with R programming, Tableau and/or Python a plus.
Previous working experience with data visualization techniques. Tableau experience preferred.
Previous experience working with data of varying quality and from varying sources.
Ability to communicate complex ideas to a wide range of audiences.
Legal industry research experience preferred but not required.
A good teammate, collaborator and relationship builder who can also work independently.
RSRLNLP

Law360 offices are located in NYC, Washington DC, and Los Angeles. We offer a casual and flexible work environment, comprehensive benefits (including; medical, dental, generous paid time off, 401(k), tuition reimbursement, and a pre-tax commuter program), and competitive salary.

Portfolio Media Inc.is an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. If a qualified individual with a disability or disabled veteran needs a reasonable accommodation to use or access our online system, that individual should please contact 1.877.734.1938 or accommodations@relx.com.

Please read our Candidate Privacy Policy",3.9,"LexisNexis Legal & Professional
3.9","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1818,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
156,Data Analyst,$55k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

Govplace is seeking an experienced Data Analyst to join our team in Reston, VA to provide unparalleled support to our customer through the Continuous Diagnostic & Mitigation (CDM) Program. The CDM Program is a high-profile, high-visibility, cybersecurity modernization and risk management program where you can contribute innovative solutions and consult with government agencies to enhance their Information Assurance (IA) programs and continuous monitoring capabilities.

Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Lead data analytical evaluation of a large set of data across multiple COTS
Create visualizations and dashboards in Elasticsearch's Kibana web site based on requirements or

customer needs.

Use query languages (KQL/JSON) to find
Lead the technical engagements to assess client business and technical objectives, determine deliverables, evaluate risk and execute projects
Awareness of data reported in cyber security
Understands and improves how data is modeled against the program Logical Data
Ensures that enterprise architects are addressing all data requirements in their respective projects and solutions by reviewing data
Align standards, frameworks and security with overall business and technology
Conduct Design Workshops with multiple
Respond to data call looking for a certain scenario requested by the
Provide reporting and feedback to senior management as
Follow the data across various systems to suggest breakdowns in data
Analyze and Review business requirement shared by the
Create data mapping. Identify any gaps in data mapping and Business Requirements Document and review with business team and close the
Support production deployments by working with the operation team to validate the
Participate in daily agile sprint meetings, set up review meetings, prepare status updates on periodic
When applicable, prepare clear and concise application documentation for business users
Train and support users on the applications and visualizations
Meet professional obligations through efficient work habits such as, meeting deadlines, honoring schedules, coordinating resources and meetings in an effective and timely manner
Experience in both Descriptive Analytic and Diagnostic
Support other duties as

Required Education and Experience:
5+ years of enterprise data analytical experience and using technologies such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI and the like, SQL, and query syntax
Experience with JSON and Unix commands a
3+ years of experience working in and/or dynamic cross-competency teams using a structured project development methodology.
Minimum Education and Certifications – Undergraduate degree or equivalent combination of education and work experience
Experience supporting technical solutions in complex and heterogeneous
Experience remediating data issues, documenting Source to Target Mapping of Data Sources
Experience with conceptual Data Models Creation and Input
Experience with Data Quality Research, Testing, Reporting
Ability to analyze, summarize and characterize large or small data sets with varying degrees of fidelity or quality; ability to identify and explain any insights or patterns within them
Strong expertise in designing, developing, and implementing reports, visualizations and dashboards

Knowledge of database design techniques and advanced SQL and NoSSQL skills
Proven skills in Business Intelligence analysis
Strong detail-orientation and excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Desire to enhance development skills and research alternatives to accomplish tasks and drive innovation
Positive interpersonal and communication skills, including the ability to listen, ask probing questions, and ensure accurate understanding of internal client needs
Ability to function independently and within an agile team
Solid experience in exploratory data analysis and visualization
Experience collaborating with US Government Agencies, state or local governments, or commercial entities to develop IT service program maturity in accordance with Federal IT mandates and best practices. Experience with DHS Continuous Diagnostics and Mitigation (CDM) a plus
Strong experience in ensuring customer satisfaction, problem resolution, and risk management on several medium to large projects
Experience in conducting assessments at an Enterprise by reviewing technical documentations, conducting interviews and workshops to identify gaps and developing a tailored solution is highly desired
Applicants should be able to develop application domain knowledge and provide subject matter expertise as needed over time.

Preferred Qualifications:
Developed data models and the ability to present to senior leadership and the client
Created Visualization using, Kibana. Microsoft Power BI, Tableau
Experience in large data sets and evaluating trends and
Perform root cause analysis on data
Knowledge of data engineering and data science with machine learning a
Experience with Jira

Clearance Requirements:
Candidate is required to be a US citizen (non-dual citizenship) with the ability to obtain DHS Suitability/Entry on Duty (EOD).

Physical Requirements:
Office work, typically sedentary with some movement around the office",3.9,"Govplace
3.9","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
157,Sr Data Analyst (Remote/ Virtual),$49k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"We Are Hiring

Remote Opportunity!

Are you a self starter who is passionate about data trends, investigating and researching solutions? Our Ascension Data Science Institute is looking to add a Sr. Data Analysis to their team! This is a great opportunity to join a growing team with a great culture!

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

Serves as a key resource/SME in collection and analysis of data from multiple sources for the development of reports and statistical information.

Responsibilities:
Compiles analytical and statistical reports as needed.
Formulates, defines and recommends scope and format of reports.
May provide leadership, orientation, training, coaching, and mentoring to staff on how to access reports and interpret the data.
Identifies data trends and makes recommendations for quality improvement.
Parses, validates and scrubs data of widely differing formats.
Analyzes data for business insight.
Initiate action on data requests with team.
What You Will Need

Education:
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required.
Bachelor's or higher strongly preferred.
Work Experience:

3 years of experience preferred in healthcare operations or administration preferred.

Preferred Skills:
1-3 years experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, QlikView, or Microstrategy.
Scripting language experience in Python, R and SQL preferred.
Knowledge of and some experience with Google Cloud Platform preferred.
Experience presenting to high levels of executives.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

This employer participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify links below for more information.

eVerify

Right to Work",3.4,"Ascension
3.4","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
158,Sr. Staff Data Analyst - Marketing Analytics Manager,$86k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart + $ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2500 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart + $ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

We are looking for a Senior Staff Analyst/Marketing Analytics Manager who will work closely with our internal and external business partners in developing data-driven solutions for the organization. In this role, you will be involved in analyzing campaign results, validating assumptions and provide recommendation for future campaigns and product offerings. You will also collaborate with team members in assessing and developing new analytic opportunities within the broader analytics organization

THE ROLE:

Conduct large scale analyses, with ownership through all stages: understand business goals and strategies, formulate the analytic approach, perform data extraction, exploration, and transformation, and translate results into actional items for the business team.
Leverage deep hands-on technical skills to produce analyses in various topics including, but not limited to, customer segmentation, campaign performance, marketing attribution and return on investment/ad spend.
Closely work with business partners on Direct Mail (DM) initiatives to ensure successful execution of campaigns.
Analyze DM campaign results to inform future targeting and optimization decisions
Iterate scoring model and perform model validation to be implemented on DM campaigns
Perform data operations necessary to execute campaigns
Develop methodologies to analyze, understand, and quantify trade-offs in marketing decision making
Interact with multiple functional teams across the organization to identify potential issues, implement solutions, improve throughput, and automate recurring processes.
Collaborate with Advanced Analytics, Data Science, and Data Engineering teams to implement predictive models into various stages of marketing funnels, particularly in adapting modern analytics techniques to offline marketing channels such as direct mail and linear television.

REQUIREMENTS/CHARACTERISTICS:

6+ years of hands-on analytic experience in the financial services industry
Hands-on experience in SQL, Python, R, Excel, and Tableau
Experience with data analytics and statistical modeling concepts such as multivariate regression, segmentation modeling, machine learning, data mining, simulation, optimization, and forecasting
Strong understanding on how the data should be captured, stored and structured in data warehousing environment
An effective cross functional communicator in both written and verbal skills
Ability and willingness to learn in a fast-paced environment and adapt to various situation
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Econometrics or equivalent

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.

Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted a Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday

This is your opportunity to be part of a growing company where dedicated professionals strive to help customers and each other succeed every day. If that sounds exciting, we want to talk to you. Apply today!

Attention Agencies & Search Firms: We do not accept unsolicited candidate resumes or profiles. Please do not reach out to anyone within Freedom Financial Network (FFN) to market your services or candidates. All inquiries should be directed to Talent Acquisition only. We reserve the right to hire any candidates sent unsolicited and will not pay any fees without a contract signed by FFN’s Talent Acquisition leader.",3.4,"Freedom Financial Network
3.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
159,Data Analyst,$60k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Grant Thornton is seeking an Associate to join its Data Management and Analytics (ADTA) service line and take an active role in engagement execution, project management and key business development activities.

Grant Thornton Public Sector helps executives and managers at all levels of government maximize their performance and efficiency in the face of ever tightening budgets and increased demand for services. We give clients creative, cost-effective solutions that enhance their acquisition, financial, human capital, information technology, data analytics, and performance management. For more information, visit grantthornton.com/publicsector.

At Grant Thornton, our professional staff applies traditional, cutting-edge approaches and methods to a variety of analyses. As part of our team, the Associate will utilize various methodologies and models to execute client projects.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES:
Meet or exceed targeted billing hours (utilization).
Assist with business development activities, such as proposals, capture, account teams, whitepapers, conferences, and/or other thought leadership materials.
Develop Information portals (e.g., dashboards) that support business user and executive information needs (e.g., CIO Balanced Scorecard)
Maintain a Performance Metrics Catalogue
Use associated tools and methods (e.g., investment optimization) used in a machine learning/data science setting; and
Support and use Government-provisioned tools associated with business intelligence and analytics (BI&A) (such as Power BI), advanced analytic and data wrangling tools such as SAS, R, and Python
Support and use emerging tools associated with data science/mining and machine learning in a Cloud environment (such as Azure Machine Learning)
Develop a data management and analytics capability and deliver analytic results that, at a minimum, provides data delivery or data analyses associated with the following methods/frameworks: (1) Performance Management Frameworks, Measurement, and Analysis, to include Value Management and Balanced Scorecard Development, (2) Performance Metrics Development, (3) Workforce Analysis and Management, (4) Program Impact Evaluation and Diagnosis, (7) OIT Investment Analytics and Prioritization, (8) Operations Research Analysis, including Soft Methods as well as Quantitative Methods (e.g., Linear Programming, Multi-Criteria Decision Analysis),
Utilize best practices in solution development, which may include concepts such as Scrum, XP, Kanban, and related approaches and shall optimize delivery of products through use and evaluation of the methods.
Guide the partitioning of the analytic solution into smaller tasks that can be solved using an Agile approach to solution delivery
Use the CRISP-DM framework to address core elements of data selection and data cleansing processes
Apply analytic method(s) to the prepared data and calibrate and test as appropriate to evaluate goodness of fit, multicollinearity, normality, heteroscedasticity, and related statistical features.
Use data mining and learning analytic methods, such as regression, clustering, and classification.
Use appropriate simulation and optimization modeling techniques, to include geospatial simulation.
Document and summarize a Data Analytics Deployment Strategy/Plan
Address governance activities, learning and adoption, and the BI Activity Monitoring Processes (e.g., Usage Metrics, Customer/User Satisfaction).
Support monitoring and maintenance of the product and identify means to extend the results from the current to other possible domains

Develop Information portals (e.g., dashboards) that support business user and executive information needs (e.g., CIO Balanced Scorecard)
Maintain a Performance Metrics Catalogue
Use associated tools and methods (e.g., investment optimization) used in a machine learning/data science setting; and
Support and use Government-provisioned tools associated with business intelligence and analytics (BI&A) (such as Power BI), advanced analytic and data wrangling tools such as SAS, R, and Python
Support and use emerging tools associated with data science/mining and machine learning in a Cloud environment (such as Azure Machine Learning)
Develop a data management and analytics capability and deliver analytic results that, at a minimum, provides data delivery or data analyses associated with the following methods/frameworks: (1) Performance Management Frameworks, Measurement, and Analysis, to include Value Management and Balanced Scorecard Development, (2) Performance Metrics Development, (3) Workforce Analysis and Management, (4) Program Impact Evaluation and Diagnosis, (7) OIT Investment Analytics and Prioritization, (8) Operations Research Analysis, including Soft Methods as well as Quantitative Methods (e.g., Linear Programming, Multi-Criteria Decision Analysis),
Utilize best practices in solution development, which may include concepts such as Scrum, XP, Kanban, and related approaches and shall optimize delivery of products through use and evaluation of the methods.
Guide the partitioning of the analytic solution into smaller tasks that can be solved using an Agile approach to solution delivery
Use the CRISP-DM framework to address core elements of data selection and data cleansing processes
Apply analytic method(s) to the prepared data and calibrate and test as appropriate to evaluate goodness of fit, multicollinearity, normality, heteroscedasticity, and related statistical features.
Use data mining and learning analytic methods, such as regression, clustering, and classification.
Use appropriate simulation and optimization modeling techniques, to include geospatial simulation.
Document and summarize a Data Analytics Deployment Strategy/Plan
Address governance activities, learning and adoption, and the BI Activity Monitoring Processes (e.g., Usage Metrics, Customer/User Satisfaction).
Support monitoring and maintenance of the product and identify means to extend the results from the current to other possible domains

Bachelor’s Degree required from an accredited college or university in a related field.
Ability to obtain and maintain certain job-related certifications if no job-related advanced degrees.
U.S. citizenship may be required. Ability to work in the United States indefinitely required.
Travel may be required.
Ability to work overtime required on occasion.
Ability to sit in an office environment for long periods of time.
Ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance.
Ability to communicate clearly in writing and verbally.
Ability to obtain and maintain firm independence and abide by firm ethics requirements.
Meet or exceed continuing professional education (CPE) requirements.

Grant Thornton Public Sector LLC (“Grant Thornton Public Sector”), based in Arlington, VA, is a global management consulting business with the mission of providing responsive and innovative financial, performance management and systems solutions to governments and international organizations. Visit Grant Thornton’s Public Sector at www.grantthornton.com/publicsector.

It is Grant Thornton’s policy to promote equal employment opportunities. All personnel decisions, including, but not limited to, recruiting, hiring, training, promotion, compensation, benefits and termination, are made without regard to race, creed, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, citizenship status, veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.",3.7,"Grant Thornton
3.7","Arlington, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1924,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
160,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Every day, Global Payments makes it possible for millions of people to move money between buyers and sellers using our payments solutions for credit, debit, prepaid and merchant services. Our worldwide team helps over 3 million companies, more than 1,300 financial institutions and over 600 million cardholders grow with confidence and achieve amazing results. We are driven by our passion for success and we are proud to deliver best-in-class payment technology and software solutions. Join our dynamic team and make your mark on the payments technology landscape of tomorrow.

Global Payments is the parent company for TSYS, Netspend, Heartland, TouchNet, OpenEdge, Xenial, Greater Giving, ACTIVE Network, and AdvancedMD. Headquartered in Georgia with over 24,000 employees worldwide, Global Payments is a member of the S&P 500 with worldwide reach spanning over 100 countries throughout North America, Europe, Asia Pacific and Latin America. For more information, visit globalpaymentsinc.com and follow Global Payments on Twitter (@globalpayments), LinkedIn and Facebook.

The Senior Data Analyst works in a global contact center environment and reports to the Director of Operations. We are looking for a data driven individual who can identify data in available resources, create summary analysis, and recommend improvements to Customer Service performance. This role is responsible for the development, delivery and maintenance of reporting to support operational objectives. They will liaison with other internal functional groups to make data driven decisions.

Responsibilities

Manage the department data infrastructure inclusive of data-warehousing, reporting, and analytics platforms.
Develop and provide standard and ad hoc reporting to internal NetSpend teams to monitor operational measures and service levels.
Identify opportunities for cost reduction or efficiency gains through operational improvement, technology enhancements & process elimination.
Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Locate and quantify new process improvement opportunities.

Skills/Education/Experience

3+ years’ experience in data analyst role.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Advanced SQL knowledge and ability to write complex SQL freehand and understand complex legacy SQL.
Experience using Excel to create reporting for leadership. This is not just providing data, but providing analysis and understanding of data.
Solid understanding of data modeling principles.
Experience with shell scripting languages such as PowerShell.
Experience with data visualization platforms (QlikSense experience a plus).
Familiarity with Atlassian Jira and Confluence.
Contact Center Operations experience a plus.
Experience interfacing with internal business partners.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Works well in cross-functional teams.
Bachelor’s Degree Preferred.
As provided in Netspend's Background Check policy, eligible candidates may be subject to drug, criminal history, and credit checks, which will be conducted and used in accordance with applicable local, state, and federal laws.

Not Ready to Apply? Join Our Talent Community!!

US Applicants:
TSYS is an equal opportunity employer (EOE) committed to employing a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture.",3.0,"TSYS
3.0",Texas,-1,10000+ Employees,1983,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
161,Alteryx Data Analyst - Contractor,-1,"At Vaco, we connect professionals with excellent career growth opportunities!

As an Altreryx Data Analyst, you will be responsible for being a poweruser of the system and helping the automation and systems teams by evaluating needs, determining appropriate processes for efficient use of the system and executing on those needs for each division of the organization. You will also ensure the integrity of such data and will generate reports that verify and document their accuracy.

Responsibilities of the Data Analyst role include:

Design and develop workflows and datasets
Determine specifications and document workflow needs and processes.
Compiling data and analyzing results
Preparing and distributing reports
Ensuring data integrity
Developing and producing reports utilized in measuring data accuracy
Assisting in the completion of appropriate client set-up and maintenance forms
Supporting internal and external users
Generating custom reports for internal and external clients
Work alongside data analysts and end users to analyze output, automation efforts and solving questions/issues through integration
MUST BE A POWERUSER OF ALTERYX!",3.4,"Vaco
3.4","Greensboro, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
162,Business Data Analyst,$47k-$52k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB SUMMARY: The Business Data Analyst, assigned to a specific client, is responsible for the process of inspecting, cleaning, validating, transforming and modeling data with the goal of discovering useful information, suggesting conclusions and supporting decision making focused on growth. The Analyst is responsible for monitoring all-source of data information to proactively identify risks and threats that could impact the company's people, assets and reputation.

Essential Functions:

The functions listed describe the business purpose of this job. Specific duties or tasks may vary and be documented separately. The employee might not be required to perform all functions listed. Additional duties may be assigned, and functions may be modified, according to business necessity.
All assigned duties or tasks are deemed to be part of the essential functions, unless such duties or tasks are unrelated to the functions listed, in which case they are deemed to be other (non-essential) functions.
Employees are held accountable for successful job performance. Job performance standards may be documented separately, and may include functions, objectives, duties or tasks not specifically listed herein.
In performing functions, duties or tasks, employees are required to know and follow safe work practices, and to be aware of company policies and procedures related to job safety, including safety rules and regulations. Employees are required to notify superiors upon becoming aware of unsafe working conditions.
All functions, duties or tasks are to be carried out in an honest, ethical and professional manner, and to be performed in conformance with applicable company policies and procedures. In the event of uncertainty or lack of knowledge of company policies and procedures, employees are required to request clarification or explanations from superiors or authorized company representatives.
The Essential Functions Include:
Represent Pinkerton's core values of integrity, vigilance, and excellence.
Create and present metric reports for the designated region and/or function.
Conduct data analysis to examine data sets to draw conclusions about the information contained therein.
Ensure data integrity and reliability by implementing processes that produces consistent results.
Perform periodic data reviews, gap analysis and formulate process improvement plans.
Lead and support data driven projects including;
Data entry.
Database case management audits.
Data and gap analysis.
Database query configuration.
Provide business data analysis and identify technical solutions to challenges that impact the business.
Handle approved requests for data audits, metrics and report generation.
Manage and oversee BI Dashboard activities, projects, requests and tasks and escalate issues as needed.
Draft data queries, reports and metrics and obtain approvals prior to publishing.
Provide support to the manager in overall database case management process, procedures, budgets and contracts.
Utilize structured analytic techniques to develop tailored data products.
Gather and analyze data to facilitate improvement in the methodologies, tools and techniques to enable the team to scale and optimize operations to mitigate potential risk.
All other duties, as assigned.
Minimum Hiring Standards:
Additional qualifications may be specified and receive preference, depending upon the nature of the position.
Must have a High School Diploma or GED.
Must be willing to participate in the Company's pre-employment screening process including drug testing and background investigation.
Must be at least 18 years of age.
Must have a reliable means of communication (i.e., email, cell phone).
Must have a reliable means of transportation (public or private).
Must have the legal right to work in the United States.
Must have the ability to speak, read, and write English.
Education/Experience:
Bachelor's degree and at least five years of experience in visual and graphic design, SQL, Python, or other data analytics programs or an equivalent combination of education and experience sufficient to perform the essential functions of the job, as determined by the company.

Competencies (As Demonstrated Through Experience, Training, and/or Testing):
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Able to carry out responsibilities with little or no supervision.
Attentive to details and accuracy.
Able to work in a fast-paced environment under multiple deadlines and competing priorities.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Able to analyze complex situations and recommend solutions.
Serve as an effective team member.
Strong project management and budgeting skills.
Computer skills; Microsoft Office, SQL, Python, Jupyter.
Working Conditions (Physical/Mental Demands):

With or without reasonable accommodation, requires the physical and mental capacity to perform effectively all essential functions. In addition to other demands, the demands of the job include:
Must undergo and meet company standards for background and reference checks, drug testing, and behavioral selection survey.
Maintain composure in dealing with authorities, executives, clients, staff, and the public occasionally under conditions of urgency and in pressure situations.
Exposure to sensitive and confidential information.
Regular computer usage.
Ability to handle multiple tasks concurrently.
Must be able to see, hear, speak, and write clearly in order to communicate with employees and/or customers.
Manual dexterity required for occasional reaching and lifting of small objects and operating office equipment.
Close and distance vision and ability to adjust focus.
Evenings and weekends, as required, to ensure the successful completion of work assignments.
Travel, as required.
Pinkerton is an equal opportunity employer and provides equal opportunity to all applicants for all positions without regard to race/ethnicity, color, national origin, ancestry, sex/gender, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, marital/prenatal status, pregnancy/childbirth or related conditions, religion, creed, age, disability, genetic information, veteran status or any protected status by local, state, federal or country-specific law.",3.4,"PINKERTON
3.4","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1850,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
163,Data Analyst,$48k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Provide Data Analysis and Management for Hemophilia and Sickle Cell grants.-Provide data management for Hemophilia grant by: entering weekly stats from nursing and social worker, entering patient data into Clinical Manager database, and other hemophilia databases or programs -Provide data management for sickle cell grant by: setting up and maintain database for sickle cell program and entering all nursing and community outreach workers stats on a weekly basis. Provide reports as needed. Enter data on quality improvement projects for Federal Sickle Cell Grant. -The Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting quality improvement efforts, IRB applications, and collecting and submitting data required for program evaluation by the regional collaborative and HRSA for the Federal Sickle Cell Grant. (S) He will attend an annual webinar through the duration of the grant. -The Data Analyst will be responsible for development and maintenance of data capture and data entry tools; data collection; data entry; and preparation of reports, as required-Review database and verifies information in order to ensure accuracy and consistency of reports -Compiles and analyzes information from standardized reports on a monthly/quarterly basis as necessary. -Reports to program manager of sickle cell/hemophilia programs and principal investigator. Prepares reports and analyzes data with PI and program manager. -Provide data management for clinical trials and research projects by entering data and submitting to company/coordinating center as per the protocol. Review database and verifies information in order to ensure accuracy and consistency of reports. Responsible for ensuring integrity of information reported for all sickle cell and hemophilia grant reports Experience in Excel, Access and Microsoft Office required. Experience with database set up management required. Experience with analysis of data required. Experience in a health care setting preferred. Experience abstracting data from Electronic Medical Records. Attention to detail and ability to track and organize multiple projects.RWJBarnabas Health is an",3.6,"RWJBarnabas Health
3.6","Newark, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1982,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
164,Data Analyst,-1,"This is an entry level role for candidates with 1-3 years experience.

Responsibilities:
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Work with the quality team to identify key reporting metrics, and current database sources
Working with SQL and writing SQL reports
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Other duties as assigned.
Preferred Skills:
Bachelors Degree
0-3 years experience as a Data Analyst
Experience with Qlik, Tableau and SSRS
Powered by JazzHR",4.0,"Latitude, Inc.
4.0","Towson, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
165,Data Analyst,$37k-$64k (Glassdoor Est.),"Posting Information

Position Type Permanent Staff (EHRA NF)
Department Social Medicine-424901
Working Title Data Analyst
Appointment Type EHRA Non-Faculty
Position Posting Category Information Technology
Salary Range $51,500-$70,000
Full Time/Part Time? Full-Time Permanent
Hours per Week 40
Vacancy ID NF0004593
Position ID 20037318
Posting Open Date 10/19/2020
Application Deadline 11/02/2020
Open Until Filled No
Proposed Start Date 11/30/2020
Position Summary

The COVID-19 virus (SARS-CoV-2) is especially devastating for those who are housed or work in criminal justice settings due to restricted access to sanitizing supplies and personal protective equipment, close congregant living conditions, and exposure to correctional staff who unknowingly transmit the infection from the community. These populations are also more likely to experience severe and life-threatening symptoms of COVID-19, due to higher rates of underlying medical conditions.

This position is funded by an NIH funded RADx-UP grant, which aims to increased access to COVID-19 testing among historically marginalized and underserved populations.

The hired candidate will join an interdisciplinary research team, led by Dr. Lauren Brinkley-Rubinstein, that will investigate, develop, and implement long-term COVID-19 testing strategies among incarcerated populations and correctional staff in diverse criminal justice settings across the country.

The hired candidate will have experience in computer science and web scraping (experience with Python, R, etc.) who is also able to manage data sets and provide analyses, as needed. Their job activities would be to help make the COVID Prison Project (which is getting support from the RADx) more sustainable through improved web scraping functionality, helping build out the CPP website as needed, providing support around the data management of the RADx, and assist with analyses and data visualizations for external partners to digest the data more easily.

This position provides informatics expertise to facilitate design, development, and provisioning of research datasets tailored to individual study needs. The position will perform hands-on data mining using graphical user interface (GUI) tools (i2b2/SHRINE, PopMedNet, CLARK, SAS, SAP Business Objects, et cetera) and SQL to extract aggregate and patient-level datasets to meet study requirements, provision datasets to requesters, provide consultation and help sessions to requesters, and assist with regulatory matters as they relate to PHI data.

This position will interface with workgroup teams, project management staff, governance committees, and others on a regular basis. This position will also be responsible for attending webinars and conference calls, as well as offering consultations, recommendations, and basic training to internal and external faculty and other stakeholders.
Educational Requirements

Master’s or Bachelor’s degree and 0-2 years’ experience
or will accept a combination of related education and experience in substitution.
Degree or coursework in Clinical or Biomedical Informatics strongly preferred.
Qualifications and Experience

-Preference for the selected candidate to have a master’s degree in computer, business, math/science related curriculum. A certificate and/or degree in clinical informatics is highly preferred. Minimum of 1 year of experience working with database systems and data mining.
Proven understanding of security and regulatory requirements surrounding protected health information (PHI).
Understanding of clinical research study design and methodologies.
Basic knowledge of SQL is preferred, as well as experience with GUI data mining tools such as i2b2 and/or SAP Business Objects.
Ability to maintain a high degree of accuracy and professionalism with strong attention to detail.
Excellent written and oral interpersonal communication skills.
Proven ability to work in a team environment.
Equal Opportunity Employer

The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, color, disability, gender, gender expression, gender identity, genetic information, national origin, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, or status as a protected veteran.
Special Instructions
Quick Link http://unc.peopleadmin.com/postings/184618

Department Contact Name and Title Sarah Morgan - Research Project Manager
Department Contact Telephone or Email numberbe@email.unc.edu
Office of Human Resources Contact Information

If you experience any problems accessing the system or have questions about the application process, please contact the Office of Human Resources at (919) 843-2300 or send an email to employment@unc.edu
Please note: The Office of Human Resources will not be able to provide specific updates regarding position or application status.

Applicant Documents

Required Documents
Curriculum Vitae / Resume
Cover Letter
List of References
Optional Documents

Supplemental Questions

Required fields are indicated with an asterisk (*).
*
Please select the response below that describes your level of education that best or mostly closely satisfies the education requirements for this position.
Bachelor’s degree in required discipline(s) listed or related field
Bachelor's degree in any field/discipline
Master's degree or Doctorate degree in required discipline(s) listed or related field
Master's degree or Doctorate degree in any field/discipline
None of the above
Describe any experiences you have had working with persons affected by the criminal justice system.

(Open Ended Question)
Describe what excellent communication skills means to you.

(Open Ended Question)
Do you have experience working with large data sets? Please describe.

(Open Ended Question)",3.8,"UNC Health Care
3.8","Chapel Hill, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
166,Data Analyst,$74k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Data Analyst

The Data Analyst will utilize analysis and visualization software to assist various engineering groups with evaluation of Semiconductor Wafer Foundry, Assembly, and Wafer Sort and Final Test data for New Products introduction and sustaining products support and business needs.

Responsibilities:
Generating yield reports, TC analysis reports of initial product lots, parametric analysis reports, and data analyses to enhance new product introductions.
Generating engineering reports based on testing and characterization of products in support of ongoing wafer facility management as well as a wafer facility transfers.
Interactively manage and enhance a suite of analysis templates as well as generated new templates upon demand and business needs.
Generation and support of analysis for Operations Support.
Performing other duties upon request
Qualifications:
S. in Electrical Engineering or Computer Science/ Engineering or an equivalent technical discipline is required
Knowledge of R, S, or Python is desirable.
Knowledge of Tibco Spotfire or another semiconductor yield analysis software package is desired.
Knowledge of database structures, big data analysis, and a sound fundamental understanding of statistics is desirable.
Ability to work independently is required.
2-5 years of experience in production/engineering data analysis is desirable.
5+ years of experience in the semiconductor industry is preferred but a suitable new graduate should apply.
Candidates with electronics manufacturing experience are preferred
Clear written and verbal communication skills in English are required",3.6,"Power Integrations
3.6","San Jose, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1988,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
167,Data Analyst,$77k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"Taos is looking for an experienced Data Analyst to help us support an enterprise video communications client .
What you'll be doing
Working as a Data Analyst within the Trust and Safety group of a large video communications company
Use data to identify trends, conduct root cause analysis and suggest potential opportunities for process improvements
Set, monitor, and maintain the key quality and abuse metrics, and identify the issues in product, engineering, and operations
Develop metrics to evaluate risks of service and effectiveness of safety programs
Conceptualize, develop and maintain dashboards for risk detection and monitoring
Devise data-driven strategies to proactively identify, detect, and mitigate risks to our users and propose possible improvements to prevent it from happening again
Work on data association, clustering, segmentation, filtering, and estimation
Strong storytelling: distill interesting and hard-to-find insights into a compelling story
What you'll bring with you
2+ years as a Data Analyst
Solid SQL Programming skills.
Demonstrated coding and programming abilities is other languages is a plus
Strong metrics management / dashboarding experience is a plus
Strong communication and organizational skills
Self-driven with the ability to work in a self-guided manner
Who is Taos?
Taos helps today’s enterprises and rapidly growing businesses harness the power of the cloud and DevOps with digital transformation and optimization solutions. From Executive Leadership to our delivery teams, Taos listens, understands, and delivers best-in-class work. Our deep technical expertise and solutions-driven approach help address our client’s biggest business challenges and opportunities. As a Global Leader of Cloud and DevOps, Taos continues to solve What’s Next.
Talent at our Core®
Taos Consultants are adaptable problem-solvers, growth-minded doers, and lifelong learners.
Thanks to this mindset, we have helped thousands of clients achieve their goals and solve their challenges. From Cloud Architects to Security Analysts to DevOps Engineers, Taos is always seeking the best and brightest technical talent. Joining Taos gives you the opportunity to work with national enterprises and innovative Silicon Valley companies. Our model provides the support and benefits of full-time employment while giving you exposure to a variety of environments and technologies to sharpen your skills and deepen your technical expertise. These advantages combined with competitive benefits, continuous training and education, and a clear career progression path make Taos a great place to work.
Referrals:
We love referrals so much that we pay for them! If you know someone that you would recommend, send an email to referrals@taos.com or Contact Us and we will do the rest! We'll make sure that you receive the $1000 referral bonus after they are employed with us.
Compensation:
Our compensation package includes a competitive salary, medical and dental insurance, 401k, paid vacation, sick time and holiday pay, plus loads of free training (Puppet, Chef, Nagios, LAMP Stack, PMP, ITIL, Python, etc.)!
Equal Opportunity:
Taos Mountain, LLC is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color national origin, sex, age, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with disability.
Veterans are encouraged to apply!
E-Verify Participant:
This employer will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS), with information from each new employee’s Form I-9 to confirm work authorization. Please go to http://www.taos.com/join-our-team/ and review the E-Verify Participant and Right to Work links for more information.

#DICE",4.2,"Taos
4.2","San Jose, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
168,Data Analyst,$44k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

ARE YOU READY TO WORK AT ALTISOURCE?

Are you looking for an opportunity to flex your skills in data analysis?
Do you enjoy solving complex business problems using financial and sales data?
Are you interested in seeing how your work has a direct impact on the business and making recommendations for continuous improvement?

If so, Altisource would love to hear from you! Altisource is seeking a Data Analyst to mine, compile, manipulate and interpret large complex sets of data in order to make important business decisions.

Job Description

WHAT YOU GET TO DO

Use a variety of technologies (SQL Server, Oracle, Visual Studio, Microstrategy, Salesforce) and business data to help LendersOne and the Business Unit
Help maintain database to track and report on key member & corporate metrics to drive retention, improve efficiency, and enhance value to all stakeholders
Use data to run a variety of advanced analytic/risk models that can help drive decision-making for both tactical and strategic purposes including assessments of existing products, new products, member consultation, and process improvement
Participate in the design and implementation of lean reporting processes and initiatives within databases and CRM’s
Collaborate internally as well as build and manage relationships with clients or consultants while sharing insights based on analysis

Qualifications

WHAT ABOUT YOU? You have...

Knowledge in creating SQL queries is highly beneficial. Exposure to Tableau, major databases (Oracle & SQL Server), and CRM’s (Salesforce). Familiarity with SnowFlake and Posman preferred
Background in the mortgage industry strongly preferred, or experience in banking/financial services industries (investments, trusts, portolios, financial assets)
Strong reporting skills in MS Excel (pivot tables, macros, etc.) and MS Access
A highly analytical ability, yet skilled at distilling complex ideas and data into meaningful and actionable business insights
An ability to tell an insightful narrative with data with advanced reporting and/or presentation skills

Additional Information

THE PERKS OF WORKING AT ALTISOURCE

Prosperity:

Competitive base salaries!
401k plans with company matching – we want to empower you to further your career, and prepare for retirement!

Good Health:

Comprehensive Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance plans
Tax-free Flexible Spending Account
Life insurance, short-term, and long-term disability

...And Happiness!

Paid holidays, plus 19 days of accrued PTO for a total of 28 paid days off per year!
Free snacks, drinks and coffee!
Plenty of employee engagement activities including sporting events, happy hours, and other fun team-building activities
Opportunities to join our community service initiatives, including Habitat for Humanity",3.1,"Altisource
3.1","Cleveland, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
169,Data Analyst,-1,"Mackin

Duties:
Familiarity with processes and/or data relevant to corporate real estate, facility operations, or architecture/design, or proven aptitude to quickly learn new domains
Excellent interpersonal skills, with proven success in building relationships and collaborating within a geographically diverse, cross-functional team
Excellent written & verbal communication, with experience communicating technical results to leadership and non-technical audiences;
Strong design-sense, with experience creating mockups or wireframes to illustrate functionality and fit to business requirements
Familiarity with basic concepts in statistics & data science, including regression modeling, forecasting,hypothesis testing.
Collaborate with Facebooks Workplace Design team to gather and refine requirements and identify ways that analytics can improve decision-making and planning.
Complete ad hoc analyses as requested.
Monitor business needs for reporting, data, and advanced analytics solutions and improvements, and coordinate with analytics leads to propose comprehensive solutions within the analytics roadmap.
Evaluate, define, and proactively monitor key metrics for long-term trends and changes.
Identify opportunities to create, organize and standardize core data sets needed for analytics and collaborate with the data engineering team to drive these projects to completion.
Work cross-functionally to build consistency in data definitions and drive data accuracy by monitoring changes to data, investigating data inaccuracies, and proposing scalable fixes as needed.
Skills:
Excellent interpersonal, communication, and presentation skills
Strong time management skills with the ability to work under tight deadlines and respond to leadership requests.
Strong attention to detail, with experience identifying technical requirements and solutions from ambiguous business problems.
Ability to formulate metrics and distill complex analyses into concise findings and recommendations
Strong understanding of data visualization design and visualization best practices.
Experience with data visualization tools such as Excel, Tableau, Shiny.
Proficiency in using SQL-based languages to extract and manipulate data to build datasets for analysis
Education:

Bachelors Degree",3.7,"Mackin
3.7","Menlo Park, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
170,Data Analyst - Community Health,$75k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us


Launched in 2011, Twitch is a global community that comes together each day to create multiplayer entertainment: unique, live, unpredictable experiences created by the interactions of millions. We bring the joy of co-op to everything, from casual gaming to world-class esports to anime marathons, music, and art streams. Twitch also hosts TwitchCon, where we bring everyone together to celebrate, learn, and grow their personal interests and passions. We're always live at Twitch. Stay up to date on all things Twitch on LinkedIn, Twitter and on our Blog.

About the Role


Data is central to Twitch's decision-making process, and analysts play a critical role in informing and evangelizing data-driven decision making across all of our operations. As a Data Analyst at Twitch, you will be responsible for leveling up the understanding and capabilities of stakeholders across your team, enabling them to make better decisions using available data.

As part of the Community Health team at Twitch, you will be on the ground floor with your team, shaping the way we build and refine operational processes, delivering formative insights about the health and safety of our communities, measuring the impact of product improvements and policy changes, and influencing future product design and strategy. In a typical week or month, you will be responsible for instrumentation, dashboard/report-building, metrics reviews, and ad hoc analysis. Your work will pave the way for high-quality, high-velocity decision-making that will lead to safer, more rewarding community interactions across the platform.

The ideal candidate combines deep analytical expertise, experience working with cross-functional product development teams, and a passion for shaping the future of community-driven entertainment. You'll find a Requirements section below. If you meet all of these, then we encourage you to apply. If you meet most of them, and feel that you have a unique perspective or skill-set that can help us to design safer and more rewarding communities, then we encourage you to apply.

You Will:
Design and evaluate A/B tests and experiments to measure the effectiveness of front-end product improvements and algorithmic machine learning systems.
Generate ad-hoc reports and insights that help teams move forward with time-sensitive product and strategy decisions.
Partner with cross-functional teams to define and track team success metrics and make these available through ETL (extract/transform/load) pipelines and reporting dashboards.
Partner across Community Science to conduct foundational analysis informing how we measure and improve the health and safety of communities across Twitch.
Contribute to data infrastructure, best practices for managing data, and a long-term vision of sustainable and thriving data processes.
Maintain a culture of high-quality output and exceptional engagement with stakeholders.
Effectively communicate at all levels, ensure that work gets done well and on time, respond effectively to ad hoc requests and unexpected obstacles, and reallocate resources as necessary.
You Have:


2+ years of industry experience as a data analyst or in a related role, preferably in the consumer internet or gaming space, or working with a high-velocity, high-growth product / business.
Bachelor's degree, or higher, in engineering, math, statistics, data analytics, operations research, or related field or equivalent data analytics experience.
Expert SQL skills -- ability to work adeptly with and contribute to Twitch's data infrastructure.
Comfort with statistical analysis, including A/B testing.
Fluency in data communication and visualization, including metrics reporting, conducting exploratory data analysis, and crafting data-driven reports and visualizations.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Comfort working on occasion with potentially sensitive and/or disturbing content.
Eagerness to shape the development of a growing team and contribute to the design of novel products that shape the community experience for millions of viewers and creators.
Bonus Points
Masters degree (preferred, but not required).
Strong familiarity with Twitch, our creators, and our community.
Knowledge of advanced statistical methods and statistical programming using Python, R, or similar tools.
Experience building aggregates, optimizing data workstreams, maintaining data pipelines, and working with AWS infrastructure.
Familiarity with NLP techniques (e.g. topic modeling, sentiment analysis), particularly involving text corpora composed of short, unstructured text.
Prior experience building end-to-end pipelines for supporting experimentation with machine-learning systems (e.g. recommendations, spam & fraud detection, notifications).
Prior experience working on a Trust & Safety or Community Health team.
Perks
Medical, Dental, Vision & Disability Insurance
401(k)
Maternity & Parental Leave
Flexible PTO
Commuter Benefits
Amazon Employee Discount
Monthly Contribution & Discounts for Wellness Related Activities & Programs (e.g., gym memberships, off-site massages, etc.)
Breakfast, Lunch & Dinner Served Daily
Free Snacks & Beverages
Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at Twitch. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.4,"Twitch
3.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
171,Data Engineer/ Business/ Data Analyst,-1,"Our client is seeking a Data Engineer to join their team. The candidate will act as a business quality resource for online marketing and creative team when testing expertise or scoping is requested across domains

Responsibilities of the Data Engineer:

Attend business operations meetings and appropriate team meetings to discuss planning, strategy, and priorities.
Perform data engineering, development, analysis, reporting, visualization, and working with the business to extract, analyze, translate and document requirements and making technical and non-technical recommendations related to solutions regarding customer experience and content on website, related to category management, merchandising, etc.
Detect and test defects and field problems to the appropriate business teams (i.e. technical, marketing, creative).
Measure and monitor quality data and recommend solutions to improve the site’s performance for internal and external customers.
Analyze category relationships and product content for appropriate information and results.

Requirements of the Data Engineer:

2 – 7 years of relevant data engineering, data analytics experience and capable of working in a BA capacity as well – 50/50 hands on dev/coding, and hands on data stuff and working with the business as a pseudo BA and data analyst.
3+ years of working knowledge of web applications, service-oriented architecture/web services, and client/server technology testing.
Previous experience with Tableau, Google Cloud, Big Query, Standard SQL Syntax, and Python.
Knowledge of web applications and web content.

IND3",3.8,"The Intersect Group
3.8","Houston, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
172,Business Data Analyst,$30k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

The Data Analyst role is responsible for the execution of all sales reporting needs that will drive inside sales initiatives for our dynamic outbound sales team. The teams’ success is linked to the effective, aggressive and detailed reporting and presentation of sales avenues nationwide. This is a data driven role in which analysis will drive company decisions and will provide opportunity for immediate impact on the business’ performance.

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:

Work closely with Lead Generators to ensure mass volume of quality leads are being generated for the entire US market; current and desired future territories
Help form data management and automation of processes within the data team
Assist in the creation of compelling presentations that provide actionable insights and recommendations
Validate the quality and quantity of leads coming in and reconcile with invoices for accuracy
Identify opportunities to improve data and business processes utlizing AQL/Python
Leveraging predictive analytics and advanced statistical techniques to drive strategic thought and decision making
Analyze market trends to proactively identify growing or shrinking markets and determine what factors, sectors, governmental regulations, etc. are causing market changes
Develop detailed, quantitative analyses work associated with developing meaningful insights to business performance
Conduct deep dive analyses of third-party provided data versus new leads to identify potential gaps in coverage and provide recommendations for improving coverage
Evaluate performance of different marketing channels based on operational and financial performance
Work with management in creating and managing the acquisition and marketing budget for the third-party lead sources to ensure spending is efficient and effective
Provide variance and impact analyses of lead generation, cost, revenue and aggregate acquisition performance
Collaborate with members of Sales, Finance, Operations and Accounting departments to ensure maximum benefit from lead generation
Partner with our marketing team to assist in the design and execution of various lead-generation programs across multiple marketing tactics and channels. Spearhead design and recommendations of programs to increase profitability and market growth
Continually analyze sales and marketing effectiveness, identify strategic and tactical opportunities, and make recommendations to further profitability and growth
Socialize and network to build a consensus on best practices for measurement and analysis of sales and marketing

COMPETENCIES – KSA’s

Skilled in Microsoft Office – Word, and PowerPoint with advanced skill level in Excel
Proficient in SQL or ability to become quickly proficient with training
Strong analysis aptitude
Communication proficiency
Understanding of project management principles with history of successful application
Thrives in an individual contributor role that offers autonomy
Ability to utilize logic-based problem solving for impactful recommendations
Demonstrate keen situational awareness within a teamed environment
Keen self-starter that has ability to confidently develop new insights that drive operations strategy and revenue growth in an ambitious environment.
Knowledge of sales cycle form generating leads through the closing of deals
Skilled in the development and presentation of insights and recommendations utilizing clean and concise communication
Must have a high degree of self-motivation with an internal desire to exceed expectations
Strong understanding of unit economics and profitability measures.
Experience in statistical analysis utilized to interpret and verify data
Strong attention to detail
Intellectual curiosity towards research with strong organizational and time management skills
Strong understanding of unit economics and profitability measures.

REQUIRED EXPERIENCE:

Minimum Education: Bachelor’s degree in statistics, math, computer science or other technical related field

Minimum Experience: 2+ years' experience in technical data analysis, data science, or data warehousing

Experience in one or more of the following languages: R, C#, .Net Javascript

Founded in 2008, Sunpro Solar is one of the leading providers of rooftop solar in the United States. Sunpro Solar designs, install, and maintain solar panels on residential and commercial properties. Sunpro Solar has a proven history and reputation for providing quality service and is ranked 5th Largest Residential Solar Contractor in the nation.",3.8,"Sunpro Solar, DBA
3.8","Covington, LA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
173,"Data Analyst IV(HEDIS, SQL)",$65k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Purpose:
Responsible for analytic data needs of the business unit. Handle complex data projects and acts as a lead for other Data Analysts.

Provide advanced analytical support for business operations in all or some of the following areas: claims, provider data, member data, clinical data, HEDIS, pharmacy, external reporting

Extract, load, model, and reconcile large amounts of data across multiple system platforms and sources

Review data to determine operational impacts and needed actions; elevate issues, trends, areas for improvement and opportunities to management.

Develop reports and deliverables and make recommendations to management

Model data using MS Excel, Access, SQL, and/or other data ware house analytical tools

Assist management in driving business decisions based on data

Ensure compliance with federal and state deliverable reporting requirements by performing data quality audits and analysis.

Assist with training and mentoring other Data Analysts.

Assist with determining work load and related activities for other Data Analysts

Education/Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience. 6+ years of statistical analysis or data analysis experience. Healthcare experience preferred. Advanced knowledge of Enterprise Reporting and Analysis tools, SQL, and Microsoft Office applications, including Excel and Access. Experience managing projects or heavy involvement in project implementation.

Centene is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to diversity, and values the ways in which we are different. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.",3.5,"Iowa Total Care
3.5","Des Moines, IA",-1,10000+ Employees,1984,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
174,Data Analyst,$46k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"PotomacWave is looking for a Data Analyst to join our team supporting a Federal client in Washington, DC. This position is in fast paced environment actively working to update and improve government policy. This is a perfect opportunity for a Consultant looking to take the next step in their career!

Responsibilities:
Serve as lead Data Analyst in support of daily casework operations; identifies, reports on, and visualizes trends and issues in client casework for sharing with client and stakeholders.
Create descriptive statistics and visualizations for incorporation into a number of external-facing documents and presentations for the client.
Use program knowledge to consult and collaborate on various project management areas: Communications & Outreach, Operations, Risk Management and Strategic Planning.
Maintain datasets and Tableau Server to ensure data accuracy and recency
Deliver thorough and timely periodic reports to client for dissemination to the public.
Produce numerous descriptive statistics and ad hoc analyses for client reporting to program directors and external stakeholders.
Create descriptive statistics and visualizations for incorporation into a number of external-facing documents and presentations for the client.
Collaborate with team to help refine/produce documentation for Communications & Outreach, Operations, Risk Management, and Strategic Planning.
Integrate several outside publicly available data sources to the client data in order to provide greater understanding of client demographics
Functional Performance:
Completes tasks and deliverables in a timely and accurate manner
Analyzes, researches, and develops client solutions with team and supports team in implementation and client acceptance process
Collaborates and communicates effectively with client and team members
Ensures quality tasks and deliverables are completed on time
Responsible for quality, timely, and relevant content to proposals for assigned areas
Demonstrates interest and effort in meeting team goals, and contributes to meeting client/team missions
Understands client environment and assists Program Manager in addressing client challenges or issues and identifies ways to provide value to the client
Builds rapport with clients and represent PotomacWave in a positive and professional manner
Reacts to client needs and direction, and adapts to a changing environment
Qualifications:
Four or more (4+) years of related experience in Data Analytics
Bachelors degree in a relevant field (business administration, finance, accounting, engineering, economics, MIS, etc.)
Knowledge of flood insurance and emergency management a plus
Able to work on multiple tasks and projects simultaneously
Proficiency in SalesForce, R, Tableau, and Excel greatly desired
Candidate must be a US Citizen capable of obtaining a Government clearance
Equal Opportunity Employer/Race/Sex/Religion/Disability/Veteran Status/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Age.

Powered by JazzHR",4.5,"PotomacWave Consulting
4.5","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
175,Data Analyst,-1,"Contract to Hire

This role will play a critical part of our clients Enterprise Analytics team that drives information-based business decisions; providing comprehensive data, standardized reporting, actionable insights, and thoughtful recommendations. This individual will be responsible for partnering with the Digital Technologies team, utilizing corporate tools, infrastructure and methodology to deliver harmonized and validated data assets for re-deployment across the enterprise. The position also requires strong capability to work with functional business experts in the delivery of technical products to include dashboards, digital solution support and analytics.

Principal Accountabilities
• Partner with Global and Regional cross functional teams to execute an enterprise data strategy and scalable data activation / democratization
• Work with Regional teams to apply business logic to raw data. Partner with Global teams to fully automate pipelines and operationalize usage.
• Utilizes multiple data sources to build an understanding of operational aspects of the organization.
• Deliver Project Management function specific reporting dashboards and automation.
• Deliver value-added insights to ad hoc business questions

Critical Leadership Capabilities
• Dealing with ambiguity
• Learning on the fly
• Drive for results
• Business acumen
• Problem solving

Key Functional Skills/Knowledge
• Demonstrated ability to manage big data sets, combine multiple data sources, and familiarity with data lakes
• Proficiency with SQL, Python, and/or other programming languages
• Development experience in DataBricks and/or similar platforms.
• Curiosity and passion for solving business problems as well as analyzing data
• Self-directed, motivated and the ability to organize multiple tasks and projects
• Ability to thrive in a fast paced, ambiguous environment.
• Collaborates and operates as a valued partner with a client-service mindset

Minimum Qualifications

• 2-3 years business intelligence working experience and/or advanced degree in data management and analytics
• Four year college degree - Computer Science, Engineering, IT, Data related

Skills and day to day activities
Top Must-Haves (Hard Skills) : SQL and Power BI.

• Nice-To-Haves (Hard Skills): SAP and Data Management (ODS, Datamart, etc). • Must-Haves (Soft Skills): Learning Agility and Drive for Results. • Nice-To-Haves (Soft Skills): Business Acumen and Curiosity. • This role will be work from home until the office is opened. When the office is opened it would be expected this individual, if local, would be able to spend 50-75% in office as needed and as aligned with the line manager. This role would have a desk in close proximity to the line manager. • Biggest Challenge of Role: The digital strategy is developing, the ways of working and process is being defined—there is a lot of foundational work to set up a mature data management strategy and associated outputs. Always managing a backlog of work will be critical. • Typical Day: This role will interface with the line manager on a daily cadence to collaborate on a variety of projects ranging from data development/transformation, data cleansing/validation and dashboarding. Engagement with Global internal functional associates and external 3rd party vendors will be frequent depending on the task. • Role fits in team: This role will be a critical contributor to the digitalization strategy for Mars Petcare. The person in this role will be expected to have a variety of experiences across the organization but specifically supporting the Enterprise Analytics function and Project Management group in regards to data management and dashboarding/info delivery

Contract length: 6 months

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Pay: $31.00 - $31.70 per hour

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
This role will be work from home until the office is opened. When the office is opened it would be expected this individual, if local, would be able to spend 50-75% in office as needed and as aligned with the line manager

Experience:
SQL and Power BI: 3 years (Required)
MDM, Datamarts: 3 years (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Marsh Consulting Services,"Franklin, TN",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
176,Rolling Stone: Data Quality Analyst,$55k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rolling Stone: Data Quality Analyst

Rolling Stone is looking for a data analyst and music charts lover to join the Rolling Stone Charts team as a Data Quality Analyst. The RS Charts offer in-the-moment view of the biggest songs, albums, and artists as they pop up, giving both music fans and music creators an unfettered glimpse into whats really happening. The Data Quality Analyst will play a key role in QAing streaming and sales data and ensuring the accuracy and punctuality of the daily and weekly charts.

Reporting to the Director of Charts on the editorial team, the Data Quality Analyst will also help produce engaging data journalism for RollingStone.com. In addition to a meticulous attention to detail, the ideal candidate will also have a passion for popular music.

The Data Quality Analyst works a Sunday to Thursday schedule.

Responsibilities:
QAing daily charts
Maintaining a music release calendar and ensuring the accuracy of sales and streaming data for new releases.
Conducting frequent tests of Alpha Data's databases for accuracy
Maintaining a robust database for chart histories, flagging major milestones for songs, albums and artists on the charts.
Regular upkeep of music metadata
Requirements:

Work experience as a data analyst or in a related field
Experience in handling large data sets and relational databases
Proficiency with SQL
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Familiarity with the music industry and an ear to the ground for new releases
About Rolling Stone:


Rolling Stone, the number one brand in music publishing, has been the leading voice of music and popular culture for over 50 years. The multi-media brand features the latest in music reviews, in-depth interviews, hard-hitting political commentary and award-winning journalism across many platforms including magazine, digital, mobile, social and event marketing. Rolling Stone provides all the news that fits to a global audience of approximately 60 million people every month and publishes over 100 pieces of content every day. Rolling Stones parent company, Penske Media Corporation (PMC), is a leading digital media company, publishing, and Information Services Company founded in 2003.

About PMC

Penske Media Corporation (PMC) is a leading digital media and information services company whose award-winning content attracts a monthly audience of more than 180 million. Our dynamic events, data services, and rich content entertain and educate todays fashion, retail, beauty, entertainment and lifestyle sectors. Headquartered in New York and Los Angeles with additional offices in 11 countries worldwide, Penske Media is the way global influencers are informed, connected, and inspired. To learn more about PMC and its iconic brands, visit www.pmc.com.",4.4,"Penske Media Corporation
4.4","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
177,Data Analyst,-1,"Tradesy may look like a fashion company, but under the surface we're a micro-economy that runs on data. From product, to marketing, to finance, every department at Tradesy relies on data to make business decisions. As a Data Analyst, you are more than just a person who makes reports. You will be empowered to partner with business owners to investigate issues and recommend solutions to our most pressing challenges

Our ideal candidate will be a storyteller who can paint narratives with data along with the investigative chops to get to the core of issues. The problems you work on will be some of the most pressing to our business; ranging from the supply and demand of our marketplace, to understanding the impact of new product features, to optimizing our marketing and inventory operations.

This role will join a team of analysts, data scientists, and engineers. You will have regular exposure to not just our varied business teams, but also direct access with the executive team, as well as many opportunities for growth.

You Will:
Be an excellent communicator who can drive the full cycle of analytics workflow, from requirement gathering, to data collection, reporting and visualization.
Identify and analyze trends and shifts in customer behavior, both independently and in collaboration with business stakeholders
Have a keen eye for detail and ensure that numbers always add up
Have strong presentation skills with the ability to create beautiful charts and slide decks
You Have:


3+ years experience in an analytics or data related role
Excellent SQL and data modeling skills
Fluency with Excel/Google Sheets functions (pivot tables, vlookups, sumifs etc)
Tableau or similar dashboarding tool experience
Outstanding communication skills and experience presenting results

Compensation:


Competitive base salary plus meaningful equity
Comprehensive benefits (Medical, Dental, Vision, 401k)
Flexible Paid Time Off

Additional Perks:


Remote Friendly Department
Flexible Working Hours
Monthly allowance towards phone or internet bill",3.3,"Tradesy
3.3",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
178,Business Analyst/Data Scientist,$45k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Analyst/Data Scientist

Location

Menlo Park, CA

Experience

2-5

Years

Job Code

CA-2020-5

Preferred Education:


Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Information Technology, Software Engineering or a similar related field of study. Master’s degree in any of these fields is a plus 1 to 3 years of related experience.

Area of Expertise:


SQL, Big Data, Python, Tableau, data modeling, data visualization and data science is required.

Roles & Responsibilities:
Partnerships: Develop strong collaborative partnerships with key stakeholders and partners across the company, including leading cross-functional task forces on major initiatives and represent the partnership functions with cross-functional teams and in Region.
Business Analytics and Insights: Conduct impactful analyses on major revenue/ market and product trends, including vertical/sub-vertical performance, product adoption, leading revenue indicators, productivity and sales effectiveness across partners and resellers. Create new & advanced analyses using internal and external data. Take a complex problem and then execute from analysis design to creation of the analysis, to put it into presentation format for senior executives
Strategic Planning: Support planning activities with the primary objective of enabling sales and partnership leadership to make effective, analytically driven and strategic operating decisions to drive growth. This includes medium/long-term go-to-market/ route-to-market planning (strategic, operational and financial) focused on market opportunity sizing, product focus, resourcing (direct and indirect) and org implications.
Strategic projects and initiatives: Execute critical projects and initiatives with cross-functional teams across the organization. In conjunction with business owners, provide guidance in developing strategic partnerships by assessing viability and return on investment.
Automation and efficiency: Develop standard processes and tools/dashboards that can be scaled centrally.",3.2,"ACL Digital
3.2","Menlo Park, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1992,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
179,Sr. Marketing Data Analyst & Contract Administrator,-1,"NuEnergen is looking for a high-energy Sr. Marketing Data Analyst and Contract Administrator to support in the development and expansion of our Marketing and Sales data analysis activities. This position reports to our VP, Client Services and Marketing. The role requires a rare combination of deep and sophisticated analytical expertise; business acumen; strategic mindset; client, relationship, and project management; and a passion for building new capabilities.

Manage the Marketing Analytics function the Investments Area – present dashboards and insights to upper management, the client marketing team, and the product team on an on-going basis. Ensure all dashboards are functioning appropriately, add to dashboards upon team request, build new dashboard upon team request, work with technology to consume new data into detailed analytics on marketing and sales activities as needed, produce regular read outs for inside sales metrics, website activity, paid search, social media, email & webinars.

This role will provide insights read outs using dashboards to our Client Services Management Marketing & Product teams, manage the maintenance of our dashboards on an on-going basis, build out new campaign specific dashboards working with the Client Services Management team to build out requirements, and manage the overall marketing analytics process. This also includes working with IT to pull in new data to our CRM, manipulate and consume that data into further analysis.
Core Tasks: *
Contract administration, prepare, manage, collect and finalize client contracts and agreements.
Route qualified opportunities to the appropriate Client Services Management.
Maintain and ensure accuracy in our HubSpot CRM sales funnel.
Provide sales data, forecasts, and account analyses to the sales team as needed.
Assist with the creation and delivery of proposals and contracts when needed.
Deliver (by e-mail) welcome packages to new clients.
Monitor weekly reports for expirations, cancellations, renewals.
Ensure that new contracts are properly logged and meet our requirements.
Update weekly Delinquent Accounts Receivable report (email and calls to clients).
Log in and review all customer checks to ensure accuracy.
Track all new deals in sales pipeline create reports for the sales team.
Monitor progress and quotas for sales team.
Deliver (by email) Certificates of Insurance and special requests to/from clients.
Help coordinate weekly sales team meetings
Prepare Annual Recurring Revenue reports in HubSpot.
Prepare input for the weekly Good/Bad Reports.
Assist CEO with the preparation of his monthly expense reports.
Additional Tasks: *
· Integrate large data sets, connecting data from disparate sources to identify insights and patterns using traditional as well as predictive and prescriptive analytics, client contract open to close analytics.

· Source, scrub, and join relevant public, commercial, and proprietary data sources

· Conduct statistical analysis and key driver analyses, such as linear regression, ANOVA, time-series analysis, classification and segmentation models, decision trees, and analysis of unstructured data (e.g., social media listening, digital footprints, speech analytics)

· Mine data to uncover patterns and to identify business trends and new opportunities for using analytics and data visualization

· Develop and maintain consultative relationships with key business stakeholders

· Summarize analytical findings and present written and verbal reports to key stakeholders, communicating with both technical and non-technical team members

· Apply relevant industry knowledge to analysis and insights, with a focus on ""what it means "" and actions to consider

· Manage project plans and timelines to ensure projects are delivered with the highest quality and on time.
_Qualifications Needed: _*
Proficiency in MS Office (especially Excel, Word, Power Point and Outlook);
Ability and flexibility to manage varied and changing tasks and priorities.
Must possess excellent communication skills, both written and oral; and
Must be detail-oriented and team-oriented.
Compensation: Commensurate with experience

(1) 401K plan (company match up to 4% of your base pay).

(2) Company profit sharing (target is 10% of base pay).

(3) 15 combined PTO and sick leave days per year plus Flex-time.

(4) Medical benefits (50% of employee's portion paid by company).

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $68,000.00 - $72,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
We have all been back in the office since mid-June with strict Covid-19 protocols in place to safeguard all employees. We have yet to have any employees test positive for Covid-19.

Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
White Plains, NY 10606 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
nuenergen.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",2.0,"NuEnergen, LLC
2.0","White Plains, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Less than $1 million (USD),-1
180,Data Analyst,$44k-$53k (Glassdoor Est.),"American Credit Acceptance is a fast growing automotive lender with $3,100,000,000 in assets. We are currently seeking a highly skilled, professional Data Analyst to provide critical data reporting & analytics capabilities. This role would analyze complex data structures to generate useful business insights and develop reporting to monitor business critical results. Supports leadership team with data consultation, data gathering, and data analysis.

Quantitative and qualitative analysis; Communicate with business customers to establish data requirements
Create tools or queries to obtain data from central data repository for the purposes of reporting and analysis
Present final analysis to customers
Participate on project teams

Minimum Qualificaitons
Bachelor’s degree
Experience with SQL or similar data querying language
Experience with programming language
Entry-level candidates will be considered
Preferred Qualifications
Degree from an analytical field
1+ Years experience with SQL
1+ Years experience in programming",2.9,"American Credit Acceptance
2.9","Spartanburg, SC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
181,"Sr. Analyst, Data Visualization - Market Research",-1,"Named as one of LA's Best Places to Work by Built in LA, Prodege, LLC, is an internet and media company that is dedicated to “creating rewarding moments” for its members by rewarding them with more than $1.7 billion in cash and free gift cards since inception. Prodege is comprised of leading consumer brands — Swagbucks, MyPoints, ShopAtHome, InboxDollars, and Upromise— which deliver engaging content and valuable rewards to more than 120 million members worldwide. Prodege's complementary suite of business solutions helps brands boost engagement with consumers by making it easy to gather insights, listen to their audience and gain further exposure to drive brand loyalty.

We are currently seeking a Sr. Analyst, Data Visualization to join our team.

In this role, you will support our Data Visualization product, assisting in the development and implementation of our capabilities in this area.
You’ll collaborate with clients at Market Research agencies as well as with Prodege’s Project Management, Survey Programming and Data Processing experts to lead the design and production of data deliverables including online dashboards and automated PowerPoint charts.
You’ll lead client demos to showcase our data analysis & visualization capabilities and provide day-to-day support to clients using our data analysis & visualization platform.
The ideal candidate will be a true team-player who is familiar with the full market research process and with experience in the areas of data analysis and data visualization. In addition, the ideal candidate will have at least some familiarity with survey programming and data collection standards as well as be comfortable communicating with clients whether via email, over the phone or when attending in-person meetings.

For the past few years, ProdegeMR has seen transformative growth and is building the team to continue to foster mutually successful client relationships and further grow our business and our team.

Sr. Analyst, Data Visualization:
Understands clients’ business questions and research-related needs and suggests approaches and data deliverables which will exceed client expectations
Demonstrates a strong ability to QA check, format and visualize data to assist clients’ in deriving actionable insights from that data
Ensures that client objectives are met throughout the process
Has a proven track record of delivering high-quality results in a timely manner
Is a fast learner who takes initiative and is driven to learn new things, test new techniques, and experiment
Is a strong team player and able to manage multiple ongoing projects
Assist in the development of new, and optimization of current, Prodege products and services
About You:
4+ years of quantitative market research experience in the area of data analysis and data visualization
Expertise with data visualization and market research survey deliverables
Enjoys working in a team environment
Excellent verbal and written communication skills in one on one and in group settings
Comfortable working as efficiently as possible to quickly deliver solutions
Attentive to detail with strong critical-thinking abilities
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent
It’s a plus if you have:
Experience using data analysis tools such as SPSS and/or R
Some familiarity with Survey Programming and Reporting platforms such as Confirmit, Decipher, Qualtrics, etc.
Some familiarity with Microsoft Excel VBA.",3.7,"Prodege, LLC
3.7","El Segundo, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
182,Data Analyst,-1,"HRS is looking to add a Data Analyst to its growing data team. This person will be responsible for maintaining and curating current data pipelines and reports, building out data transformation pipelines and dynamic dashboards, primarily using tools like SQL and Chartio. This is an exciting role for someone with a quantitative mindset and desire to create data products as well as communicate their findings with various stakeholders. Through this work, you’ll have ample opportunities to make a positive difference in the lives of clinicians and patients who use our platforms.

What you’ll be doing

Writing efficient SQL queries to pull data from our databases
Creating clear and informative dashboards and reports using SQL-based BI tools such as Chartio
Maintaining, improving and building out data transformation pipelines
Ensuring data quality that leads to reproducible results
Be a primary point of contact for HRS marketing, product, tech support, sales and client success teams, eventually taking full ownership of their data requests

What we’re looking for

A data skeptic with strong organizational skills
Someone with a degree in a scientific discipline, including but not limited to mathematics, statistics, informatics/bioinformatics/health informatics, quantitative psychology, business analytics, or 1-2 years of relevant work experience
Knowledge of SQL and best coding practices
Knowledge of Excel and/or BI tools such as Tableau, Looker, Chartio
Internal drive for consistency, willingness and ability to find optimal and maintainable solutions when it comes to building data products, such as BI dashboards
Strong communication skills and a passion for communicating through data

Bonus points

Knowledge of analytics engineering principles and tools like dbt
Experience with git and Jira
Experience with R or Python for Data Visualization and Exploratory Analysis
Self-motivation and willingness to learn new tools and technologies in a fast-growing start-up environment

What we offer

Competitive salary commensurate with experience
Flexible hours and work environment
Paid vacation
Medical, dental, vision, disability and life insurance packages to fit your needs
Flexible spending account for medical, commuter benefits
401(k) savings plan
Unlimited snacks, coffee, and drinks
Employee events and catered team lunches
ZogSports Team
The opportunity to work with some of the smartest, most driven people in the industry and have fun while doing it!

Creating a new standard of care requires passion, drive, and the desire to make health care accessible, efficient, and effective. HRS is an Equal Opportunity Employer and we are proud to celebrate and foster diversity within our workplace. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, gender, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, veteran status, physical or mental disability, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.

Powered by JazzHR

27fshagMyf",4.7,"Health Recovery Solutions Incorporated
4.7","Hoboken, NJ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
183,"Nurse Informatics Data Analyst, Biomedical Informatics",$35k-$61k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB SUMMARY:

This role bridges the gap between business end-users, clinical data scientists, leadership, and medical informatics to support development of systems for both operations and research purposes. Supports customer use of electronic health record and other technology and associated workflows, including troubleshooting when issues arise, under occasional guidance. Educates customers on use of sound informatics principles, including but not limited to problem shaping, design requirements, change management, etc. Gathers and integrates appropriate data, conducts analyses using SQL, and provides manual chart review and annotation.

Department/Unit Summary:

The mission of the Vanderbilt Department of Biomedical informatics has complementary themes that include education, research, service, and a commitment to our colleagues in our own institution and around the world. The Educational Mission is to educate undergraduate, graduate, and postgraduate trainees in the theory and practice of biomedical informatics. The Research and Service Mission is to develop and evaluate innovative technologies for the storage, retrieval, dissemination, and application of biomedical knowledge, in order to support clinical practice, biomedical research, life-long learning, and administration and as a result, to contribute to the professional body of knowledge in the field of biomedical informatics. The Professional and Ethical Mission is to maintain cooperation and collegiality with all those who learn and work with us locally, nationally, and internationally; and, to develop and disseminate ethical and professional standards for the conduct of biomedical informatics research and for the use and evaluation of health care informatics applications.

Position Shift:
Day Shift/ Exempt Position
Click here to view how Vanderbilt Health employees celebrate the difference they make every day:

Celebrate 2019

Click Here To View The VUMC Promise of Discovery

Discover Vanderbilt University Medical Center:

Located in Nashville, Tennessee, and operating at a global crossroads of teaching, discovery and patient care, VUMC is a community of individuals who come to work each day with the simple aim of changing the world. It is a place where your expertise will be valued, your knowledge expanded and your abilities challenged. It is a place where your diversity — of culture, thinking, learning and leading — is sought and celebrated. It is a place where employees know they are part of something that is bigger than themselves, take exceptional pride in their work and never settle for what was good enough yesterday. Vanderbilt’s mission is to advance health and wellness through preeminent programs in patient care, education, and research.

VUMC Recent Accomplishments

Because we are committed to providing the best in patient care, education and research, we are proud of our recent accomplishments:

· US News & World Report: #1 Adult Hospital in Tennessee and metropolitan Nashville, named to the Best Hospitals Honor Roll of the top 20 adult hospitals, 10 nationally ranked adult specialty programs, with 3 specialties rated in the top 10 nationally, Monroe Carell Jr. Children’s Hospital at Vanderbilt named as one of the Best Children’s Hospital in the nation, with 10 out of 10 pediatric specialties nationally ranked.

· Healthcare’s Most Wired: Among the nation’s 100 “most-wired” hospitals and health systems for its efforts in innovative medical technology.

· Becker’s Hospital Review: named as one of the “100 Great Hospitals in America”, in the roster of 100 Hospitals and Health Systems with Great Oncology Programs and to its list of the 100 Hospitals with Great Heart Programs.

· The Leapfrog Group: One of only 10 children’s hospitals in the to be named at Leapfrog Top Hospital.

· American Association for the Advancement of Science: The School of Medicine has 112 elected fellows

· Magnet Recognition Program: Received our third consecutive Magnet designations.

· National Academy of Medicine: 22 members, elected by their peers in recognition of outstanding achievement

· Human Rights Campaign Healthcare Equality Index: 6th year in a row that Vanderbilt University Medical Center was a Leader in LGBTQ Healthcare Equality.

Additional Key Elements/ Responsibilities:

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES:
Analyzes and annotates complex medical charts using technical experience and clinical judgement to trace data quality issues or leverage data/information to improve outcomes or create new knowledge to advance patient care. Identifies data quality trends through chart review and provides this to leadership to address.
Utilize multiple sources of data including tools to analyze and resolve problems.
Develops work plans to ensure analysis is completed accurately and on time.
Gathers and integrates appropriate data and conducts analyses using SQL.
Chooses or develops appropriate data collection tool, output/visualization for the end-user or leadership, and communicates findings effectively.
Under minimal supervision, provides a single point of contact to partner with customers in defining issue, scope and objectives.
Ensures adherence to the highest of quality standards and maintains appropriate documentation.
Collaborates with ETL and QA teams, VUMC stakeholders, subject matter experts, end-users, and third-party application experts to support business needs.
Acts as liaison between operations, research teams and medical informatics departments and performs analysis of needs for new services or enhancements.
Assists with submission of IT enhancement requests and guiding those requests through the process on behalf of customers. Assists ETL team and leadership in analyzing customer requests for changes or enhancements to production. Communicates with clients and conducts fact gathering sessions for enhancements. Handles simple root cause analysis of business data issues and provides clinical data guidance to non-clinical computer scientists on more complex issues.
Competently identifies data mapping gaps and provides data requirements.
Assists with improvements in workflows and processes with technology components through workflow gap analysis and current state and future state planning. Identifies new opportunities to optimize content delivery and improve user experience via content mapping efforts
Supports data use workflows by coaching customers thru processes to troubleshoot and resolve technological or clinical considerations in collaboration with other teams as appropriate.
Collects data and information pertinent to the situation and uses effective communication to define issues and problems. Identifies key stakeholders.
Utilizes current evidences based nursing knowledge, including research findings to guide practice.
Works on projects and work groups. Lead small area-based projects with oversight from manager or director.
The responsibilities listed are a general overview of the position and additional duties may be assigned.

CORE ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Organizational Impact: Delivers job responsibilities that impact own job area/team with some guidance.
Problem Solving/ Complexity of work: Uses existing procedures, research and analysis to solve standard job related problems that may require some judgement.
Breadth of Knowledge: Requires subject matter knowledge within a professional area to meet job requirements.
Team Interaction: Individually contributes to project/ work teams.

Position Qualifications:

· Bachelor's Degree (or equivalent experience) and 2 years experience required. (**3 years of experience in information technology and clinical healthcare operations strongly preferred**)

Registered Nurse License Required
CA
IND000
NHCN
Basic Qualifications

Additional Qualification Information:

• Current RN license in state of TN (Required) • Bachelor’s Degree in Nursing (Required)• Master’s Degree in Nursing Informatics (Preferred)• Experience in information technology and clinical healthcare operations. (Required)• Experience conducting manual chart reviews and conducting annotation on electronic health records (Preferred)• Experience or desire to learn to work with relational databases using SQL and assisting in the development and curation of clinical data. (Preferred)• Understanding of the extract, transform, load (ETL) and Quality Assurance (QA) process. (Preferred)• Certification- American Nurses Credentialing Center (ANCC) - Nursing Informatics or CPHIMS (Preferred)

Physical Requirements/Strengths needed & Physical Demands:

Sedentary category requiring exertion up to 10 lbs. of force occasionally and uses negligible amounts of force to move objects. Sedentary work involves sitting most of the time.

Movement

Occasional: Standing: Remaining on one's feet without moving.
Occasional: Walking: Moving about on foot.
Occasional: Lifting under 35 lbs: Raising and lowering objects under 35 lbs from one level to another
Occasional: Carrying under 35 lbs: Transporting an object holding in hands, arms or shoulders, with help of coworkers or assistive device.
Occasional: Push/Pull: Exerting force to move objects away from or toward.
Occasional: Bending/Stooping: Trunk bending downward and forward by bending spine at waist requiring full use of lower extremities and back muscles
Occasional: Reaching above shoulders: Extending arms in any direction above shoulders.
Occasional: Handling: Seizing, holding, grasping, turning or otherwise working with hand or hands.
Frequent: Sitting: Remaining in seated position
Frequent: Reaching below shoulders: Extending arms in any direction below shoulders.
Frequent: Bimanual Dexterity: Requiring the use of both hands.

Sensory

Continuous: Communication: Expressing or exchanging written/verbal/electronic information.
Continuous: Auditory: Perceiving the variances of sounds, tones and pitches and able to focus on single source of auditory information
Continuous: Vision: Clarity of near vision at 20 inches or less and far vision at 20 feet or more with depth perception, peripheral vision, color vision.
Continuous: Smell: Ability to detect and identify odors.

Environmental Conditions",3.7,"Vanderbilt University Medical Center
3.7","Nashville, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1874,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
184,Data Analyst,$41k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Money Map Press is looking for an experienced Data Analyst to support their in-house Business Intelligence team. This role will work in unison with an in-house Data Architect to create an ecosystem of timely, accurate and actionable data repositories that can drive business decisions. You will have the opportunity to collaborate with internal stakeholders and business units, leverage the latest technology platforms and have many resources at your disposal.

Responsibilities
Create 360-view of consumer in BI platform (Tableau) – including custom metrics and dimensions to support strategic goals, marketing priorities and business units.
Maintain open lines of communication with each business unit to translate questions and requirements into reports, dashboards and views for Data Architect.
In accordance with Data Architect's vision, create executive-level dashboards and automate delivery via email, app, web per user needs and user technical competency .
Become Product Owner for any analytical platform, tool or technology and create a strategy that serves various analytical needs.
Identify statistically significant patterns, correlations, and compiling questions raised by ad-hoc analysis.
Improve understanding of the business and contribute to marketing ideas.
Create and maintain thorough report documentation and methodology.
Excellent coordination skills, able to manage multiple projects and meet deadlines.
Work with Data Architect to customize BI solution to drive revenue gains and solves business problems.
Create mockups, technical requirements and use cases and testing procedures for new dashboards, reports or ad-hoc deliverables.
Qualifications
3+ years experience in data analysis, marketing reporting, vendor/client relations.
Excellent communication skills.
Experience in Financial Services Industry preferred.
Must thrive in a fast-paced, constantly changing environment with tight deadlines and multiple priorities.
Experience with BI platforms, Tableau a plus.
If interested, please submit a resume and cover letter to the link provided.

About Money Map Press

Money Map Press is a group of top experts focused on the global economy. Led by veteran publisher Mike Ward, they have one goal: to make investing profitable. Their subscribers get access to a team of investment experts with more than 250 years of combined experience who deliver analysis and actionable investing ideas to put subscribers on a path to greater wealth.

Working there can be heaven on Earth for someone who is hungry to learn and have a fun, fulfilling career.

But it’s not the place for everyone...

One of the qualities you need to possess to make it at Money Map Press is drive. And we mean “through-the-roof” kind of drive. The kind of drive that can – and has, actually – double a company’s size and revenues in just 18 months.

If passion drives everything you do, Money Map Press is looking for you.

Money Map Press is an Equal Opportunity Employer and complies with all applicable Federal, State and local employment laws. No question in this Application is intended to elicit information in violation of any such law, nor will any information obtained in response to any question be used in violation of any such law. Applicants with disabilities who require a reasonable accommodation to participate in the application and/or interview process may contact us at here@14west.us to arrange for such accommodation.

#LI-MV1",4.1,"14 West
4.1","Baltimore, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
185,Data Analyst,-1,"We’re in search of a Data Analyst who lives, breathes and eats data, and knows how to turn that information into business gold, helping us to glean more information and, gain more insight. You’ll need to be detail-oriented and methodical in your approach, but still capable of connecting and collaborating with like-minded departments to collect and analyze data, determining the trends that can inform our clients business needs going forward. Technical expertise is a must, as is the ability to provide clear and concise reports to support your findings. You’ll also be expected to enact quality control protocols to help us improve, manage the master data set, be a top-level troubleshooter, and have knowledge of databases and analysis tools.

Data Analyst Responsibilities:

Collecting, interpreting and analyzing data.
Developing and generating reports across multiple systems that identify trends that can be applied to business cases.
Evolve our data collection capabilities, analytics and reporting process as the business case evolves and grows by optimizing strategies, implement databases, and managing security, data sources and metadata.
Commissioning and decommissioning data sets as needed, while maintaining, cleaning and organizing data sets as needed.
Build models, test data set validations, and clean our data sets to ensure the most accurate reporting.
Identify and correct problems in our data sets, including performing quality assurance on imported data.
Keeping current with industry standards, and implementing updates as needed or required.

Data Analyst Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Information Technology, or a related field.
Strong knowledge of database languages such as SQL, and programming languages such as Javascript, ETL Frameworks, XML.
Capability in managing and translating data sets and models, including experience with relational databases and managing large data sets.
Strong data reporting skills to develop best in class dashboards.
Strong analytical mindset that translates to superior data gathering, cleansing, transforming, modeling and more.
Ability to identify and implement data improvements, including new tools, software, and other associated programs that can streamline our data environment.

MUST BE A US CITIZEN.

ONLY CANDIDATES WITH ACTIVE GOVERNMENT SECURITY CLEARANCES AND

APPROPRIATE POLY WILL BE CONSIDERED.

Interested in Joining Our Team? - Check out this YouTube video!

Be a part of an award-winning, employee friendly company in Northern VA and have the satisfaction of helping keep America safe. DataSync Technologies, Inc is a veteran owned small business providing consulting excellence and real time solutions for customers with complex information technology needs within Intelligence Community. Our cleared consultants bring real world experience with a common sense approach to their jobs whether they are creating complex analytic dashboards, architecting new cloud technology infrastructures, securing sensitive data or streamlining business processes for efficiency.

Equal Employment Opportunity
DataSync is an EEO and Affirmative Action Employer of Female/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.

Information about Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) and Employee Polygraph Act (EPPA) provisions in addition to other Federal labor laws can be found at the Department of Labor's Website.

DataSync is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.

Powered by JazzHR

Ykyr8wcgiq",4.8,"DataSync Technologies, Inc
4.8","Reston, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2003,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
186,Data Governance Analyst,$44k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Governance Analyst will act as an intermediary between the business community and the technical community working with business clients, data stewards, and IT project teams to influence and drive our enterprise data governance program including data quality and data catalog implementation. The Data Governance Analyst will establish and ensure adherence to an enterprise data governance program framework for data policies, standards, and best practices. This role is data-centric and requires analysis and demonstrated knowledge in data governance and data quality to aid in building an enterprise data-driven culture.

Develop and maintain data governance policies, guidelines, standards, procedures, and communications in collaboration with data stewards and development teams.
Assist data stewards with the creation, documentation, and adherence of data governance standards.
Monitor and enforce compliance of data governance standards.
Participate in process mapping for data decision rights, and the development of business policies and practices for managing data.
Assist with the development and maintenance of data decision rights and stewardship.
Build partnerships with business stakeholders to anticipate opportunities for data management governance activities and projects.
Assist with the development and implementation of data quality standards, data protection standards and adoption requirements across the enterprise.
Assist in maintaining the business data catalog and ensuring data quality standards are met.
Maintain data governance processes and controls by working with project and business leaders to analyze the impact of future changes on critical data sources and mitigate any potential risks to data quality.
Estimate and assess impact of requested changes to assigned business stakeholders/systems.
Liaise with business systems stakeholders and software vendor’s implementation staff, ensuring alignment of business needs with delivery of systems changes.
Develop an understanding of operational needs to set the direction for the organization's workflows; proactively identify opportunities to improve business workflow with technology improvements.
Participate in training and work with end users.
Troubleshoot problems and questions.
Provide end-user support for data quality issues entered into issue tracking systems.
Review the status of projects and issues with project leadership.
Demonstrate flexibility with respect to changing end-user business needs.
Work within a cross-functional team.
Strong problem-solving skills.
Ability and willingness to take ownership of work activities and ensure that they are done in a timely, accurate and efficient manner.
Ability and willingness to recognize assignments or tasks that need to be completed, to seek out additional assignments or tasks and to help others.
Ability to communicate information clearly and concisely with project leadership, subject matter experts and key stakeholders.
Ability to persevere in difficult situations, overcome obstacles, and reach high levels of performance when faced with stressful work situations and time pressures.
Ability and willingness to learn new software applications.
Strong analytical skills, business intuition, and organizational ability.
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, ability to operate in a cross functional and complex matrix environment.
Adaptable, open to change and able to work in ambiguous situations and respond to new information or unexpected circumstances.
Uphold company mission and values through accountability, innovation, integrity, quality, and teamwork.
Support and comply with the company’s Quality Management System policies and procedures.
Regular and reliable attendance.
Ability to lift up to 10 pounds for approximately 5% of a typical working day.
Ability to work on a mobile device, tablet, or in front of a computer screen and/or perform typing for approximately 90% of a typical working day.
Ability and means to travel between Madison locations.
Ability to travel 5% of working time away from work location, may include overnight/weekend travel.

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science/MIS or related field; or High School Degree/General Education Diploma and 4 years of relevant experience in lieu of Bachelor's degree.
2+ years of experience in a Data Governance, Data Management or data centric role.
2+ years of experience with the identification/documentation of Data Governance policies & standards across the enterprise data management practices.
Basic computer skills to include Internet navigation, Email usage, and word processing.
Proficient in Microsoft Office.
Demonstrated ability to perform the Essential Duties of the position with or without accommodation.
Authorization to work in the United States without sponsorship.
Preferred Qualifications
Professional working knowledge with Data Governance Principles.
Professional working knowledge with data management in a life sciences, healthcare or related industry.
Ability to facilitate and present to a variety of audiences.
#LI-MW1

We are an equal employment opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, color, creed, disability, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, and any other status protected by applicable local, state or federal law. Applicable portions of the Company’s affirmative action program are available to any applicant or employee for inspection upon request.",4.1,"Exact Sciences Corporation
4.1","Madison, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
187,Compliance Data Analyst,$46k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are: Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal’s 286 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.

Job Description Summary: We are seeking a highly motivated team player with strong analytical skills who specializes in creating, driving, and executing projects. As a Compliance Data Analyst, this person will be providing data-driven solutions for managing and optimizing the filter of our payments screening system for the Sanctions and CIP program at PayPal. This role will primarily involve managing and supporting data maintenance, configuration, reporting, and data analysis projects for these programs by providing insights to solve complex business problems. Additionally, this role will include testing filters for our payment screening systems. This person will also be working closely with our technology partners in defining requirements for application enhancements, global operations partners, for identifying and driving sustainable operational improvements, as well as with the Sanctions and CIP Policy teams to ensure proper implementation of controls. If you are a driven, analytical thinker that values collaboration, continuous learning, and problem-solving, we would love to hear from you.

Job Description:

Responsibilities:

Plan, design, develop/implement code/configuration for Sanctions and CIP screening application
Perform data analysis to determine and verify business requirements/issues specification, flows, and deliverables for projects
Prepare essential documentation to define requirements, test plans, analysis
Create and execute test cases and scripts for testing of changes and releases
Create and execute monthly, quarterly, bi-annual, and annual filter testing for our payment screening systems
Create tailored business rules to reduce hit rate, prepare tuning data, reviewing hit reduction strategies
Performs data mining to look for commonalities and patterns that exist.
Extract and manipulate large datasets using standard tools such as SQL, Excel, SAS, and Python
Share findings by organizing the data results into easy-to-understand frameworks using Tableau or other visualization tools

Qualifications:

Ability to independently manage, organize and prioritize multiple tasks, projects, and responsibilities
Well-developed research and analytical skills with good problem solving and lateral thinking ability
Analysis of existing applications to identify weakness and develop opportunities for improvements
Ability to rapidly learn new concepts (technical, risk, business) a critical success factor in this role
Team-oriented, must be self-motivated, plan and manage time effectively, and be customer-focused
Detailed, thorough, diligent individual with robust data analysis, and time management skills
Proven ability to function well independently as well as in a team
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to articulate concepts and ideas to diverse audiences
Experience within the financial industry, with payments/ (e-Commerce knowledge preferred)
Experience in UNIX and Windows shell scripting for process automation
Experience with SQL scripting (Oracle, MS SQL), Python, and tableau
Experience with big data Ecosystem, such as Hadoop, etc.
Experience with system testing of large applications: the creation of test cases, execution of tests, and validation of results
Knowledge of the economic sanctions programs administered by the U.S. Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets Control, and general knowledge of sanctions evasion practices is also desirable
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field (Engineering, Science, Finance, Statistics, Economics, Math, Business) with 3 years of experience or a Master's degree with 1 year of experience

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience in risk management (Sanctions, AML, Fraud, Credit, Compliance, CIP/KYC etc.)
Experience in payments industry

We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.

PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities.",4.0,"PayPal
4.0","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1998,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
188,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

Rochester, NY

6 Months

Under the direction of the Supervisor Data Analytics & the SAP Master Data Specialist will be responsible for supporting the Engineering master data and the touch points within SAP. The Data Analyst I will follow all work instructions of the Business Process Support Team (BPS). The Qualified Candidate will be responsible for supporting the requirements related to Engineering master data changes and the touch points within SAP for a specific project.

SPECIFIC RESPONSIBILITES

Evaluate and make required changes in SAP for existing materials, product BOM’s, and routings per the direction of the Engineering Team.

Create work centers, changing and creating BOM’s, Routings. Change Material Masters (Production Versions.

Responsible for the ECM’s to document their work.

Document and maintain ECM (Create, Obtain approvals, and submit to the Business Process Support Team).

QUALIFICATIONS

Proficient in SAP Master Data as it relates to BOM’s and routings.

Advance experience with Excel.

Possess high levels of data accuracy and attention to detail

Strong analytical skills, combined with practical business knowledge

Strong verbal and written communication skills

About Advantage Resourcing

Advantage Resourcing is committed to providing equal employment opportunity for all persons regardless of race, color, religion (including religious dress and grooming practices), sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital status, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, pregnancy, medical condition, genetic information, mental and physical disability, political affiliation, union membership, status as a parent, military or veteran status or other non-merit based factors. We will provide reasonable accommodations throughout the application, interviewing and employment process. If you require a reasonable accommodation, contact us. Advantage Resourcing is an E-Verify employer. This policy is applicable to all phases of the employment relationship, including hiring, transfers, promotions, training, terminations, working conditions, compensation, benefits, and other terms and conditions of employment.

All employees are directed to familiarize themselves with this policy and to act in accordance with it. All decisions with respect to employment matters and other phases of employer-temporary employee relationships will be in keeping with this policy and in accordance with all applicable laws and regulations.",2.7,"Advantage Resourcing
2.7","Rochester, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
189,"Product Analyst, Data Science",$53k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Note: By applying to this position your application is automatically submitted to the following locations: Mountain View, CA, USA; San Bruno, CA, USA; New York, NY, USA

Minimum qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or equivalent practical experience.
3 years of experience working with statistical packages (e.g. R, SAS, Stata, MATLAB, etc.).
Experience articulating product questions, pulling data from datasets (SQL) and using statistics to arrive at an answer.
Preferred qualifications:
BA/BS or Master's degree in a quantitative field such as; Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Data Sciences.
Experience in scripting with SQL, extracting large sets of data, and design of ETL flows.
Experience in an inter-disciplinary/cross-functional field.
Interest and aptitude in data, metrics, analysis and trends and applied knowledge of measurement, statistics and program evaluation.
Ability to translate analysis results into business recommendations, and excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Distinctive problem solving skills and impeccable business judgment.
About the job


Product Analysts provide quantitative analysis, market expertise and a strategic perspective to our partners throughout the organization. As a data-loving member of the team, you'll serve as an analytics expert for your partners, using numbers to help them make better decisions. You will weave stories with meaningful insight from data. You'll make key recommendations for your fellow Googlers in Engineering and Product Management.

As a Product Analyst, you relish tallying up the numbers one minute and communicating your findings to a team leader the next. You can see different angles of a product or business opportunity, and you know how to connect the dots and interact with people in various roles and functions. You will work to effectively turn business questions into data analysis, and provide meaningful recommendations on strategy.
Responsibilities
Conduct data analysis to make business recommendations (e.g. cost-benefit, invest-divest, forecasting, impact analysis).
Deliver effective presentations of findings and recommendations to multiple levels of stakeholders, creating visual displays of quantitative information.
Develop and automate reports, iteratively build and prototype dashboards to provide insights at scale, solving for business priorities.
Collaborate with cross-functional stakeholders to formulate and complete full cycle analysis that includes data gathering, analysis, ongoing scaled deliverables and presentations.
Help Google to focus on key decisions to improve products and services.

Google is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. See also Google's EEO Policy and EEO is the Law. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know by completing this form.",4.5,"Google
4.5","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1998,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
190,Data Analyst - Machine Learning,$34k-$64k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

With more than 2,500 locations nationwide, Public Storage is the leader in the self-storage industry, and given our number of tenants, we may very well be the world's largest landlord. We've experienced unprecedented growth over the past four decades, and it's in no small part due to the dedicated team that has helped us become an S&P 500 industry leader, the country's largest real estate investment trust (REIT), and the most recognizable name in self-storage.

Job Description

We are currently looking for a Data Analyst to join our Data & Analytics practice in Glendale, CA.

The Data Analyst will use both business domain and technical skills to establish empathy and understanding with a business owner in order to propose meaningful solutions with a measurable outcome.

The Data Analyst will assist business owners with a triage of opportunities, as well as delivering the storyboard for completion. The will perform any required EDA (including but not limited to visualization) and establishes the guidelines for both user acceptance and project success criteria and be responsible for measuring and quantifying enterprise outcomes (Increase rev, Optimize cost, Improve productivity)

Responsibilities

Triage opportunities by estimating benefit and effort.
Capture the business requirements in the form of a storyboard to set a shared vision of the outcome
Create mock-ups to communicate acceptance criteria and outline a minimally viable product (MVP)
Sets or compromises work scope for speed of execution and learning with multiple stakeholders
Communicate effectively with the Data Engineer on specific data requirements and the Data Scientist on models as driven by the business needs, documented on storyboards, detailed use cases and product requirements etc
Act as project or product manager as needed for success

Qualifications

Bachelors in physics, social/economics, or business with a strong technical acumen
4-6 years of experience or any equivalent of experience and post graduate education.

Knowledge Skills & Abilities

Strong verbal communication skills: ability to effectively communicate cross functionally.
Understanding of visualization to highlight the narrative and impact … the problem and the so what.
Strong command of programming and scripting languages: SQL, Python and R
Passionate about visual storytelling via visualization code – leveraging matplotib, ggplot, shiny, bokeh, etc.
Ability to perform general network troubleshooting and leverage open source analytical and EDA libraries
Capable of performing key functions of a data engineer (SQL) and a data scientist (EDA, interpreting a model)

Additional Information

Public Storage offers competitive compensation program, in addition to medical, dental, vision, life, LTD, STD, AD&D, 401(k) with company matching, FSAs for healthcare and dependent care. Public Storage is an equal opportunity employer.

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

Relocation assistance is not available for this role.",3.4,"Public Storage
3.4","Glendale, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1972,Company - Public,Real Estate,Real Estate,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
191,Data Analyst,-1,"ABOUT THE COMPANY:
Our client is the number one software company indigital marketing efforts who just reported a record revenue in the 3rd quarter 2020!

Job Title: Data Analyst
Location: San Jose, CA
Duration: 5+ months

Responsibilities:
Write complex SQL queries to analyze large-scale data sets.
Use Big Data best practices to enable working with terabyte-scale data sets.
Create dashboards in tableau.
Apply statistical methodologies and data mining skill sets on large volume of data
Analyze data and provide insights to senior executives.
Basic understanding of A/B testing concepts.
Qualifications:
3-6 years of experience.
SQL Expertise.
Hadoop expertise.
Can work in hive, pig etc
Create dashboards in tableau.
Experience working with MS Excel.
Understanding of statistics concepts
Ability to interpret data and present
Excellent written and verbal communication skills

IND123",4.5,"Ursus
4.5","San Jose, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
192,"Senior, Measurement Data Analyst",$65k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary

Performs data analysis to ensure a consistent, timely flow of accurate measurement data in compliance with contractual requirements, industry standards and company policy. Reviews measurement data for accuracy and makes necessary edits of data. Resolves questions and problems using principles for measurement in accordance with standardized processes, Enable Measurement Standards Procedures and AGA/API standards. Develops recommendations to improve measurement processes based on analysis.

This position requires comprehensive knowledge within a functional area. Work is performed under general direction and is reviewed upon completion for adequacy in meeting objectives and to ensure compliance with processes, standards and policies of the organization. Provides technical solutions to a wide range of difficult and complex problems. Solutions are imaginative, thorough, practical, and consistent with the objective of the organization. May train and mentor less experienced professionals.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

• Analyze, process and edit data used in the determination of measurement volume and energy quantities.
• Develop, maintain and analyze queries, databases and spreadsheets to provide accurate measurement data.
• Identify volume discrepancies at major delivery and receipt measurement points and resolve problems for internal and external customers.
• Analyze and process prior period adjustments.
• Implement and monitor quality measurement data methodologies, processes and procedures.
• Partner with other team members, management, Measurement Engineers, Field Operations Technicians and SCADA team to resolve data and balance discrepancies.
• Apply skills and concepts to ensure data integrity, data reliability and data accessibility throughout department/company.
• Collect, organize and review measurement data from diverse data sources. Take corrective action to resolve data discrepancies. Prepare reports and summaries.
• Produce and maintain data specific to measurement.
• Produce procedures to document data sources and analysis methods relevant to measurement.
• Serve as a source of expertise on reporting systems and data sources.
• Analyze department data and reports.
• Analyze large data sets to ensure reliable, accurate and timely measurement data.
• Provide feedback to field operations on technical data gathering processes and accuracy.
• Conduct compliance reviews of technical documents and processes.
• Compile, track and report on department performance metrics.
• Provide input to system and/or process design.
• Write and review technical documents.
• Act as a resource for less experience analysts.

Minimum Education & Experience

• Bachelor's degree. In lieu of a degree, six (6) years' relevant experience will be considered.
• Five (5) years' relevant experience (2 years must be directly related to Measurement).

Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

• Comprehensive knowledge of gas measurement principles.
• Ability to distill data into concise and easily understood concepts and recommendations.
• Comprehensive data management skills; ability to format, model and analyze large data sets.
• Knowledge of federal, state and local regulations (i.e. AGA, GPA, API, FERC, SOX).
• Comprehensive knowledge of natural gas and liquid operations.
• Ability to effectively handle pressures and demands of deadlines and competing priorities.
• Ability to handle confidential information and material with the highest degree of professional responsibility.
• Comprehensive skills in computer applications, databases and reporting software: FlowCal, Business Objects, Crystal Reports, Microsoft Office suite (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Outlook, SharePoint).
• Strong collaboration skills in order to partner effectively across various levels of the organization.
• Strong knowledge of the organization, processes and customers.
• Work independently; with guidance in only the most complex situations.
• Ability to discern data inaccuracies through technical experience and knowledge.
• Strong interpersonal and presentation skills.
• Strong organization and process improvement skills.
• Strong analytical skills; ability to recognize, analyze and solve complex problems.
• Demonstrate commitment to compliance with applicable laws and regulations, company’s ethics code of conduct and other company policies and procedures.
• Respect and follow safety policies and regulations; scan the environment for objects or people who may pose a safety risk; encourage others to utilize safe and healthy work practices.

Physical Requirements

• Sedentary to light work exerting up to 10 pounds of force occasionally, and/or negligible amount of force frequently to lift, carry, push, pull or otherwise move objects.
• Ability to view computer screen, sit, stand or walk for long periods of time.
• Ability to operate a computer, copy machine, fax machine, calculator, telephone and other miscellaneous office equipment.
• Ability to work in a constant state of alertness and in a safe manner.

Working Conditions

• Ability to produce quality work in fast paced environment with high daily pressure to meet deadlines.
• Ability to work non-standard work hours as needed or required to meet established deadlines.
• Ability to work indoors, in an office environment, regardless of whether cubicle, open office or private office.
• Ability to travel occasionally to work or field locations, and/or to attend meetings or training, including overnight stays.
• Subject to normal office noise levels.",3.5,"Enable Midstream Partners
3.5","Oklahoma City, OK",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Oil & Gas Exploration & Production,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
193,Senior Marketing Data Analyst,$82k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Terrific 6+ month contract opening in Plano, TX for a Senior Marketing Data Analyst and Concept Planner. Will work on a team responsible for developing concept proposals to showcase new styling and technology and address future customer needs. Team is also in charge of developing a customer-centric full line product portfolio that will allow the company to meet sales and compliance objectives in the future.

This is a highly analytical role focused on a marketing/business analytics perspective. Will assist in developing the business strategy for the group based on data analysis, using the latest in data analysis tools.

Responsibilities include:
• Help provide strategic guidance, insight and knowledge about market trends, consumer attitudes, competitors and the success of company products.
• Identify, develop, and deliver core product recommendations with customer-first focus.
• Perform detailed quantitative analyses using mTAB, PAI CSQ, PIN, Polk and other available resources to support strategic recommendations.
• Work closely with affiliate companies, including designers and parent company.
• Prepare and deliver presentations summarizing sharp insights and conclusions, often for executives
• Partner closely and collaborate with data management teams, strategy teams, and other analytics resources across multiple functional teams.

Requirements:
• 5+ years of product development experience with a history of delivering successful products across the full product lifecycle.
• 2+ years of experience with hands-on data analysis and providing data driven insights.
• 2+ years of experience with Business Intelligence and analytical tools such as Tableau, Power BI, Alteryx, etc.
• Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite (especially PowerPoint & Excel PivotTables & Graphs)
• Ability to present fact-based recommendations in a clear, logical, and concise way; “tell a story” with data.
• Ability to analyze, organize, and integrate large amounts of complex data into clear and concise presentations and status reports.
• Critical thinking and conceptual problem-solving abilities with a strong attention to detail.
• Great communication and interpersonal skills, with demonstrated ability to develop and manage cross-functional.
• Prefer experience and knowledge of the automotive industry.
• Bachelor’s and/or Master’s Degree in Business, Marketing, Mathematics, Computer Science or Statistics, with significant quantitative coursework.",4.2,"Matrix Resources
4.2","Plano, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
194,Data Analyst,$40k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Aerospace

Job Description

The Data Analyst is responsible for data entry and maintenance for integrating and uploading data into the SAP environment. As part of the Data team, this position is responsible for the accurate entry of data into SAP. The Data team is responsible for the efficient and effective management of part number master data. This will require an individual with good attention to detail, intermediate to advanced computer skills and ability to develop processes documents.

WHAT YOU'LL DO TO BE SUCCESSFUL:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required
Product Data – Responsible for managing product information levels to established standards
Maintain data to meet company standards and quality of information
Data includes images, technical specifications and other data elements
Manually populate non-automated data as necessary
Identify system enhancements to improve processes
Perform audits to ensure accuracy of assigned manufacturers or categories
Communicate with data providers to ensure complete product data is supplied
Request necessary information
Identify areas of improvement and provide feedback
Ensure materials are created correctly via download process
Create materials via proprietary systems and/or SAP
Process internal requests for creation
All other assigned duties
SKILLS NEEDED:
Associates degree or above from a college or university; or 3 years industry work experience.
Intermediate to advanced spreadsheet skills
Ability to analyze and troubleshoot information for resolution
Ability to work well in cross-functional teams
Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment
Assisting in establishing best-practices and development of content that improve the efficiency
Ability to meet aggressive service-level agreements
Ability to take a complex process or technology and create easy-to-follow copy
Excellent written and verbal communication, with strong editing skills
Proficiency with MS Word, Excel, Outlook and SAP
Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups
Ability to understand processes and identify areas of improvement
Ability to multi-task and demonstrate organizational details

Qualifications

Associates degree or above from a college or university; or 3 years industry work experience. data analysis and SAP

Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.7,"Infotree Service Inc
3.7","Fairfield, OH",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
195,Junior Data Analyst,-1,"Designation
Junior Data Analyst

04-Feb-2020

SR Number
UFS-/UFS-/2019/1143055

Country
USA

No. of Positions
3

Auto req ID
608493BR

Experience
1-3 Years

Skill (Primary)
Support Competencies (BSERV )-Verify/Validate-compliance audit

Qualification
Diploma

Location
Colorado

Job Family
Delivery Transaction

Employee Group
Business Line Hourly

Job Description (Posting).
Generates and maintains all process related financial dats . Manages adhoc reporting requests & manages reporting for the team,Identify and track the unmeasured areas keeping and maintaining quality standards as per the defined quality norms,Innovation and Kaizen,Training & Self Development,Solution Mindset . (1.) Bringing new ideas and Process Improvement (2.) Improving skill level through Self development / nominating training programs
Skill reverification Tests (3.) Individual should have ability to provide solutions commensurate with the customers’ needs within the ambit of the given environment so as to lead to business results. (4.) Meet the defined Quality Scores as defined by the process. (5.) To consistently meet or exceed CSAT parameters as defined for the process.

Entity
BSERV",3.5,"HCL Technologies
3.5",Colorado,-1,10000+ Employees,1991,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
196,Warranty Data Analyst,-1,"Warranty Data Analyst #418167*
Job Description: *
Creative problem solver, proactive in the identification and resolution of vehicle quality issues.
Responsible for taking the lead role in identifying warranty issues from the field for clear problem definition.
Research warranty data for issue identification and document appropriate communication information.
Work with cross functional teams and/or assembly plants to track issue resolution.
Assure timely and effective containment and permanent corrective actions are established.
Basic Qualifications*:

1) A minimum of a bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Science, or other technical disciplines

2) A minimum of 4 years’ experience:
Understand regulations surrounding regulatory emissions warranty and defect reporting.
Releasing parts - Understand cradle to grave concept of a part to being placed a vehicle.
Successful in facilitation of forming cross functional teams and managing action plans.
Understand legal documentation, but ability to speak technically and in simpler terms
3) Proven leadership and project management skills

4) Facilitate, guide, pushing activities to successfully meet deadlines

5) Comfortable communicating regularly with outside agencies or executive-level management

6) Self-motivation to train on company specific systems working in a virtual setting.
Preferred Qualifications: *
MBA or advanced engineering degree
Emissions related background/experience
Powertrain calibration experience
Experience with code or federal regulation in mobile/vehicle emissions and fuel economy testing
Vehicle testing background - chassis dyno testing and an understanding of coast down testing
Additional Info: *
At Fast Switch – Great Lakes (FSGL), Our Purpose is Our People and Our Planet. We come to work each day and are reminded we are helping people find their success stories. Isn’t that cool? Also, Doing the right thing is our mantra. We act responsibly, give back to the communities we serve, and have a little fun along the way.

We at FSGL, have been doing this for 22 years with pride, dedication and plain old-fashioned hard work.

We're a financially strong, privately held company that is 100% consultant and client focused.

We've differentiated ourselves by being fast, flexible, creative and honest. Throw out everything you've heard, seen, or felt about every other IT Consulting company. We do unique things, and we do them for Fortune 10 companies, Inc. 500 companies, and technology start-ups.

Our benefits are second to none and thanks to our flexible benefit options you can choose just the benefits that you need or want, options include:
Medical and Dental (Fast Switch pays majority of the medical program)
Vision
Personal Time Off (PTO) Program
Long Term Disability (100% paid)
Life Insurance (100% paid)
401(k) with immediate vesting and 3% (of salary) dollar-for-dollar match
Plus, we have a lucrative employee referral program and an employee recognition culture.

One of our pride points as that in 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018 and 2019, Fast Switch was named one of the Top Work Places in Michigan by the Detroit Free Press.

To view all of our open positions, please go to: https://clientapps.jobadder.com/45103/fast-switch

Follow us on Twitter at: https://twitter.com/FastSwitchGL

Follow us on Instagram at: https://www.instagram.com/fastswitchgl/

Find us on LinkedIn at: https://www.linkedin.com/company/fast-switch-great-lakes

And you can become a fan of Fast Switch on Facebook at: https://tinyurl.com/v4p9yy7

Job Type: Contract

Pay: Up to $1.00 per hour",-1,Fast Switch - Great Lakes,"Auburn Hills, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
197,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Title: * Data Analyst
Department: * Data Analytics
Reports To: * Division Director of Data Analytics
FLSA Status: * Non-exempt / Full time
Salary Range: * $50,000 - $65,000 annually
Prepared By: * Chief of Staff
Approved By: * Executive Director
Last Modified: * 2020-8-12
Job Summary *
• As a Data Analyst you will assist the Division Director in delivering data driven solutions to healthcare and public safety organizations. The ideal candidate shall turn data into information, information into insight, and insight into actionable deliverables.

• You should have demonstrated experience with SQL, MySQL, and PostgreSQL databases including use of server tools. You will be part of a small cross-functional, agile team where you will have continued opportunity to learn and grow.

• You will help determine end user requirements, develop project plans, perform data functions, and create reports and visualizations. You will be responsible for system maintenance such as software updates, user management, data standardization, and system performance improvements.

• We look for self-starters who thrive in a fast-paced, agile environment – which means wearing many hats, being able to change direction quickly, and showing an eagerness to learn new technologies as the need arises. And most importantly – we look for people who can prioritize, multi-task, and deliver.
Responsibilities *
• Develop and maintain reports, dashboards, and data extraction routine
• Perform data analysis, data validation, and data mapping/design
• Develop database queries, views, and stored procedures to support analytics
• Use statistical methods to analyze data
• Determine user needs and design appropriate analytical solutions
• Acquire, extract, transform, clean, and filter data
• Develop and update technical documentation including database documentation, standards, procedures and data dictionaries
• Maintain detailed, tiered user accounts insuring proper data access
• Maintain data analytics platforms and databases
• Provide technical support and problem resolution for analytics platforms
Qualifications *
• Undergraduate Degree (BA or BS) in Data Analytics, Statistics or a related field from an accredited college or university

• Tableau Server and Desktop development and maintenance experience required

• Experience with and a solid understanding of SQL, MySQL, and PostgreSQL databases including use of server tools

• Strong mathematical and statistical knowledge
• Understanding of database structure and data modeling
• Adept at creating queries including quality assurance and optimization
• Strong personal computer skills, (i.e., Word, Excel, Power Point, etc.)
• Experience with Crystal Reports required
• Healthcare or Public Safety experience is preferred
• Ability to work independently with minimal supervision
• Ability to work with time constraints and handle stressful situations
• Strong attention to detail with sound judgement
• Ability to collaborate and communicate effectively
Work Environment*
• Your choice between Mac or PC
• Work provided phone
• Work provided hotspot with unlimited data
• Stocked break room with complimentary snacks and drinks
• 401k with company match
• Works in multiple environments. Must possess physical and mental health to meet the demands of the position. Must be able to travel up to 25% and participate in various conferences, regional exercises, the Regional Medical Operations Center, and appropriate meetings related to state, regional emergency management and Acute Healthcare activities. Must be able to serve for extended periods of time, with high stress loads.
Competencies *
• Analytical - Collects / researches data; Uses intuition and experience to supplement data.
• Problem Solving - Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gathers and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions.
• Project Management - Develops project plans; Communicates changes and progress; Completes projects on time and within budget.
• Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively; Listens and gets clarification when needed; Responds well to questions; Contributes thoughts, ideas and suggestions.
• Written Communication - Writes clearly and informatively; Edits work; Varies writing style to meet needs; Presents numerical data effectively; Able to read and interpret written information.
• Teamwork - Balances team and individual responsibilities; Exhibits objectivity and openness to others' views; Gives and solicits feedback.
• Quality Management - Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness.
• Business Acumen - Understands business implications of decisions; Demonstrates knowledge of market and competition; Aligns work with strategic goals.
• Judgment - Exhibits sound and accurate judgment; Supports and explains reasoning for decisions; Includes appropriate people in decision-making process.
• Planning/Organizing - Prioritizes and plans work activities; Sets goals and objectives.
• Quality - Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness; Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Applies feedback to improve performance.
Code of Conduct: *
Employee follows the STRAC Code of Conduct, which are rules to guide us in our work to assure the highest standards of business ethics and compliance as follows:
1. Legal Compliance: * comply with federal/state laws
2. Business Ethics: * accurately & honestly represent the Organization and not defraud anyone of money, property or service.
3. Confidentiality: * protect confidential information
4. Conflict of Interest: * do not use position to profit personally
5. Business Relationships: * business transactions are free from offers or solicitation of gifts/favors
6. Protection of Assets: * preserve assets by using resources prudently and effectively
7. Patient Rights: * respect and support patient rights to privacy & treatment
About the Southwest Texas Regional Advisory Council *
The Southwest Texas Regional Advisory Council (STRAC) is designated by the Texas Department of State Health Services (DSHS) to develop, implement and maintain a regional trauma and emergency healthcare system for the 22 counties in Trauma Service Area P. TSA-P has a mixture of urban, suburban, rural and frontier counties, including the 7th largest city in the United
States to the International Border with Mexico. The region encompasses over 26,000 square miles in southwest Texas. STRAC is one of twenty-two regional advisory councils in Texas that comprise the Texas Trauma and Emergency Healthcare System.

The Southwest Texas Regional Advisory Council, together with its leadership, members and staff, strives to maintain its reputation as a preeminent leader in regional healthcare coordination within Texas and across the United States. Working collaboratively alongside EMS providers, hospital and healthcare system leadership, as well as local governments, STRAC leverages its consensus based approach to innovative program development that has led to cutting edge improvements in regional emergency healthcare, including its Regional Prehospital
Whole Blood Program, Regional Communication and Coordination Center (MEDCOM), Mental
Health Patient Navigation System alongside our Law Enforcement Partners and the Texas
Emergency Medical Task Force.

STRAC is a 501c3 non-profit, tax-exempt member organization consisting of 74 general and specialty hospitals, including 2 Level I Trauma Centers, 16 PCI centers, 12 Stroke centers, air medical providers, and over 70 Fire and EMS agencies.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Monday to Friday
On Call
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
San Antonio, TX 78227 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
Strac.org",-1,Southwest Texas Regional Advisory Council,"San Antonio, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
198,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description: Analyze and interpret financial risk data for Beshton, its customers, and its partner companies using expertise in economics and statistics; Develop software and mathematical tools to evaluate loan applications and risk management, design statistical methods and algorithms for use in tools; Identify trends in financial data and risk factors for businesses, process large amounts of collected data and make use of increased data points to increase forecasting accuracy; Design Artificial Intelligence and machine learning models, apply modeling to Beshton’s data analysis tools and services; Evaluate the algorithms and methods in risk management software to validate results and verify the accuracy of calculations; Present software deliverables to management and client companies, make changes to analysis tools based on software requirements; Report analysis results using internal tools, provide statistical visualizations and in-depth reporting that translates data into business insight. Requirement: Minimum a Master’s Degree in Economics/Econometrics. Apply send email to career@beshton.com",4.0,"Beshton Software
4.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
199,Data Analyst,$46k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Jackson Family Wines is much more than a family owned wine company. We're risk-taking innovators with a strong belief that quality is paramount. We're always on the lookout for top talent -- individuals who possess a strong work ethic, commitment to quality and share our beliefs in healthy lands and a healthy community. In 2019, we were selected as one of the North Bay Business Journal's Best Places to Work for the fifth year running.

SUMMARY

Data Analyst

The Data Analyst position will capture, manage, analyze, and apply customer knowledge to help Jackson Family Wines win, support and retain customers. To succeed, this person will partner with Direct-to-Consumer teams to define, develop, deliver and support technology solutions that align with department goals and business strategy. This includes capturing customer data from all sources, managing across customer-facing systems and functions as well as partner with Business Analysts to obtain actionable insights.

A successful candidate will have proven experience in producing reporting, dashboards and visualizing insights; expertise in pattern mining and business analytics. This role requires both a broad knowledge of existing data mining and processing along with the creativity to invent and customize as needed.

Responsibilities
Proficient in the analysis, design, development, debugging, and support of data ecosystems including data management, governance, and ETL integration processes to generate insights
Participates in the development of statistical and predictive models and leveraging machine learning algorithms
Take ownership of both recurring/standardized reporting as well as ad hoc projects and requests
Lead the analysis of transactional and customer data, including cross-tabulations and statistical analysis, provide insights into purchasing patterns, develop hypotheses about trends, and translate results into actionable recommendations for business partners
Responsible for business analytics work through all phases, including data quality, data analysis, data visualization, and presentation of results and deliverables
Design and create scalable BI analytic solutions that provide insights into business KPIs. Analytic solutions to cover data acquisition, storage in data warehouse, automation, and visualization of insights
Quantify the impact of DTC sales and marketing initiatives on customer success and future behavior
Develop reusable analytics and assets working closely with the Data Warehouse/BI team to ensure scalability of analytical outputs
Build relationships with customers and peers and work closely with them to influence the design of acceptable solutions
Qualifications
Ability to operate comfortably, and effectively, in a fast-paced, highly cross-functional, rapidly changing environment
Intermediate to advanced experience with an enterprise reporting/BI platform (Power BI preferred)
Proficient with SQL, creating stored procedures, and data models
Advanced knowledge of relational Database Management Systems (RDBMS)
Proficient at creating, testing and supporting ETL processes with modern integration tools
Experience with R, Python, or similar scripting language
Knowledge of statistical and predictive data models
Ability to work effectively with data, BI developers and consumer research and insights partners to meet the data needs of the business, translating business needs into analytical requirements
Desire to take proactive ownership of the accuracy and timeliness of reported data
Education: Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics, Economics or related field

Experience: 3-8 years of exemplary experience in a business analyst, data analyst or similar role. Wine industry and/or CPG experience preferred.",3.8,"Jackson Family Wines
3.8","Santa Rosa, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
200,Data Analyst,$66k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our Mission

Move people.

Our Values

We are independent. Creative. Gutsy. We aren’t afraid to dream big. We are accountable. To our customers. To our cities. To each other. We are humble. Human. Lighthearted. We take our work seriously, but not ourselves.

Mobility is the lifeblood of urban environments and cities need affordable, emissions-free transportation options that are free of delays. We believe that shared electric mopeds will become an integral part of transit networks, filling gaps not served by bike share, car share, scooter share, or public transit.

About the role

We’re looking for a data scientist who can quickly and easily learn their way around a variety of data structures and technology. With access to warehouses of real-time geospatial data as well as business operations data, this role will work with the rest of the Data Science team to develop both predictive and descriptive reporting, visualize data, and automate associated processes. You will report to the Senior Analyst, Data Science and Analytics.

Requirements

Technical
2-3 years experience working as a data scientist/data analyst
An applied understanding of machine learning and other modeling techniques
Experience working with large data sets - Geospatial Data experience is required
Strong knowledge of R, Python and SQL, particularly Postgres and PostGIS
Experience with data visualization tools
Familiarity with AWS services such as Kinesis, S3, EC2, RDS, and Redshift
Ability to quickly understand new technologies and data environments
Experience with a Unix-based operating system
Non-technical
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to summarize key findings into clear and actionable recommendations, and to interact with individuals at all levels.
Strong project management skills and ability to plan and prioritize work in a fast-paced environment.
Sense of urgency and an ability to multitask
Team player and willing to pick up extra responsibilities as required
You are enthusiastic, reliable, and hardworking
You take your work seriously but not yourself
Responsibilities
Understand business needs across multiple tiers (for example, executive, operations and logistics, business strategy, customer acquisition and retention)
Build deep knowledge of relevant internal and external data repositories
Translate data into meaningful and insightful information for business users via appropriate tools
Work collaboratively with operations, customer success, marketing, product, finance, and other departments to help answer questions and define KPIs
Prioritize and respond to ad hoc requests for information from the business and productionalize as necessary
Build and automate visualizations and reporting",3.7,"Revel
3.7","Brooklyn, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
201,Data Analyst,$37k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"SUMMARY

A mid-level position in the finance department reporting to the Senior Data Analyst or Financial Analysis Manager responsible for developing and overseeing various data management, analysis, and reporting solutions for key stakeholders across the organization.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES The following statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by an individual assigned to this job. Other duties may be assigned.

• Provide support to teams and management by creating, maintaining, and analyzing reports to identify issues, trends, and opportunities.

• Collaborate with various departments to determine reporting needs as well as develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize efficiency and quality while driving business growth.

• Streamline existing, and introduce enhanced, modeling, reporting, and analysis solutions that leverage large, complex data sets derived from multiple sources.

• Interpret data model and report results and communicate meaningful insights to senior and executive management in a non-technical manner.

• Seek out new sources of data for incorporation into existing collection, analysis, and reporting workflows.

• Educate end users about features and functions of new reports and dashboards.

• Ad hoc requests, special projects, and other duties, as necessary.

EDUCATION/YEARS EXPERIENCE

• Bachelor’s degree in data science, analytics, statistics, economics, business, or other quantitative field.

• 1-2 years experience with data management, modeling, visualization, and analysis.

REQUIREMENTSTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES

• Capability of programming in SQL as well as R and/or Python (VBA and DAX a plus) and demonstrated experience working with large relational databases.

• General understanding of database design and development, data sources, and data feeds used to populate reports and dashboards.

• Familiarity with applications used to support data analytics, data visualization, and report and dashboard development such as Tableau, Power BI, and JD Edwards EnterpriseOne One View Reporting.

• Strong grasp of applied statistical tools and methodologies, including effective research design.

• Proficiency in Microsoft Office with advanced knowledge of Excel and Access.

• Exceptional interpersonal, analytical, problem-solving, and organizational skills with the capacity to handle multiple, high-priority projects with a keen attention to detail.

• Experience in the trading card, memorabilia, or toy/game industries highly preferred.

• Excellent oral and written communication skills with an ability to interface with all levels of the organization.

• Energetic intellectual curiosity with a desire to learn and apply new skills.

• Committed to contributing to a collaborative, adaptable work environment focused on team success.

• Ability to handle confidential or otherwise sensitive information with appropriate discretion.",2.7,"Upper Deck
2.7","Carlsbad, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1988,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
202,Data Analyst,$44k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"HR Pundits has an exciting mid-level opportunity for a Data Analyst. This is an excellent opportunity to work with our IT Solutions Team especially in technologies like ERP Applications, Web Applications and so on.

Required Skills:
• Bachelor Degree in computer science engineering, or information
systems and/or equivalent formal training or work experience
• Experience with Data Warehouse technologies
• Excellent SQL skills: extensive experience querying large, complex data
sets• Strong and clear understanding of database design and Data Warehouse
modeling
• Extensive experience with Extract, Transform and Load (ETL) of Data
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills

Duties
• Perform detailed data exploration and validation to support data
analysis
• Perform data analysis and data mappings across various systems. Create
data models
• Liaise with Business users to understand their requirements and
document in the form of Business Requirements Documents.
• Conduct Joint Analysis and Design (JAD) sessions with technology for
various enhancements to be implemented in the warehouse.
• Provide analytical support by writing complex SQL queries.
• Perform data quality checks on various data elements available in the
warehouse.
• Develop ETL technical specifications and recommend, design, develop,
test, implement, and support innovative and optimal data solutions.
• Provide strategic vision, architecture and road map for Enterprise Data
Warehouse platform across all platform technologies and align with
business and technology requirements.
Well known for the casual, team-oriented work environment that values initiative and enterprise, we are consistently looking for talented and ambitious individuals to join our team. For a deeper glimpse into HR Pundits, take a look at our website www.hrpundits.com. HR Pundits is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",2.0,"HR Pundits
2.0","Schaumburg, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
203,Data Analyst,$44k-$77k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Analyst, the primary responsibility is to acquire and transform clinical and health data from Inovalon’s technical platforms and databases to create impactful, dynamic, and insightful healthcare data analytics such as opportunity analyses, pharma reports/ extracts and program evaluation studies, customer reporting, product development, and ad-hoc analytics.
Responsibilities: *
Performs detailed statistical analyses and modeling of clinical and operational data with outputs that are clear and relevant to the users;
Participates in the design and development of analyses and reports that explore and present large amounts of data to discover underlying patterns and trends related to quality, safety, and clinical performance;
Works with information from a variety of sources, including the Specialty Pharmacy and Pharma data, and other sources using a variety of highly-specific tool such as, but not limited to, Oracle, SQL or Tableau;
Develop requirements for data mapping and data loading processes. Execute data mapping/loading requirements and reconciliation of such activities;
Assist with the design of data integration strategies, develop intuitive designs, and build enterprise interactive dashboards with built in guided healthcare data analytics;
Identify and research anomalies and outliers in data. Identify problematic areas and conduct research to determine the best course of action to correct the data;
Monitor and perform trend analysis for the company and research report on anomalies Maintain compliance with Inovalon’s policies, procedures and mission statement;
Maintain compliance with Inovalon’s policies, procedures and mission statement;
Adhere to all confidentiality and HIPAA requirements as outlined within Inovalon’s Operating Policies and Procedures in all ways and at all times with respect to any aspect of the data handled or services rendered in the undertaking of the position; and
Fulfill those responsibilities and/or duties that may be reasonably provided by Inovalon for the purpose of achieving operational and financial success of the Company.
Qualifications: *
At least 3 years of experience in data analytics, data science, or related field;
Experience with data management and visualization tools, such as SQL and Tableau, Power BI, and Oracle APEX;
Possession of strong analytical / statistical skills used in evaluating and analyzing data;
Strong organization skills and attention to details, comfortable working with minimum direction;
Adaptable to changing organizational requirements and priorities and supportive of a diverse work force;
Ability to collaborate with others in diplomatic, tactful manner, while exercising sensitivity and discretion as needed;
Specialty Pharmacy and/ or Pharma Industry Experience is preferred;
Advanced PC skills (Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Visio, and other programs); and
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Bachelor’s degree in Information Systems, Computer Science, Statistics, Analytics, or a related field of study;
Physical Demands and Work Environment:
Sedentary work ( i.e. sitting for long periods of time) Exerting up to 10 pounds of force occasionally and/or negligible amount of force;
Frequently or constantly to lift, carry push, pull or otherwise move objects and repetitive motions
Subject to inside environmental conditions; and
Travel for this position will include less than 5% locally usually for training purposes.
Inovalon provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
data analytics, data science, or related field: 3 years (Required)
data management and visualization tools (e.g., SQL, Tableau): 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Canonsburg, PA 15317 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
inovalon.com
Work Remotely:
No",2.6,"Inovalon, Inc.
2.6","Canonsburg, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
204,Data Business Systems Analyst,-1,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Kforce has a client in search of a Data Business Systems Analyst in Hillsboro, OR.

Duties:
Assist in the strategic and business planning process from a financial perspective for organization: target setting, budgeting, forecasting, analysis, and financial planning
Look for opportunities to combine, divest, or enhance internal processes
Communicate capacity plan strategy and create plan for resource acquisition throughout the year
Maintain plans for resource impacts to maximize the recommendations to meet customer commitments and meet financial effectiveness of plans (e.g. vendor supplied resources, city planning)
Reconcile resource plan to time records and make recommendations to meet customer commitments and meet financial objectives
Communicate Scorecard targets, periodically re-evaluate & run reports bases on actuals vs. goals
Coordinate with other IT teams regarding metrics reporting processes
Utilize influencing skills to coach MT/LT in the development of action plans to address improvements necessary to meet targets
Ensure accurate and timely status reports, time reporting, and scorecards
Ensure SOX and compliance processes are followed throughout the organization
Ensure organization is aligned with GIT/GOT SOX processes and compliance initiatives
REQUIREMENTS:
Expert Excel
Business Requirements
Data Analysis
Data Integrity
Database
Database Design
Additional:
Tableau
SQL
Languages: English (Speak, Read, Write)
Typical Office: This is a typical office job, with no special physical requirements or unusual work environment
With a commitment to innovation, this client employs some of the world's top engineers and designers! It was ranked as one of the 'Happiest Companies to Work For' and awarded an 'Employees' Choice Award 2018 Best Place to Work' by Glassdoor. Its culture thrives by embracing diversity and rewarding imagination. If you would like to make a difference globally and locally, apply now.

Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,"Kforce
4.1","Hillsboro, OR",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
205,Data Analyst,$48k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Req ID: 101396

NTT DATA Services strives to hire exceptional, innovative and passionate individuals who want to grow with us. If you want to be part of an inclusive, adaptable, and forward-thinking organization, apply now.

We are currently seeking a Data Analyst to join our team in Falls Church, Virginia (US-VA), United States (US).

Job Responsibilities Include:
Data migration strategies/approach [analyze/define/build/test]
Familiar with Agile methodology, discovery phase project management process (Discovery Phase project development process includes defining the purpose, requirements gathering, sitemap, architecture build specifics, value proposition, and overall project delivery)
Data analysis of legacy systems and assist with the preparation of a physical data model;
Collect business rules from functional consultants/business users to form the mapping rules
Work closely with business users to fill in data templates; explain technical data issues
Identification of data quality (data inconsistencies/data duplication) issues
Fine tuning the data loaders to achieve the best performance
Perform unit testing and integration testing
Responsible for coordinating activities related to infrastructure implementation. Involves a high degree of activities with Systems Integration.
Reviews all technical and architectural design from the SI
Ensures that SI adheres to standards and practices
Schedules and facilitates all meetings of review committees that may be required
Plans for and ensures that infrastructure resources are available for ongoing project activities and for production operations
Accountable for team deployment, execution of project deliverables and the achievement of customer satisfaction.
Basic Qualifications:
Minimum of 6 years’ experience with data extraction, data cleansing, data mapping, data harmonization, data enrichment, data consolidation, data loading and data reconciliation
BS/BA in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, Business, Physical Science, or other technology-related disciplines.
US Citizenship
Preferred Skills:
experience with Courts Case Management
INDPUBLIC

About NTT DATA Services

NTT DATA Services is a global business and IT services provider specializing in digital, cloud and automation across a comprehensive portfolio of consulting, applications, infrastructure and business process services. We are part of the NTT family of companies, a partner to 85 % of the Fortune 100.

NTT DATA Services is an equal opportunity employer and will consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, gender, disability, age, veteran-status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other class protected by law.

Nearest Major Market: Washington DC
Job Segment:
Database, Consulting, Information Systems, Computer Science, Project Manager, Technology",3.4,"NTT DATA
3.4","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,1967,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
206,Data Analyst,$56k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"About GameChanger:

We believe sports are important because they encourage leadership, teamwork, responsibility, and confidence—critical life lessons that have the power to propel young athletes toward meaningful futures. GameChanger recognizes that without coaches, parents, and volunteers, organized youth sports could not exist. We celebrate those dedicated heroes and make it our mission to help them do what they do best.

GameChanger is a technology company providing team management, scorekeeping, and live fan experiences that keep athletes connected with the team community. With GameChanger, coaches and parents can organize and follow their athlete's journey in a simple and powerful way.

We're headquartered in downtown Manhattan and are proud to be part of the DICK'S Sporting Goods family.

The Role:

We are looking for a Data Analyst to embed within a cross-functional team alongside product, engineering, marketing, and design. In this role, you'll develop metrics and generate insights to help guide decision-making, with the goal of building better products. The Data Analyst role is perfect for someone who is curious and creative, with the ability to learn new skills to get the job done. You'll use and grow your excellent collaboration and communication skills to translate business questions into data questions, and then deliver findings to broad audiences.

You will:
Own the measurement of new product features, transforming the data in the warehouse, and reporting the results
Work with product managers to define meaningful metrics
Build data visualizations and dashboards that clearly communicate findings
Identify opportunities for experimentation and recommend appropriate methodology
Generate hypotheses for future product features
Translate ad-hoc requests into reusable data tools that can scale to answer broader questions
Mentor cross-functional teammates to level up as consumers and users of data
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree (or equivalent) that includes some quantitative coursework (economics, statistics, research methods, etc.)
2+ years in a cross-functional or stakeholder-focused data role
Proficiency writing SQL and working with relational databases
Experience with BI tools (we use Looker) and data visualization
Excellent written, verbal, and graphic communication skills with both technical and non-technical colleagues
Optional Experience:
Cross-functional experience at a consumer software company
Knowledge of statistical concepts (experimental design, confidence intervals, regression analysis, causal inference, A/B testing)
Some proficiency in Python, R, TypeScript, or other scripting languages
Version control & GitHub
The Perks:
Be part of a diverse team of genuinely kind individuals dedicated to improving the lives of our customers.
Flexible full-time remote and occasional work from home options.
Benefits include medical, vision, prescription, dental, FSA/HRA, and coverage for family/dependents.
Generous maternity / paternity leave policy.
Well-furnished, modern office with a rich supply of snacks and drinks.
Commuter Benefits.
Learning opportunities including clubs, lunch tech talks, conference attendance, and participation in hack days.
Organized lunches and team outings.
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.4,"GameChanger
4.4","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
207,Data Analyst,$47k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"RigUp is changing the way work is done. Each one of our teams exists to move us closer to our north star -- “to empower the people who power the world.” The Analytics team at RigUp is hiring a Data Analyst who will be responsible for helping RigUp make data-driven decisions to unlock growth.
We are looking for a strong data analyst to come join RigUp and help us drive analytic insights and best practices at scale from the ground up. Success in this role comes from marrying a strong data background with acute product and business acumen to deliver highly strategic and compelling insights that accelerate our business growth and influence our product decisions.

Our ideal candidate for this role will be someone who is excited by the challenge of being part of a rapidly changing and maturing data environment and enjoys solving complex and ambiguous problems. Sound like you? Keep reading
What you'll be doing:
Support RigUp’s rapid growing business and product teams
Work with multi-functional teams to define requirements for ad-hoc data analysis and reporting, being able to work independently to propose solutions to address business or product needs
Bring a sophisticated level of statistical and quantitative analysis to enable growth for RigUp
Own the design, development, and maintenance of ongoing metrics, reports, analyses, dashboards, etc. to drive key business decisions
Build metrics and reporting functions to measure and monitor operational efficiency
Apply industry knowledge to interpret data and improve company performance
Use an understanding of business strategy and analytics to move our company forward
Assist with new business or product experimentation including design, roll-out, and monitoring
Work to mature RigUp’s company-wide data environment

What you should have:

Minimum 4 years of experience in a similar role
Advanced degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Economics
2+ years of SQL experience (Hive, Spark, and other big data tools a plus)
2+ years of Python experience (experience in R a plus)
Proven execution and impact on initiatives that cross multiple product areas and work with leadership and product teams
Background in data visualization and reporting, using open source libraries/packages and third-party tools (Tableau or similar)
Able to drive complex projects to successful completion
Able to identify stakeholders, establish relationships, and influence others to get work done
Strong verbal and written communication, and presentation skills
Excellent judgment, critical-thinking, and decision-making skills; can balance attention to detail with swift execution

Perks:

Flexible PTO policy
401k Program with 4% match
Fully paid employee health insurance for employee
Open office space in the heart of downtown Austin
RigUp is a technology company that's building a platform to better support the energy workforce. Through the industry’s largest marketplace, we’re improving the lives of contractors and helping service providers and operators find the people who will get the job done. Headquartered in Austin, TX, and backed by a16z, Founder’s Fund, Quantum Energy Partners, and Silicon Valley Bank, we’ve raised $423.8 Million in funding to support our mission to change the way work is done in the energy field.

Our goal is to make RigUp an environment where any and all people feel welcome, respected, and free to be their authentic selves. We welcome applicants of all gender identities, sexual orientation, educational background, religion, ethnicities, veteran status, and citizenships. We’d love to learn what you can add to our team!",3.2,"RigUp
3.2","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
208,Marketing Data Analyst - Spectrum Enterprise,$52k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"At a glance:
Are you an experienced marketing reporting and analytics professional skilled at translating reporting requirements and developing custom reports?
Can you commit to a position performing deep-dive analyses to address key business issues and presenting findings to stakeholders at all levels of the organization?
Do you desire a competitive salary with lucrative benefits and a focus on professional development?
Our company:

At Spectrum Enterprise, our goal is to foster an engaging work environment that encourages our team members to reach their full potential. We promote a culture of excellence that celebrates diversity, innovative thinking and dedication to consistently exceeding client expectations.

Spectrum Enterprise, a part of Charter Communications, Inc., is a national provider of scalable, fiber technology solutions serving Americas largest businesses and communications service providers. The broad Spectrum Enterprise portfolio includes networking and managed services solutions: Internet access, Ethernet access and networks, Voice and TV solutions. Spectrum Enterprises industry-leading team of experts works closely with clients to achieve greater business success by providing solutions designed to meet their evolving needs. More information about Spectrum Enterprise can be found at enterprise.spectrum.com.

Highlights:

You are passionate about empowering business leaders with concise, high-quality information and assisting them in leveraging it to identify and address business opportunities and threats. As a Marketing Data Analyst, you focus on managing a program of business unit-focused initiatives designed to assist business partners drive value from information. You ensure that business needs and goals are realized by building reports to track key metrics, empower stakeholders with analytics and investigate key performance indicators (KPIs). You improve initiative outcomes by providing consultation on the interpretation of data to various business partners.

You drive project success by collaborating with key stakeholders to translate reporting requirements and the development of custom reports. You perform deep-dive analyses to address key business issues and present findings to stakeholders. You improve key metrics and marketing KPI outcomes through proactive recommendations for new tests and initiatives. You excel at guiding your program in an office environment while interacting with multiple teams across Spectrum Enterprise. You report to the Director of Marketing Analytics and Reporting for goals, guidance and assistance.

Position benefits:

Competitive Salary with Bonus.
Health, Vision and Dental Insurance.
100% Company Match 401(k) up to 6%.
Company Funded Retirement Accumulation Plan for an additional 3%.
Education Assistance.
Pretax Child Care Spending Account.
Paid Holidays, Vacation Days, Personal Days and Sick Days.
Employee Discount on Spectrum Services Where Available.
What you will do:
Ensure the success of projects and initiatives by communicating data trends and insights to all levels of the company in a clear and concise manner.
Work closely with stakeholders to gather detailed reporting and analysis requirements, recommend and identify metrics and KPIs, create reporting and visualization mockups, translate into data requirements and gain approval.
Ensure successful user adoption by presenting data in a fashion that is easy to understand with the proper documentation.
Align business needs, timelines and department standards by working with cross-functional teams.
Promote efficiency by working with the reporting automation team to automate reporting and analyses.
Perform additional duties related to this position as assigned.
Required keys for success:
Relevant reporting and analytics experience
Prior experience and passion for leveraging data to drive significant business impact
Intermediate statistical knowledge and intuition ideally utilized in A/B or multivariate testing or related analytics
Beginner to intermediate SQL skills
Strong presentation skills with the ability to speak to large groups
Sound critical thinking abilities in data analysis and process
Detail-oriented and attention to quality
Solid team and relationship building skills
Proven prioritization and organizational skills with the ability to manage multiple projects and assignments in a fast-paced environment
History of understanding complex business processes and rules to gain business acumen
Familiar with data visualization standards and techniques to visually summarize data and insights
Proficient in Microsoft Excel
Effective written and spoken English communication skills with all levels of an organization
How you will stand out from the crowd:
Experience with cable TV, internet or phone products and services or other related industry
Hands-on experience with reporting and BI tools, such as MicroStrategy and Terradata
Proven report development skills using basic and advanced Excel power user features
Understanding of the business-to-business (B2B) marketing and sales funnel data
Knowledge of Salesforce data and structure
Familiar with data, metrics, analysis and trends and applied knowledge of measurement, statistics and program evaluation
Distinctive issue resolution skills with various technologies
Advanced skills in deriving analytical insights and presenting on PowerPoint, Datorama, Tableau or Microstrategies
Expertise with multi-touch attribution, user journey analysis and media performance tracking
Previous experience with account base marketing (ABM) tracking and reporting
Your education:
Bachelors Degree in economics, mathematics or business administration or an equivalent combination of education, training and experience (required)",3.0,"SPECTRUM
3.0","Stamford, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,2016,Subsidiary or Business Segment,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1
209,Data Analyst,-1,"Company Description

null
Job Description

Data Analyst

Summary

An IT Data Analyst is responsible for working as part of a team to create, enhance and maintain

custom reports that are relied upon to run the business effectively and efficiently. An IT Data

Analyst is also heavily involved in the ETL process by helping to identify source systems for

required data and assisting in the building of data cleansing procedures.

Duties/Responsibilities

· Develop custom reports to address business needs

· Conduct exploratory meetings with business partners to generate ideas on how data and reporting can be used drive operational efficiencies, as well as new business opportunities

· Participate in all aspects of Scrum, including but not limited to daily stand-ups, estimation meetings, demos and retrospectives

· Work with vendors and the internal software development team to retrieve and manage required data

· Design tables in the data warehouse in such a way that enables drilldown reporting

· Create and update stored procedures that are part of the ETL process

· Assist in the automation of manual data analytic efforts

Qualifications

Qualifications

· Degree in Data Analytics or equivalent experience

· 2+ years creating reports in a BI tool

· At least 1 year of professional experience writing queries in SQL/T-SQL

· At least 1 year of professional experience working in a relational database

· PowerBI experience a plus

· Strong analytical skills

· Detail oriented with the ability to multitask

· Self-motivated individual with excellent written and verbal communication skills

· A willingness to work both independently and in a team-oriented environment

Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",5.0,"HireTech Group
5.0","Bedford Heights, Cuyahoga, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
210,Data Analyst,$69k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Role We are looking for a highly skilled and motivated Data Analyst to support our Supply Chain Organization by analyzing and visualizing data to make more educated decisions on how to successfully launch and scale our various global programs. In particular, you will be the lead for ensuring that the large supply chain datasets we have are effectively utilized by the global supply management team. You will be part of a team that is managing strategic projects and continuous improvement efforts across all of Tesla Purchasing. You will interact with stakeholders across all levels of the organization, including our Global Supply Managers as well as executives on a regular basis and hence require the ability to compartmentalize requests and formulate applicable data-driven solutions. You will require a sharp business focus, a collaborative style of working, and a proactive and critical mindset. Excellent interpersonal, communication, and writing skills are crucial, as is the ability to synthesize complex issues, drive desired outcomes. Tesla is a fast moving, dynamic environment where flexibility and adaptability are key attributes. The successful candidate is a self-starter with a passion for data analytics and continuously demonstrates an ability to tackle complex problems and implement solutions. Responsibilities Create reports and data visualizations to guide decision-making across the purchasing team Act as the purchasing liaison for all internal data analysis requests and coordinate requirements with cross-functional teams Make data and reporting updates as needed to ensure accuracy Communicate reporting outcomes and improvement areas effectively Lead data analytics vision for global supply management by thinking strategically and considering Tesla’s global supply chain structure Develop data-based solutions to complex purchasing challenges and be able to present relevant information in non-specialist forum Apply out of the box thinking, problem-solving abilities and operational supply chain experience to derive solutions Independently handle multiple projects at a time meeting objectives and deadlines As data analyst lead, document relevant timelines as well as deliverables and present to project steering committees Requirements Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field and/or equivalent experience or evidence of exceptional ability Expert in data analysis, visualization, and communication, with prior full-time work experience in relevant area Experience creating dashboards/visualizations using, e.g. Tableau (or similar) Proficiency with SQL, and comfort with Python Detail-oriented/relentless, willing to find cracks in the system to expose problems High proficiency with Microsoft Windows and Office applications, particularly Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint Strong organizational skills and the ability to prioritize and manage multiple projects simultaneously with complex and demanding deadlines Exceptional communications, strategic thinking, and interpersonal skills Ability to present complex issues in a clear and concise manner Tesla participates in the E-Verify Program",3.5,"Tesla
3.5","Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2003,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
211,Data Analyst,-1,"Job ID#:
8698
Job Category:
Information Technology
Position Type:
Contract
Duration:
6 mos+
Shift:
1

Details:
Visium Resources has been asked to identify candidates for the following contract position in Orlando, FL:
Summary:
Utilization of Informatica Data Quality to evaluate, identify problems with current data sets, monitor, and lead the remediation effort. Will collaborate with internal data stakeholders and technical staff to define data quality requirements; and will present data quality findings and recommendations to internal and external data stakeholders.
Responsibilities:
Understand data sources, data flows, and end-user data
Perform detailed data analysis and profiling using Informatica Data Quality (IDQ)
Extensive experience in developing SQL query for data analysis
Present data quality metrics and trends to internal and external stakeholders facilitating discussion of data issues, root causes, and action plans
Create and maintain data quality documentation
Evaluate data quality dimensions: completeness, validity, accuracy, timeliness, consistency and integrity against the data quality rules and produce a data scorecard that display the key data quality characteristics
Deliverables: Data Quality Assessment Action Plan/ Summary Report, Scorecards, Other Reports ( Rules, Audit, Recommendation) and other deliverables as required.
Job Requirements
Minimum Security Clearance:
No Clearance
Details:
Qualified candidates would have the following:

Minimum of 3 years recent experience using the (Informatica Data Quality) products and using them to interrogate and remediate MS SQL data sets.
Minimum of 3 years recent experience with Microsoft SQL Server SQL language.





Visium Resources is an award-winning employment firm with a mission to match talented individuals with highly successful organizations. At Visium, our company’s success is based on your success. When you work with us, you are never “just a number”. You are our most important asset. Here, you will know us by name through our regular visits to client sites and even occasional luncheons. We will always be there when you need assistance and will always go the extra mile to ensure that you are as successful as possible. Whether you're looking for contract, contract-to-hire or permanent opportunities, we firmly believe there is no employment agency that will work harder for you than Visium.

Visium Resources is an equal opportunity employer and values diversity. All employment is decided based on qualifications, merit and business need.
#DS",4.9,"Visium Resources
4.9","Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
212,Product Development Data Analyst,$38k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary:

The Product Development Data Analyst will support Global Product Development project portfolio analytics and reporting within Fortune Brands Global Plumbing Group (GPG). They will assist with the design, implementation, administration, and continuous improvement of Product Development analytics capability required to reach the new product portion of GPG growth targets.

The scope of work includes expanding analytic capabilities within Global Product Development across project management and product engineering functions. This consists of enabling data-driven decision making by supporting the development and optimization of dashboard reporting for executive management, as well as communicating conclusions from aforementioned analytical solutions to a varied audience.

Job Description:

Responsibilities

Act as a point of contact for engineering reports, dashboards and other analytics that will help the global project management and engineering organizations make insightful decisions about the people, processes and products.
Under the direction of the Senior Project Portfolio Systems Manager, assume project/deliverable ownership for the full lifecycle (cradle to grave) for all relevant dashboards and reports.
Support the strategic decision-making processes by defining, monitoring and reporting key metrics; Continue to evolve key metrics as business strategies and objectives evolve.
Track, analyze and report on critical KPI’s on a regular cadence; Use data visualization (i.e. create dashboards, graphics and reports) to assist critical decision-makers in effectively interpreting data to arrive at insights.
Play a key role in generating solutions to complex product development problems by mining data and reports to yield relevant, actionable insights into improving product engineering processes and systems.
Provide technical subject-matter-expertise in evaluating technology changes that may advance capability.
Work with stakeholders in determining what analytical improvements are required to drive the achievement of their strategic and business objectives.
Identify the impact of potential changes, integrate new initiatives with existing processes, and ensure that all processes are consistent and fit together.
Work with IT and other stakeholders to communicate, test and deploy necessary configuration changes to software (upgrades).
Support ad hoc analysis requirements based on product development business priority

Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Mathematics, Data Science or an equivalent technical degree is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related analytics experience to include experience in the design and development of insightful portfolio dashboards and analytics.
Experience in the design and development of insightful portfolio dashboards and analytics; in depth knowledge of product engineering project ROI financial metric relationships and interdependencies required.
Proficient in the use of Microsoft Office Suite. Intermediate to Advanced Excel skills are preferred.
The following qualifications are preferred:
Experience developing reports using reporting tools and dashboards, such as BW Query Design, QlikView or Tableau
Experience with Product Development and Stage-Gate methodology
Experience with QlikView
Experience with SharePoint 2013
Experience with SAP R3 software
Experience in merging data from SAP R3 ERP platform with MS Project Server/SQL Server data, and Excel based financial models within QlikView analytics software required.
Demonstrated sense of urgency and ability to persevere to reach objectives for challenging problems.
Strong communication skills with experience presenting and translating data into decision-ready insights is preferred.
Strong interpersonal skills with the ability to collaborate in a team environment.
Demonstrated passion for learning, adoption of new technology, and independent decision making.
Must possess excellent organizational skills and be able to deal with fluctuating priorities; be a self-starter and work with minimum supervision
Ability to travel ~ 10%.",3.7,"Moen
3.7","Cleveland, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Wholesale,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
213,Data Analyst,$36k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Duties and Responsibilities:
Design reports in web-based analysis tools, Crystal Reports, and label systems
Client data loads into SQL database
Monitor business systems through queries to alert and resolve issues
Provide initial technical support and analysis to business users
On-boarding and testing of EDI trading partners in ERP system
Maintaining industry standards documentation
Skills and Specifications:
Knowledge of Microsoft SQL and how to write SQL queries is required
Proficiency with Microsoft SQL Server Management Studio
ETL (extract, transform, load) skills
Crystal Reports or SSRS
Microsoft Office (Excel, Word)
General knowledge of ERP systems and business processes
Education and Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in Information Systems, MIS, or Computer Science
Authorized to work for any company in the United States
Written and oral communication in English required
Must reside in the Toledo, Ohio area, no relocation available
Competitive Benefits Package:
Competitive compensation will be based on educational background
Health Insurance and company paid health care spending account
401(k)
Holiday, personal, and vacation paid time off",4.0,"Tech Group International
4.0","Toledo, OH",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
214,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description: *
Data Analyst job is to gather, organize data, identify trends, generate deeper customer insight and formulate recommendations to the Executive Team. This role requires knowledge of accounting, inventory tracking and data management that is used to assess sales trends, feedback, and market movement. Responsible for creating the metrics to evaluate sales efficiency and productivity via dashboards and reports.
Key Responsibilities: *
Data Analytics:

· Collaborate with the accounting and operations teams in measuring and analyzing product category performance, revenue forecasting and budgeting.

· Define and build dashboards and reports for different departments to help monitor KPIs and to help the Executive Team make well-informed decisions.

· Create graphs, infographics, and other methods to visualize data.

· Create presentations and reports based on recommendations and findings.

· Perform ongoing analysis to understand user behavior and provide actionable recommendations in different areas of the product.

· Assist in the identification and analysis of “slow-moving” and obsolete inventory positions and the financial and operational impact related to those positions.

· Assists in the investigation and audits cycle inventory counting variances. Aids in the resolution of issues.

Accounting:

· Monitor expenses and their adherence to budget. Perform ongoing analysis regarding budget to actuals.

· Aids in the preparation of budgets and forecasts.

· Analyze monthly cost and variance reports and prepare financial commentaries on various operating areas.

· Performs month-end and year-end closing duties including journal entries, accrual entries, and reconciliations.

· Provides other departments with ad-hoc reports based upon data outputs, as required.

· Maintains monthly Balance Sheet account reconciliations and analysis.

· Answers accounting and financial questions by researching and interpreting data.

· Ensures that all costs in the ERP system are updated. Assists with any cost verification or revaluation.

Operations:

· Provide and present detailed analysis of inventory utilization by all Sales Agents throughout the country

· Present Data Point Analysis of each Novastep product category as it expands and contracts at each existing level while providing PAR level forecasting to internal and external team members

· Track and analyze all field consigned inventory as it relates to tray utilization, implant kitting, expiration date and sales volume

· Provide present different data points to aid in implementing a structured process for managing short dated inventory in the field to limit product expiration

· Provide monthly presentation on profitability of product category as it is directly related to volume of inventory dispatched throughout different sales territories versus operational and marketing costs spent in each individual territory thus determining territory value to Novastep

· Find and present patterns in sales as to determine possible volume discounting and up-front purchase of implants and/or instrument trays

· Discover new ways to utilize and become the expert on our inventory management platform known as Enhatch
Qualifications (Education, Skills, and Experience; Required): *
· *Education: * Bachelor’s degree in Accounting, Economics, Stats/Mathematics, or Computer Science is required.

· *Experience: *

o At least 3 years of experience working on data integration, data analytics, data science projects.

o 3 plus years’ experience performing advanced analytics using large structured and unstructured data.

o 3-5 years in an analytical position with accounting experience.

· *Technical: * Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Excel is required (Pivot Tables, V-Lookups, Macros) and Microsoft PowerPoint.
Other: *
· Requires a strategic and tactical viewpoint, strong problem-solving skills, and a deep sense of curiosity.

· Solid conceptual understanding of methods in analytics and data science. Understanding of common roadblocks and technical challenges.

· Advanced multi-tasking and prioritization skills.

· Must maintain a high level of confidentiality.

· Flexibility on scheduling to complete month-end and year-end is required.

· ERP experience.

· Working Knowledge of foot medical device industry or medical industry is a plus.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $80,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Signing bonus
Work Location:
One location
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Novastep,"Orangeburg, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
215,Data Analyst,$55k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position: Data Analyst

Agency: New York City Employees’ Retirement System’s (NYCERS).

Project Name:Information Technology (IT) Division.

Duration: 3 Years

Project Description:

NYCERS seeks one (1) Data Analyst with ETL Expertise to work with the Information Technology (IT) Division for a period up to 36 months. NYCERS reserves the right to hire the candidate(s) as an employee, at no additional cost, after a period of six (6) months. The Data Analyst will primarily be responsible for detailed field level analysis, profiling and mapping of the current IBM z/VSE Mainframe VSAM files loaded into SQL tables.

Mandatory Skills:
Candidates must meet all the requirements below to be considered for this position.
Minimum of five (5) years of source-to-target data mapping experience in a mixed Mainframe, relational database and object storage environments.
Experience creating and/or maintaining ETL applications.
Experience migrating mainframe VSAM files to relational and/or dimensional SQL databases.
Experience working in multiple development environments/systems: IBM Mainframe, Windows Server, UNIX and SQL Server.
Strong SQL knowledge working with complex queries and stored procedures.
Proficiency in mainframe applications encompassing COBOL, VSAM and DB2.
Experience creating data dictionary documentation and data definitions/domains.
Excellent interpersonal, communication, presentation, writing, analytical, problem solving, and information gathering skills along with fundamental technique troubleshooting abilities.
Strong analytical skills demonstrated by the ability to receive and analyze requirements and propose a suitable solution that adheres to the team’s methodology.
Preferred Experience:
Experience with Data Quality/Profiling tools.
Experience extracting business rules from the existing legacy code.
Experience with Data Warehouses and/or Data Marts.
If this isn’t the role for you, perhaps you have a friend or colleague that would be a fit. I would appreciate your help forwarding this to people in your extended network that may be interested in exploring the opportunity.

I look forward to hearing from you soon.

--

Regards,

Asim Ghafar

Technical Recruiter.

ZDAAS

1107 North Point Blvd, Ste 228

Baltimore, MD 21224

Office: 443-836-4932 X 1004

Cell: 239-666-8767

hr3@zd-techsolutions.com",4.4,"ZDAAS
4.4","Brooklyn, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
216,Data & Reporting Analyst,$38k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB SUMMARY
This position is responsible for managing specific data and reporting to better assist management in maximizing resources in various departments or lines of business. Responsible for creating and producing forecasts, reports, ad hoc requests, dashboards, etc. in order to provide insights to determine operational impact, trends, and opportunities.

MAJOR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Conduct data analysis in support of a variety of analytic solutions

Capture, develop, and document data definitions, business rules, and data quality requirements

Integrate data from multiple sources to produce requested or required data elements

Create and produce forecasts, reports, ad hoc requests, dashboards, etc.

Interpret data, analyze results, and provide insights to determine operational impact, trends, and opportunities

Develop reports and deliverables for management and communicate with all levels of stakeholders

Identify and define data quality improvements

Create and maintain report forms and formats, information dashboards, data generators, canned reports and other end-user information portals or resources

Ensure compliance with deliverable reporting requirements by performing quality data audits and analysis

May create specifications for reports based on business requests

Perform other duties as requested

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Ability to read, write, speak and understand English
Ability to prioritize and organize effectively
Ability to work independently, as well as in a collaborative and dynamic team environment
Ability to handle multiple projects and priorities
Ability to analyze and interpret data
Ability to quickly identify business problems/opportunities
Ability to communicate orally and in writing in a clear and straightforward manner
Ability to communicate with all levels of management and company personnel
Ability to manage multiple projects at one time
Ability to document, prepare and present data-driven presentations
Knowledge of software applications such as Word, Excel, etc.
Excellent knowledge of SQL

Education
Bachelors degree in business or related field

Related Work Experience Number of Years
Data analysis and reporting or related experience 2+

WORKING CONDITIONS
Office environment

EOE
Charter Communications is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Minority/Female/Veteran/Disability",3.0,"Spectrum
3.0","Louisville, KY",-1,10000+ Employees,2016,Subsidiary or Business Segment,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1
217,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

Expertise.com connects over 8 million consumers annually to the best local experts in their area, whether they need a dog walker, financial advisor, or wedding photographer. With over 200,000 providers across more than 200 different industries, we dive deep into figuring out what makes a professional the best in their area of expertise and how to help the reader find the professional best for them.

We're looking for a Data Analyst based in the Los Angeles (Encino) area to join full-time. You will be joining Expertise.com at a formative time where there is large amounts of data being gathered (including site analytics, Google rankings, marketing operations, and more), but little of it exposed to the business. You will play a major role in tapping into this data to help shape & define the business strategy and execution plan going forward.

What You’ll Do

Influence business strategy by discovering and exposing compelling data insights
Translate data insights into actionable recommendations, balancing strategic objectives and tactical optimization
Ensure data integrity by testing and comparing similar data sources
Build and refine models to support business growth, such as pricing and forecasting
Consult with business leaders in Sales, Marketing, Operations, Content and other team members, helping define the business strategy

What It’ll Take

2 to 5 plus years of experience in a data-oriented role
Highly skilled in building queries using SQL & analysis in Excel
Experience building visualizations in tools such as Tableau, Qlikview or PowerBI
Experience with Salesforce SOQL (APEX is a plus)
Experience with Python and API creation a plus
Must be intellectually curious, extremely detail oriented and passionate about learning new technologies
A hands-on, team player with a positive outlook, an entrepreneurial spirit, the capacity to thrive in ambiguity, and the willingness to adapt to the needs of the business
Ability to work with diverse remote teams.
B.S. in engineering, economics, applied math, stats or any other quantitative field (preferred)

Who We Are

We’re a small but rapidly growing team driven by a bias-to-action mentality, balanced with a sense of humor.
We love to problem-solve creatively while keeping a sharp focus on the important drivers of the business.
We prioritize relentlessly to ensure that whatever we're working on is vital to our business' growth
We’re results-focused, but not afraid of failure as we lean into change and pursue our goals.
We’re open to new ideas and not afraid to break the status quo

Powered by JazzHR

IaAChcvYfa",-1,Expertise LLC,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Contract,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
218,Data Analyst,-1,"Who we are Atreca is an integrated biotechnology company located in South San Francisco, California (moving in 2021 to a new campus in San Carlos, CA). We apply our proprietary drug discovery platform to profile clinically relevant, active B cell responses in patients receiving successful treatment and, in turn, develop a portfolio of antibody therapeutics against novel tumor targets with the potential to treat large patient populations. Atreca seeks talented, driven individuals who are dedicated to making a positive impact on human health and are motivated to become key members of a growing biotechnology company. Position Summary We are seeking a talented Data Analyst to design and develop reports and analyses from our R&D database. The information you deliver will drive key research and development decisions by scientific stakeholders. Your strong communication skills and scientific knowledge will enable you to work collaboratively with a diversity of cross functional scientific team members to develop meaningful, rich views of drug discovery data. In addition to directly creating such views using your expertise with reporting tools such as R markdown or shiny apps, you will serve as a liaison between the research team and the software engineering team, providing project management support and writing specifications for any engineering work required in support of reporting. Duties and Responsibilities In collaboration with scientists and other stakeholders, identify R&D data to capture in our database and develop reports and analyses Maintain a prioritized list of reporting projects Coordinate effort between stakeholders and software engineers to ensure on time development and delivery of reporting projects Develop reports using R markdown or shiny apps Train employees how to follow company standards and procedures when creating reports. Develop reports for data quality cleaning and monitoring Ensure high quality of reports, proactively detecting and resolving errors in reports Required Skills and Qualifications Degree in Computer Science, or Biology related field Minimum of 3yrs informatics experience in Biology related field working with data Strong R, SQL and RDBMS skills Previous experience in data reporting Previous experience as an analyst Excellent interpersonal and organizational skills Extensive computer software skills Strong candidates will have training in statistics Strong candidates will know Python or another scripting language Exact title commensurate with experience. Atreca is an equal opportunity employer.",4.5,"Atreca
4.5","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
219,Data Analyst,-1,"The core responsibilities for this position are:

• Design and maintain a system of databases using SQL and custom forms used to collect data from all facets of the business

• Train employees in data entry

• Ensure data collection and entry compliance

• Analyze collected data using Excel or R

• Use Power BI to create dashboards and present data to CEO, Director of Operations, and all Department Heads

• Work with department heads to implement new software and technologies and make data-based decisions

• Learn to use various software packages and offer support to other users

• Create predictive models for production, sales, purchases, maintenance and other areas

Requirements:

• Fluency in R and SQL are necessary

• Excellent analytical, problem-solving, organizational, computer, and people skills

• A bachelor's degree in data analysis, computer science, math, physics, statistics, actuarial
science, or a related field",2.0,"Stahmanns Pecans
2.0","La Mesa, NM",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
220,Data Analyst,$43k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),Please send your resume and cover letter to careers@boost-hc.com,2.1,"Boost Healthcare Consulting
2.1","Alameda, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
221,Data Analyst,-1,"Looking for a job is never easy. You take the time to prepare your resume, fill out countless online applications, only to now wonder when someone is going to reach out to you. With Helpmates, you have a partner that is here to walk you through the difficult job search, moving quickly in helping you find work. For over 45 years, we have been helping countless job seekers find the right work opportunity for them. What’s the difference? It’s our award winning service, nationally recognized safety programs and qualified CSP staffing professionals that help us earn unique and exclusive connections that you won’t find anywhere else. Experience the Helpmates difference!

The Data Analyst will be responsible for ongoing analysis of client, policy, exposure, and loss information, obtained from a variety of different sources. It involves development and preparation of information and reports for management, associates, and other custom built applications. The Data Analyst will be responsible for ongoing analysis of client, policy, exposure, and loss information, obtained from a variety of different sources. It involves development and preparation of information and reports for management, associates, and other custom built applications.

Job Duties:

Become subject matter expert in industry-related data
Pull and compile data from multiple, non-standardized sources
Recognize data issues and work with providers of data to resolve problems
Generate standard and ad hoc reports on a regular basis
Develop and support new analytical tools and reports
Provide consulting, training, and technical support as need for data intensive projects
Deliver projects accurately and on time
Prepare spreadsheets, graphs, charts, diagrams, and other illustrative tools used in presentations
Communicate results to internal and external clients in a consultative manor
Provide exceptional customer service and adhere to the company philosophies
Examine and interpret a wide variety of data/information to make recommendations or decisions

Requirements:

Bachelor’s degree in mathematics, statistics, computer science, economics or related field; or equivalent education and/or experience.
1-2 years of analytical experience strongly preferred
Superior attention to detail
Advanced proficiency with Microsoft Office applications (Excel, Outlook, and PowerPoint)
Advanced proficiency with Microsoft Excel spreadsheet applications (array formulas, if-then statements, v-lookup, and pivot tables)
Strong mathematical and statistical aptitude (rates, percentages, statistical analysis)
Familiarity with BI Reporting Tools and Data Warehouse analysis preferred (Cognos, QlikView, SQL)
Demonstrated analytical, critical thinking and problem-solving skills, including research and investigation, to develop results oriented solutions
Ability to quickly grasp new concepts and applications
Ability to examine and interpret a wide variety of data/information to make recommendations or decisions
Demonstrated effectiveness in working with multi-functional teams in a technical production environment
Ability to communicate complex technical concepts effectively, both verbally and written
Ability to multitask without sacrificing the quality and accuracy of project deliverables
Aptitude to develop unique, creative, and efficient work products. Challenges current procedures to implement alternative methods to streamline and improve work products.
Assumes ownership for individual projects. Self-motivated to actively seek solutions to problems without supervision.
Prioritize heavy workloads to meet time sensitive deadlines while handling several projects
Works effectively individually and cooperatively in a team-oriented group setting. Promotes open participation.

Testimonials that reflect the Helpmates Difference:

“Communication stands out as being one of Helpmates' biggest assets. They’re always quick to provide updates, respond to requests, and just overall pleasant to work with. When we were recruiting for this year's peak season, I felt like we were all working as a team which is a reflection of the attention Helpmates gives to building partnerships.” - Helpmates Client

“[My recruiter] satisfied my standards on so much of what I was looking for in all aspects. I can always call or email and she responds quickly! Love their dedication and personality.” – Helpmates Specialist

Helpmates is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). We will consider for employment all qualified Applicants, including those with Criminal Histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (FEHA).

IND2",3.4,"Helpmates Companies
3.4","Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1972,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
222,Data Analyst,-1,"To apply for a position at HealthWorks, please forward cover letter, resume and salary requirements to [email protected].
Data Analyst
Location: Herndon
Full-time

Responsible for supporting the Informatics and Reporting Manager in developing, implementing, and facilitating methods of extracting and analyzing patient information using the electronic medical record (EMR) and reporting systems. The ideal candidate will have the ability to work effectively both as a team member with multiple departments, as well as independently, in a very fast paced, high energy setting. Strict health information security and confidentiality are required.
Qualifications/Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in HIT/Informatics or equivalent education and work experience required
Experience working with clinical staff in a health care setting, and in analyzing patient and population health information using IT systems
A basic understanding of clinical decision processes, reporting, data analysis, and safeguarding of personal health information
Expert computer and EMR skills to include advanced Excel skills and a working knowledge of ICD-10 and CPT codes
Strong orientation to problem solving, detail, accuracy, deadlines, and customer service
Strong oral, written, and data visualization communication skills are fundamental to ensuring all reporting requests are fully and accurately delivered and interpreted
Ability to work flexible hours as needed for special projects to include Uniform Data Systems (UDS) reporting
Ability to work autonomously and as part of a team to ensure a high level of service delivery; all staff are expected to function within a",4.5,"HealthWorks
4.5","Herndon, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Private Practice / Firm,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
223,Data Analyst,$53k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Details Level Experienced Job Location Agoura Hills - Agoura Hills, CA Position Type Full Time Education Level 4 Year Degree Salary Range Undisclosed Travel Percentage None Job Shift Undisclosed Job Category Admin - Clerical Data Analyst JOB SUMMARY: Creates functional specifications from business requirements and defines business processes. Serves as a primary liaison between Business and IT. Authors use cases and test cases. Is directly involved with the installation, modification, testing, implementation, documentation and maintenance of purchased vendor software and developed solutions. Gathers and analyzes data in support of business cases, proposed projects, systems requirements, and provide solutions and recommend best practices. Responsible for creating SSRS reports, developing ad-hoc SQL queries, dashboards using BI tools such as Tableau, and providing end user training. Applies proven communication, analytical, and problem-solving skills to help maximize the benefit of IT system investments. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: Develops working relationships with a diverse group of business people and gains an understanding of the complex nature of the company’s business. Maintains familiarity with the business plans of the company and the departments serviced. Leads design sessions in identifying business requirements needed for selecting new systems for the purpose of enhancing business processes, operations, and information process flow. Creates system design proposals. Provides creative solutions to user areas and also contributes ideas to improve the function, reliability and quality of services from IT. Coordinates and performs in-depth tests, including end-user reviews, for modified and new systems, and other post-implementation support. Ensures compatibility and interoperability of in-house computing systems. Maintains knowledge of current Data Warehousing, Business Intelligence (Tableau) and Reporting tools (SSRS). Understand statistics and statistical analysis. Take ownership of designing and building end to end BI solutions using SQL Server, T-SQL, SSIS and Tableau Are able to produce visualizations of data to clearly communicate ideas. Development experience in at least one scripting language (R or Python preferred) Gathers and analyzes reporting needs; identifies and analyzes data systems; designs reports and assists in the design and implementation of a reporting infrastructure to support the business reporting needs. Responds to elevated Help Desk Tickets in a timely manner. Provides orientation and training to end users for all modified and new systems. Supports IT Team in planning and implementing backup, security or disaster recovery actions. Maintains a professional awareness of tools and techniques that might be used to improve the quality of service. Conducts research on software and hardware products to justify recommendations and to support purchasing efforts. QUALIFICATIONS: Technical Competencies: Bachelor in Computer Science, Information Technology or related field preferred and 4+ years of work experience in the field. Hands-on experience using Tableau to create impressive visualizations Proven experience in Databases and Data Relationships particularly Microsoft SQL Server including T-SQL and SSIS Development experience in at least one scripting language (R or Python preferred) Good working knowledge of manufacturing business systems Strong organizational and communication skills. Experience working in manufacturing environments is a plus. (ERP). Good verbal, written and listening communication skills. Demonstrated ability to troubleshoot and solve problems and to communicate with and support clients. Able to communicate technical information to non-technical people effectively. Proven ability to work across organizational boundaries to identify business information needs and to implement applications that fulfill them. Core Competencies: Ethics, Values, Integrity & Trust - Adheres and acts in line with CPI core values. Functional/Technical Skills - Possesses high level of skill, knowledge and ability in assigned functional area. Safety – Complies with company safety rules and regulations. Takes a proactive approach to identify and eliminate safety hazards. Customer Focus - Gives high priority to customer satisfaction. Interpersonal Skills - Uses diplomacy and tact. Uses collaborative skills. Action Oriented & Adaptability - Takes initiative; acts promptly; is proactive. Ownership & Accountability - Proactively models, guards and demonstrates all of CPI’s core values. Priority Setting, Planning & Organizing- Uses resources effectively and efficiently. Problem Solving & Creativity - Uses logic and methods to solve problems with effective solutions. Develops new and unique ideas. Listening, Informing and Written Communications - Practices attentive and active listening. Shares information. Presents ideas and facts clearly and effectively in writing. PHYSICAL/ENVIRONMENTAL REQUIREMENTS: Works on computer majority of the day. Ability to lift up to 25 lbs. to move computers, equipment, etc. as needed. Some travel (domestic and international) may be required both by automobile and airplane. May have to perform duties in tight spaces (phone closet, etc.). Must be able to work flexible hours.",3.4,"Chatsworth Products
3.4","Agoura Hills, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
224,Senior Data Analyst,$85k-$115k (Employer Est.),"About Sysco Labs

Sysco LABS is a technology-focused division within Sysco, dedicated to reimagining foodservice through innovation. An extension of Sysco’s commitment to deliver exceptional products and services to the foodservice industry, Sysco LABS uses customer and market intelligence, data-driven insights and agile technology development to rethink the entire foodservice ecosystem.
Our innovation will improve everything from the ordering process, inventory, pricing and automation to the in-restaurant customer experience. Operating with the mindset of a startup and backed by the authoritative expertise of an industry leader, Sysco LABS’ mission is to improve the Sysco customer experience and consistently deliver cost savings and new innovations through technology.

About the Role

As a Senior Data Analyst at Sysco Labs, you will be responsible for driving strategies and tactics to optimize Sysco products using quantitative data, find answers to broad questions, identify patterns and trends, and make informed decisions to influence product strategy and direction.

Responsibilities
Utilize a combination of exploratory and descriptive analytics to inform product strategy and roadmap, and provide ad-hoc analyses that uncover root cause of recent business trends.
Understand data infrastructure and coordinate with Data Engineering to deliver data models and structures to meet business demands.
Design relevant data models, including outlining dimensions and measures needed, for answering business questions.
Establish and implement product data standards and best practices in order to optimize the data collection, fidelity and accuracy. Develop product measurement plans and dashboards to monitor metrics and KPIs.
Ensure optimization and validations initiatives are implemented, tracked and reviewed postproduction.
Shape, explore and publish data for business analysis or stakeholder initiatives using core Business Intelligence (BI) tools.
Maintain a presence in the broader data and analytics community.
Shape, explore and publish data for business analysis or stakeholder initiatives using core Business Intelligence (BI) tools, such as Tableau and Redash.
Other duties as assigned.
About You

Minimum Qualifications:
6 years’ experience in using data and analytics to drive decisions and insights.
Experience with SQL.
Experience with MixPanel or Google Analytics.
Experience with digital marketing tools such as Google Search Console, Adwords, Marin, Google DoubleClick stack, Tealium, or similar.
Experience with Tableau
Experience with JavaScript tag management.
Experience with Python Analytics/Viz packages.
Experience with R-Studio.
Experience with Data Mining tools such as RapidMiner, Opera, ProM, or similar.
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in mathematics, statistics, computer science or related field.
Experience with programmatic media.
Experience with structured and semi-structured data.
Perks at Sysco LABS:
Competitive base & bonus packages
Fun, casual, fast-paced work environment filled with talented colleagues
Brand-new high-tech office space located in the heart of East 6th St, (walking distance to the MetroRail)
Generous PTO policy
Flexible work environment that encourages work/life balance
Fully stocked break room & weekly catered lunch
Excellent medical, dental and vision benefits and company 401(k) program
At Sysco LABS you will be part of a team that values trust, learning, and working together to solve problems. Your efforts will help to build groundbreaking experiences for our customers. Come join us!
We embrace diversity and equal opportunity in a serious way. We are committed to building a team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. The more inclusive we are, the better our work will be.",4.1,"Sysco Labs
4.1","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
225,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"**Not able to use 3rd Party Agencies***
Senior Data Analyst
Our client is seeking Senior Data Analyst to join their team.

Key Responsibilities
Business and Technology primary point of contact for Applications Data Capture (as it relates to Application Lifecycle Management).
Work with the business & technology teams to explain data requirements for capturing Applications information.
Act as a cross-functional connection between engineering leadership and architecture.
Provide guidance and partner with engineering leadership and architecture teams by applying knowledge of data design.
Analyze existing and new data to ensure consistency, correctness and completeness.
Query datasets from various data sources and perform ad-hoc data analysis.
Investigative analysis on functional pain points (data capture process gaps).
Help establish and maintain processes to support massive data capture at scale and ensure data is kept up to date.
Work with developers to align dataset design with report design.
Partner with enterprise data management and strategy on governance and stewardship.
Participate in data definition and data management reviews.
Partner with QA in test planning activities, especially in data integration efforts.

Requirements for the position include:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Computer Science or equivalent; 3 years of additional relevant experience in lieu of a degree.
3 years of experience in Data Modeling and design.
3 years of experience in data analysis, business analysis or system analysis.
Strong knowledge of Relational and Dimensional data modeling concepts.
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment where change is a constant.
Ability to handle ambiguous requirements.
Strong data analysis and communication (verbal & written) skills.
Proficient in database design, implementation and maintenance.
Demonstrated ability to influence critical business outcomes in a matrix based, global environment.
Strong networking skills and ability to work across multiple organizations to accomplish diverse goals.
Excellent communication skills in both formal and informal settings.
Self-starter with high motivation and passion.
Self-organize, speak up when blocked or need help.

Benefits are available to eligible VanderHouwen contractors and include coverage for medical, dental, vision, life insurance, short and long term disability, and matching 401k.

About VanderHouwen
VanderHouwen is an award-winning, Women-Owned, WBENC certified professional staffing firm. Founded in 1987, VanderHouwen has been successfully placing experienced professionals throughout the Pacific Northwest and nationwide. Our recruitment teams are highly specialized in either Technology and IT, Engineering, or Accounting and Finance career markets. Our recruiters value building meaningful, professional relationships with each candidate as well as developing honed knowledge of companies' staffing needs and workplaces. Partner with us to land your next exciting career.

VanderHouwen is an Equal Opportunity Employer and participates in E-Verify. VanderHouwen does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local, state or federal civil rights laws.",4.2,"VanderHouwen
4.2","Hillsboro, OR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1987,Private Practice / Firm,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
226,Data Analyst,$53k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Details Level Experienced Job Location Agoura Hills - Agoura Hills, CA Position Type Full Time Education Level 4 Year Degree Salary Range Undisclosed Travel Percentage None Job Shift Undisclosed Job Category Admin - Clerical Data Analyst JOB SUMMARY: Creates functional specifications from business requirements and defines business processes. Serves as a primary liaison between Business and IT. Authors use cases and test cases. Is directly involved with the installation, modification, testing, implementation, documentation and maintenance of purchased vendor software and developed solutions. Gathers and analyzes data in support of business cases, proposed projects, systems requirements, and provide solutions and recommend best practices. Responsible for creating SSRS reports, developing ad-hoc SQL queries, dashboards using BI tools such as Tableau, and providing end user training. Applies proven communication, analytical, and problem-solving skills to help maximize the benefit of IT system investments. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: Develops working relationships with a diverse group of business people and gains an understanding of the complex nature of the company’s business. Maintains familiarity with the business plans of the company and the departments serviced. Leads design sessions in identifying business requirements needed for selecting new systems for the purpose of enhancing business processes, operations, and information process flow. Creates system design proposals. Provides creative solutions to user areas and also contributes ideas to improve the function, reliability and quality of services from IT. Coordinates and performs in-depth tests, including end-user reviews, for modified and new systems, and other post-implementation support. Ensures compatibility and interoperability of in-house computing systems. Maintains knowledge of current Data Warehousing, Business Intelligence (Tableau) and Reporting tools (SSRS). Understand statistics and statistical analysis. Take ownership of designing and building end to end BI solutions using SQL Server, T-SQL, SSIS and Tableau Are able to produce visualizations of data to clearly communicate ideas. Development experience in at least one scripting language (R or Python preferred) Gathers and analyzes reporting needs; identifies and analyzes data systems; designs reports and assists in the design and implementation of a reporting infrastructure to support the business reporting needs. Responds to elevated Help Desk Tickets in a timely manner. Provides orientation and training to end users for all modified and new systems. Supports IT Team in planning and implementing backup, security or disaster recovery actions. Maintains a professional awareness of tools and techniques that might be used to improve the quality of service. Conducts research on software and hardware products to justify recommendations and to support purchasing efforts. QUALIFICATIONS: Technical Competencies: Bachelor in Computer Science, Information Technology or related field preferred and 4+ years of work experience in the field. Hands-on experience using Tableau to create impressive visualizations Proven experience in Databases and Data Relationships particularly Microsoft SQL Server including T-SQL and SSIS Development experience in at least one scripting language (R or Python preferred) Good working knowledge of manufacturing business systems Strong organizational and communication skills. Experience working in manufacturing environments is a plus. (ERP). Good verbal, written and listening communication skills. Demonstrated ability to troubleshoot and solve problems and to communicate with and support clients. Able to communicate technical information to non-technical people effectively. Proven ability to work across organizational boundaries to identify business information needs and to implement applications that fulfill them. Core Competencies: Ethics, Values, Integrity & Trust - Adheres and acts in line with CPI core values. Functional/Technical Skills - Possesses high level of skill, knowledge and ability in assigned functional area. Safety – Complies with company safety rules and regulations. Takes a proactive approach to identify and eliminate safety hazards. Customer Focus - Gives high priority to customer satisfaction. Interpersonal Skills - Uses diplomacy and tact. Uses collaborative skills. Action Oriented & Adaptability - Takes initiative; acts promptly; is proactive. Ownership & Accountability - Proactively models, guards and demonstrates all of CPI’s core values. Priority Setting, Planning & Organizing- Uses resources effectively and efficiently. Problem Solving & Creativity - Uses logic and methods to solve problems with effective solutions. Develops new and unique ideas. Listening, Informing and Written Communications - Practices attentive and active listening. Shares information. Presents ideas and facts clearly and effectively in writing. PHYSICAL/ENVIRONMENTAL REQUIREMENTS: Works on computer majority of the day. Ability to lift up to 25 lbs. to move computers, equipment, etc. as needed. Some travel (domestic and international) may be required both by automobile and airplane. May have to perform duties in tight spaces (phone closet, etc.). Must be able to work flexible hours.",3.4,"Chatsworth Products
3.4","Agoura Hills, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
227,Data Analyst,$33k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Law360, a LexisNexis company, is an online newswire for business lawyers that covers major litigation, transactions, and regulatory issues. Founded in 2004 and acquired by LexisNexis in 2012, Law360 is a cutting-edge organization and one of the fastest-growing subscription news services in the U.S. Our subscribers include the largest law firms in the U.S. and around the world, in-house counsel at major corporations, and key decision-makers in the government sector.

Law360, a LexisNexis company, is seeking qualified candidates for the position of Data Analyst to join our newsroom.

The Data Analyst will be part of a growing team in our Law360 newsroom, helping to implement surveys and rankings of law firms that support our efforts to report on the legal industry. The Data Analyst will support the accurate, timely, relevant and efficient delivery of that research, and would work collaboratively with editors, reporters and graphic designers to analyze the results of the team’s surveys. The analyst will also work on data management, cleaning and verification. The analyst will employ statistical methods to help improve analyses and data usage. Training will be provided.

Primary Duties/Responsibilities:

Help conduct surveys and interviews.
Help develop the methodologies used in annual reports and rankings from survey data.
Collaborate with editors on research projects, based on surveys and publicly available data.
Help create data visualizations based on surveys and publicly available data.
Participate in drafting and presenting key research findings to reporters and editors.
Combine, clean and verify data from multiple sources.
Help manage our data set. Work with a wide range of stakeholders in Editorial and IT with regard to data management.

Basic Requirements:

1+ years of related experience, including in data management, cleaning, and analysis. Relevant coursework may count toward this experience.

Preferred Requirements:

Previous expertise using quantitative analytical tools.
Advanced Excel skills (e.g., Pivot Tables).
Familiarity with R programming, Tableau and/or Python a plus.
Previous working experience with data visualization techniques. Tableau experience preferred.
Previous experience working with data of varying quality and from varying sources.
Ability to communicate complex ideas to a wide range of audiences.
Legal industry research experience preferred but not required.
A good teammate, collaborator and relationship builder who can also work independently.

RSRLNLP

Law360 offices are located in NYC, Washington DC, and Los Angeles. We offer a casual and flexible work environment, comprehensive benefits (including; medical, dental, generous paid time off, 401(k), tuition reimbursement, and a pre-tax commuter program), and competitive salary.

Portfolio Media Inc.is an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. If a qualified individual with a disability or disabled veteran needs a reasonable accommodation to use or access our online system, that individual should please contact 1.877.734.1938 or accommodations@relx.com .

Please read our Candidate Privacy Policy",3.7,"LexisNexis Legal & Professional
3.7","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1880,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
228,Data Analyst,-1,"We are working with a client in Jacksonville, FL who is looking to add a mid-level Data Analyst to their growing team. Salary will be between $60-70k depending on previous experience and qualifications with the following requirements. Please apply directly if interested.
Create datasets for analysis.
Ability to plan, research, and analyze
Applying database skills including T-SQL, procedures, indexing and query tuning
Contribute to technical architectural planning, data modeling, process flow documentation and the design and development of innovative solutions
Working with both technical staff and business partners to translate requirements into technical implementations
Maintaining technical and user documentation
Manage datasets and perform data cleaning, including identifying potential problems with study data and collaborating with research team to resolve issues",4.5,"Green Key Resources
4.5","Jacksonville, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
229,Data Analyst,-1,"We have an exceptional opportunity for an ambitious and talented Data Analyst. The Data Analyst will be a key member of the Data and Planning Team and will analyze media and social data created by marketing activity, identifying trends and providing actionable insights to improve performance. Will be responsible for tracking and understanding the performance of campaigns using fractional attribution. Proactively builds strong working relationships with internal contacts to help support and educate the agency about how mathematical concepts can improve marketing effectiveness.

Responsibilities
Has working knowledge of technologies such as SQL, Python and Tableau to manage data preparation, analysis and presentation. This would include the management of datasets which are required for ongoing analysis.
Responsible for the creation and management of models which would be used in campaign planning and management.
Responsible for the documentation of analytics projects and ensuring that specific analytical processes can be replicated and scaled across clients if necessary.
Responsible for the delivery of robust mathematical analysis
Responsible for the production of campaign reports, studies, presentations and proposals to Jellyfish brand standards.
Achieves continuous improvement by proactively assessing Jellyfish’s working relationships, practices and methods
Demonstrates measurable success through the achievement of analysis which contributed to an improvement in client performance or an improvement in agency efficiency
Requirements
BS/BA Degree in Business Administration, Statistics, Mathematics, or related field (or equivilent work experience)
1+ years of experience
Experience in data analysis with the ability to identify causations and correlations within multiple datasets.
Excellent technical analytical experience - to include some of the following Excel, SQL, Python, R, Tableau or Data studio.
Have experience in machine learning and can identify the correct opportunities of where to use it and construct the appropriate training and production of models.
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to distill and translate complex analysis into actionable insights that a client will understand.",3.6,"Jellyfish Group Ltd
3.6","Baltimore, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Motion Picture Production & Distribution,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
230,Data Analyst,-1,"PDS Tech, Inc. is seeking a Data Analyst, in Cupertino, CA.

Summary:
Strong data and analytic skills, knowledge of excel, numbers and data modeling.
We're looking for a Master Data Management professional who understands PLM and SAP ECC
Knowledge of or experience working on subscription businesses a plus.
Reporting and presentation skills a must. Looking for a person who has a passion for data and numbers.
The successful candidate will turn data into information and insights that will help support business decisions.
Work closely with the Data Anlytics team and cross functionally in marketing to produce monthly & quarterly data driven marketing reports.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Filter and clean data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.

Skills:
MacOS
iOS
5-10 years of experience.
Education:
Bachelor's Degree or equivalent work experience preferred.",3.9,"PDS Tech, Inc.
3.9","Cupertino, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
231,2021 IT - Advanced Data Analytics Product Analyst Remote Intern,-1,"Information Technology - Advanced Data Analytics Product Analyst Intern

The Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco believes in the diversity of our people, ideas, and experiences and our committed to building inclusive culture that representative of the communities we serve.



FEDERAL RESERVE SYSTEM OVERVIEW

The Federal Reserve Bank’s mission and work are built on over hundred years of strength, stability, and excellence. No other organization does what we do or has a greater impact on global economies. Our mission is to promote low inflation, full employment, and financial stability as well as provide services to financial institutions and the Treasury.

FEDERAL RESERVE BANK OF SAN FRANCISCO OVERVIEW

The Reserve Bank of San Francisco is one of Twelve Reserve Banks responsible for setting the nation’s monetary policy, serving the as the fiscal agent for the United States Treasury and supervising banking institutions, ensuring their stability and compliance with banking regulations. Our headquarters are in SF, CA serving the largest geographic district within the Federal Reserve System. With Branches offices in Los Angeles, Seattle, Portland, Salt Lake City, and Phoenix.

GOLD INTERN PROGRAM OVERVIEW

Invest in your future and consider joining the Growing Opportunity for Leadership and Diversity (GOLD) Program. Our paid internship program will offer you the opportunity to work on projects that supports the Bank’s business and impact the United States economy.

GROUP/DEPARTMENT OVERVIEW

Within the ADAC team, our day to day tasks revolve around supporting one of the multiple projects that are being worked on by our team. Specifically on my project, daily tasks include, writing user stories, participating in scrum meetings, working on user stories (as applicable), building report-out decks for management.

POSITION/PROJECT OVERVIEW

This project/position would challenge the intern because usually interns do not have a lot of experience working within a product team. Our team is extremely product focused and will continue to be so in the future. Additionally, we are currently focusing on Cloud technologies which allows interns to learn in detail more about the cloud environment as well as get hands on experience within the cloud.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES

The intern will write user stories for our development team, work on user stories (as applicable), gather functional requirements from stakeholders and product leadership, work through information security aspects (as necessary), present on completed user stories (as necessary), support product leadership with marketing, customer outreach, etc.

REQUIREMENTS:
U.S. Citizen or Permanent Residency
Freshman, Sophomore, Junior, or Senior standing in a 4-year bachelor’s degree program
Ability to work 40 hours week throughout the duration of the approximately 10 -week internship program
MS Suite Proficiency
Strong written communication skills
PREFERRED SKILLS:
Desired skills: SQL, Tableau,
Students graduating in 2021 or 2022
Jira, AWS Cloud, product management, agile methodology
The Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.6,"Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco
3.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1913,Government,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
232,Data Analyst,$51k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tracking Code

2409-056

Job Description

COMPANY OVERVIEW:

Knoll is a constellation of design-driven brands and people, working together with our clients to create inspired modern interiors. Since 1938, we’ve been thinking about how people interact with their environments, and how their environments impact what they do. Our strength in office systems, seating, furniture, textiles, leather and architectural accessories allows us to compose integrated solutions from products and services that naturally work together.

To learn more, visit www.knoll.com

POSITION OVERVIEW:
The Data Analyst, functioning within the Procurement Organization, will create and maintain the databases used for reporting key procurement data.
Responsible for supporting the Procurement teams in various aspects of metric management (definition, target setting, ongoing status reports), process development and deployment – with emphasis on definition, development and roll out of related IT systems and tools, and program management for new and ongoing purchasing initiatives.
Enhance and refine procurement database strategy to meet changing business requirements.
Leverage existing database and systems to provide monthly procurement results for:
Spend
Savings, Inflation and Tariff
Compliance
Supplier Performance
Supplier Stocking Agreements
Lead and develop enhancements for Supplier Performance Scorecard.
Manage key operational projects to contribute to strategic plans; preparing and completing action plans; implementing, productivity, quality, and customer-service standards; resolving problems; identifying trends; determining system improvements; implementing change.
Compile reports and documentation to aid in the planning of the Procurement yearly fiscal plan.
Compile data and documentation to aid in the preparation of annual GSA report.
Compile data and documentation to aid in the preparation of annual Conflict Minerals report.
The position holder will also drive business investigations within the Procurement organization to identify improvement opportunities or specific change requirements to better support the business through enhanced contributions from our supply base in terms of cost, responsiveness, on time delivery and technology capabilities/innovation.
Prepare reports and documentation to prepare for purchase price standards.
Expert in MS Office suite and knowledge with JDE and Oracle applications. Proficient with MS Access is required.
Job Responsibilities:
Procurement database development and optimization (simplification, automation, integration)
Prepare and facilitate monthly, quarterly and annual reporting meetings and provide related documentation. Keep related scorecards up to date.
Update and publish monthly Supplier Scorecards.
Manage monthly Supplier Scorecard data review process.
Manage monthly Procurement Savings, Inflation and Tariff review and reporting process.
Manage quarterly Procurement data required for Knoll Financial Results reporting.
Update/create written procedures/work instructions and training documents.
Process design and review with all stakeholders.
Collaborate and align with key partners on development and improvement of cross functional processes.
Interface and work with IT teams (Local and HC Global Teams assigned) for system architecture and related activities.
Develop business cases in support of business requirement.
Report out to management on progress, achievements and required escalations for support.
Prepare and facilitate monthly/quarterly reporting meetings and provide related documentation. Keep related scorecards up to date.
Required Skills

Expert in MS Office, particularly MS Access and MS Excel, is required.
Knowledge of JDE and/or Oracle applications preferred.
Knowledge and experience with Tableau preferred.
Experience in project management is preferred.
Required Experience

College Degree in related discipline.
Knoll is an Equal Employment opportunity employer. Employment selection and related decisions are made without regard to race, color, sex, religion, age, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy, genetic information, veteran status or any other characteristic protected under federal, state or local law. Applicants with disabilities may be entitled to a reasonable accommodation under the Americans with Disabilities Act and/or other applicable laws. If you require an accommodation due to a disability at any time during the application or interview process, please contact Talent Acquisition at recruiting@knoll.com..

Job Location

East Greenville, Pennsylvania, United States

Position Type

Full-Time/Regular",4.0,"Knoll
4.0","East Greenville, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1938,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
233,Data Analyst,$43k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"Careers at Hyland's
Data Analyst
Los Angeles, California, USA

Hyland's is a leader in innovations that answer to the changing health needs of our modern world. We celebrate our century long commitment to making medicines that are rooted in safe and natural homeopathic remedies.

The opportunities have never been greater nor has our responsibility. Our team is quickly expanding amidst larger conversations of natural and homeopathic medicines taking center-stage, making it an exciting time for you to join us. We are looking for qualified applicants who strive to make an impact and believe in working in a higher purpose. We're excited to hear from you!

Summary: We are looking for a Data Analyst that will provide critical support across the organization through advanced analytics, and the development of databases and reports that will capture real-time actionable data to guide decision making. In this role, you will be critical to our company's growth. The primary responsibility of this position is to collect, analyze, and connect large volumes of data from disparate sources, extract insights, and identify opportunities to increase sales and improve profitability.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
● Integrate disparate sources of data and prepare high level analyses using various software programs or statistical programing languages (e.g., Excel, SQL, R, Python).
● Manage large, complex data sets and support the reporting requirements across the organization providing actionable and real-time data in a highly visual format (dashboards) to key stakeholders.
● Act as a data steward to maintain the integrity of our data sources within a centralized repository in which there is a “single source of data” to be referenced and ensure consistency in reporting across the organization.
● Develop financial models in support of various strategic planning initiatives and conduct analyses to evaluate actual performance vs. plan.
● Collect and analyze data on consumer demographics, preferences and buying patterns in different markets and sales channels to optimize product distribution and identify opportunities for growth.
● Conduct competitive analyses across multiple sales channels and ecommerce platforms providing insight on sales trends, marketing methods, promotions/advertising, product pricing and distribution.
● Evaluate the Return on Investment (ROI) for digital marketing and advertising campaigns and make recommendations on strategies that will drive profitable growth, improve our competitive position, and increase brand awareness.
● Work cross-functionally with Sales and Finance teams to evaluate the effectiveness of trade promotions and the accurate accounting of customer discounts/allowances.
● Work closely with Sales and Marketing teams in preparing customer presentations and creating fact-based selling stories.
● Work with the Marketing and Innovation teams to analyze consumer insight data to inform new product development decisions, packaging updates and unique SKUs for various channels.
● Develop new product forecasting models using predictive analytics and work closely with Sales and Operations Planning Team to improve forecast accuracy for new product launches.
● Work collaboratively with internal team members in Sales, Marketing, Supply Chain and Demand Planning to refine customer forecast for new and existing products.
● Assist in the development and refinement of channel, customer and product P&Ls to drive profitable growth across multiple brand lines.
● Identify opportunities for process improvement that enable the organization to capture the most valuable data.
● Make recommendations for new KPIs and better ways to manage data to view the business across multiple dimensions.
● Conduct ad-hoc analyses and participate in other projects as needed.
● May be required to perform other duties as assigned or as needed.

Supervisory Responsibilities: This position has no supervisory responsibilities.

Qualifications: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Education and/or Experience:
● Bachelor's degree (B.A) in Data Science, Information Management or Statistics or related field or equivalent from a four-year university or technical school; 3+ years in a Data Analyst role with experience in data mining and building financial models or related experience and/or training: or equivalent combination of education, training, and/or experience.
● Experience in data warehousing and importing/exporting data to a variety of databases and applications.
● Experience in using data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Microsoft Power BI).
● Experience with syndicated data platforms (e.g., Nielsen) a plus.
● Experience with Microsoft Dynamics NAV (a.k.a. Navision, Microsoft D365) ERP software a plus.
● Experience with Amazon Premium Analytics, Google Analytics and Facebook Insights a plus.

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
● Advanced proficiency with software tools such as Excel and statistical programs such as R or Python to gather, assess, and analyze data, as well as PowerPoint to build presentations.
● Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze and disseminate information with attention to detail and accuracy.
● Solid business intelligence and reporting development experience, preferably with Jet Enterprise.
● Exceptional team player with the interpersonal skills needed to work effectively in a cross functional team setting, earn team confidence quickly and facilitate change.
● Thrives in a fast-paced environment with the ability to manage multiple tasks and evolving priorities.
● Critical thinker and team player with the ability to inspire others to collaborate through own example.
● Strong people skills: able to work with a wide variety of personalities.
● Strong communication skills; persuasive, and willing to share research and knowledge with the team.

Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.

Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit, use hands to finger, handle, and feel; reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand, walk, talk and hear. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.

Work Environment: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.

ABOUT US
Hyland's is one of the leading homeopathic companies in North America, creating medicines with natural active ingredients for consumer health and wellness. Rooted in over 115 years of experience, Hyland's continues to be one of the top natural over-the-counter medicine brands that has been passed down by families for generations. All Hyland's products are prepared with the highest quality natural active ingredients and follow strict standards of preparation. Hyland's is dedicated to supporting the health and wellness of families everywhere.",3.9,"Hyland's
3.9","Los Angeles, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
234,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst
Boston (temporarily remote)
6 month contract, likely extension

Our client is looking for a talented Data Analyst to join its Data Management team!

Signature Consultants is committed to helping IT specialists reach their personal and professional goals. We support the diverse needs of our consultants and their families by providing a competitive benefits package that includes Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, 401(k), HSA, FSA, and EAP. Employees also receive weekly pay, training and certification opportunities and access to an array of other helpful programs.

Responsibilities:
load investment data into client's OMS so it's accessible to the front office
creating KPIs
Optimize SQL queries
analyzing investment data
Required Skills & Technologies:
SQL query optimization
Python
investment data analysis experience
Keywords
SQL, Python, ESG, investment data, aladdin, OMS

About Signature Consultants, LLC

Headquartered in Fort Lauderdale, Florida, Signature Consultants was established in 1997 with a singular focus: to provide clients and consultants with superior staffing solutions. For the ninth consecutive year, Signature was voted as one of the ""Best Staffing Firms to Work For"" and is now the 14th largest IT staffing firm in the United States (source: Staffing Industry Analysts). With 28 locations throughout North America, Signature annually deploys thousands of consultants to support, run, and manage their clients' technology needs. Signature offers IT staffing, consulting, managed solutions, and direct placement services. For more information on the company, please visit www.sigconsult.com. Signature Consultants is the parent company to Hunter Hollis and Madison Gunn.",3.8,"Signature Consultants
3.8","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
235,Data Analyst,$54k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst-266039
Federal Reserve Bank of Boston
Primary Location MA-Boston
Full-time / Part-time Full-time
Employee Status Regular
Overtime Status Exempt
Job Type Experienced
Travel No
Shift Day Job
Job Sensitivity Tier II CC@Hire/No CC@Rescreen

Data Analyst

The Federal Reserve Bank

Boston, MA

Working at the Federal Reserve Bank positions you at the center of the financial world with a unique perspective on national and international markets and economies. You will work in an environment with a diverse group of experienced professionals to support the safety, soundness, and vitality of our economic and financial systems. It is a challenge that demands the skills of a financial service professional and the intelligence of an academic—all combined with a passion for public service.

Job Summary:

The Finance and Analytics Group in the Supervision, Regulation, and Credit Department of the Federal Reserve Bank of Boston (FRBB) has an opening for a data analyst. The Finance and Analytics group develops the budget and multi-year forecast for the Supervision and Regulation department, including reporting to department and Bank leadership and the Board of Governors. The group also helps administer the Federal Reserve System time tracking application (ROAM) and Conflicts of Interest. The group provides analysis and reports to support management decision making around staffing, resource allocation, and expenditures. The work performed by the group ensures appropriate resources to support the Bank’s mission to contribute to local communities by providing supervisory oversight and ensures compliance with Bank and Board of Governors regulations and guidance.

The Data Analyst will analyze and transform data into meaningful and valuable input for management decision making. By working with several individuals across the organization, you will analyze multiple types of data from financial and employee tracking systems, accessed through backend database queries, and use different presentation formats and tools to increase efficiency, improve and automate processes.

Principal Accountabilities:

• With some guidance performs complex business analysis on department financial, time tracking, and conflicts records data. Analyze problems with appropriate logic and fact-finding and begin to identify underlying issues and recognizes trends and cause and effect relationships. Use complex data, tools, and technology to perform non-routine tasks. Train others and perform troubleshooting when errors occur.

• Partner with team members within the unit, the department, the Bank and the System. Coordinate own work with others in group projects. Manage workflow independently.

• With some oversight, presents both orally and in written form on non-complex business matters to internal and external stakeholders, System colleagues, and the Board of Governors.

• Influence or negotiates change in behavior or viewpoint of others with senior staff support. Contribute to possible solutions on moderately complex business issues related to finance, time tracking, conflicts, and records.

• Demonstrate experience adjusting to new and different priorities.

• Provide guidance and constructive feedback to less experienced staff and peers. May assign work to junior or project team members.

Qualifications:

• Master’s degree or equivalent

• 2 years of related work experience

• Proficiency in data visualization using Tableau, PowerBI, Shiny or other dashboarding tools

• Experience using SQL, R, Python, or similar programming and analytics applications desired

Our total rewards program offers benefits that are the best fit for you at every stage of your career:

• Comprehensive healthcare options (Medical, Dental, and Vision)

• 401K match, and a fully funded pension plan

• Paid vacation and holidays; flexible work environment, healthy workflow

• Generously subsidized public transportation

• Annual tuition reimbursement

• Professional development programs, training and conferences

• And more…

The Federal Reserve Bank is committed to a diverse, equitable and inclusive workplace and to provide equal employment opportunities to all persons without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, genetic information, disability, or military service.

This position requires access to confidential supervisory information and/or FOMC information, which is limited to ""Protected Individuals"" as defined in the U.S. federal immigration law. Protected Individuals include, but are not limited to, U.S. citizens, U.S. nationals, and U.S. permanent residents who either are not yet eligible to apply for naturalization or who have applied for naturalization within the requisite timeframe. Candidates who are not U.S. citizens or U.S. permanent residents may be eligible for the information access required for this position and sponsorship for a work visa, and subsequently for permanent residence, if they sign a declaration of intent to become a U.S. citizen and meet other eligibility requirements.

All employees assigned to this position will be subject to FBI fingerprint/ criminal background and Patriot Act/ Office of Foreign Assets Control (OFAC) watch list checks at least once every five years. All candidates must undergo an enhanced background check and comply with all applicable information handling rules.

The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work required of this position. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities or skills associated with this position or the personnel so classified. While this job description is intended to be an accurate reflection of this position, management reserves the right to revise this or any job description at its discretion at any time.",4.1,"Federal Reserve Bank of Boston
4.1","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1914,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
236,Data Analyst,-1,"Love data? Love to make a huge impact? As the Analyst within the Customer Analytics vertical at goPuff, you’ll bring thought-leadership and insights to help optimize many aspects of our business - from customer acquisition and retention to user behaviors and branding. You’ll help
lead our efforts to use data to understand how to improve all aspects of the customer experience. This role is within our data & analytics team and we’re designed to move fast. You’ll have the opportunity to make a huge impact as the future success of goPuff will depend
on the insights we derive from our data.

Help drive analytics for the Customer side of the business - including marketing analytics, site analytics, merchandising, pricing and promotions, and more.
Bring your unique data perspective and proven experience and hit the ground running as an analytical thought leader.
Obtain a deep understanding of the business drivers through data exploration, and make recommendations to optimize performance and deepen our understanding of customer behaviors
Perform deep-dives to analyze problems, identify opportunities and suggest experiments based on findings
Own data accuracy and integrity
Partner with other Analytics team members, Product Management, Engineering, and other functions to identify opportunities, propose solutions, and share insights - ensuring consistency of data-driven decision-making throughout the org

2+ years of experience in analytics or data science - preferably in fields related to marketing, digital merchandising, or consumer product
Bachelors in Business, Statistics, Engineering, or other quantitative discipline
Expert in SQL and database table design - able to write structured and efficient queries on large data sets
Proficiency in R or Python
A deep understanding of statistical analysis and experiment design
Experience in data warehousing concepts, big data technologies, and analytics platforms
Development experience with BI platforms such as Looker, Tableau, PeriscopeData
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Experience managing multiple cross-functional stakeholders
Experience collecting business requirements and working with engineering teams to implement marketing data pipelines
Top-notch organizational skills and ability to manage multiple projects in a fast-paced environment
Move fast, be a team player, always be learning and give back",4.0,"ORS Partners
4.0",Pennsylvania,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
237,Data Analyst,-1,"Large online marketplaces like Amazon have trained consumers to expect products to be delivered in two days at no extra cost. As a result, millions of sellers on other marketplaces are falling behind, unable to cost-effectively deliver products to their customers within two days. Deliverr enables any seller, regardless of size, to delight their customers with fast, cost-effective fulfillment. If you get excited about joining a company on a mission to deliver products anywhere in the world within two days, we're looking for you. What You'll Do: Build Critical Data Infrastructure: Design, build, and maintain databases, reports, and analyses for business operations and financial reporting for internal and external parties Solve Problems: Use data to identify problems, understand causes, and recommend resolutions; execute ad-hoc requests for data insights Think Strategically: Work with company leadership to develop financial and operating goals and forecasts, plus the right operating cadence to make it all happen Learn the Business: Be an integral part of both the Data Science and Finance teams and help a fast growing startup scale and mature its finance processes Make an Impact: Partner with Finance, Data, Eng, Ops, and Growth on key initiatives What We're Looking For: 4+ years experience in a related role. Academic background in mathematics, statistics, physics, computer science, or engineering; familiarity with finance and accounting concepts highly critical Fluency in Python, SQL, and / or other similar languages required Ability to express complex information to both technical and non-technical audiences Ability to work, prioritize, and adapt in a rapid-growth startup Know the difference between sophisticated and effective Must be based in North America.",4.8,"Deliverr Inc
4.8",California,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
238,Data Analyst,-1,"BluePath Labs is a fast-growing research and management consulting company focused onsolving challenging problems for government and private sector clients. BluePath is looking for Data Analysts to support the Department of Energy Office of Fossil Energy (FE). This is an exciting and fast paced opportunity to have a positive impact with the Department of Energy.

Education/Experience:
A minimum of three (3) years of experience that is directly relevant
A BS or BA degree (or an additional six (6) years of relevant experience in lieu of a degree).
Knowledge of Federal, DOE, and the Office of Fossil Energy is desirable
Role Responsibilities:

Examples of tasks to be performed under this position include:
Human Capital Support
Budget Formation and Execution
Regulatory Processing
Federal Employee Workforce Engagement
Communications Support
Continuity of Operations Support
Subject matter expertise in the functional areas of the Office of Fossil Energy and its programs may be needed during the life of the contract

About BluePath

BluePath Labs combines mission and business insights with advanced technologies to deliver measurable performance improvements for our clients. BluePath is dedicated to surpassing client expectations by always living by our core values of integrity, professionalism, and resilience.BluePath's extensive experience in Government, Military, Commercial, and Academic environments is unique among small businesses and a core differentiator of our solutions. Our multidisciplinary background allows us to solve diverse and complex problems. Most importantly, we work closely with our clients to frame problems correctly, optimize processes, leverage technologies, and implement enduring solutions. Labs are where ideas are born, experiments occur, and breakthroughs happen. It is the hallmark of BluePath's culture.

https://www.bluepathlabs.com/

BluePath is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",5.0,"BluePath Labs
5.0","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
239,Data Analyst,$50k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description:
Evaluate and make required changes in SAP for existing materials, product BOM's, and routings per the direction of the Engineering Team. Create work centers, changing and creating BOM's, Routings. Change Material Masters (Production Versions. Responsible for the ECM's to document their work. Document and maintain ECM(Create, Obtain approvals, and submit to the Business Process Support Team) Proficient in SAP Master data as it relates to BOM's and routings. Advance experience with Excel. Possess high levels of data accuracy and attention to detail Strong analytical skills, combined with practical business knowledge Strong verbal and written communication skills",4.1,"Indotronix International Corporation
4.1","Rochester, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
240,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Our Mission
We’re here to create a safer, happier and more mindful future for all with the help of data science, engineering, design, and mobile technology. We're starting by reinventing insurance, by rethinking the technologies that enable it, but our true goal is to build a platform that rewards people for driving well — creating safer roads with fewer accidents in the process.

Backed by impressive funding, we're poised to re-engineer a trillion-dollar category, and that’s just the beginning. We’re using rich customer insights, advanced technology and data science to build our cloud-native InsurTech solution, and other things we haven’t even dreamt up yet. We're out to change behavior and promote mindful living at a societal level. But the key to us being successful in our mission isn’t just about nailing the technology—it’s about hiring the talented people who can help us make a quantifiable impact in the world. We’re growing our world-class team.
And that’s where you come in.

The Role
The Senior Data Analyst will work with teams (product, marketing, engineering, data science, CX and business owners, etc.) to measure, understand, and monitor key business metrics across our mobile apps and websites. The ideal candidate will be comfortable working with datasets across a variety of systems (SQL, Firebase,...).
This role will be responsible in delivering ad-hoc analysis with actionable insights and translating stakeholders’ priorities into dashboards. As an early member of the analytics team, you’ll have many opportunities to make a meaningful impact by helping develop how we do analytics as a company.

All applicants for this job posting must complete the simple challenge.
Must have:
Previous experience(s) in an early stage startup in an analytics role. Not everything has been built yet and data is often messy or incomplete. This role is just as much of doing the difficult work to design the core system as it is in getting reliable analytics results.

Skills and Experience:

Degree in quantitative or business fields preferred
Prior experience in a consumer organization is a plus
Web and mobile analytics experience using a variety of tools
Proficiency with Firebase and/or Google Analytics
Experience using SQL
Python experience is a great plus
Experience with web and mobile tagging, including tag management system (GTM, DTM,...)Ability to build and manage dashboarding tools (Data Studio, Redash, Tableau,...)
Strong analytical skills
Team player
Highly organized, attention to detail and curious

Salary & Benefits:

Salary: We invest in first-rate people and pay top-of-market salaries for most positions, factoring in experience, talent and location. We do not offer equity.
Benefits: Medical, dental, vision, 401(k), wellness reimbursement, four weeks of vacation + six weeks of parental leave, and great work-life balance. Our office building offers on-site shower and bike stalls, and panoramic views of San Francisco.
Location: Due to COVID-19 our teams are all working remotely through 2020. We provide an in-home office set-up including laptop, monitor, ergonomic desk, chair and other items as needed
Location: Post COVID-19: San Francisco, CA near Montgomery Bart Station
BlueOwl, LLC is an equal opportunity workplace. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

If you are a San Francisco resident, please read the City and County of San Francisco's Fair Chance Ordinance notice. https://sfgov.org/olse/sites/default/files/FCO%20poster2020.pdf",4.5,"Blue Owl
4.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
241,Data Analyst,$53k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Senior Data Analyst in the CACI Data Analytics lab is responsible for providing senior-level support for data analytics projects surrounding investigations or litigation. This includes managing projects on various cases from initiation to closure, developing deliverables and serving as a primary point-of-contact for Attorneys and Case teams. Senior Data Analysts gather a wide variety of data types from primary and secondary sources through diverse channels using a combination of methods that will be researched and employed by the Data Analytics Lab Management team. Senior Data Analysts develop, maintain, and enforce streamlined and efficient processes for project lifecycles, from collection through transformation of data; manage timelines, training, resources, and budgets through the finalization of client deliverables. Manage the collection, documentation, vetting and onboarding of data, manage the database development and set up, and oversee the population of data into the appropriate analytical tools. Must have the ability to guide and assist other data analysts as required.

The senior data analyst is responsible for defining, developing, and communicating data analytics solutions to support the customer. This includes:

• Corresponding with key case personnel to elicit requirements and provide regular status updates,
• Performing data analysis and modeling to understand and identify data relationships/trends/classifications/predictions
• Enriching data using open source or online investigation tools (e.g. CLEAR, FINCEN, Lexis-Nexis, etc.)
• Proposing reporting solutions that best present the information to the end user
• Delivering the completed solution.

This position requires strong analytical, problem solving, and communication skills with a keen attention to detail. Additionally, the problems and toolset are quite varied, and the candidate should take the initiative to attack new challenges and learn new skills independently. This person must be well organized and flexible. We desire someone with the diverse experience and skills in data analysis, analytic programming languages (Python, R, Java, SAS), litigation support, statistical software, link analysis, visualization software, and database management.

Requirements:

• Minimum of 5 years of experience performing using the tasks outlined in the job description utilizing one or more of the following tools: Tableau, Python, R, SAS, Palantir, Foundry
• Experience with analysis stemming from multiple Databases: SQL Server, Oracle, PostgreSQL, MySQL
• Experience working with the SAS VIYA statistical software suite strongly preferred
• Programming and/or scripting (Python, R, Java)
• Background in Data Science, Investigations, Data Analysis, Computer Information Systems, or Statistics
• Industry analytics/business intelligence knowledge including current industry trends, challenges, and data quality approaches
• Deep understanding of database, ETL, and analytics tools and concepts
• Must be able to work independently and prioritize work effectively, as well as to function as an effective team member in a local and virtual team development environment
• Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with an unsurpassed attention to detail
• Excellent communication (written and verbal) skills
• Experience supporting federal agencies

What you can expect from us:

• Real opportunity for career growth in an environment where your achievements will be celebrated
• Constant collaboration with numerous teams to ensure client success
• A team that respects and embraces your ideas and expertise
• Coworkers that are motivated by pursuing excellence, rather than the prospect of personal gain
• A workplace dedicated to supporting and bettering public safety and government agencies

Benefits:

• Very competitive salary based on qualifications and experience
• Comprehensive, Company paid United Health Care Medical for you and your family (We pay your premiums and deductibles)
• 401(k) & 4% matching
• Travel & performance incentives
• 3 weeks paid time off (plus Federal Holidays)
• $5K annual training allowance
• $500 book allowance
• Tuition reimbursement program

Praescient Analytics is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for all. Employees and applicants without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity, national origin, legally protected physical or mental disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or status in the uniformed services of the United States, status as a disabled veteran or veteran of the Vietnam era, or on any other basis which is protected under applicable law. This includes a commitment to provide a work environment that is free from all forms of illegal harassment including sexual harassment.

This covers all terms and conditions of employment including (but not limited to):

• Hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, or demotion of all job classifications;
• Recruiting, advertising or solicitation for employment;
• Treatment during employment;
• Rates of pay or other forms of compensation;
• Benefits;
• Selection for training;
• Company sponsored social and recreational activities; and
• Layoff or termination

Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
US Citizenship Required
Praescient Analytics is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Interested Candidates: Please forward your resume to recruiting@praescientanalytics.com and please visit our website to apply online at www.praescientanalytics.applicantstack.com/x/openings.",3.2,"Praescient Analytics
3.2","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
242,Data Analyst,$35k-$61k (Glassdoor Est.),"Build your career at Buildertrend, ranked #1 in Best Places to Work in Omaha 2019 & 2020!

As a Data Analyst at Buildertrend, you will work in a cross-functional team with a mix of Data Engineers, Software Engineers, Product Marketers and Company Leaders to drive innovation and technical solutions into the business. Data Analysts will help us discover insights hidden in vast amounts of data, and help us make smarter decisions to deliver an even better product. Your primary focus will be doing statistical analysis, and working with multiple areas of the company to identify opportunities for improvement based on insights drawn from data.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Collaborate with company leadership to understand business needs and devise possible solutions
Glean insights from a large data set using SQL and present those insights in an understandable way
Create real-time and ad-hoc reports and dashboards for business leaders as means of sharing findings
Perform ad-hoc analysis and respond to data/analytical requests
Keep up-to-date with the latest data science trends, share learnings with the team and apply to daily project work
QUALIFICATIONS
Proficiency with Microsoft SQL Server and knowledge of other database platforms
Extensive background in statistical analysis
Good applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Extensive experience with BI tooling (Tableau experience is preferred)
R/Python programming experience is a plus
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on product development
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
BENEFITS & PERKS

Health
Dental
Vision
401 (k)
Paid Time Off
Hosted Happy Hours
Bottomless Soda Pop
$50 Monthly Onsite Cafe Cash
Relaxed Dress

ABOUT US

Buildertrend’s mission is simple: To make building or remodeling your home an amazing experience! Founded here in Omaha in 2006, Buildertrend is a 13 year young company that is on its way to being an industry standard. Buildertrend is changing the way that homes are built not only in North America, but around the world. Using technology to bring all parties together, Buildertrend has quickly become the product of the future. The innovative solutions and team atmosphere are what makes Buildertrend one of the hottest employers and Best Places To WorkTM in Omaha. If you want to learn more about us, check out: http://buildertrend.com/about.aspx.

Come be a part of the fun and challenging environment at our new headquarters conveniently located off 118th and I Street.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

At Buildertrend, we value diversity and treat all employees and job applicants based on merit, qualifications, competence, and talent. We are committed to providing an environment of mutual respect where equal employment opportunities are available to all applicants and teammates without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. Buildertrend believes that diversity and inclusion among our team is critical to our success as a company, and seek to recruit and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool.

To see the complete list of Essential Job Functions, click here https://buildertrend.com/essential-job-functions-notice/",4.3,"Buildertrend
4.3","Omaha, NE",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
243,Game Data Analyst - Disney Sorcerer's Arena,$56k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Glu Mobile, we build free-to-play mobile games. Our titles include Covet Fashion, Design Home, Deer Hunter, MLB Tap Sports Baseball, and our newest game, Disney Sorcerer's Arena, to name a few. We are seeking a Game Data Analyst that wants use data to improve player experience.

Role Overview
As a Game Data Analyst, you will consult with studios on how to best optimize their games and understand their players. You will work with our Glunies studio on Disney Sorcerer's Arena to define business problems, develop analytical approaches, and craft recommendations to the studio leadership. You will work with a team to measure performance of events, sales strategies, features, and more to shape the day to day live operations. This is a highly visible role with direct impact on the financial success of our game!
You'll most often:
Consult with game studios on opportunities to improve the performance of their games, before and after worldwide launch
Perform ad-hoc analytical tasks
Pull and summarize data with traditional and big data tools
Design and analyze A/B and multivariate experiments
Define game telemetry and metrics for game features
Build actionable visualizations of game performance
You'll be a great fit for this role if you have:
Played mobile games or role-playing games extensively
Excitement for working in a data rich environment
Enthusiasm for using analytical techniques to answer business problems
Experience working in Unix-like and cloud environments
Bachelor’s degree in quantitative field such as statistics, economics, social science, or related field
Bonus points for:
Master’s degree in quantitative field such as statistics, economics, social science, or related field
Experience delivering analytics driven consulting
Writing re-usable code in dynamic programming languages (such Python) or statistical programming environments (such as R or Julia)
Collaborating on code using Git",3.5,"Glu Mobile
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
244,Data Analyst,$46k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary

This position is located in the Office of Workforce Planning, Policy, and Systems

Management, Office of Human Capital and Talent Management. The Systems Management Team is responsible for developing and supporting agency-wide HR Information Systems (HRIS) related to both Civil Service and Foreign Service human capital programs. While USAID integrates the data flow between systems when possible, there are several systems that require that data be extracted and loaded into other systems.

The primary function of this position is to extract and load data from various HRIS into other HRIS.

The statements contained in this job description reflect general details as necessary to describe the principal functions of this job, the level of knowledge and skill typically required, and the scope of responsibility. It should not be considered an all-inclusive listing of work requirements. Employee may perform other duties as assigned, including work in other functional areas to cover absences or relief, to equalize peak work periods or otherwise to balance the workload.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Produces recurring and ad hoc reports and extracts from HRIS.
Creates or edits basic reports in HRIS.
Loads extracts into HRIS following standard operating procedures.
Validates successful loading of data; identifies errors or issues with data extracts and/or loads.
Troubleshoots and investigates basic inquiries related to data loads.
Tests changes in data load procedures and/or data mapping.
Validates data dictionaries for HRIS.
Creates and/or updates SOPs related to data extraction and loading.
Creates and/or analyzes metrics.
Performs data entry and/or correction.
Serves as a tester for User Acceptance Testing (UAT) for new functionality in HRIS.
Performs administrative duties, such as coordination of routing correspondence, coordinating meetings, and organizing documentation.
Perform other duties as assigned or required.

Travel Requirements

0 - 10%

Salary Grade

Job Requirements

Education and/or Experience

1-2 years of relevant experience, preferably within the federal government.

Qualifications and Requirements
Strong Microsoft Excel skills
Attention to detail
Experience with extracting and/or loading data a plus
Strong problem solving skills
Skilled in both oral and written communications
Exceptional customer service skills to meet the requirements of a demanding customer base under tight deadlines
Experience using case management systems to respond to customer inquiries a plus
Must have authorization to work in the United States as defined by the Immigration Reform Act of 1986.
MUST BE ABLE TO OBTAIN AND MAINTAIN USAID FACILITY ACCESS

Category

Human Resources

Location

USAID EH - Washington, DC 20004 US (Primary)

Education

High School",4.1,"Cape Fox Shared Services
4.1","Washington, DC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
245,Data Analyst,$46k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Experience: 5+ Years
Clearance: Top Secret / SCI Eligible

AERMOR LLC is qualified candidates to provide technical and analytical support for FCC OCA in support of all OCA inspections. Candidates shall perform a wide variety of technical support services and functions required to meet the mission of FCC OCA to enhance overall DoDIN-N readiness and security.

Responsibilities Include:

Process, inspect, cleanse, transform, and model data to discover useful information, informing conclusions, and supporting decision-making.
Conduct technical analyses and develop reports (e.g., General reports: detailed, grouped, crosstab, column, query reports, etc.) related to cybersecurity and cyber operations.
Analyze inspection findings for the compilation of quarterly and annual lessons learned.
Support future analysis efforts, perform detailed studies, and execute pilot programs as determined by OCA, draft instructions, or conduct post-inspection follow-up/research/analysis and includes, but is not limited to:
Provide detailed analysis of cybersecurity inspections (i.e., CCORIs, CCRIs, CSIs, SAV results) in a manner that ensures OCA and Onsite leadership understands the Navy’s cybersecurity posture, the status of trends in cybersecurity findings, and aids inspected site prioritization of mitigation and remediation efforts.
Provide cybersecurity and programmatic analysis to identify vulnerabilities across multiple Navy platforms, programs, and Enterprise Networks that may be systemic in IT infrastructure and its assets.

Publish cybersecurity results and other products such as visualizations and/or Responsible, Accountable, Consulted, and Informed (RACI) documents within FCCs unclassified/classified portals.
Develop trend data from completed cybersecurity inspections/assessments.
Compile and provide ad hoc and recurring cybersecurity inspection metrics and trend reports.
Develop technical reports, standard operating procedures (SOPs), briefings, messages, information papers, and other reporting formats for analytical results.
Present trends, findings, and results to Navy leadership in dashboard formats.
Communicate analysis results to management via reports, visualizations, etc.
Develop SharePoint Dashboards and administer user permissions
Adhere to established Navy and DoD policies and procedures

Required Skills and Experience:

Minimal of 5 years of experience in data management, analytics using technologies such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI and the like, SQL, and query Syntax
3 years of experience working in dynamic cross-competency teams
Experience remediating data issues, documenting Source to Target Mapping of Data Sources
Experience with conceptual Data modes Creation and Input
Ability to analyze, summarize and characterize large or small data sets with varying degrees of fidelity or quality; ability to identify and explain any insights or patterns within them
Strong expertise in designing, developing, and implementing reports, visualizations, and dashboards
Possess a bachelor’s degree or higher from an accredited university in automated data management
DoD 8570.01-M IAT Level II
Education: Bachelor’s degree in a related field, or equivalent education or experience and related training

Apply Now

For more information contact: careers@aermor.com",3.6,"Aermor LLC
3.6","Suffolk, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
246,Data Analyst,$47k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

Job Title

Data Analyst

Job
ID

26969311

Location

Phoenix,

AZ

Other Location

Description

Career Evolutions is searching for a Data Analyst for an exciting and rapidly-growing wellness company in Phoenix, Arizona. This is an excellent career opportunity with a competitive compensation.

Duties Will Include:
Perform data profiling and analysis to clarify the nature and scope of data issues.
Identify and document data-cleansing requirements.
Develop strategies for duplicate identification and merging.
Drive the definition, development, testing and application of data cleansing strategies in a hands-on fashion:
Work with Subject Matter Specialists (SMS) to identify and prioritize data quality issues
Profile data to determine scope, risk, and cleansing approaches
Present cleansing options with recommendations for addressing issues
Develop and test cleansing scripts to automate cleansing wherever possible
Coordinate cleansing using data verification services where appropriate
Coordinate the application of cleansing activities with production support staff
Coordinate data entry resources and tasks and where manual cleansing is required
Configure and manage environment for data profiling and analysis.
Qualifications:
SQL fluency required, especially SQL Server.
Experience cleansing consumer data in volume (address, phone, email, etc.)
Familiarity with profiling tools and data cleansing services is strongly desirable.
Great team player with a positive attitude.
A highly proactive, energetic, and enthusiastic approach, projecting a sense that business is being taken care of responsibly.
Ability to see the “big picture” while addressing critical details.
Problem solving and analysis skills, combined with strong business judgment.
Attention to details, consistency and reliability of performance under tight deadlines.
Excellent communication skills both written and verbal.
Superior organization and planning skills. Capable of handling multiple activities and ad-hoc requests simultaneously.
Willingness to adapt to fast-paced delivery cycles; ability to multi-task.
Local candidates in the greater Phoenix area preferred.",2.5,"Career Evolutions
2.5","Scottsdale, AZ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
247,"Business Systems Analyst, Data Operations",-1,"Commvault is a worldwide leader in delivering backup and recovery for the progressive enterprise. Commvault enables you to protect, manage, and use your data, while managing it in a consistent, compliant way. Our automated solutions work on-prem and in the cloud, and work with the digital tools and procedures you’re already using. Keep your data accessible and actionable with a single solution that ensures your data is always available — no matter what.

JOB DESCRIPTION:
This is a critical business facing role within Business Intelligence & Analytics (BI&A) team. A Business Systems Analyst is a single point of contact for a functional unit. This role is responsible for understanding business strategy and focus areas, translating those into IT requirements and prioritization, help move these through IT processes including budgeting, agreement on prioritization and timing with the business stakeholders and delivering on expectations. The main job of this role is to hide complexities of our BT organization and of IT project delivery work as much as we can from the business and provide a streamlined approach for business to engage BT and get technology and processes improvement projects done. A BSA will be accountable for multiple functional organizations.
How you will make an impact:
Understand and communicate our team’s infrastructure and technology offerings as well as current business processes relevant to the business organization being supported
Learn the business organization, strategy, goals and priorities for the functional orgs you will own by interacting directly with key business stakeholders and developing own network of contacts
Keep up with latest tech and productivity trends within business areas of responsibilities
Help lead roadmap planning activity by providing an insight into your business segment’s demand; prioritize and maintain demand pipeline through engagements with business stakeholders and the Business Intelligence & Analytics team
Set expectations and communicate proactively on deliverables with the business.
Drive building business case for projects, define ROI, articulate risks and trade-offs in approach
Drive application and vendor selection process alongside the Procurement and business team – requirements analysis and comparison
Analyze business and user needs; document requirements
Document the design, build, and delivery of projects – take projects through designed process working with the business stakeholders and BI&A owners
Collaborate with admin and dev teams to ensure the business projects stay on target, on scope, on cost, and on time
Coordinate change management with the business and provide end user documentation and support where necessary
Log and track user stories and issues – drive prioritization with the business and BI&A stakeholders
Drive resolution of issues and risks

What you need to be ready:
3-5 years of experience in the business operations or IT field with background in Computer Science or related fields, working close to the development teams and the business teams
Good understanding of the software development life cycle and Agile methodologies
Structured development methodologies including liaising with business stakeholders to write and refine Business Requirement Documents and User Stories
Good interpersonal skills and written communication skills to frequently interact with various levels of the organization
Good organizational and problem-solving skills
Demonstrated ability to drive collaboration in cross-organizational team setting without owning resources directly
Great networking skills to establish great connections across different organizations

Commvault is an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are always committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. and we will not discriminate against on the basis of such characteristics or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we work.",3.3,"Commvault
3.3",New Jersey,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
248,Data Analyst,-1,"About DMI


DMI (Digital Management, LLC.), the world’s first end-to-end mobility company, combines all the skills and services necessary to deliver mobile enterprise solutions. Built to reinvent business through mobility, DMI has expertise in mobile strategy, UX, web, and app development, omni-channel commerce, brand and marketing, IoT and big data analytics, and secure device and app management. The company’s unique, integrated approach to mobility has resulted in dramatic growth as well as an expanding client base, which includes hundreds of Fortune 1000 commercial clients and all fifteen U.S. Federal Departments. DMI is headquartered in Bethesda, MD, with satellite offices around the world. The company was named one of the 2018 Top Workplaces and 2019 Top Workplaces in the Washington, DC area by The Washington Post and received Inc. Magazine’s Hire Power Award as one of the top 100 Private Job Creators in the US. Additional information is available at www.dminc.com and on LinkedIn, Twitter, Facebook, and Instagram.

About the Opportunity


DMI is currently seeking to hire a Database Analyst to support Federal Government customers on a long-term contract in the DC metro area. This developer will work on a variety software projects implementing database components for several portal and web-based systems.

Duties and Responsibilities:

· Interpreting data, analyzing results using statistical techniques

· Analyze customer data and write ETL scripts to load this data into an existing database schema

· Acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases

· Developing and implementing data analyses, data collection systems and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality to accommodate new requirements

· Create and deploy new reports using SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS)

· Perform break/fix analysis for reported issues

· Work with management to prioritize business and information needs

· Locate and define new process improvement opportunities

Qualifications


Education and Years of Experience:
BS in Computer Science or equivalent or 4+ years of relevant experience
4+ years of experience in MS SQL Server database development -including DB design, coding of stored procedures, functions, and development of complex queries
4+ years of experience in data analysis - reviewing business data and adjusting it to existing data models, or adjusting data models as necessary to accommodate data patterns.
Experience with SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) - defining, deploying, and maintaining report
Required Skills/Certifications:
Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst
Demonstrate excellent data analytical abilities and best practices scripting standards
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Strong communication & presentation skills
Working Knowledge of Data Warehousing concepts and modeling techniques (dimensional modeling, Star Schema, Snowflake, SCD, ODS, ETL, OLAP)
Working knowledge of software processes (Agile/Scrum Methodology, project management, architecture/design, requirements, development, QA/QC, deployment)
Min. Citizenship Status Required: Permanent Resident

Location: Work from home or Tysons Corner Office, VA office

Physical Requirements: N/A

Working at DMI

DMI is a diverse, prosperous and rewarding place to work. We provide our employees with competitive benefits, educational assistance, and career growth opportunities. Every employee is valued for their talents and contributions. We all take pride in helping our customers achieve their goals, which in turn contributes to the overall success of the company.

The company does and will take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals with disabilities and protected veterans, and to treat qualified individuals without discrimination on the basis of their physical or mental disability or veteran status. DMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minority/Female/Veteran/Disabled.

***************** No Agencies Please *****************

Applicants selected may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. US citizenship may be required for some positions.",3.4,"DMI
3.4",United States,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
249,Health Data Science Analyst,$62k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

At MITRE, people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges. We’re committed to the long-term well- being of our employees.

MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with a focus on making the world safer, healthier, and more secure. R&D centers that we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as, healthcare, cybersecurity, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth.

Through the Health federally- funded research and development center (FFRDC), MITRE exclusively serves in the public interest and helps to bring world-class expertise to bear on key challenges facing the nation. MITRE operates the Health FFRDC on behalf of US Department of Health and Human Services (HHS). MITRE serves as an objective, independent, not for profit advisor supporting many of the complex analysis and critical thinking requirements that encompass business, policy, technology, and operational interests across HHS.

Basic Functions:
Conduct analysis on large health data sets (e.g., electronic health records, clinical data) using data science tools and methods.
Analyze analytical outputs using expertise in biomedical sciences, health and healthcare, and industry best practices to create actionable recommendations.
Perform data ingest, data preparation and validation in preparation for analysis using industry best practices.
Apply specialized expertise in data science, engineering, science/clinical research, ethics, or other health and healthcare-related subject matter areas to projects and tasks.
Advise and assist federal stakeholders as they plan and conduct biomedical research projects and initiatives.
Provide technical thought leadership and innovative ideas, which help sponsors improve computational analysis methods to solve bioinformatics research challenges.
Translate scientific business needs into required computing, storage, tool and other technical requirements
Create reports and presentations for both lay and professional public health audiences that disseminate finding and promote recommendations to improve health outcomes.
Participate in highly functional and creative teams while building knowledge and working relationships across the Corporation.
Develop working relationships within MITRE across all levels of staff and management to leverage the Corporation’s deep experience across a broad set of domains.
Serve as a technical resource to other staff, including MITRE health care experts with backgrounds in law, health IT and other fields.
Required Education/Experience/Skills/Certifications:
Master’s degree in science, computer science, engineering, and/or a health-related field.. A Bachelor’s degree coupled with related experience may be acceptable.
Hands on technical expertise in statistical computing and data analytic programming and/or scripting in Python and Python libraries required; R, SQL, SPARK, data visualization tools (Tableau, Jupyter, etc.) a plus.
Solid understanding of the healthcare industry, including government and private healthcare organizations; knowledge of the data systems and formats used in federal health systems a plus.
A strong track record of successfully delivering on deadlines.
Exceptional organizational skills and meticulous attention to detail.
Self-starter with excellent written and oral communication skills required.
Ability to work out of MITRE’s Bedford MA, Baltimore MD or McLean VA campuses is preferred. Professionals who can successfully collaborate via teleworking will be most welcome to apply.
Desired Education/Experience/Skills/Certifications:
Advanced scientific knowledge of electronic health records, cancer research, and clinical trials - including platforms, algorithms, tools and databases
Expertise working with the National Institutes of Health and/or a NIH-funded extramural research organization.
Demonstrated technical leadership and experience applying data sciences techniques, to include artificial intelligence, machine learning, statistical modeling and/or data visualization
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
250,Data Analyst,-1,"Goldbelly empowers the top food makers around the country to sell their specialty dishes (think deep dish pizza from Chicago, iconic Texas BBQ, etc) to food-lovers nationwide. Consumers know we are the marketplace of the best food you can get in the US. Merchants can use our platform to manage sales, fulfillment, reporting and easily create a new revenue stream. We never have to touch the inventory, which allows us to scale rapidly without inventory risk. It's a win-win. We're solving an incredibly complex problem around perishable shipping from n endpoints.

We are looking for a Data Analyst to join our growing Data Science team in New York. This role will oversee generating data-driven insights across all of Goldbelly's data including ad-hocs reports and business intelligence dashboards.
Responsibilities
Able to acquire, manipulate, analyze, and report key metrics and data points
Proficient in building dashboards to meet the data reporting needs of Goldbelly
Work with the rest of the team to maintain quality and accuracy of our data
Assist in interpretation of data for predictive analysis of user trends
Qualifications
Degree in an analytical field (finance, accounting, mathematics, computer science, economics, natural sciences)
2+ years of experience in a Data Analyst role
Proficient in SQL and Microsoft Excel
Experience creating BI dashboards and reports
Strong communication skills and a desire to collaborate with others
Can generate comprehensive reports, analyze trends and make meaningful recommendations
Strong problem-solving and analytical skills
Knowledge of Python/R is a plus",-1,Goldbelly,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
251,Data Analyst,$32k-$57k (Glassdoor Est.),"All Job Postings will close at 12:01a.m. CST (1:01a.m. EST) on the specified Closing Date (if designated).

If you close the browser or exit your application prior to submitting, the application progress will be saved as a draft. You will be able to access and complete the application through “My Draft Applications” located on your Candidate Home page.

Job Posting Title:
Data Analyst 3

Position Type:
Professional / Unclassified

Department:
LSUAM Engineering - School of Civil and Environmental Engineering (George Z Voyiadjis (00009256))

Work Location:
3121 Patrick F. Taylor Hall

Pay Grade:
Professional

Job Description:

Provide advanced technical support and maintenance of equipment for research laboratory facilities. Assist in identifying, purchasing, receiving and installing of equipment and software for the department and laboratories. Maintain and operate department's computer lab and LSU Vlab feed system. Responsible for troubleshooting, repairing, maintaining, purchasing and receiving departmental computer equipment. Act as department IT Support responsible for implementing university information technology policy. Other duties as assigned.

40% Computer Hardware and Software Support: Troubleshoot, repair and maintain the department's computer equipment and research related equipment including acting as an IT support person responsible for implementing university information technology policy on relevant department equipment. Act as point on contact for software developers in order to receive and process quotes to the point of installation and maintenance. Assess and repair as needed for instrumentation and test equipment associated with the research and computer labs.

20% Maintain and operate the department's Germano computer lab and LSU Vlab feed system. This includes management and administration of a VMWare Horizon system including being able to create and maintain virtual desktop pools and managing permissions for access to this pools. This also includes configuring physical desktops so that they can be utilized within the virtualized desktop environment.

20% Provide advanced technological support and maintenance of electrical/electronic equipment for the research/teaching laboratory facilities and associated equipment. Responsible for troubleshooting a wide variety of systems such as Agilent instruments (gas chromatographs, mass spectormeters, etc.) and MTS materials testing equipment, as well as a variety of other systems. Supervise one or more student workers.

10% Assist in identifying, pricing, purchasing, receipt, and installation of appropriate new equipment for research laboratories, student software requirements, department operation and teaching labs.

5% Represent the department in relevant college and department committees.

5% Other duties as assigned.

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor's with 3 years of experience which includes knowledge of applicable computer hardware, software operating systems to provide specialized technical and system support to the Civil and Environmental Engineering Department in an academic, research, or public service setting

Additional Job Description:

Special Instructions:
Analyst - Data Processing 3

Transcripts and three letters of recommendation required prior to hire

Posting Date:
October 16, 2020

Closing Date (Open Until Filled if No Date Specified):

Additional Position Information:

Background Check - An offer of employment is contingent on a satisfactory pre-employment background check.

Benefits - LSU offers outstanding benefits to eligible employees and their dependents including health, life, dental, and vision insurance; flexible spending accounts; retirement options; various leave options; paid holidays; wellness benefits; tuition exemption for qualified positions; training and development opportunities; employee discounts; and more!

Essential Position (Y/N):

EEO Statement:

LSU is committed to diversity and is an equal opportunity / equal access employer.

HCM Contact Information:

Questions or concerns can be directed to the LSU Human Resources Management Office at 225-578-8200 or emailed HR@lsu.edu",4.0,"Louisiana State University
4.0","Baton Rouge, LA",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
252,"Fraud Intelligence, Data Operations Analyst",-1,"At White Ops, we are all about keeping it human. We are the global leader in bot mitigation. We protect more than 200 enterprises—including the largest internet platforms—from sophisticated bots by verifying the humanity of nearly one trillion online interactions every week. The most sophisticated bots look and act like humans when they click on ads, visit websites, fill out forms, take over accounts, and commit payment fraud. We stop them.

Founded in 2012 in a Brooklyn sci-fi bookstore, our Bot Mitigation Platform protects enterprises from the sophisticated bots that threaten them. It's an ongoing war that we fight passionately every day. Join our mission to stop bots, disrupt the economics of cyber crime, and keep it human.

The Data Operations team is responsible for surfacing useful insights from the terabytes of data we amass every day. We value ethics, experimentation, efficiency, and intellectual curiosity. We are looking for someone who will compliment the team to innovate without regard to conventions, accelerate us through new tooling, and deliver quality data intelligence to our internal and external stakeholders.

What you'll do:
Identify impactful detection leads that increase velocity from time of threat identification to implementation of detection/blocking in White Ops products
Deploy stop-gap defenses for emerging threats through the development of analyses, models, algorithms, and dashboards
Create complex queries and reports to analyze historical data, including the use of techniques such as: subqueries, temp tables, complex joins, variables
Lead the design and architecture of data models and dashboards used to present key information to detection and customer success teams
Triage customer and internal inquiries about fraud efficacy by acting as first line of analysis
Implement best practices and tooling that will improve the time to understand a new detection lead and process it
Assist in research for case studies and white papers on fraud patterns
Create detailed documentation of models, algorithms, and analyses to create transparency and auditability of work
Who you are:
You have a strong sense of ownership which drives you to find ways to do things better, faster, and leaner; you hold yourself accountable for the quality and accuracy of your work
You look to find new and innovative ways to solve complex problems through rigorous experimentation and application of emerging technologies
You are open and transparent and work in tight collaboration with other team members on data projects and cross-departmentally across the rest of White Ops
You are communicative and go out of your way to support your team
Proficiency in SQL
Experience working with multi TB to PB data sets in cloud databases
Experience working with both structured and unstructured data sets
Experience improving processes and implementing tooling to accelerate analysis
Python experience or exposure preferred
Benefits and Perks
Unlimited vacation policy
Stock options, 401(k), and commuter benefits
Competitive salary and benefits
Medical and dental insurance for all full-time employees
Fully paid parental leave
Professional development fund
Great coaching from senior leaders and challenging development opportunities
Life at White Ops:

Our HQ office is located in the heart of New York City. We are growing the company deliberately with a keen eye towards maintaining a culture that values diversity, lifestyle, and career growth. We are doing meaningful work and we need people to join our mighty team. We are proud of our overwhelmingly positive presence on Glassdoor and Built in NYC. We have offices located in NYC, DC, Victoria, and London.",3.8,"White Ops
3.8","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
253,Data Analyst,$53k-$86k (Glassdoor Est.),"MindFinders is recruiting a Data Analyst to support the provision of high-quality early education services that prepare children for kindergarten entry and later school success. Approximately 5,000 children ages three to ﬁve attend early childhood classrooms in 67 elementary schools across the district.

The Support Temp, Head Start Data is responsible for working to provide support to the ECE Division by assisting the Head Start Data Specialist in implementing & maintaining database systems to collect, manage & report program data for the ECE Head Start School Wide Model.

The Support Temp, Head Start Data will report to the Manager, Head Start Performance.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities The below statements are intended to describe the general nature and scope of work being performed by this position. This is not a complete listing of all responsibilities, duties, and/or skills required. Other duties may be assigned.

• Performing periodic extraction, transformation and upload of student demographic, eligibility and attendance data • Provide database access to new staff including setting up appropriate permissions • Troubleshoot daily staff access and other database issues • Assist Data Specialist in developing, formatting and distributing data reports to stakeholders including monthly Enrollment, Attendance, and Registration reports and other ad hoc reporting needs • Perform regular data quality assurance for student and staff data • Assist the Data Specialist in preparation and production of annual PIR report • Assist Data Specialist in documentation of all ECE data process and procedures

Qualiﬁcations • Bachelor’s Degree preferably in a computer information management, statistics or related field; associate degree with at least 3 years of experience in data management or data analysis • Solid understanding of relational database management systems • Hands on experience with any programming language • Advanced MS Excel skills (able to manipulate Pivot Table, Write Macros) • Experience with ETL (Extract, transform, load procedures) • Experience with other data management and analysis tools such as R, Tableau, Power BI preferred • Experience with data validation • Experience with JavaScript, HTLM/XML preferred • Preferred prior experience working in education or other human services sector • Preferred hands-on knowledge of QuickBase

Personal Qualities of Top Candidates Commitment to Equity: Passionate about closing the achievement gap and ensuring that every child, regardless of background or circumstance, receives an excellent education. Leadership: Coaches, mentors, and challenges others to excel despite obstacles and challenging situations. Focus on Data-Driven Results: Relentlessly pursues the improvement of central oﬃce performance and school leadership, instruction, and operations, and is driven by a desire to produce quantiﬁable student achievement gains. Innovative Problem-Solving: Approaches work with a sense of possibility and sees challenges as opportunities for creative problem solving; takes initiative to explore issues and ﬁnd potential innovative solutions. Adaptability: Excels in constantly changing environments and adapts ﬂexibly in shifting projects or priorities to meet the needs of a dynamic transformation eﬀort; comfortable with ambiguity and non-routine situations. Teamwork: Increases the eﬀectiveness of surrounding teams through collaboration, constant learning and supporting others; sensitive to diversity in all its forms; respects and is committed to learning from others. Dependability: Does whatever it takes to consistently deliver with high quality under tight deadlines; successfully manages own projects through strong organization, detailed workplans, and balancing of multiple priorities. Communication and Customer Service Skills: Communicates clearly and compellingly with diverse stakeholders in both oral and written forms; anticipates and responds to customer needs in a high-quality and courteous manner.",3.6,"Mindfinders
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
254,Data Analyst,-1,"Amarillo, TX Location. Company is looking an experienced data analyst to join a growing a rapidly expanding organization. Looking for an engaged, enthusiastic, and excited folks to become an integral part of our team. As a data analyst, you’ll get to directly see the impact or your projects, be empowered to understand the everyday needs of users and make decisions that deliver real business value. At the same time, you’ll enjoy a friendly work environment and nimble small-business culture.

Someone experienced in SAS, or with experience using another stack (Python, R, etc.) to analyze large datasets. College degree or work equivalent; Data Mining / ETL experience; SQL; SAS Programming; Microsoft SQL Server; Experience with project management and delivery Distributed Version Control

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
SAS or similar: 3 years (Required)
Data Analysis: 3 years (Required)
Data Mining: 3 years (Required)
Location:
Amarillo, TX (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.recruitingassociates.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",4.3,"Recruiting Associates
4.3","Amarillo, TX",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
255,Data Analyst,$31k-$57k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role and Responsibilities: *
Analyze, design, develop, implement and maintain data integrity enhancements regarding Western Express, Inc.’s business requirements. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

· Analyze, design, develop and implement new analytics to enhance internal decision-making processes.

· Design, develop and maintain internal data analytics enhancements to provide forecasting business requirements.

· Design and develop data sets used for external system API’s as needed.

· Analyze and utilize data sets used for integration with TMW/ICC, the TMS system; TMT, the Maintenance System; and Synergize, the document imaging system to enhance business operations.

· Interpret data, analyzing results using statistical techniques and providing ongoing reports.

· Developing and implementing databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.

· Acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases/data analysis systems.

· Communicate and impart knowledge and skillsets to internal personnel as directed.

· Manage and maintain data integrity of select systems.

· Work with and assist the Director if IT and the VP of IT to accomplish business requirements and goals.

· Assist Accounting and Finance as needed to accomplish enhancements and business requirements.

· Refer difficult cases and projects to the VP of IT.
Qualifications and Education Requirements: *
· High school diploma/GED required.

· Minimum 3 - 5 years’ experience in information technology software development and analysis.

· Working knowledge of Windows Office and Outlook 365 software options and functionality.
Preferred Skills*
· Extensive knowledge of TMW/ICC modules, data base and peripheral systems used.

· Knowledge of internal iSeries TMW/ICC database structure and peripheral databases contained with iSeries.

· Knowledge of Information Builders suite of products.

· Bachelor’s degree. Extensive analytical skills and development experience in a working environment. Extensive data systems configuration, knowledge, and support. Ability to work with internal and external personnel in a calm, professional manner.

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
information technology software development and analysis.: 1 year (Required)
Location:
Brentwood, TN 37027 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.westernexp.com
Company's Facebook page:
www.facebook.com/drivewithwestern
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"Western Express Inc.
3.9","Brentwood, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Trucking,Transportation & Logistics,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
256,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"The Senior Data Analyst role requires extensive analytical, data product and business skills applied through the execution of data including the development and creation of data models. Also responsible for data analysis, reporting, and technology implementations using industry-leading principles, methodologies, and programs. Analytic activities are typically designed to be repeatable and serve many clients although there are occasions that may require a custom solution to solve a specific business problem. This role requires comfortability with generating analytics as well as explaining findings to various audiences.

This role can be home-based in the US.
What You Will Do:
Use predictive modeling and machine learning to improve and optimize client usage, adoption, and benefit of data.
Utilize statistical techniques to perform predictions, analyze patterns, and uncover hidden stories told through data.
Collaborate with partners to identify and support the development of analytic solutions based on company data products.
Prepare analysis datasets by appending data, deduping, loading data to analysis application, and merging with other datasets.
Research and implement new analytic techniques or methodologies as needed for specific projects or analyses.
Use a variety of statistical analysis tools (SAS, R, Python) to facilitate analytic discovery.
Communicate findings to internal and external business partners.
What You Will Have:
Bachelor’s Degree in a quantitative field (Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Economics) or related degree programs and 8+years of relevant work experience.
Master’s Degree in a quantitative field (Math, Statistics, Computer Science, Economics) or related degree programs and 5+years of relevant work experience.
Knowledge of various statistical software programming languages (SAS, R, Python).
Experience with data mining and statistical/machine learning techniques.
Ability to interpret business problems and identify optimal solutions.
Proficiency in data manipulation and skills needed for utilizing appropriate analytic software.
Attention to detail and time management to deliver high quality, client-ready work for multiple projects across several client engagements while meeting timelines.
Knowledge of supervised and unsupervised statistical and data mining techniques
Knowledge of sophisticated predictive analytics (GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting Trees)
Experience with a variety of programming languages (SAS, R, Python)
Ability to efficiently communicate results and findings
Comfort with handling multiple priorities at once and pivoting focus as necessary
Intellectual and business curiosity
What Will Set You Apart:
Knowledge of data visualization tools (Microsoft BI, Tableau)
Experience with automating processes using a variety of tools and platforms
Experience working with global data
Experience working with agencies
Experience with digital data
Experience with cloud platforms (GCP, AWS)
Travel: 10-20%

#GD17

Primary Location City/State:

Homebased - Conway, Arkansas

Additional Locations (if applicable):

Acxiom is an affirmative action and equal opportunity employer (AA/EOE/W/M/Vet/Disabled) and does not discriminate in recruiting, hiring, training, promotion or other employment of associates or the awarding of subcontracts because of a person's race, color, sex, age, religion, national origin, protected veteran, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetics or other protected status.",3.8,"Acxiom
3.8",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1969,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
257,Senior Data Transportation Analyst,$47k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"What you will do
This position is responsible for the analysis and reporting of all transportation related metrics covering all UPG locations to satisfy the desired level of service and guarantee the optimization flows at the lowest possible cost.

How you will do it

Extract freight, sales, inventory and delivery performance data on a daily basis from multiple ERP and transportation management systems to design and support all UPG freight reporting requirements.
Support the Logistics department as the UPG Super User for SAP, Kewill TMS and Proship TMS. User will be the subject matter expert and act as first level IT support for all Logistics related questions on functionality, defects and enhancements to the systems.
Analyze internal processes and procedures to recommend and assist in implementation of process improvements to help reduce waste and improve logistics processes leading to overall logistics cost reductions and or improvements in delivery performance.
Use VBA or other software to automate repetitive/monotonous data pulls, alteration, and presentationeliminating non-value added workload.
Independently recognize cost-saving opportunities, and lead implementation among individuals or groups to drive the potential savings into actual tracked-savings.

What we look for
Required

Bachelor's degree in logistics related field, computer science, computer programming, accounting or engineering. Applicants who have completed a coding boot-camp may also be considered.
Some travel to support meetings and development related to Corporate Logistics reporting and Logistics software enhancements and improvements.
Previous coding experience with VBA, Azure, SQL, or other database-beneficial coding tools or languages.
Strong interpersonal skills and decision making abilities, problems may be vaguely defined and require technical/operational practices.
Preferred

Preference given to candidates located in the Oklahoma City area, or those who can relocate to the area. This position could be remote from anywhere in the continental United States should we feel the candidate is a superb fit for the role.
Strong preference for applicants with computer science degrees, or previous coding experience.
Preference given to candidates with a minimum of 2 years experience in a related field.
High proficiency in a Windows operating environment, including Excel (macros), Power Point and Access. Proficient in other report building software including: Tableau, Power BI, and Cognos Analytics.
Effective and professional communication and organization skills.
Leadership and decision making skills to support day to day logistics decisions in the absence of the Logistics Manger.
Johnson Controls International plc. is an equal employment opportunity and affirmative action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, genetic information, status as a qualified individual with a disability, or any other characteristic protected by law. For more information, please view EEO is the Law. If you are an individual with a disability and you require an accommodation during the application process, please visit www.johnsoncontrols.com/careers.",3.3,"Johnson Controls
3.3","Norman, OK",-1,10000+ Employees,1885,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
258,Data Analyst,-1,"About Us

Gitwit is a digital product and marketing company located in the Arts District of Tulsa, OK. We are a fiercely creative 25 person team with a diverse set of talents ranging from researchers, strategists, and data scientists, to writers, designers, animators, and producers. We create and implement growth and innovation strategies for a wide variety of local, national, and global clients.

We champion questions above everything and clearly understand that our value to the world lies in moving quickly and methodically to innovate in ways that companies themselves cannot.

About the Work


We are currently looking for an experienced Data Analyst who will increase the fidelity and impact of our dashboards and data visualizations. This is an opportunity for the right analytics guru to plug into one of the best product and marketing teams in the region. Your task is to rapidly prototype data-driven product ideas to help grow our analytics product line.

At Gitwit, were passionate about building products that impact peoples daily lives for good. Youll have the opportunity to work on projects that reach thousands of people in a variety of fields. Some of our current projects include a two-sided marketplace for parents and caregivers to arrange childcare during COVID-19, a patient check-in tool for ER and urgent care centers, a tool for understanding and hiring the right kind of innovator, and other internal and external projects.

About You

You have a serious passion for great technology products and are a voracious reader and follower of the latest technology trends and experiments. Youre passionate about creativity and generating new ideas. After all, this is what our clients come to us for.

The work we do is fast, fluid and requires a very particular type of analyst:
A Problem-first Thinker. You take the time to completely understand a problem space before jumping into solutions. You love asking questions.
Collaborative. At Gitwit our teams are composed of people that come from a variety of disciplines -- not just engineering. We dont throw work over the fence. We solve problems together.
Compassionate. You have the desire, patience, and ability to succinctly explain deeply complex technical concepts to those you work with.
Strategic. You understand technology as it relates to business and UX. Youre able to see the big picture and suggest solutions that might be 100% technical.
Here are some of the things you should be awesome at:
Data visualization and storytelling
Statistical analysis and techniques
Programming and Analysis tools, such as git, SQL, Python, and/or R
Insight generation
Exploratory data analysis
Data engineering + strategy
Structuring experiments
Hypothesis generation
Business intelligence
Rapid prototyping
Basic Qualifications:
BS degree in Computer Science, Math, Physics, or a similar technical field of study
3 years of relevant industry work experience
Benefits
Competitive salary
Technology package of your choice (including cell phone)
Private and collaborative workspace at one of the coolest office buildings in Tulsa
Excellent health and dental insurance with 99% of the employee premium paid by us
401k match
Life insurance
Flexible work schedule
Plenty of vacation time to live your life
Powered by JazzHR",-1,Gitwit Creative,"Tulsa, OK",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
259,Data Analyst,$34k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"Reduces risk of lost revenue to the company through research, monitoring system functions, and business rule development of system changes.

·
Locates, validates, and analyzes data utilizing tools such as Excel, SQL, Access, and VBA, from disparate sources to support Revenue Cycle goals.

·
Combines data from all systems in the RCM life cycle (credentialing, EMR, and clearinghouse), claim transactions, and data elements provided in policies from payers and government entities to influence and initiate changes in claim outcomes, payer behavior, or system processing.

·
Conducts trending on baseline metrics (billing, collection, and remittance) and assists with the development and resolution of action plans

·
Identifies issues and conducts analysis and/or audits (i.e. gap analysis, audit summary) of payer and/or clinic issues and escalations

·
Monitors key tasks to ensure turn-around time is being met and escalating issues timely

·
Compiles data in a systematic fashion, clearly documenting assumptions and validating accuracy of information to resolve inconsistencies

·
Identifies trends within large datasets and has the ability to summarize, graph, and communicate findings

·
Researches charging/billing questions for new and existing services to ensure appropriate revenue recognition

·
Analyzes data to identify likely relationships, summarizes data, and prepares summary materials for discussion with clinical and finance teams

·
Runs and extracts accurate reports from software tools

·
Prepares training materials to document a task and cross train for coverage

·
High School graduate or equivalent; college graduate preferred

·
Experience in health care or analyst position is an advantage

·
Experience in Excel

·
Strong attention to detail required",4.4,"Team Rehabilitation
4.4","Clinton, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
260,Data Analyst,$31k-$57k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role and Responsibilities: *
Analyze, design, develop, implement and maintain data integrity enhancements regarding Western Express, Inc.’s business requirements. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

· Analyze, design, develop and implement new analytics to enhance internal decision-making processes.

· Design, develop and maintain internal data analytics enhancements to provide forecasting business requirements.

· Design and develop data sets used for external system API’s as needed.

· Analyze and utilize data sets used for integration with TMW/ICC, the TMS system; TMT, the Maintenance System; and Synergize, the document imaging system to enhance business operations.

· Interpret data, analyzing results using statistical techniques and providing ongoing reports.

· Developing and implementing databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.

· Acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases/data analysis systems.

· Communicate and impart knowledge and skillsets to internal personnel as directed.

· Manage and maintain data integrity of select systems.

· Work with and assist the Director if IT and the VP of IT to accomplish business requirements and goals.

· Assist Accounting and Finance as needed to accomplish enhancements and business requirements.

· Refer difficult cases and projects to the VP of IT.
Qualifications and Education Requirements: *
· High school diploma/GED required.

· Minimum 3 - 5 years’ experience in information technology software development and analysis.

· Working knowledge of Windows Office and Outlook 365 software options and functionality.
Preferred Skills*
· Extensive knowledge of TMW/ICC modules, data base and peripheral systems used.

· Knowledge of internal iSeries TMW/ICC database structure and peripheral databases contained with iSeries.

· Knowledge of Information Builders suite of products.

· Bachelor’s degree. Extensive analytical skills and development experience in a working environment. Extensive data systems configuration, knowledge, and support. Ability to work with internal and external personnel in a calm, professional manner.

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
information technology software development and analysis.: 1 year (Required)
Location:
Brentwood, TN 37027 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.westernexp.com
Company's Facebook page:
www.facebook.com/drivewithwestern
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"Western Express Inc.
3.9","Brentwood, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Trucking,Transportation & Logistics,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
261,Data Analyst,$41k-$77k (Glassdoor Est.),"Gupta Media is looking for a Data Analyst to join our Strategy & Analytics team to assist with reporting, tracking, data analysis, advertising strategy, and visualization needs. In this role you will work internally to assist paid media analysts with reporting requests as well as externally to provide clients with insights regarding their advertising campaigns. Advanced knowledge of Excel is a requirement, and 1-2 years of experience managing paid advertising campaigns or working in digital advertising is preferred.

Responsibilities:
Reporting
Comfort with Excel, Powerpoint, Google Data Studio, Google Docs and Google Sheets is required.
Maintaining customized dashboards in Google Sheets and Excel that are updated on a daily/weekly cadence.
Generating pivot tables and other visualizations that summarize thousands of lines of data.
Prefer candidates with experience in translating performance media metrics into a coherent, digestible reports for client ad campaigns.
Assist with the creation of Power Point/Google Slide decks.
Strategy
Understand advertising trends within a single project and across multiple projects to help guide media buying strategy.
Learn client’s business and align the media strategy with business goals. Understand concepts like LTV, ROAS and Incremental Revenue.
Discuss strategy with clients to gain trust and shareholder buy-in on media strategy and results.
Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree or higher.
2-3 years of experience as a data analyst or comparable position.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Excel, Powerpoint, Google Data Studio, Google Docs and Google sheets.
Nice-to-have: Tableau, Python, SQL, ETL Services
An absolute love for data. You have no problem tearing apart a problem, and living inside a spreadsheet to find the answer to any question.
Driven, motivated, enthusiastic attitude. You want to take on challenges, and you are excited to find the solution in the most effective way possible.
About The Agency

Gupta Media is an agency with three specialties – media buying, creative services and technology solutions. We do our best work when all three are working in unison. Our client roster includes brands like Amazon, Red Bull, Movember and Fender, music festivals like Boston Calling, The Governor’s Ball and Afropunk, and record labels like Sony Music, Universal Music and Warner Music Group.

We pride ourselves on being innovative, competitive and disruptive in the digital space. Due to this, we’ve organically grown to dominate our target industries. Now, we want to apply what we already know to other industries.",2.9,"Gupta Media
2.9","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
262,Data Analyst,$34k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"When you’re the best, we’re the best. We instill an environment where employees feel engaged, satisfied and able to contribute their unique skills and talents. We provide extensive opportunities for personal and professional development, building both employee competence and organizational capability to fuel exceptional performance now and in the future.

Summary:

In this role, you will perform analyses, data management, and research. You will answer methodology and data source questions from internal teams through the use of available data sources, documentation processes, and data methodology tools.

Responsibilities:
Understand data source and business processes and how they fit into overall business needs.
Interpret trends, regulatory changes, and/or forecasts and anticipates impact for the company.
Define requirement dashboards and reports that enable information sharing with stakeholders.
Ensure quality and timely project delivery while working closely with stakeholders (internal and external).
Establish and maintain relationships with stakeholders to effectively manage expectations.
Assist with planning and participating in stakeholder meetings to gather requirements and/or understand current business processes.
Qualifications:
Relevant degree preferred. Mathematics, Accounting, or Finance degree a plus.
2 or more years of relevant work experience required.
Must be proficient in Microsoft Excel with the ability for creation, manipulation, and interpretation of data.
Strong analytical, database, and spreadsheet skills.
Tableau and Access database experience desirable.
Equal Opportunity Employer: Females/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The Company is committed to equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants without regard to race, religion, color, gender identity, ethnicity, age, national origin, sexual orientation, disability status, veteran status or any other category protected by applicable law.",4.0,"Vizient
4.0","Irving, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
263,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst
If you are a Data Analyst with SQL Server experience, please read on!

We are a top rated financial firm that is looking to expand our Data Team. If you like to take the lead on projects, develop SQL scripts, and are a Data Wizard, this could be the job for you!

What You Will Be Doing
Design/Develop SQL scrpts, Functions, Views, Triggers, Stored Procedures
Create SQL Mail Agent, Alerts, and schedule DTS and SSIS Packages
Migrate data from various formats into our SQL server database with automated processes
Work closely with the team to develop requirements for data
What You Need for this Position
Qualifications:
2+ years working with SQL Server
Familiarity with SSIS
Nice to haves:
SSRS
SSAS
Stored Procedures
SQL Mail Agent
DTS/SSIS Packages
What's In It for You
Competitive base salary
Great benefits
Work for a talented data team in a well established financial firm
So, if you are a Data Analyst with experience, please apply today!
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.

CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.",4.2,"CyberCoders
4.2","Chesapeake, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
264,Data Analyst,$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

We are OpenSquare. We believe that people with a purpose need a place to be their best. From Seattle area skyscrapers to the Pacific Northwest’s premier Universities and medical facilities, we design and create insightful spaces with the latest technology providing our clients an environment that embodies their image and encourages success. Splice is the professional services division of OpenSquare, providing FF&E project integration, post-occupancy and MAC management for some of the most well-known companies in the Seattle area.

The Data Analyst provides critical business intelligence for the Splice team, specifically focused on building in-depth knowledge of relevant databases, processes and programs. Additionally, this role provides strategic information to key stakeholders through data mining of corporate databases and by deeply understanding business processes and programs. This role will also drive the development and communication of business performance reporting analysis

Location: South Lake Union

*Please note that due to an influx of candidate submittals, we are only reviewing candidates located in the Seattle/surrounding cities area*

The Data Analyst will:
Work closely with account managers and other stakeholders to support customer data questions and analysis
Interpret data and identify trends using statistical techniques, generate reports and visualizations
Support development and maintenance of databases, data collection systems, analytics and other strategies to optimize operational efficiency
Develop a deep understanding of the processes underlying our data to identify opportunities for data integrity, normalization and quality assurance initiatives
Develop metrics and dashboards for monitoring data trends or telling stories
Train end users on new tools, reports and dashboards
Qualified Candidates will have:
1-3 years’ experience in data analysis, modeling and/or visualization. Education may be substituted in lieu of work experience
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university in a quantitative field
Experience with Python & SQL required
Experience with Tableau, Bokeh or other data visualization tools is heavily preferred.
Ability to work with stakeholders to assess potential risks
Ability to translate business needs into non-technical, lay terms
Experience handling large data sets
Benefits include:
15 days of PTO
9 Paid Holidays
Medical/Dental/Vision
401K
If this sounds like the right opportunity for you, please apply with your resume today! We look forward to connecting.",2.9,"OpenSquare
2.9","Seattle, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
265,Data Analyst,$37k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview

Donegal Insurance Group is a regional property-casualty insurance company doing business in 26 states, headquartered in Marietta, PA, with 7 regional offices located in Athens, GA, Le Mars, IA, Grand Rapids, MI, Albuquerque, NM, Greenville, OH, Glen Allen, VA, and Sheboygan Falls, WI.

Donegal offers a broad range of personal and commercial insurance products sold exclusively through our network of independent agents. We are committed to the independent agency system and proud of the company's heritage, which spans over 130 years. Donegal's strong financial foundation and successful operating strategies have earned the company a rating of 'A' (Excellent) by the A.M. Best Company, the nation's leading insurance rating organization.

Job Summary

Donegal Insurance Group has an opening for a Data Analyst to work in the Business Intelligence area. Primary responsibility will be to provide data for business intelligence solutions for all functional areas based on business need. This role will work closely with IT to acquire data, identify analytical requirements and perform business analysis using various techniques, e.g. statistical analysis, explanatory and predictive modeling, data mining. This role will help in determining best practices and develop actionable insights and recommendations for the current business operations. This role will help ensure business intelligence applications and analyses enhance business decision-making capabilities.

Responsibilities and Duties
Based on business requirements, provide data from multiple sources for use in building analytical solutions which enhance decision-making and/or refine operations.
Aid in the interpretation of results from multiple sources using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation to complex data mining.
Coordinate the use of data to develop, modify, and enhance reports and dashboards based on user requirements.
Create, enhance, and maintain data models/sets.
Identify business trends and problems through data analysis.
Collaborate with business users and members of IT, including business analysts, database architects, and managers.
Gather and document user requirements.
Perform usability testing and report data validation against end user requirements.
Gain familiarity with data structure in the Donegal data warehouse and various data marts.
Exhibit a commitment to data quality by validating results against requirements.
Ensure duties are performed in adherence to all Federal, State, and Local laws and regulations.
Comply with guidelines, policies, and directives outlined in the company handbook and department manuals.
Provide timely, courteous, and quality customer service to customers.
Clearly demonstrate commitment and participation to team goals and objectives.
Reliable attendance and punctuality.
Qualifications and Skills
Bachelors Degree in Business Intelligence, Computer Sciences, Information Technology, Data Science, Data & Analytics, Mathematics, Statistics, Actuarial Science or related field required.
1-2 years of related experience preferred.
Experience working with property/casualty insurance preferred
PC skills to include:
Microsoft Office applications
Power BI, SSRS and Excel
SQL
Oracle
Relational and dimensional modeling concepts
DAX and M expression languages
Open-Source Software (e.g. R / Python)
Benefits

Donegal Insurance Group offers a comprehensive benefits package for all full-time, permanent positions. Learn more about our benefit offerings by visiting our Benefits page.

Additional Information

Donegal Insurance Group participates in E-Verify in the following states: Alabama, Arizona, Georgia, Louisiana, Mississippi, Nebraska, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, and Utah. If you reside in one of the listed states, please review the ""Notice of E-Verify Participation"" and the ""Right to Work Poster"" on the links below:
Notice of E-Verify Participation Poster (English and Spanish)
Right to Work Poster (English and Spanish)
Powered by JazzHR",3.7,"Donegal Insurance Group
3.7","Marietta, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1889,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
266,Data Analyst,$74k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst
Position Summary
We have a need for Data Analyst with experience in data analytics and metrics optimization. We will need you to assist in collecting data and putting it to practical use, with the end goal of maximizing profits and increasing our efficiency. We are interested in furthering our data collection and analysis practices, so you will recommend new data procedures and programs. You’ll be responsible for processing several different types of data, including those related to our website and online presence, and our multi-channel marketing campaigns and launches.
Responsibilities
As our Data Analyst, you will report to the Director of Marketing Technology. Your role will be to work across the marketing organization and cross-functional teams (IT, sales operations, finance, and CRM salesforce) to gather, analyze and share qualitative and quantitative analysis.
Evaluate the multichannel impact of marketing activities on engagement, sales and ROI
Develop and refine techniques used to measure engagement, conversion and trends for marketing efforts, including campaigns and ongoing programs
Create a baseline marketing performance and build a process to streamline measurement
Ensure timely delivery of reporting and insights, and build user-friendly answers to basic marketing questions (e.g., executive dashboards)
Use data mining and other analytical techniques to gain insight into customers to improve the effectiveness of communications and products
Improve the presentation and communication of marketing analytics across the organization
Benchmark marketing metrics against relevant standards and competitors
Identify and suggest optimization opportunities to appropriate executional teams
Conduct other ad-hoc analysis and reporting on request
Required Qualifications
Our ideal candidate will have three years of professional experience with marketing data at an investment firm or in a financial services company’s investment unit.
Strong background in quantitative analysis (e.g., statistics, finance, mathematics or economics)
Ability to aggregate, standardize, interpret and model data, and to work independently within a decentralized environment
Analytic modeling using methods such as basic statistics, software-assisted segmentation and linear regression
Digital marketing platform skills, including common website analytics platforms, widely used ad serving and technology platforms, social listening and analytics platforms, and mobile site and mobile app analytics platforms
Advanced Excel skills (pivots, tables and functions)
Familiarity with database queries and programming languages (e.g., SQL)
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, including the ability to convey complex ideas clearly and to communicate with both technical and nontechnical audiences
Degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research or relevant experience",2.3,"The Rockridge Group
2.3","Concord, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
267,Data Analyst,$39k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Southcentral Foundation (SCF) Data Analyst is responsible for data mining, analysis and statistical reporting of data to support operations, research, and regulatory requirements using structured query language. May also be responsible for user training/support, application support and automation of business processes.

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in information management, statistics, finance and/or healthcare related field; or combination of equivalent training/education and experience.
Two years experience in data mining, extraction, analysis and reporting using structured query language, analyzer, data and report writing tools such as MS Query Analyzer/SQL Enterprise Manager, PL/SQL, Aqua Data, Crystal Reports or SQL Reporting Services.

Additional Qualifications for Data Analyst II: Meets all requirements of Data Analyst I in addition to the following:

One year experience in using healthcare coding schemes and/or financial coding schemes

Additional Qualifications for Data Analyst III: Meets all requirements of Data Analyst II in addition to the following:

Master’s Degree with a focus in information management, statistics, healthcare related field; or equivalent training/education and experience.
One year of experience using statistical software such as SPSS, SAS or other analysis tools.
One year experience in using healthcare coding schemes and/or financial coding schemes.",3.5,"Southcentral Foundation
3.5","Anchorage, AK",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Membership Organizations,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
268,Data Analyst,-1,"Description:

***Note: This is a contingent opportunity***
SNA International seeks a bright, collaborative Data Analyst with a strong work ethic to join our team. SNA International’s team works together in pursuit of the same cause: build a safe and just world by empowering organizations in the use of forensics, biometrics, and identity intelligence.
Qualified candidates will utilize their statistical and analytical skills to conduct full lifecycle analysis to include requirements, activities, and design. Data analysts will develop analysis and reporting capabilities. They will also monitor performance documentation, and metrics to identify improvements.
The following list is representative of the types of activities and responsibilities anticipated to be performed, but are not limited to:
Responsibilities:
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques.
Develop and implement data analyses, data collection systems, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports.
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.
Support additional activities, functions, or duties, as required.
Minimum Education and Experience Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics, or in another field with demonstrable coursework in these areas.
Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst.
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (e.g. Business Objects), databases (e.g. SQL), programming (e.g. XML, JavaScript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (e.g. Excel, SPSS, SAS)
Possess strong written and verbal communication skills
Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, Excel, and Adobe Acrobat
Attention to detail and strong organizational skills
The ability to prioritize job responsibilities in a fast-paced environment while maintaining a focus on excellent customer service is a must.
This position is located in Quantico, Va.
Candidates must be US citizens and able to pass a background check, drug screening, and a polygraph (if required).

Please submit your resume and a cover letter that outlines why you should be considered for this position and position level. Applications without a cover letter will not be considered.

No phone calls

SNA International is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.",4.1,"SNA International
4.1","Quantico, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Contract,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
269,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

Category: Information Systems
Type: Contractor
Description: An International company, located in Plano, TX, is seeking a Data Analyst for a 4+ month contract role.

Description:

The Data Analyst is responsible for, but not limited to: monitoring the COVID-19 related data in Workday HR system and a custom Power BI application for missing / inaccurate data, performing data audits, troubleshooting and investigating data anomalies and issues, and working with the business and IT to resolve data issues (proactively and reactively). The role will be working across multiple business units (i.e. IT, local HR, third party nurses, etc.) and locations virtually to help guarantee the quality of the data. The position will require flexibility, adaptability, and advanced experience utilizing Workday and Excel. The desired candidate should be deadline driven, work well under pressure, possess a strong customer service mindset, have excellent communication skills, and can build and maintain relationships across the organization.

Requirements:

BS or BA degree in computer science, business administration, or related technical field or equivalent experience is preferred
1-3 years"" experience working with large datasets
Strong Excel proficiency
Workday functional expertise required (including EIB (Enterprise Interface Buildier) and advanced reporting)
Detail oriented
Critical thinker
Ability to formulate and present recommendations regarding functional and technical solutions
Excellent written and verbal communication, presentation and organizational skills, and the ability to build strong working relationships with technical and non-technical teams alike at all levels including senior management
Must be able to video interview
Location Plano , TX
Minimum Experience (yrs):
Required Education: Not Specified
Benefits:

Return to search results Email this job to a friend

*Logged in members may also add jobs to their job cart",3.8,"Login Consulting Services
3.8","El Segundo, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
270,Cybersecurity Data Analyst,-1,"Job Summary/Company:

Our partner, a Federal contractor, is seeking a Cybersecurity Data Analyst who can leverage a wide variety of data science capabilities and languages, analyze and resolve critical data issues using various methodologies and ensure data integrity. If you are interested in learning more about Sparks Group and the opportunity, please submit your resume today.

Responsibilities:

Collect, validate, model, and analyze data from different data sources
Create infographics and visualizations for inclusion Cybersecurity briefings and presentations
Collaborate with key stakeholders to gather reporting requirements
Develop key metrics, interpret performance trends, identify root causes, and support data-based performance improvement
Build a maintainable cyber risk reporting process

Qualifications/Background Profile:

Bachelor’s degree in Operation Research, Engineering, Analytics, Data Science, Economics, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, or related field
2 years of experience with data-oriented tasks for cybersecurity operations
Access experience needed
Public Trust security clearance

Qualified candidates should send their resume AND call Sparks Group for additional details. Please note, resume must include a valid email address in order to be considered. We look forward to discussing your background, your current job search, and your potential career path with Sparks Group!

Sparks Group is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, pregnancy, citizenship, family status, genetic information, disability, or protect veteran status.

Sponsored by Sparks Group",4.4,"Sparks Group
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
271,Data Analyst,$45k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst


Date Posted: 12/9/2018

Primary Duties
- Uses InfoMaker and/or SQL to run queries to extract student, graduate, faculty employee, and other information from the Jenzabar Ex software system
- Performs appropriate tests to ensure accuracy and consistency of all data, documents query/report criteria and processes to ensure consistent application of methodology in future projects
- Builds and maintains at least four database systems (student, graduate, faculty, and staff) for ease of completing multi-year data summaries for dissemination
- Acquires, organizes, analyzes, and synthesizes data and results from internal and external data sources to produce meaningful and accurate reports including the annual Fact Book
- Completes all required and requested institutional surveys
- Updates and maintains the Institutional Research and the Quality Enhancement Plan (IR/QEP) Manual
Other Duties
- Develops an effective system using sound strategies for obtaining quality data from various internal and external sources
- Prepares statistical reports on operational performance of the IR/QEP office and the IAER Title III activity as requested (weekly, monthly, quarterly and annually)
- Interacts with Paine's faculty, staff and administration as a group, sub-groups, or individually to identify suitable data, information, and research needs in collaboration with the IR/QEP and IAER
Qualifications
Education: Bachelor's degree required, master's degree preferred, in the field of computer science, statistics, mathematics, information systems, economics or other field that included significant coursework in a related field from a regionally or nationally accredited college or university.
Experience: Minimum of three (3) years' experience as a Data Analyst or in a related position, minimum of two (2) years of experience extracting data from a query system such as InfoMaker or from a relational database such as Jenzabar Ex using another query system, experience maintaining and reporting data for a college or university's Institutional Research office, advanced level experience collecting and analyzing complex data, both narrative and statistical; experience maintaining and reporting data for a college or university's Institutional Research website would be an excellent asset
Other
- Strong analytical skills including, but not limited to, data analysis A
- Ability to collect data from internally or externally developed surveys, process and analyze data, and prepare reports for dissemination of results to stakeholders with minimum supervision
- Intermediate to advanced ability to use all Microsoft Office 365 components
- Excellent communication (verbal and written)/interpersonal skills
- Successful history of handling confidential information and completing assignments when deadlines are critical
- Ability to explain concepts/data to technical and non-technical personas/groups
- Ability to work effectively alone and with a team
- Must be able to deliver work in a timely and consistent manner
- Self-motivated and Innovative

Salary
Salary Range: $35,000 - $37,250
FLSA Classification: Exempt
Terms of Employment: 12 months",3.4,"Paine College
3.4","Augusta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1882,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
272,Data Analyst,-1,"We are looking for an organized, detail-oriented Data Analyst to join our Operations team. You will be responsible for collecting, maintaining, and analyzing data that drives our day to day business as well as translating data into insights and working closely with our leadership to help guide our business strategy.

Responsibilities

The Data Analyst will:

• Collect data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.

• Utilize strong Microsoft Excel and SQL skills to provide high-quality data analysis.

• Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports that effectively communicate trends, patterns and predictions using relevant data.

• Manage and complete time-sensitive monthly data tracking and reporting projects.

• Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.

• Fix coding errors investigate data anomalies and other data-related problems.

• Assist in building predictive systems to help catch issues before they arise and assist in building and supporting monthly financial reporting.

• Own the design of advanced analytics dashboards and KPI reports in our BI tool starting from requirements gathering across sales, product, and senior leadership teams to the delivery of a final, polished reports in production.

• Use data to answer key questions about the business and deliver takeaways from data with statistical significance.

• Provide timely, valuable solutions for ad hoc analyses via SQL with a focus to detail on crafting scripts that can be easily manipulated to efficiently address similar future analyses.

• Be the go-to person for any ad-hoc data-related questions.

Skills

• 2-5 years of experience in data, consulting, analytics, or a related function involving quantitative data analysis to solve problems.

• Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques.

• Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy.

• Proficiency in using SQL and advanced knowledge of Microsoft Excel.

• Experience designing reports and dashboards with data visualization tools such as Tableau and Microsoft Power BI.

• Experience with using an ETL management tool to collect data from various sources into analytical databases.

• Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings.

• Data-oriented personality, great communication skills, and an excellent eye for details.

• Accountability is key needs to have drive, urgency and be self-motivated.

• BS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics is a plus.",-1,CompuForce,"New York, NY",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
273,Data Analyst,$78k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Skills:

Data management (ability to run and manage large data sets) - MUST HAVE

Statistics and statistical modeling - MUST HAVE

REDCap Experience. Research Electronic Data Capture (REDCap) is a secure, HIPAA-compliant, web-based system for building and managing web-based research projects such as surveys and databases- MUST HAVE

Epidemiology

Quantitative Analysis

Qualitative Research

Skills in SAS, Stata, IMP SPSS

Survey design

Experience:

7+ Years of experience in data analysis, project design/planning

Quantitative/statistical methods

Qualitative research methods/analysis

Medical and clinical protocol writing

Business strategy including marking research

Data collection and management

Project management

Data scraping/wrangling

Multivariate modeling, data visualization

Years of data warehouse experience (ETL processes and DW modeling)

Management experience on database driven applications implementation",3.7,"Altimetrik Corp
3.7","Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
274,Data Analyst,-1,"Sprezzatura seeks a Data Analyst for the Department of Veteran Affairs VETPS contract. The qualified candidate will work collaboratively with both stakeholders and their Agile Scrum team members to serve as the team's data quality and process standards manager for an advanced cloud-based data and analytics platform. This 100% remote telework position requires candidates to demonstrate excellent communications and coordination skills as well as superior task ownership capabilities.

Roles/Responsibilities:

As the team's Data Analyst, you will work with ETL engineers, DBAs, solution architects, system SMEs, and the Product Management team member to:
Support the review, ingest, cleansing, testing, and release management activities of this D&A platform
Provide general IT and testing support to ensure VEO Ingest data meets quality standards
Scan and identify data anomalies, develop cleansing procedures, and support solution testing
Contribute to the development of customer deliverables, product artifacts, customer communications, and technical support efforts
Skills & Qualifications:
Experience interpreting and analyzing large data sets (1TB+)
Experience with Determine predictive models/ML algorithm a plus
Must be able to use qualitative and quantitative analytical skills to assess the effectiveness of IT operations.
Analytical and investigation skills
Must be able to develop processes for tracking configuration Items including customer provided items
Must be able to develop and maintain a Configuration Management plan, Configuration Management, and Document Management procedures
Must be able to track all problems and changes in work products and report changes and current configuration
Ability to work independently with minimal guidance and supervision
Well organized
Ability to meet deadlines
Works well in an agile IT solution delivery team environment
Ability to obtain a public trust clearance
Other Requirements:
A bachelor's degree in a technical field, is required.
5+ years of experience.
Exceptional organizational skills, attention to detail, and ability to work under tight deadlines
Location: Remote
Veteran Preference: Yes.
Citizenship/Security: Citizen/Green Card.
Must be able to hold a federal security clearance.",5.0,"Sprezzatura Management Consulting
5.0",Remote,-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
275,Data Analyst,$46k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary
Responsible for developing queries, stored procedures and/or subject specific data sets to use in the creation/maintenance of graphical and analytic reports in support of internal and external clients as well as assisting senior management with decision making. Compiles and analyzes information from various sources to support performance improvement, outreach, disease management, complex case management, and utilization management, financial and operational initiatives throughout MedStar Family Choice. Supports HEDIS throughout the year with proactive reporting of wellness measures. Responsible for accuracy, quality and timeliness of data and analytics delivered by fulfilling a data steward role. Interacts seamlessly with all levels of the organization, Technical and Non-Technical to gain an understanding of specific reporting requirements for regulatory reporting purposes.
Minimum Qualifications

Education/Training:

Bachelor’s degree in Healthcare Administration, Finance, Information Technology, Business Administration or related field or a combination of equivalent experience and education. Master’s degree preferred.

Experience:

5 years experience in relational database management and analysis, experience in managed care or healthcare related organizations preferred. Experience with Microsoft SQL Server, T-SQL, SQL Server Reporting Services (SRSS), MS Office, Email and Messaging Systems.

License/Cert/Reg:

No special certification, registration or licensure required.

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:

Project management, problem resolution, strategic and tactical planning. Ability to convey verbal and written information effectively. Moderate level of problem solving. Identifies and proposes solutions to moderately complex problems. Must be skilled in healthcare payer data model, data governance, data quality and data management. Requires advanced knowledge of relational database management, SQL, various reporting tools, and other applications necessary for data analysis. Must be comfortable with initiating discussions with all levels of staff to clarify and understand complex reporting requirements.

Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Contributes to the achievement of established department goals and objectives and adheres to department policies, procedures, quality standards, and safety standards. Complies with governmental and accreditation regulations.
Analyzes and interprets both clinical and financial data using knowledge of healthcare claims, including various coding guidelines (e.g., CPT, HCPCS, ICD-9 & 10-CM), healthcare finance, and regulatory agency guidelines.
Collaborates with multidisciplinary staff and senior management to design, implement, and evaluate outcomes for operational improvement initiatives. Analyzes and presents results to cross-functional teams to help shape outreach and disease management initiatives.
Ensures that monthly and quarterly reports are prepared and delivered on a timely basis. Develops ad-hoc reports as necessary from data warehouses.
Establishes and maintains a functional documentation system including necessary rules/regulations and standardizes all related procedures.
Leads and implements improvements, enhancements, updates, and modifications to administrative, clinical and/or financial data that enhances overall business operations and effectiveness.
Maintains current knowledge of the Medicaid managed care industry, and researches potential policies, practices, and trends. Translates this knowledge into innovative reports and analyses for use by senior management.
Manages the design, implementation, and production of all reports; responsible for data integrity for all databases created by and for the decision support function. Accountable for problem identification and resolution with respect to accessing, accumulating, and processing information from various sources.
Participates in initiatives/projects both internally and externally as assigned, ensuring compliance with corporate policies, HIPAA, Delmarva standards, HEDIS measurement, NCQA accreditation, or regulatory compliance.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Stewards data utilized in reporting and analytics by capturing and implementing business rules for data validation and quality, practicing and documenting data management and transformation processes, collaborating to accurately determine data definitions, and contributing metadata to an enterprise data dictionary.
Works closely with information technology (IT) staff and monitors additions to the MSFC data warehouses for accuracy and relevance.
Works closely with IT and the Quality Improvement Department to assist with annual HEDIS audit.
Participates in multidisciplinary quality and service improvement teams as appropriate. Participates in meetings, serves on committees and represents the department and hospital/facility in community outreach efforts as appropriate.
About MedStar Health
MedStar Health is dedicated to providing the highest quality care for people in Maryland and the Washington, D.C., region, while advancing the practice of medicine through education, innovation and research. Our 30,000 associates and 5,400 affiliated physicians work in a variety of settings across our health system, including 10 hospitals and more than 300 community-based locations, the largest visiting nurse association in the region, and highly respected institutes dedicated to research and innovation. As the medical education and clinical partner of Georgetown University for more than 20 years, MedStar is dedicated not only to teaching the next generation of doctors, but also to the continuing education and professional development of our whole team. MedStar Health offers diverse opportunities for career advancement and personal fulfillment.",3.7,"MEDSTAR HEALTH
3.7","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
276,Salesforce Data Analyst,$60k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"A pioneer in K–12 education since 2000, Amplify is leading the way in next-generation curriculum and assessment. Our captivating core and supplemental programs in ELA, math, and science engage all students in rigorous learning and inspire them to think deeply, creatively, and for themselves. Our formative assessment products turn data into practical instructional support to help students at every skill level build a strong foundation in early reading and math. Our programs provide teachers with powerful tools that help them understand and respond to the needs of all their students. Today, Amplify serves five million students in all 50 states.

The Salesforce Data Analyst will be responsible for the fidelity and accuracy of the data in the Salesforce system as well as the maintenance of data, processes, profiles and architecture of our Salesforce.com solution. The analyst will work closely with other CRM Team members and business subject matter experts to process data hygiene requests, update requirements and business processes specifications, and aid in large projects. The analyst will also work closely with IT development teams (CRM and Enterprise Data Mart) on projects intended to improve user experience and operational functionality; they must also work closely with SME’s to reconcile sales data between CRM and corporate systems of record. In addition, the analyst may assist in developing proposals for new policies and procedures, metrics, and for documenting process flows.

Responsibilities:
Specialize in collecting, organizing, and analyzing data from various systems
Develop an in-depth understanding of the interrelationships of data and multiple data domains
Create and maintain thorough documentation artifacts
Identify and document data migration paths and processes
Demonstrate commitment to providing customer-focused quality service
Develop and perform standard queries to ensure data quality, identify data inconsistencies, and missing data then resolve as needed
Standardize data naming, data definitions, and modeling
Perform data extraction, storage, manipulation, processing, and analysis
Collect, profile, collate, and map appropriate data for usage in new or existing solutions as well as for ongoing data analysis activities
Interpret customers’ functional and information needs and turn them into functional or data requirements, process models, etc.
Perform other duties as deemed relevant based upon experience
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent with 1 or more years of experience related to this position
1-3 years of demonstrated experience in data analysis, data manipulation, and decision support
Knowledge and application of relational database concepts
Experience or exposure to Extract/Transform/Load (ETL) and/or Business Intelligence
Greater than 1 year working in SQL
Experience completing technical design via iterative mockups
Several years experience using MS Office Suite (esp. Word and Excel)
Preferred Qualifications:
High-level knowledge of enterprise IT organizational, business, and technical environments
High aptitude in analytical and logical thinking
Demonstrated experience with data models and data mapping
Experience with ETL tools and procedures (any tool)
Prior experience working in the Cloud
Ability to perform ad-hoc analysis and maintain clear and comprehensive documentation of decision-making, data preparation, and processes
Openness to learning new skills and software as necessary
Demonstrated ability to manage simultaneous work flows while maintaining quality output and meeting deadlines
Demonstrated ability to learn new and exciting technologies with little assistance
Strong verbal and written communication skills with demonstrated ability to communicate at different levels of the organization
Demonstrated ability to produce highly detailed, comprehensive documentation artifacts
Client-focused attitude
Ability to analyze processes and recommend improvements as needed
We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. To that end, we seek to recruit, develop and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool.

Amplify is an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans and Individuals with Disabilities.

This position may be funded, in whole or in part, through American Recovery & Reinvestment Act funds.

Amplify Education, Inc. is an E-Verify participant.",3.7,"Amplify
3.7","Brooklyn, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
277,Data Analyst,$38k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join a team recognized for leadership, innovation and diversity


The future is what you make it. When you join Honeywell, you become a member of our global team of thinkers, innovators, dreamers and doers who make the things that make the future. That means changing the way we fly, fueling jets in an eco-friendly way, keeping buildings smart and safe and even making it possible to breathe on Mars. Working at Honeywell isnt just about developing cool things. Thats why all our employees enjoy access to dynamic career opportunities across different fields and industries.

Are you ready to help us make the future?

Join a company that is transforming from a traditional industrial company to a contemporary digital industrial business, harnessing the power of cloud, big data, analytics, Internet of Things, and design thinking. You will lead change that brings value to our customers, partners, and shareholders through the creation of innovative software and data-driven products and services. You will work with customers to identify their high value business questions and work through their data to search for answers. You will be responsible for working within Honeywell to identify opportunities for new growth and efficiency based on data analysis.

Key Responsibilities:

As a Data Analyst, you will be part of a team that delivers contemporary analytics solutions for the Data Management & Analytics function at Honeywell. You will build strong relationships with leadership to effectively deliver contemporary data analytics solutions and contribute directly to business success. You will develop solutions on various Database systems viz. Hive, Hadoop, SnowFlake, etc.

You will identify and implement process improvements and if you dont like to do the same thing twice, you will automate where possible. You are always keeping an eye on scalability, optimization, and process. You have worked with Big Data before, IoT data, SQL, Azure, AWS, SnowFlake

You will work on a team including scrum masters, product owners, data architects, data engineers/analyst, data scientists and DevOps. You and your team collaborate to build products from the idea phase through launch and beyond. The software you write makes it to production in sprints. Your team will be working on creating a new platform using your experience of APIs, microservices, and platform development.

YOU MUST HAVE
US Citizenship due to export control restrictions
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Mathematics, or other technical degree
4+ years of data engineering experience
2+ years in supply chain, materials planning, logistics/distribution, procurement, finance and/or order management.
WE VALUE
Should have developed and deployed complex big data ingestion jobs in Talend/Informatica BDM bringing prototypes to production on Hadoop/NoSQL/MPP platforms.
4+ years of hands on experience with MapReduce, Pig/Hive, Spark, etc. and automation of data flow using NiFi and Airflow/Oozie.
3+ years of experience in developing and building applications to process very large amounts of data (structured and unstructured), including streaming real-time data (Spark, R/Python, Scala, Kafka, Spark streaming or other such tools).
2+ years of experience in working with at least one NoSQL system (HBase, Cassandra, MongoDB etc.). In-depth knowledge of schema design to effectively tackle the requirement.
Experience in writing complex SQL statements
Experience in working with cloud-based deployments. Understanding of containers & container orchestration (Swarm or Kubernetes).
Hands on experience in Cloudera, Hortonworks and/or Cloud (AWS EMR, Azure Data Lake Storage) based Hadoop distributions.
Good understanding of branching, build, deployment, CI/CD methodologies such as Octopus and Bamboo
Experience working with in Agile Methodologies and Scrum Knowledge of software best practices, like Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Effective communication skills and succinct articulation
Experience in building advanced analytics solutions with data from enterprise systems like ERPs, CRMs, Marketing tools etc.
Experience with dimensional modeling, data warehousing and data mining
Experience with machine learning solutions and data science methods promotion
Database performance management and API development
Technology upgrade oversight
Experience with visualization software, Tableau preferred.
Understanding of best-in-class model and data configuration and development processes
Experience working with remote and global teams and cross team collaboration
Consistently makes timely decisions even in the face of complexity, balancing systematic analysis with decisiveness
Additional Information
JOB ID: req244867
Category: Information Technology
Location: 300 S. Tryon St, Suite 500 / 600,Charlotte,North Carolina,28202,United States
Exempt
Must be a US Citizen due to contractual requirements.
Global (ALL)

Honeywell is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to age, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, marital status, affectional or sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, nationality, sex, or veteran status.",3.7,"Honeywell
3.7","Charlotte, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,1885,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
278,Data Business Analyst,$40k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"POSITION TITLE

Data Business Analyst

LOCATION

Raleigh, NC

YOUR ROLE

Reporting to the Senior Manager, Enterprise Data Management, this business facing data business analyst role will spearhead the onboarding of reporting and analytics data requests, identify stakeholders, engages experts cross functionally, triages highly complex data issues, identifies impacts, analyzes, and effectively communicates progress at all levels. This function will also be responsible for working closely with governance lead, ensuring completeness, accuracy and conducting root cause analysis. This role is highly collaborative and will directly support the data modernization efforts and work closely with data scientists, stewards, enterprise analytics team members, and business SMEs.

YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES

Triages and onboards highly complex data requests and issues, assigning priority and timelines for resolution
Provides subject matter expert knowledge and consulting on data usage, techniques, and accuracy
Supports business units in the resolution of in-depth user questions and issues
Engages as data SME with teams during the designing, building and testing phases of projects to clarify business requirements
Work with the testers and IT to ensure that all data components are tested adequately
Collaborates with other data analysts, data scientists, and data engineers to ensure implementations in accordance with the business specification.
Continually improves the integrity of governance and data through delivery of validated, accurate sources
Identify meaningful outcomes and analytical support needs to develop high-value, actionable reporting, insights, and data recommendations aimed at continually improving the overall health of Genworth data
Identify data patterns, attribute hierarchies and data relationships and organize into data dictionaries, entity diagrams, helps to create standardized definitions for metrics and critical metrics as needed
Provides a strong understanding of mortgage insurance business processes and data needs as well as technology capabilities, and participates in filtering and prioritizing requests accordingly

YOUR QUALIFICATIONS

Bachelor's degree in mathematics, statistics, marketing, management information systems, or related field
5+ years hands-on experience analyzing, testing, and spearheading data standards
Exposure to ETL and data warehousing techniques
Experience with large-scale systems, BI, data mining, and statistical analysis tools
Experienced in user centered design, preferably experience with front-end customer facing systems. High regard for exceptional customer service.
Expert level analytical, strategic and problem-solving skills
Self-starter and results oriented, with a focus on quality and attention to detail.
Creative presentation skills for packaging analytics in a simple and actionable way for teams and leadership, along with effective and persuasive communication skills.
Experience working with agile teams and processes; ability to establish and handle multiple priorities with multiple deadlines, manage time effectively, and communicate expectations to stakeholders
Ability to thrive in a fast paced, dynamic, demanding, and fluid environment and contribute positive attitude and approach to projects
Ability to support the creation of single source of truth for performance monitoring leveraging agreed upon data definitions, create a common data foundation, and semantic layers to be consumed by business
Working knowledge of data governance dependencies on an enterprise analytics platform, including data quality, metadata management, and data catalog

ADDITIONAL QUALIFICATIONS

Insurance industry experience
5+ years project management experience, PMP certified preferred

WHY WORK AT GENWORTH

We have a real impact on the lives of the people we serve
We work on challenging and rewarding projects
We give back to the communities where we live
We offer competitive benefits including:
Medical, Dental, Vision, Flexible Spending Account options beginning your first day
20 days of Choice Time Off your first full year
11 Paid Holidays
40 hours of volunteer time off
401K Account with matching contributions
Tuition Reimbursement and Student Loan Repayment
Paid Family Leave
Child Care Subsidy Program

COMPANY

Genworth Financial, Inc. is a leading insurance holding company committed to helping families achieve the dream of home ownership and address the financial challenges of aging through its leadership positions in mortgage insurance and long-term care insurance. Headquartered in Richmond, Virginia, Genworth traces its roots back to 1871.

Genworth Mortgage Insurance, headquartered in Raleigh, North Carolina, is a global mortgage insurer with a major presence in the United States and Australia. With origins dating back to 1980, Genworth Mortgage Insurance provides primary mortgage guaranty insurance coverage on residential mortgage loans, as well as mortgage pool insurance policies that enhance insurance coverage for various types of mortgage-related securities. Our mortgage insurance can help individuals secure low down payment loans and realize the dream of home ownership faster – even for the first time.

We know we can’t deliver on our mission unless we deliver for our employees. That’s why we’re committed to creating a work environment that fosters diversity, inclusion, excellence, improvement and connection. We know each employee contributes in their own unique way and we’re dedicated to supporting every one of them to help them reach their full potential.",3.5,"Genworth
3.5","Raleigh, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
279,Data Analyst,$49k-$86k (Glassdoor Est.),"More than any other, insurance is an industry whose foundation is based on trust – to provide peace of mind. So it is essential that, above all, Berkley Select is a company defined by the attributes that engender trust and confidence among our brokers and agents, and their clients. Berkley Select is the result of bringing together two of the industry’s most respected names in professional liability insurance.

We are a leading provider of professional liability insurance products across a full spectrum of disciplines and industries, for clients of virtually every size and level of complexity.
As a Berkley company, we enjoy operational flexibility that allows us to deliver quality coverage solutions. Berkley Select clients have access to a creative team of dedicated underwriters and the resources of W. R. Berkley Corporation. All member insurance companies are rated A+ (Superior) by A.M. Best Company, and carry Standard & Poor’s Financial Rating of A+ (Strong).

We are looking for an experienced Data Analyst to join our Business Intelligence team. The ideal candidate has exceptional analytical skills and is adept at solving complex problems and creating elegant business solutions. The Data Analyst assesses basic information needs, designs studies, analyzes results and delivers key findings in support of business leaders. The Data Analyst, with considerable latitude for independent action and judgment, will analyze, design, build, publish, program, maintain, test, troubleshoot, and implement and maintain legacy reports and PowerBI dashboards. Work on multiple projects independently and larger team based projects. Position requires excellent SQL programming skills and experience with the Microsoft BI Stack (SQL Server 2017, SSRS, SSAS), Visual Studio, and PowerBI.
Code and design SSRS reports, end user dashboards and retrieve Ad hoc data sets from the business intelligence environment.
Collaborate in collecting to define functional requirements, document and contribute to technical design discussions
Provide estimates and plans for report initiatives as requests are obtained from different departments and company stakeholders
Ability to handle multiple tasks and support special projects needs simultaneously.
Use optimized SQL server queries to efficiently and quickly retrieve data. Work with the Data Delivery Team Lead on different methods of SSRS query design and to find solutions that meet the requestors needs.
Create and design reports as best-practice solutions that support business reporting tasks. This will be achieved in using different programs and software, such as SSRS, SSAS, Microsoft Excel, MS SQL Server, SharePoint and other tools.
Ability to work in a fast paced team environment and self-manage, work well under pressure meeting tight deadlines and possess excellent interpersonal skills to work well with employees at all levels.
Resolve and Troubleshoot Report and data issues reported by end-users or support desk.
Maintain a record of different reporting processes in place and help to improve Report team goals with regard to report and data management.

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, or at least 4 years of work-related experience
1-2 years of business intelligence experience building reports and/or dashboards
Insurance Industry Experience Highly Preferred
Required Experience:
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server 2017 tools and technologies (SSRS, SSAS)
Experience using data visualization tools (PowerBI or Tableau)
Strong analytical skills, able to translate complex business requirements into sound solutions
Demonstrates depth of knowledge in data modeling, data transformation & designing analytical data structures including tabular and multi-dimensional
Ability to work in a fast-paced, collaborative team environment
Excellent written and verbal communication skills and ability to express ideas clearly and concisely in good grammatical form, as well as effectiveness of expression in individual and group situations
An understanding of analysis and research with a basic understanding or dataset, programming, querying, report design and dashboard design required.
Experience with Power BI and/or Tableau
Experience developing multi-dimensional data models
Strong SQL skills with experience creating complex queries, building stored procedures, or creating views to support the data analysis requirements.",3.7,"Berkley
3.7","Chicago, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1967,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
280,Data Science Division - Research Analyst,$66k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tuesday, July 7, 2020

The Data Science Division works on projects to help the Department of the Navy and other government agencies to develop advanced analytics and algorithms for systems, sensors, networks, and platforms to ensure America's defense in the 21st century. DSD researchers have relevant experience (either in course work, previous job experience, or military experience) in programming, machine learning, model building, and data visualization.

CNA fosters an inclusive culture that values diverse backgrounds and perspectives. Our flexible and engaging work environment encourages iterative and creative collaboration at every stage of the problem solving process. Our employees are committed to helping clients develop effective solutions to better manage their programs through scientific, data-driven approaches.

We are looking for creative and innovative individuals to help carry out our mission.

JOB DESCRIPTION/DUTIES
Analysts in the Data Science Division work on projects to help the Department of the Navy and other government agencies develop advanced analytics and algorithms for systems, sensors, networks, and platforms to ensure America’s defense in the 21st century. Analysts will learn CNA's unique approach to analytics that combines an understanding of the technical capabilities with insights gained from up close and current experience with real-world military operations.
Serve as an important contributing team member on projects or lead smaller/less complex activities. Demonstrate analytical competence. 1. Develop sound analytic frameworks and associated analytic methodologies/ techniques for addressing both structured and unstructured problems. Consistently produce high quality analysis. 2. Develop and maintain broad, general institutional knowledge of primary clients/sponsors; their culture, organization, and issues. 3. Support business development efforts and/or marketing activities by maintaining strong client relationships through high quality work, increasing the visibility of our work, and other related activities such as proposal preparation. 4. Interact with sponsors/clients under the supervision of an experienced colleague, and with study POCs independently. 5. Make significant contributions to research publications and analytic products for individual projects. 6. Communicate results of work in a clear and concise fashion. Effectively communicate one-on-one and in groups. Document work efficiently and accurately. Effectively present work to colleagues, sponsors, and small audiences that are familiar with content. 7. Work with minimal or no guidance on focused, well-structured pieces of projects. Work under closer supervision on more complex, less-structured tasks. Serve as task lead for pieces of projects by managing own activities. May lead small projects under the supervision of an RTL/CMD. 8. Exhibit a positive attitude in interactions with colleagues and clients/sponsors. Provide clear guidance to colleagues on tasks. Take responsibility for own actions and outcomes. 9. Perform other duties as assigned.

JOB REQUIREMENTS
1. Education: Minimum Master’s degree in a relevant field (Data Science related field) or equivalent experience, PhD preferred. 2. Experience: Typical minimum requirements Ph.D. & 0+ years or Master’s & 2+ years of experience in research and analysis. 3. Skills: Ability to construct effective briefings using MS PowerPoint and intermediate skills with MS Word and Excel and other standard software packages. Ability to apply machine learning techniques, building models (statistical, mathematical, simulation, etc.) in programming languages such as R or Python. Ability to analyze complex datasets using effective visualizations of data in achieved results; skilled in programming, statistics, machine learning, and data visualization. Working knowledge of data and information management analysis techniques and best practices. 4. Other: Ability to obtain and maintain an Active Secret Security Clearance.

CNA is committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service and protected veterans, or other non-merit based factors. In addition to federal legal requirements, CNA complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. These protections extend to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting and hiring practices, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training and career development programs. For more information about EEO protections, please view the EEO is the law posters below: ""EEO is the Law"" Poster; ""EEO is the Law"" Poster Supplement. The pay transparency policy is available here: Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Poster

To be considered for hire, all individuals applying for positions with CNA are subject to a background investigation. For positions requiring access to classified information, U.S. citizenship is required. Individuals will also be subject to an additional government background investigation, and continued employment eligibility is contingent upon the ability to obtain and maintain an active security clearance.

Other details
Job Family
Research
Job Function
Career Path I - Research
Pay Type
Salary",3.3,"CNA Corporation
3.3","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
281,Data Analyst,-1,"About Kraken

Our mission is to accelerate the adoption of cryptocurrency so that you and the rest of the world can achieve financial freedom and inclusion. Founded in 2011 and with over 4 million clients, Kraken is one of the world's largest, most successful bitcoin exchanges and we're growing faster than ever. Our range of successful products are playing an important role in the mainstream adoption of crypto assets. We attract people who constantly push themselves to think differently and chart exciting new paths in a rapidly growing industry. Kraken is a diverse group of dreamers and doers who see value in being radically transparent. Let's change the way the world thinks about money! Join the revolution!

About the role

This is a fully remote role, we will consider applicants based in North America, South America and Europe

We are looking for Data Analysts who will play a key role in driving decision making in building cutting-edge products at Kraken. You will transform large datasets from complex systems, generate actionable insights and share the results with stakeholders at all levels of the company. You will partner and lead projects with product management, engineering, client engagement, finance and other enterprise level teams.

You are a self-starter, results driven and passionate to drive success of products at Kraken using the power of data analytics.
Responsibilities
Conduct data analysis and generate actionable insights and make recommendations for improving, developing and launching products
Communicate key results with self-serve tools (dashboards, analytics tools) for your product teams and key stakeholders
Develop and automate reporting of key performance indicators of various Kraken’s products and services at scale, solving for business priorities
Partner with product managers to design experiments to test hypothesis and help with idea generation and refinement
Collaborate with engineering teams and relevant stakeholders to build key datasets and data pipelines using Python/ETL frameworks
Be a data evangelist and help Kraken improve its products and services
Requirements
3+ years industry experience in data analytics field
Advanced knowledge of SQL, scripting languages and database concepts
A consistent track record of performing data analysis using scripting language (Python, Javascript, etc) and/or experience with a programming language (Java, Scala, Golang, etc)
Strong understanding of statistical concepts
Experience with BI Software (Superset / Tableau / etc)
Experience with big data tools (Hadoop, Presto, Spark, Druid, etc)
Familiarity with data warehouse development and best practices
The versatility and willingness to learn new technologies on the job
The ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences
Nice to have
Familiarity with cryptocurrency ecosystem
BA/BS or MA/MS degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Information Systems, Computer Science, Business Analytics, Data Science or related technical field
We’re powered by people from around the world with their own unique backgrounds and experiences. We value all Krakenites and their talents, contributions, and perspectives.

Check out all our open roles at https://jobs.lever.co/kraken. We’re excited to see what you’re made of.

Learn more about us:
Watch ""Working at Kraken""
Follow us on Twitter
Catch up on our blog
Follow us on LinkedIn",4.5,"Kraken Digital Asset Exchange
4.5",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
282,Data Analyst,-1,"Bread is a technology company that aims to transform the way the world shops online. We build tools, technologies and APIs that allow e-commerce merchants to integrate installment loan financing and other alternative payment products anywhere in their customers' shopping journey. Bread was started in 2014 by financial technology veterans, and has experienced explosive growth to date. We're backed by top investors including Menlo Ventures, Bessemer Venture Partners, Kinnevik, among others.

Are you passionate about data? Are you someone who prides yourself on your ability to use data to shape decisions around business strategy, product design, and profitability? The Analytics team at Bread is tasked with navigating and understanding Bread's vast first and third party data and works closely with management stakeholders across Product, Finance, Engineering, and other departments to ensure that we are making the best data-backed decisions we possibly can. As a key member of our growing team, you will report directly to our Lead Analyst and work on some of the most exciting, cross-functional projects at Bread. This role will involve: modeling new products and growth opportunities, deep-dive research into consumer conversion and repayment behavior, and revenue and profitability reporting among other responsibilities. You will be the ""data expert"" in the room and a key partner to every business team at Bread. This will involve both 'teaching them to fish' through coaching, reporting, and self-service tools, as well as 'fishing' by providing your own analysis and insights. This will originally be an individual contributor role, however, there may be opportunities to manage other analysts as the team grows.

Your role at Bread:
Build: Build and maintain the company's central Enterprise Data Warehouse to support Reporting, Analysis, Dimensional Modeling, and Data Development for internal and external stakeholders
Idea Generation: Analyzing both our B2B and B2C funnels, identifying weak points and brainstorming ways to improve UX, conversion, and profitability
Product Development and Testing: Collaborating with senior leadership across teams as a statistics expert on A/B tests
Research: Further Bread's understanding of our business and customers by deep diving into Bread's data, building predictive models, and writing research reports
Prioritization: Supporting company leadership, including the C-suite, to identify the highest ROI projects
What we are looking for:

Must Have:
2-4 years of experience analyzing product or customer data at a software company
BA in a quantitative field: Stats, Finance, Economics, Math, or Computer Sciences are preferred
Fluency in SQL and at least one functional programming language, especially Python or R
Evidenced knowledge of statistics, i.e. confidence intervals, linear regression, and hypothesis testing
Experience with funnels and event tracking software, i.e. Heap or Mixpanel
Effective interpersonal skills
Nice to Have:
Experience with any technologies in our analytics stack: Snowflake, PostgreSQL, DBT, Databricks and/or Spark, Airflow, Python, Github, Looker, and Docker
Experience in financial services or credit
Experience with web applications
Familiarity with other languages in our technology stack: Golang and Javascript
An advanced degree
Familiarity with survey data, software, and methods
Familiarity with an agile working environment",4.7,"Bread Finance
4.7",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
283,Data Analyst,-1,"Growing Insurance Software Company Seeks a Talented Business Analyst / Financial Analyst!

This Jobot Job is hosted by: Reed Kellick
Are you a fit? Easy Apply now by clicking the ""Apply Now"" button and sending us your resume.
Salary: $70,000 - $80,000

A bit about us:

Based in Philadelphia, we have built a cloud-based software platform for the insurance industry that is changing up the space. We have been around for about 10 years now, but we are still a small, agile team. We are currently looking to hire a FP&A Analyst / Accounting Analyst for our Philly location!

Why join us?
Competitive Base Salary Between $70k and $80k!
401k!
Bonuses!
Paid For Trips to California Twice a Year for Company Events!


Job Details

As a Software Analyst / Data Warehouse Analyst on our team, we are looking for:

Strong Excel background -- pivot tables, macros, etc.
Experience with XML / XSLT / JSON would be ideal
An accounting, finance, business intelligence, business analysis, or data analysis background
Good client-facing ability and willingness to interact with customers
Ability to communicate with engineers
APIs / Web Services experience would be preferred


Interested in hearing more? Easy Apply now by clicking the ""Apply Now"" button.",5.0,"Jobot
5.0","Philadelphia, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
284,Data Analyst,$35k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst, Fandango
Our ideal candidate is a sharp, thoughtful problem solver, who enjoys identifying key business levers and challenges, and then building analytical framework to impact strategic decision making.

What you'll do

Business Performance, Reporting and Visualization: Define KPIs, build automated dashboards, reports, and models to help teams make faster better decisions.

Deep-Dive Analysis: Analyze user behavioral data to identify patterns, uncover opportunities, and create common understanding of how people are interacting with the platform and content. Able to work effectively on sometimes ambiguous data and constructs within a fast-changing environment, tight deadlines and priority changes.

Forecasting and Opportunity Sizing: Set goals and help evaluate potential opportunities, this analyst will be tasked with forecasting and opportunity sizing. This will help business stakeholders evaluate trade-offs in different approaches and create targets for driving business performance.

Stakeholder management: Partner cross-functionally with product/marketing/Engineering to identify opportunities using data.

Qualifications/Requirements

Who you are

 2+ years of analytical experience with product or marketing analytics.
 Very Strong SQL and data visualization skills
 Experience with Python/R or other statistical programming language a plus
 Familiarity with data exploration and data visualization tools like Looker, Tableau
 Understanding of statistics concepts (e.g., hypothesis testing, regression analysis).
 Strong communication skills, as well as written and verbal presentation skills.

Sub-Business

Fandango

Career Level

Experienced

City

Beverly Hills

State/Province

California

Country

United States

About Us

At Fandango, we love movies. From showtimes and ticketing, to engaging content and innovations in movie going- we strive to deliver the perfect movie going experience—anytime, anywhere. And to be the go-to destination for moviegoers, we think it’s all about collaboration. Anyone can build a website or app, but it takes a special group across many disciplines to create an experience that can live across multiple platforms and connected devices. Thanks to an exceptional team, we’re working hard to make Fandango a little bit better every day. Our 30 million (and growing!) online and mobile monthly visitors can now buy movie tickets at over 25,000 screens nationwide and stay for exclusive trailers, our award-winning original video series, movie reviews, celebrity interviews and more. So, if you’re looking to inspire, be inspired and work at the intersection of entertainment and technology look no further than Fandango. Visit Fandango.com/careers for a behind-the-scenes look at Fandango and follow us on LinkedIn for the latest news and updates. Fandango is an NBCUniversal Company.

Notices

NBCUniversal’s policy is to provide equal employment opportunities to all applicants and employees without regard to race, color, religion, creed, gender, gender identity or expression, age, national origin or ancestry, citizenship, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, pregnancy, veteran status, membership in the uniformed services, genetic information, or any other basis protected by applicable law. NBCUniversal will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with relevant legal requirements, including the City of Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative For Hiring Ordinance, where applicable.",4.0,"NBCUniversal
4.0","Beverly Hills, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1906,Company - Public,TV Broadcast & Cable Networks,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1
285,Data Analyst,$44k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Job ID#:
2359

Job Category:
Behavioral Health (Promesa)

Position Type:
Full Time

Details:


Acacia Network, the leading Latino integrated care nonprofit in the nation, offers the community, from children to seniors, a pathway to behavioral and primary healthcare, housing, and empowerment. We are visionary leaders transforming the triple aim of high quality, great experience at a lower cost. Acacia champions a collaborative environment to deliver vital health, housing and community building services, work we have been doing since 1969. By hiring talented individuals like you, we’ve been able to expand quickly, with offices in Albany, Buffalo, Syracuse, Orlando, Tennessee, Maryland and Puerto Rico.

The Data Analyst is responsible for entering information into the Nextgen EHR, importing data results for analysis, analyzing data trends, completing QA/QI to improve program performance and outcomes based on trends and will be a member of the integrated treatment team. Under supervision of the Program Director, the requirements listed below represent the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities as defined by the ADA to perform the essential functions of the job. The functions below outline the general responsibilities associated with this position. Each of these functions is considered critical to effective department operations and our Mission. It is expected that all staff in this position will have satisfactory attendance and will perform these functions as assigned in a competent, cooperative, and timely manner. The Job Description will be reviewed periodically for accuracy and/or adjusted according to business necessity.


KEY ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Will enter all required data into Nextgen and run queries in SQL at the back end
Will run daily, weekly, monthly, and quarterly reports as per program needs and performance indicators.
Generates quality indicator reports from Nextgen database as requested and assigned by supervisor.
Maintains Data spreadsheet up-to-date by keeping all required data indicators as per program regulations by mapping from front end to back end and validating it.
Coordinates and maintains record of consumer participation in the program by conducting surveys, activities and integrating consumers to participate in activities as per program regulations.
Generates and inputs discharge and re-entry information for consumers on the Nextgen database as per program requirements and assigned by supervisor.
Participates in integrated team meetings, collects data information as per program requirements and maintain accuracy in data spreadsheet.
Complete quality improvement projects based on data trends.
Act as curator of new datasets, documenting and performing quality checks.
Completes all required training as per program regulations for entering consumer data and as assigned by supervisor.
Completes office duties as needed/required by Supervisor.
Completes additional tasks as assigned by Supervisor.

REQUIREMENTS:
College degree preferred
Knowledge of the Nextgen database and proficiency in SQL
Experience or desire to work with people who have a mental illness
Positive attitude and professional demeanor
A self starter
Ability to complete work independently as well as in collaboration with team members
Must be team oriented with a willingness to be flexible and helpful.
Excellent computer skills including, Microsoft Windows, Excel, PowerPoint, and electronic communications tools: internet and email
Ability to communicate effectively orally and in writing
Highly organized, motivated self-starter
Excellent time management skills.
Acacia Network is an equal opportunity employer*

Job Requirements


Already have an account? Log in here",3.3,"Acacia Network
3.3","Bronx, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1966,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
286,Data Analyst,$48k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Bigger challenges. Bolder ideas. Global impact. At Viasat, we’re on a mission to deliver connections with the capacity to change the world. We’re the company behind the world’s fastest satellite internet service, with technology that’s helping to bridge the digital divide and improve life for our customers around the globe. By providing powerful new ways for people to connect with one another, gain greater access to education, entertainment, medical research, commerce, and much more, our team is empowering millions of customers worldwide.

We’re looking for passionate, innovative professionals to join our team and connect the world to more. You’ll work in a collaborative and inclusive environment that values diverse perspectives and continuous learning, and provides industry-leading benefits with unmatched opportunities for career growth. Our team is fearless in pursuit of new ideas and uncompromising in our quest to become the world’s first truly global Internet Service Provider. Interested in joining our mission? Take a look at career opportunities at Viasat today.

Job Responsibilities

As a Data Analyst on the Quality team, you will provide analytics and insights into the manufacturing and quality systems in support of a wide range of functional groups. A

significant amount of this role’s responsibility is aggregating, cleansing, joining, and storing data from varied sources. The talented individual in this position will develop analytical models while automating reporting and bringing the data visualization to life by building dashboards for stakeholders to use. The Data Analyst will perform data analyses encompassing in a range of analytic capabilities including but not limited to: statistical analysis, regression, time-series analysis, control charting, simulation, and other mathematical techniques.

Parse and manipulate raw data leveraging tools including R, Python, Tableau, Alteryx, Pentaho or Informatic with a strong preference for Python
Analyze large data sets, while finding the truth in data, and develop efficient processes for data analysis and simple, elegant visualization
Identify improvement opportunities, proactively develop, produce, and track data quality reports, analyze data and report on trends
Determine root cause for data errors, make recommendations for long-term solutions, and implement fixes
Document data source management, monitoring, and continuous improvement processes and procedures
Develop and automate daily, monthly, quarterly reporting for multiple business areas within Viasat
Monitor big data with Business Intelligence tools, simulation, modeling, and statistics
Experience building intuitive and actionable dashboards and data visualizations that drive business decisions (Tableau or similar)
Act as a key point of contact for consulting with key stakeholders to ensure availability and continuously improve data quality and ensure business requirements are met
Undertake special projects or assignments as assigned

Requirements

3-5 years SQL experience
3-5 years data analysis experience with emphasis in reporting
2-3 years Python experience in data cleansing, statistics, and data visualization packages (i.e. pandas, scikit-learn, matplotlib, seaborn, plotly, etc.)
Strong statistics/SPC background
2-3 years Tableau experience or equivalent with data visualization tools
Background in data visualization and decision support leveraging open source libraries/packages and third-party tools (Tableau or similar)
Excellent judgment, critical-thinking, and decision-making skills; can balance attention to detail with swift execution
Able to identify stakeholders, build relationships, and influence others to drive progress
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills
Strong oral and written communication skills
Strong statistical background
BS/BA in a relevant subject
Up to 10% travel
US Citizenship is required
Preferences

Strong preference for personal projects and work in Python
Data Science experience
Alteryx experience preferred
Oracle EBS experience desired
Oracle Business Intelligence (OBIEE) highly preferred
Viasat is proud to be an equal opportunity employer, seeking to create a welcoming and diverse environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, genetics, age, or veteran status or any other applicable legally protected status or characteristic.",3.9,"ViaSat
3.9","Mesa, AZ",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1986,Company - Public,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
287,Data Analyst,$36k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Company

BlueLabs is a leading provider of analytics services and technology for government, business, and campaigns. Founded in 2013 by senior members of the Obama for America re-election campaign team, we help our clients optimize their engagements with individual customers, supporters and stakeholders to achieve their goals.

Today, our team counts over 40 data scientists, engineers, and strategists from diverse backgrounds who share a passion for using data to solve the world’s greatest social and analytical challenges. We’ve served more than 400 organizations ranging from political campaigns to advocacy groups, unions, government agencies, and international groups, as well as companies in the automotive, travel, consumer packaged goods, entertainment, healthcare, media, telecom, and other industries. Along the way, we’ve developed some of the most innovative tools available in analytics, media optimization, reporting, and influencer outreach.

Data Analyst

Data Analysts are instrumental members of BlueLabs Data Science and engagement teams. They gain exposure to all parts of our process, from collecting and organizing data, to analyzing trends and predicting outcomes, and working with clients to understand how these insights can be used to improve program efficiency. Data Analysts are able to work both as part of a team and independently, completing projects in a fast-paced environment, error-free, and on short deadlines. You will receive strong mentorship from senior members of the BlueLabs Data Science and Engagement teams, and also be given a chance to complete projects independently. BlueLabs Analysts have the opportunity to develop into the Data Science or Engagement tracks within BlueLabs.

What you'll do:
Analyzes data, as well as contributes to the design, implementation, and delivery of analytics products and services.
Builds predictive models, tools, and data visualizations.
Checks data and modeling results for quality and cleans, transforms, aggregates, and reports on data as needed.
Strives to support team excellence by documenting processes and evangelizing new approaches
Preferred Experience & Background
An undergraduate degree in a quantitative field or equivalent work experience.
Conceptual understanding of foundations of statistics and modeling (distributions, parameter estimation, confidence intervals and tests, etc.).
Proficient understanding of a statistical programming language such as R, Python, or Julia.
The ability to effectively communicate technical concepts to a non-technical audience, both in writing and verbally
The ability to manipulate data with SQL.
Experience building predictive models using regression and machine learning techniques.
Knowledge of experimental design and causal inference experience with GIS.
Experience creating informative and engaging data visualizations using industry leading tools.
The ability to create user interfaces for new products using frameworks such as Shiny or Django.
This position is available in DC, NY, & LA. We are currently accepting resumes and anticipate hiring for these positions in late winter/early spring of 2021.

At BlueLabs, we celebrate, support and thrive on differences. Not only do they benefit our services, products, and community, but most importantly, they are to the benefit of our team. Qualified people of all races, ethnicities, ages, sex, genders, sexual orientations, national origins, gender identities, marital status, religions, veterans statuses, and disabilities are strongly encouraged to apply. As an equal opportunity workplace and an affirmative action employer, BlueLabs is committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",4.7,"BlueLabs
4.7","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
288,Data Services Analyst,-1,"Data Services Analyst

Job Description:
Audit Electricity, Gas, Water, and other types of utility invoices using proprietary software
Key data into Excel spreadsheets
Utilize online logins to retrieve customer invoices
Become familiar with utility tariffs
Research and maintain utility tariffs
Verifying system performance and data accuracy (historical, quarterly and as requested)
Monitor, work through, and respond to emails
Load consumption reports of utility data using proprietary software
Provide daily status update related to work queue and tasks
Submit, track, and follow up on IT support tickets
Continuously review processes and software functionality for potential improvements.
Work on projects with others as needed
Once trained, able to work autonomously even in a remote environment if required (work from home)
Other tasks as directed
Skills and Traits:
Detail-oriented – takes pride in work and strives for accuracy
Intermediate level Excel skills
Formulas
Pivot tables
Macros
Reporting capabilities as needed
Proven research abilities
Ability to comprehend complicated documents
Big picture mindset – able to research problems while maintaining a focus on the problem at hand
Ability to multi-task effectively
Ability to interact effectively and professionally with both internal and external contacts
Ability to successfully counterbalance the need for speed with the need for accuracy
Responsible with the ability to work in a flexible work environment and stay motivated to complete work
Able to empathize, listen, and connect with others both socially and emotionally
Ability to remain focused during monotonous tasks
Strong time management and organizational skills
Must be able to self-motivate
Excellent problem-solving skills
Strong aptitude for math
Ability to work deadlines and to realize when extra time is needed
Willingness to work additional hours when needed
Bachelor’s degree required
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $40,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
We are currently working from home but plan to return to the office when possible

Experience:
customer: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Tulsa, OK 74120 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.thgenergy.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"THG Energy Solutions, LLC
4.4","Tulsa, OK",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
289,ERP Data Analyst,-1,"RealWear* is transforming how Real Work gets done. *RealWear* products, the HMT-1 and HMT-1Z1, are the world's first voice-driven, completely hands-free, head-mounted wearable computing devices. Implementing hardware, software, cloud, and AI, *RealWear* is the future of the connected industrial worker.
We are seeking an ERP Analyst who has experience working with NetSuite to develop and maintain our internal accounting and data tools, integrations, processes and reports.
About you: *
You have deep experience maintaining and designing solutions that help keep our business applications and data integrations up to date and working smoothly. You possess the aptitude to understand different systems at a technical level and the ability to connect and integrate those systems. You will also be required to gain an intimate understanding of the organization enabling you to suggest solutions to improve internal processes and gain efficiencies. You possess a strong drive to meet deadlines and have the ability to control a manage busy environments!
As a RealWear Employee, YOU are the key to our success. Come join our dynamic international team and be a part of our rapidly growing, successful business.
What you will own: *
Own the technical understanding, implementation, and maintenance of NetSuite
Work with the entire team to optimize NetSuite and automate manual tasks
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from clients with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Create, maintain and improve frontend reports based on user feedback while expanding features based on the product roadmap
Validate reports against existing client reporting systems
Document business requirements, organization and flow of data, methods and forms from multiple sources
Articulate high-level objectives provided by management into a viable process or procedure based on function
Lead efforts to ensure data integrity and security
Focus on company goals to drive internal system development
Experience: *
Bachelor’s Degree in BIT, Computer Science, Finance, Economics, Statistics
Must have a deep understanding of NetSuite
Experience with SharePoint for project tracking and reporting
Experience in supporting data integrations
Experience with process improvement and project management
Proven analytic skills, including extraction, evaluation, analysis, and visualization
Ability to communicate and closely work with both technical and non-technical teams.
Scripting experience with PowerBI, JavaScript, SQL, or other relevant technologies
Knowledge of internal risk management controls, and Standards of Conduct (SOC) guidelines and controls
Must have excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to multi-task with attention to detail
EEO/Affirmative Action Statement: *
RealWear is an equal opportunity employer. We welcome and encourage diversity in the workplace and strive to recruit, hire, train, and promote employees in job classifications without regard to race, color, gender, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, physical or mental disability, citizenship status, pregnancy, genetic information, or military or veteran's status. Employment decisions, such as compensation, benefits, transfers, layoffs, return from layoffs, training, Company-sponsored education, and social and recreational programs will be administered without discrimination. Employment decisions will be made with the goal of furthering the principle of equal employment opportunity.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
.

Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.realwear.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible",3.2,"Realwear
3.2","Vancouver, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
290,Data Analyst,-1,"Description:
Projection analyst for forecasting and other business needs
Manager will accept a fresh college graduate.
Must have experience working with sales data
This is a part time position 8 am to noon.
It does have potential to go perm. at that point it would be full time hours.
Comments updated: 6.5.20 could go permanent.
Minimum Required Qualifications:
Must have Power BI & Excel experience.
Bachelor’s degree in information science, data management or related field or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Excellent knowledge of Microsoft Office using Excel, Power BI, PowerPoint
Comfortable working in newly forming, ambiguous areas where learning and adaptability
The Sales Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting the sr. global sales analyst on developing, implementing and automating global sales reporting and analytical models in support of the EP/HF commercial organization.
The analyst will ensure the portfolio enhances organizational strategy and global sales operations management through successful, consistent, and predictable delivery of programs, projects and applications.
This role will be reporting to the Director of Global Sales Operations, EP & HF
Nice to have:
NOT a must, would be nice if they have experience with ETL , DW and medical device experience.
1-2 years working experience in the medical device or healthcare industry with strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Strong business acumen with the ability to translate information into relevant and actionable insights
Related work experience and knowledge of ETL, data warehouse, and business intelligence tools.
Candidate can start as soon as completed onboarding.",4.0,"Horizontal
4.0","Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
291,Senior Data Analyst,$45k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"_\*\*This position is located in Irvine, CA. Relocation assistance may be offered.\*\*_*
Looking for an innovative, creative, passionate, and fun company in OC? Then, let us introduce ourselves. We are MobilityWare and we make fun for a living! Our mobile games have been rocking the app store since its inception and we regularly show up in top lists for most popular games. We recently reached over 350 million downloads across our portfolio of games!

We've been voted 2015, 2016, 2017 & 2018 Best Places to Work in Orange County by the Orange County Business Journal and OC Register! Headquartered in Irvine, CA., our flagship game, Solitaire, was released on the day the App Store opened in 2008. Other titles include Blackjack, FreeCell, Destination Solitaire and Spider Solitaire, to name a few. Our vision is to create the most exciting mobile games and have fun doing it.
Position Summary*
As a Data Analyst, you will support the product team within depth analyses related to in-game activity, user behaviors, retention, funnel and monetization analysis, and provide insights to enhance the user experience. Your work will directly influence what features are built, prioritization of the roadmap and estimate expected return on these efforts. Youll be responsible for creating, monitoring and building dashboards, models and ad hoc analyses to support product efforts to drive user retention and in-game monetization. In addition to the product team, you will work closely with the DBAs, Marketing, and Monetization teams to create actionable insights.
Responsibilities*
Create in-depth analyses, tools and dashboards to highlight the in-game behaviors that drive revenue activities and user retention
Work with our marketing and product teams to deliver insights into user performance and make recommendations that enhance the user acquisition activities
Work as a key member of the BI team to support in-game analyses including review of events captured, troubleshooting data discrepancies, and anomalies
Work closely with the monetization team on continuous forecasting of various revenue models
Stay up to date on current and upcoming innovations and capabilities in the mobile gaming space
Qualifications*
3+ Years Work Experience in *gaming, mobile gaming or lifestyle app analytics*, including experience with building predictive models
Bachelors degree (advanced preferred) in a quantitative field such as Statistics, Math, Economics or in Computer Science with Modeling/Data Science coursework
Advanced SQL skills
Familiarity with relational databases, MS SQL, data transformation, data mining, and ad hoc analysis
Experience with statistical inference and advanced analytics techniques (A|B testing, ANOVA, regression, decision trees etc.)
Understanding of basic Data Engineering principles like ETL and data warehousing
Familiarity with customer data platforms (CDP) like deltaDNA, LeanPlum, TreasureData etc.
Ability to work productively with others in a highly collaborative manner
Why you should work for us: *
Awesome Perks: free lunch, free snacks, free drink, free Annual Company trip
Casual workplace - yes, flip flops and shorts are pretty much an everyday thing
Growth, growth, growth - we are growing and we would love for you to join us on the ride
We also want to take care of our team so we've got profit sharing incentives, medical, dental (100% paid), vision (100% paid), Unlimited PTO/Vacation, life insurance (100% paid), and 401K
Awesome office smack dab in the middle of OC and 2 minutes off the 5 freeway
Amazing talent: We've got some heavy hitters from the industry who embody both brilliance AND humility
\_Indeed Hire and Mobilityware are working together to find the best candidate for this job. *\_
_\*By applying, you agree to be contacted by our agent, Indeed Hire, and receive updates via text and phone about your application._\*

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
statistical inference: 3 years (Required)
Advanced analytics techniques: 3 years (Required)
relational databases: 3 years (Required)
building predictive models: 3 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
mobile gaming or lifestyle mobile app data analysis: 3 years (Required)",4.4,"Mobilityware
4.4","Dallas, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1990,Company - Private,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
292,Data Analyst,-1,"Downers Grove, Illinois
Skills : Alteryx ,Data Analysis,Tableau,Automate,SAP/SFDC
Description :
Senior Data Analyst

Duration : 6 to 9 M contract

Location : Downers Grove, IL

Description:


5+ years of experience as a data analyst working with Tableau data analysis and automation using Alteryx - Must have
Experience/knowledge with SAP/SFDC business terms
Analyses data and performs required transformations
Measure performance, identify choke points, exception paths, identify problem type, Alteryx automate data extraction/data de-duping, creation of output format, SAP/SFDC data knowledge
Should have excellent written and communication skills

Alteryx ,Data Analysis,Tableau,Automate,SAP/SFDC",4.1,"Collabera
4.1","Downers Grove, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1991,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
293,Data Analyst,$50k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Analyst is a dynamic position driven by the goal of delivering automated reporting of complex systems and data to achieve significant improvements in business visibility of trends and performance indicators. The ideal candidate for this role will lead discovery, design and testing sessions with cross functional business partners and stakeholders. In addition, the role is responsible for supporting data driven value analysis of top issues and business priorities. They collaborate with service operations data analysis teams while utilizing and leveraging Robotics Process Automation (RPA), Extract, Transform, Load (ETL) and Data Visualization tools such as Spotfire, AlterYX, and Thoughtonomy.

Role Responsibilities:
Work with product, service, and business process owners to execute RPA/ETL initiatives by connecting systems, analyzing and designing process workflows with multiple vested stakeholders; building, testing, and implementing RPA/ETL solutions; and ensuring quality of data usage, and standardization across projects.
Assist process owners in the construction of business cases to support the adoption of RPA/ETL solutions throughout the organization to ensure continuous identification of product quality and focus areas for investment and improvement.
Assist in the development of recommendations and solutions that are in-line with industry best practices.
Work with product and process owners (including product leaders, service teams, finance, quality, supply chain) to ensure knowledge, report/analysis handoffs are transferred with success.
Support stakeholders in managing project priorities, timelines, quality, budgets as well as end user relationships.
Support business and product leadership with top issue discovery of data, quality of existing systems and reports, and corrective actions to identify data driven projects for business and product quality performance and improvements.
Prioritize business needs and remain up to date with organizational goals.
Perform end to end validation on all finalized projects to ensure quality and compliance.
Maintain and update all data analysis models/tools as necessary to ensure accuracy and timeliness of reporting for our supported functions.
Partner with IT to develop permanent data connectors to improve the quality and efficiency of our analysis models.
Basic Qualifications
Bachelors Degree in Sciences or Business; Masters Degree in business or Data Analytics preferred.
5+ years of professional experience in Robotics Process Automation and/or Extract, Transform, Load tools.
Preferred Qualifications
Previous experience working analyzing end-to-end medical device manufacturing processes.
Previous experience working with ERP systems in support of a service organization.
Additional Preferred Skills
Ability to communicate, verbal and written, with all management levels.
Strong organization, project management and analytical skills, including the ability to identify trends and anomalies within statistical data.
Ability to work through complex situations in a fast-paced, unstructured environment.
Understanding of finance operations (revenue, labor costs, material costs, overhead, inventory, etc), preferred.
Understanding of IT data architectures, preferred
Experience with reporting in any or all of the following, a plus
SAP Intelligence
Spotfire
Tableau
Salesforce
Extensive Microsoft Office Experience.
Travel and office Requirements:
Must be able to travel both domestically and internationally up to approximately 20% of the time to other PKI sites.
For remote/virtual location, a home office with strong internet and cell phone or land line capabilities is a must.",3.3,"Perkinelmer
3.3","Waltham, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1937,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
294,Data Analyst,$43k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview
TekWissen Group is a workforce management provider throughout the USA and many other countries in the world. Our Client is a company operating a marketplace for consumers, sellers, and content creators. It offers merchandise and content purchased for resale from vendors and those offered by thirdparty sellers.
Responsibilities:
Design and build custom reporting and dashboards to support TES.
Run daily, weekly, monthly reports with an ongoing cadence to support the team with data to help with project execution.
Create reporting and metrics to facilitate analyses and drive data-driven decision making Own the development and maintenance of new and existing artifacts focused on the analysis of requirements, metrics, and reporting dashboards.
Report key insight trends, using statistical rigor to simplify and inform the larger team of noteworthy storylines. Deep dive into large data sets to answer key business questions using SQL, Excel, and other data manipulation languages.
Continually improve ongoing reporting and analysis processes, while automating or simplifying self-service support and access to authoritative data sets.
Partner with execution/business teams to consult, develop and implement KPIs, automated reporting/process solutions, and process improvements to meet business needs.
Prepare and deliver business requirements reviews to the senior management team regarding progress and roadblocks.
Own and perform individual deep-dive analyses, including communicating results and implications to leaders.
Generate weekly and monthly data reports for both internal and external business reviews.
Learn and understand a broad range of the client's data resources and know-how, when, and which to use and which not to use Translate complex or ambiguous business problem statements into analysis requirements Scale data processes and reports; write queries that clients can update themselves; lead work with data engineering for full-scale automation Participate in strategic and tactical planning discussions.
Excellent writing skills, to create artifacts easily digestible by business and tech partners.
To support this initiative, you must be able to think strategically, perform dive deep analytics, and communicate effectively with internal and external senior leadership. Excellent communication skills are required.

REQUIRED SKILLS
Bachelor's degree in Business, Engineering, Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or related field 3+ years of professional experience in a business analyst/data analyst/statistical analyst role
Expert-level skills in writing and optimizing SQL to handle extremely large datasets
Expert-level skills in excel and MS access
Experience in scripting languages for parsing and data analysis
Understanding of data warehousing and data modeling
Proficient and direct experience with one or more major data visualization tools including
Tableau/QuickSight/Power BI etc.

PREFERRED SKILLS
MBA or Master's Degree in a related field 5+ years of relevant experience in a business analyst/data analyst/statistical analysis role
Experience leading large-scale analytics projects with BI solutions development using AWS technologies Redshift, Athena, S3, EC2, Quicksight, etc
Proven success in designing and implementing ETL Pipelines, Query Performance Tuning, and other data engineering techniques
Self-driven and able to deliver on ambiguous projects with incomplete data Excellent communication (verbal and written) and able to effectively communicate with business and technical teams
Proven problem-solving skills, project management skills, attention to detail, ability to influence others, and exceptional organizational skills
Ability to deal with ambiguity and competing objectives in a fast paced environment

Top 3 must-have hard skills
Self-starter and quick learner. Only BA on the team so need to get started ASAP
3+ years of professional experience in a business analyst/data analyst/statistical analyst role
Creating dashboards in Tableau OR PowerBI OR QuickSite

TekWissen Group is an equal opportunity/affirmative action Employer (m/f/d/v) supporting workforce diversity.",4.3,"TekWissen LLC
4.3","Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
295,JPSC-8710 - Oracle Data Analysts,$43k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

Must have Healthcare experience

 Bachelor’s degree with 8+ years of work experience in data analysis and visualization.

 Experience in preparing and conducting extensive business analysis and studies, process

assessments, data analysis and cost benefit analysis in an effort to support data driven strategies.

 Minimum 4 years of experience working with healthcare data and helping businesses make better data driven decisions.

 Minimum 4 years of strong troubleshooting and problem-solving skills

 Experience with various data platforms.

 Proficiency in PL/SQL coding with ETL

 Willingness to participate in team on‐call rotation, and perform off hours work as needed.",4.5,"Avani Technology Solutions
4.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
296,Data Analyst,$30k-$53k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company: FedEx Services
Job Title: Data Analyst
Job Requisition Number: RC295967
Category: Decision Science & Analytics
Locations:
Collierville, Tennessee 38017
United States

Job Summary:
Under general supervision, designs and implements processes and solutions associated with a wide variety of data sets used for data/text mining, analysis to enable informed business decisions. Gains insight into key business problems and deliverables by applying statistical analysis techniques to examine structured and unstructured data from multiple disparate sources. Uses current and emerging technologies to evaluate trends and develop actionable insights and recommendations to management, via an increasing understanding of the business model and the information available for analysis. Typically uses data, statistical and quantitative analysis, and fact-based management to drive decision-making.

Job Roles and Responsibilities:

Interpret security log data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex log data sets.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Build data architecture, data integration, preprocessing & enrichment, master data management, data quality monitoring, and develop data dashboard.

Knowledge/Skills Considered a Plus:

Proven working experience as a Data Analyst or Business Data Analyst
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Familiar with at least one of these languages – Java, Python, or Perl.
Experience with one or more of the following: Hadoop, Splunk, Hive, NoSQL, Spark, Hive, Mahout, Impala, Pig, Cascading, Yarn,
knowledge in Cybersecurity, cloud platform (Azure or GCP)

Domicile:
Collierville, TN
The ability to work remotely may be available based on business needs

Relocation:
Relocation assistance may be available for this position based on business needs

Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in information systems, computer science, or a quantitative discipline such as mathematics, engineering, operations research, economics or Finance. Two (2) years work experience in measurement and analysis, quantitative business problem solving, operations analysis,marketing analysis, simulation development and/or predictive analytics. Proficient in analytics software and applications. Good interpersonal skills. Good written and oral communication skills.

Application Deadline / Criteria:
To be considered for this opening, upload current copy of Resume to include beginning and ending dates for each employer/position and answer job screening questionnaire by close of business (5:00 PM CST) on October 27th, 2020

Want a career where you are empowered to make a difference? Want to work for a company that is environmentally responsible? Want to grow and develop on the job? If so, FedEx is the place for you! Every day FedEx delivers for its customers with transportation and business solutions. FedEx serves more than 220 countries and territories around the globe. We can serve this global network due to our outstanding team of FedEx employees. FedEx has over 400,000 talented employees who are tasked with making every FedEx experience outstanding. FedEx has been recognized on many different lists both for business success and for being a great employer.

Here are some of the recognitions FedEx has received from the past couple of years:

Fortune ""World’s Most Admired Companies"" – 2019
Forbes ""Best Employers for Diversity"" - 2019
Reputation Institute ""World’s Most Reputable Companies"" – 2019
National Business Inclusion Consortium ""Best-of-the-Best Corporations for Inclusion"" - 2019
Women’s Business Enterprise National Council ""America’s Top Corporations for Women’s Business Enterprises"" - 2018
Corporate Responsibility Magazine ""100 Best Corporate Citizens"" – 2018
Black Enterprise ""50 Best Companies For Diversity"" – 2018

When 400,000 employees around the globe are all working together it is amazing what we can achieve! FedEx connects people and ideas. If you would like to make a difference on a global scale while receiving top notch benefits, competitive pay, and plenty of opportunities to develop, click ‘Apply’ and tell us more about yourself.

EEO Statement - FedEx is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer (minorities/females/disability/veterans) that is committed to diversifying its workforce.",3.4,"FedEx Services
3.4","Collierville, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Business Service Centers & Copy Shops,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
297,Data Analyst,$47k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:


We are seeking a self-motivated Data Analyst to provide technical and analytic support to a small, high-impact team. This is a developmental position with opportunities for career growth along a Data Science track. The position requires an active TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance.

The Data Analyst will be expected to work with Data Scientists to build statistical models, test hypotheses, and interpret, summarize, visualize, and succinctly report data findings. The Analyst may be required to leverage automation and machine learning models to manage data, predict scenarios, and make recommendations to a non-technical audience.

The Data Analyst will contribute to building new analytical tools in support of the IC customer, and will be expected to collaborate with team members in a highly technical environment. The Data Analyst will be expected to learn and leverage technical frameworks and collaboration technologies, including Amazon Web Service (AWS) and Git.

Requirements:
Experience with scripting in Python or R
Experience (either on-the-job or in an academic setting) working with data manipulation techniques and statistics
Knowledge of computer science concepts, data architecture, and common statistical models
Knowledge of all-source intelligence, including SIGINT, and/or HUMINT collection reports
Familiarity with cable writing styles and classified client databases, including specific targeting tools
Ability to communicate technical findings to non-technical audiences
Familiarity with key US foreign policy and national security Counterterrorism (CT) objectives
Knowledge of IC policies and procedures
Ability to work efficiently in a metrics-driven environment
Bachelor’s degree + a minimum of 4 years of experience
TS/SCI clearance with polygraph required
External Referral Bonus:
Eligible
Potential for Telework:
No
Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph
Travel:
No
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Day
Requisition Category:
Professional
Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
298,Data Analyst,$43k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you ready for an amazing career opportunity? Are you a data-driven problem solver?

As a Data Analyst at MealPal, you will drive meaningful insights to help inform the business strategy. You will manage weekly and monthly KPIs, build reports and dashboards, and create processes to ensure we use data to make impactful business decisions.

MealPal is a food startup based in NYC that empowers restaurants to build better businesses and users to eat more intelligently in 20 international markets. We offer users affordable lunches from the best restaurants in their city, all easily available to reserve and pick up through our mobile app.

Responsibilities:
Generate, maintain, and automate reporting
Mine data for answers to business challenges
Develop insights and recommend business strategy based on data
Share data in a digestible way with the entire company
Define best practices and new processes to collect, analyze, and manage data
Requirements
3-6 years of experience in prior data team role
SQL coding and advanced Excel skills
Logical, problem-solving mentality
Expertise in data models, database design development, and segmentation techniques
Strong communication skills
Benefits
Competitive base salary
Meaningful equity and the opportunity to build something
401(k) with Employer Match
Health, Vision, & Dental benefits (healthcare is 100% covered by MealPal)
Paid vacation time
Opportunity to work with a smart, passionate team",2.7,"MealPal
2.7","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
299,Data Analyst,$41k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company: FedEx Services
Job Title: Data Analyst
Job Requisition Number: RC294638
Category: Decision Science & Analytics
Locations:
Collierville, Tennessee 38017
United States

Job Summary: Under general supervision, designs and implements processes and solutions associated with a wide variety of data sets used for data/text mining, analysis to enable informed business decisions. Gains insight into key business problems and deliverables by applying statistical analysis techniques to examine structured and unstructured data from multiple disparate sources. Uses current and emerging technologies to evaluate trends and develop actionable insights and recommendations to management, via an increasing understanding of the business model and the information available for analysis. Typically uses data, statistical and quantitative analysis, and fact-based management to drive decision-making.

Job Specific Information: Act as a primary resource in one discipline, backup and assistant in others. Applying skills to supplement the overall team, such as such as product development, quality control, engineering design, analytics/reporting, hardware testing, analytical thinking, and technical writing. Support the manufacturing, production, inventory, and analytics of TRON/SenseAware hardware, plus 3D printing capabilities central to our hardware design process.

Abilities/Skills/Knowledge Considered a Plus
MS Office Tools (Excel, MS-Word, PowerPoint, Visio, etc.)
Inventory management skills
Technical writing skills
SQL and RDBMS query writing
Communications and reporting skills
Knowledge of electronic circuitry and component level design
Application of sensors and Internet of Things (IoT) technologies
Process Engineering
Statistical Process Control
Familiarity with embedded systems design, technology, and software
CAD / CAM Software such as SolidWorks, FreeCAD, Blender, AutoDesk Fusion, etc.
Additive Manufacturing engineering skills
Quality control methodologies
Manufacturing process development
Application of big data analytic tools to solve real-world problems
Scripting programming languages such as Python, PHP, VBScript, etc.
3D printing design and tools for usage in manufacture of electronics products
Domicile: This position will be domiciled in Collierville, Tennessee (suburb of Memphis, Tennessee).

Remote Work: The ability to work remotely within the United States may be available based on business need.

Relocation: Relocation assistance may be available based on business need.

Minimum Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in information systems, computer science, or a quantitative discipline such as mathematics, engineering, operations research, economics or Finance. Two (2) years work experience in measurement and analysis, quantitative business problem solving, operations analysis,marketing analysis, simulation development and/or predictive analytics. Proficient in analytics software and applications. Good interpersonal skills. Good written and oral communication skills.

Application Criteria: To be considered, please upload a copy of your current resume to include beginning and ending dates for each employer/position and answer job screening questionnaire by close of business (5:00 PM CST) on Monday, October 26, 2020.

Want a career where you are empowered to make a difference? Want to work for a company that is environmentally responsible? Want to grow and develop on the job? If so, FedEx is the place for you! Every day FedEx delivers for its customers with transportation and business solutions. FedEx serves more than 220 countries and territories around the globe. We can serve this global network due to our outstanding team of FedEx employees. FedEx has over 400,000 talented employees who are tasked with making every FedEx experience outstanding. FedEx has been recognized on many different lists both for business success and for being a great employer.

Here are some of the recognitions FedEx has received from the past couple of years:
Fortune ""World’s Most Admired Companies"" – 2019
Forbes ""Best Employers for Diversity"" - 2019
Reputation Institute ""World’s Most Reputable Companies"" – 2019
National Business Inclusion Consortium ""Best-of-the-Best Corporations for Inclusion"" - 2019
Women’s Business Enterprise National Council ""America’s Top Corporations for Women’s Business Enterprises"" - 2018
Corporate Responsibility Magazine ""100 Best Corporate Citizens"" – 2018
Black Enterprise ""50 Best Companies For Diversity"" – 2018
When 400,000 employees around the globe are all working together it is amazing what we can achieve! FedEx connects people and ideas. If you would like to make a difference on a global scale while receiving top notch benefits, competitive pay, and plenty of opportunities to develop, click ‘Apply’ and tell us more about yourself.

EEO Statement - FedEx is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer (minorities/females/disability/veterans) that is committed to diversifying its workforce.

, street_address=920 W. Poplar Ave",3.8,"FedEx
3.8","Collierville, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1973,Company - Public,Express Delivery Services,Transportation & Logistics,$10+ billion (USD),-1
